

ZETA RETICULI 

ETS 

  updated 6-22-10

 



Release 25


 
9-22-99 - I was arguing with myself about whether I thought I was always right or wrong. I said, "Let's find something else to worry about.  
VISIONS:

I saw a road with a farm field next to it and two teenager boys walking in the field.  

I saw these words:  ZETA RETICULI STAR SYSTEM with a big orb on the upper right.  

I then saw a computer web page url that ended STOP_SATAN.htm

 
 
In 1961, Betty and Barney Hill were abducted by aliens and taken aboard their spacecraft. During her abduction, Betty was shown a star map. She was asked by an alien to point out the Earth, but since Betty had no knowledge of astronomy, she couldn't reply. After her abduction, and under hypnotic regression Betty Hill drew the star map as accurately as possible. A few years later, Marjorie Fish built a few models of star systems using plastic balls and wire .. one of these models matched Betty Hill's diagram. The star system from which Betty had been told the aliens originated from was Zeta 2 Reticuli!  


http://www.nicap.dabsol.co.uk/hillmap.htm

http://www.gravitywarpdrive.com/Zeta_Reticuli_Incident.htm

The Betty Hill Star Map Controversy:   http://www.hillwilsonstarmap.com/

 
 
From the Extra Solar Planets Encylopedia   

 
The two stars, Zeta 1 and Zeta 2, are located in the southern constellation of Reticulum (the net) and are thus never visible to most of the northern hemisphere. Both are classed as old disk population II stars whose age is between six to eight billion years. There is every indication that both had a common origin and are part of a relatively near-by old moving group (or loose cluster) of stars which was first defined in 1958 and is known as the Zeta Hercules group. Zeta 1 Reticuli is separated from Zeta 2 Reticuli by at least 350 billion miles or about 100 times the Sun-Pluto distance. They may be even farther apart but, as just mentioned above, the available observations suggest they are moving through space together and are therefore physically associated. They probably require at least a 100,000 years to orbit around their common center of gravity.

Star      M[.sini]            Semi-maj.      Period       Ecc.       Inclin.       Radius 
             Jup. mass:(J)    Axis (AU)       years(y)                   (deg)       (Earth 
             Earth mass:(E)                        days(d)                                     rad.) 
 (note 1) 

zeta2      Ret 0.27(J)     0.14               18.9 (d)       0.            -               - 
 11 pc 
 G1V 
 V = 5.24



Now this big quarter of a Jupiter mass planet is in an orbit about Zeta 2 Reticuli which lasts 18.9 days and has a semi-major axis of 0.14 Astronomical Units. For comparison Mercury has a semi-major axis of 0.39 Astronomical Units (AU) [1.00 Astronomical Units = the distance of between the earth and the sun, about 93 million miles). Now assuming that this newly discovered planet is the closest one to Zeta 2 Ret (it's hard to imagine a closer one) then following Bode's Law (the law which states each planet is about twice the distance from it's sun as its inner neighbour) Reticulum 2 should be at 0.28 AU, Reticulum 3 should be at 0.56 AU and INTERESTINGLY Reticulum 4 would be at 1.12 AU in between the Earth's 1.00 AU and Mars's 1.52 AU, well within the lifezone of a G class star! Source : Joe LeSesne, E-mail : raver187@m-net.arbornet.org


FROM: http://www.mufor.org/zeta2ret.html

 
 

Alleged ‘Project’ sent U.S. military team to another planet?



Steve Hammons  

Steve Hammons is author of two novels about a secret joint-service U.S. Government research team investigating unusual phenomena. MISSION INTO LIGHT and the sequel LIGHT'S HAND introduce readers to the ten women and men of the "Joint Reconnaissance Study Group" and their exciting adventures exploring the unknown. Both novels are available from the Barnes & Noble Web site, bn.com. Hammons also serves as a research analyst at the open source intelligence (OSINT) Web site IntelDesk.com. Visit the home page of his novels at the link below for more information:  


In recent weeks, information has surfaced on the Web about an alleged U.S. Government military project called “Project SERPO.”

We’ve all heard about reports of unusual and unconventional secret government projects. Some of them seem so far out that you wonder if they are real or an “urban legend” floating around.

Yet, many of us understand that people within our government and our military sometimes face unusual and strange phenomena in the course of their duties.

According to a mysterious source’s comments on a recently-developed Web site, serpo.org, Project SERPO was an effort developed between the late 1940s and the mid-1960s. It was a joint project between the U.S. Government and a race of friendly beings from a planet in the Zeta Reticuli star system. The source claims that diplomatic relations were established between the U.S. Government and these beings after their spacecraft crashed in New Mexico in 1947.

Aw, give me a break, you may say. What have these people been smoking – medical cannabis or something?

We’ve heard and read about unconventional government projects before such as “remote viewing” intelligence-gathering methods, time-travel physics research, psychological studies on “magic mushrooms,” unusual non-lethal weapons and similar efforts. But relations with visitors from another planet?

That’s not all. Information on the SERPO Web site describes a project that selected and trained a joint-service U.S. military team to board a spacecraft of these visitors and go to their home planet for a planned ten-year stay. And, that in the mid-60s, this was successfully accomplished. Most of the team members returned and were debriefed.

Remember the movie “Close Encounters of the Third Kind?” Remember when the government teams set up a landing zone for the “visitors” and how Army Special Forces personnel assisted with covert logistics? Remember how 12 people in red jumpsuits were transported to the LZ for boarding? The entries on serpo.org allege that this is based on fact.

In addition, the information posted there and elsewhere indicates that the government has been struggling since the 1940s to figure out how to break this kind of information to the general public without creating anxiety and negative disruption. According to the information, various efforts have been underway over the decades to gradually prepare us for this reality.

Well, do you buy it? It would make a good novel or movie, that’s for sure. Is it possibly true or is it just someone’s imagination and a bunch of warmed-over stories from movies, writings and UFO lore?

If there was some truth to it, how would Americans and the rest of humankind react? Would we have open minds and hearts toward friendly visitors? Would we be afraid? Would we feel intimidated if they had more advanced technology and knowledge? Would we hate them because they look different and have different beliefs?

Undoubtedly, it would add more complexity to our view of things. Not only do we have trouble getting along with other countries and other people who are different, now we would really need to be tolerant and open-minded. And, are their other kinds of "visitors" who are not quite so friendly, or even dangerous in some way?

This could explain why our government officials might have thought it wise to keep information like this from the general public.

According to information on the serpo.org site, there are responsible people in and out of government who may now believe that the time is right for more gradual disclosure of information about this situation. These people, people with compassion and vision, could feel that we might now be ready to obtain some understanding of the situation and react responsibly and with intelligence.

Of course, it could all be bunk. There may be no truth to it at all. Probably not. Right?

FROM: http://www.americanchronicle.com/articles/viewArticle.asp?articleID=4163

 
 
11-24-05  
Hi Bill,

 Good points, I would see propositions 2 or 3 for Anon as the most likely.
 As for Strawberry ice cream? See, http://www.ufoconspiracy.com/reports/strawberries_boost_performance.htm

 And, yes, you're right, they can manipulate space-time but not for time travel as you mentioned. It's been a hypothesis by some I've talk to that the Aliens are able speed time up or down using a Space-time bubble which is why they can go through walls and windows as reported. This is not NEW Physics. It is the ability to manipulate the laws of Physics. Many people see this manipulation as some new law which it isn't....Have a nice one.....Robert C

 Bill Ryan wrote:

Nearly 50 years ago, Eric Frank Russell wrote “Allamagoosa”, the funniest science fiction short story it’s ever been my delight to read. In this exquisite little tale, the captain of a space cruiser is notified that there is to be a mandatory routine inventory inspection. It’s a hassle, but he must comply. After days of work, everything is accounted for except for one item, which reads simply: “offog, one”.

No-one can explain the offog and no-one has a clue what it is. Fearful of admitting to his superiors that the item has been lost, he fabricates a little white lie that he’s awfully sorry, but the offog had disintegrated in a hyperspace jump. The story ends with the captain staring at an urgent telex recalling every ship in the galactic fleet – at a cost of trillions of dollars – pending an investigation into the disintegration of the ship’s official dog.

 So what’s a “DIN”? Here is another “gross consistency”. It rings true that Anon reports this faithfully but does not know what it is. Neither do I: I’ve been staring at my keyboard looking at every combination of typos (like the offog), to no avail. It may well be an acronym – but what for? Maybe the ex-military list members might guess what it is. Furthermore, we need to know if it’s a D.I.N., DIN, a Din, or a din. Can Anon clarify?

 Here’s one more.

 In Dan Sherman’s book, “Above Black”, in which he reveals how he was groomed and trained as a telepathic communicator with a race of ETs whom he received information from and about but never actually met, Sherman states that he learned that 'time' – as we humans know it – does not have the same meaning for "them". They still age as we do but are not bound by the physics of time as we currently are. Their means of travel across vast distances is heavily dependent on the manipulation of time but not as we perceive it.

 Sherman asked if they can travel through time: e.g., can they go backward-or-forward in time? He was told that it was not possible to witness a reality that occurred in some other time but the present. In order to go back in time, one must assume that there exists a reference point from which to measure backward or forward. This is an impossibility. Essentially, they weren't able to travel through time but around time and from time. Sherman says he never really understood what this meant. Their mode of propulsion was somehow that they used “time" and electromagnetic energy. Also they said that our sun was very unique; and that someday we would understand how it really worked and how we could utilize the same methods that they themselves use but on a smaller scale.

 (references: http://www.stealthskater.com/Documents/Sherman_1.doc, http://www.aboveblack.com%29/

 There are other candidates for “gross consistencies”, but I’ll keep my powder dry for the moment. I’m noting them carefully. The problem, of course, with these is that they might also be reasons to dismiss everything. It’s like strawberry ice cream. I lean to thinking that (like the anomalous orbital data) that’s so absurd it has to be true, because no-one would dare invent it. The false information component of disinformation has to be credible for the purpose of the disinformation to be achieved.

 Logically there are four possibilities:
 1)  Anon is a pathological prankster and the reported data is either all invented or clumsily culled from other sources and added to a wild novelistic story.
 2)  Anon is operating to an agenda and the information is deliberately distorted, but contains a core of extraordinary truth.
 3)  Anon is doing his best to report data from an indirect source (personal notes, his own short or long term memory, or another person), but accidental errors, omissions and additions have occurred.
 4)  Anon is reporting everything faithfully and accurately as best he can present it.

 Only possibility (1) means everything should be rejected. The other three necessarily mean that the story deserves close attention. Victor/Anon, keep it all coming.

 Best wishes to all – Bill


 ~~~~~~~  
Enilil and Enki (Stargate)  is only the story of Gilgamesh, the Sumerian epic rehashed. 'According to Sumerian texts' is to
 misrepresent the situation.
 Kelly

   I beg to dream and differ from the hollow lies 
   This is the dawning of the rest of our lives
 -Holiday, Green Day
 ('This song isn't anti-American, it's anti-WAR')

 On Nov 21, 2005, at 11:14 AM, Dee777@aol.com wrote:

 > In a message dated 11/21/2005 5:03:29 AM Pacific Standard Time,
 > bill.ryan@virgin.net writes:
 >> So what’s a “DIN”? Here is another “gross consistency”. It rings true that Anon reports this faithfully but does not know what it is.
 >> Neither do I: I’ve been staring at my keyboard looking at every combination of typos (like the offog), to no avail. It may well be an
 >> acronym – but what for? Maybe the ex-military list members might guess what it is. Furthermore, we need to know if it’s a D.I.N., >>DIN, a Din, or a din. Can Anon clarify? E.din, Land of Righteousness In ancient E.din we find our creation, our Creator. Through >>the calendar of Appointed Time at Giza the ancients gave us the addressees of a message, ...
 >> www.edinnet.com/
 >  
 > The Real Story Behind The Movie Stargate. 2
 > Sitchin's book called "The Twelfth Planet" tells about this. ... E.DIN was Enlil's domain and contained a spaceport that shipped the gold to a permanent ...
 > www.think-aboutit.com/Spiritual/ real_story_behind_the_movie_star2.htm
 >  
 > The Cosmic Code - Hidden Mysteries
 > ... recorded the even in the tale of Adam and Eve in the Garden of Eden (the Sumerian E.DIN), ... author: Zecharia Sitchin. paperback
 > Price: $7.99+shipping ...
 > www.hiddenmysteries.com/item200/item244.html
 >  
 > Adam and Eve
 > After a long period of time (Sitchin reckons the date as 300000 BCE),  According to the Sumerian texts, Enlil created an E.DIN, a special place where new ...
 > www.halexandria.org/dward191.htm
 >  
 > Dee

 ~~~~~~~~


For what's it worth. Origin of the word SERPO.  

   

---------------------------------------------------------------  

Sarpa (Sanskrit) [from the verbal root srip to wriggle, creep, crawl] Serpent; the serpent has ever symbolized in occultism wisdom, immortality -- therefore renewed birth -- and secret knowledge; hence sarpa is applied to an initiate, as is naga (Sanskrit serpent). "There is a notable difference esoterically between the words Sarpa and Naga, though they are both used indiscriminately. Sarpa (serpent) is from the root Srip, serpo serpo to creep; and they are called 'Ahi,' from Ha, to abandon. 'The sarpa was produced from Brahma's hair, which, owing to his fright at beholding the Yakshas, whom he had created horrible to behold, fell off from the head, each hair becoming a serpent. They are called Sarpa from their creeping and Ahi because they had deserted the head' (Wilson). But the Nagas, their serpent's tail notwithstanding, do not creep, but manage to walk, run and fight in the allegories" (SD 2:181-2n).  

   

Sarpa was the original Sanskrit term for a snake or serpent, whereas naga, although likewise signifying a snake or serpent -- which it does consistently throughout the range of Sanskrit literature -- nevertheless early became identified in mystical thought with initiates because of their power of casting off physical body after physical body almost at will. Both terms therefore signify serpent or snake, and both later were used almost indiscriminately to signify initiates; nevertheless, because of habit or use, naga is the more common term for a full initiate, sarpa in this sense being of less frequent usage.  

   

Just as the forces of nature are in themselves neutral, and become "good" or "bad" as they are used by individuals, similarly so is a symbol usable in a good or a bad sense. In the use of nagas and sarpas, the Brothers of Light are properly called nagas, and the Brothers of Darkness are more properly called sarpas, as the root srip which means to wriggle, hence to insinuate, to creep in by stealth and deceive. Both the Brothers of Light and of Darkness are focuses of power, subtlety, wisdom, and knowledge; in the one case rightly and nobly applied, and in the other wrongly applied. The former are the nagas or serpents of light: subtle, wise, and with power to cast off the garment or vehicle when the body has grown old and to assume another at will. The latter are more strictly the sarpas or serpents of darkness, insinuating, worldly wise, selfishly shrewd, deceitful, venomous, and dangerous, and yet possessing the same powers, but in less degree, and using them wrongly, thus deceiving human hearts and succeeding in their work often by lies and misrepresentations. Nevertheless, precisely because nagas and sarpas are used almost indiscriminately, either word may apply both to the servants of light or of darkness.  

-----------------------------------------------------------------------  


Sent: Monday, November 21, 2005 2:14 PM  

Subject: Re: Allamagoosa (and Dan Sherman)
 


In a message dated 11/21/2005 5:03:29 AM Pacific Standard Time, bill.ryan@virgin.net writes:  

So what’s a “DIN”? Here is another “gross consistency”. It rings true that Anon reports this faithfully but does not know what it is. Neither do I: I’ve been staring at my keyboard looking at every combination of typos (like the offog), to no avail. It may well be an acronym – but what for? Maybe the ex-military list members might guess what it is. Furthermore, we need to know if it’s a D.I.N., DIN, a Din, or a din. Can Anon clarify?  

E.din, Land of Righteousness  
In ancient E.din we find our creation, our Creator. Through the calendar of Appointed Time at Giza the ancients gave us the addressees of a message, ...
www.edinnet.com/ 

   

The Real Story Behind The Movie Stargate. 2  
Sitchin's book called "The Twelfth Planet" tells about this. ... E.DIN was Enlil's domain and contained a spaceport that shipped the gold to a permanent ...
www.think-aboutit.com/Spiritual/ real_story_behind_the_movie_star2.htm 

   

The Cosmic Code - Hidden Mysteries  
... recorded the even in the tale of Adam and Eve in the Garden of Eden (the Sumerian E.DIN), ... author: Zecharia Sitchin. paperback Price: $7.99+shipping ...
www.hiddenmysteries.com/item200/item244.html 

   

Adam and Eve  

After a long period of time (Sitchin reckons the date as 300000 BCE), ... According to the Sumerian texts, Enlil created an E.DIN, a special place where new ...
www.halexandria.org/dward191.htm  

   

Dee  
 

   
 

Aloha Don and Robert,
 From Dr. Salla  
12-16-05 

 I'd like to point out that the completion of an affidavit does have legal status that helps clarify issues considerably when it comes to a 
 witness's alleged activities and their credibility. This makes it easier for researchers to reach accurate conclusions in complex cases 
 like Project Serpo and Dan Burisch which contain numerous claims, and are almost certainly seeded with disinformation. In the case 
 of Philip Corso, he completed an affidavit with Peter Gersten to be on the record for a CAUS action against the U.S. Army to learn the 
 truth about the Roswell crash. I attach a copy a Corso's affidavit below.  

   

While an affidavit doesn't prove the truth of the alleged witness's claims, it at least is a formal record that can be used to assess the 
 credibility of the witness and to weed out possible disinformation. From a researchers perspective, an affidavit is stronger than hearsay 
 testimony that can be easily  changed or seeded with disinformation. So far what I have seen concerning Project Serpo is much hearsay 
 testimony. I think Don makes a good point that those supporting the veracity of the Planet Serpo story might have greater credibility 
 if they came forward with affidavits. These affidavits could then be forwarded to Bill Ryan as part of the official record on the website 
 he has created. To make this more of a legal process, the affidavits might be collected as part of an effort to initiate a Congressional 
 investigation into the Project Serpo affair.  

   

In peace  

   

Michael Salla  

   

***Peter A. Gersten, Esq.
 Attorney for Plaintiff
 Arizona Bar #016925
 Sedona, Arizona 86351    
UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT
 THE DISTRICT OF ARIZONA   


CITIZENS AGAINST UFO SECRECY, INC.
 7349 Via Paseo Del Sur #515-194
 Scottsdale, Arizona 85258
 (602) 818-8248

Plaintiff,   

v.

 

DEPARTMENT OF ARMY

Defendant,  
 
)
 )
 )
 )         CIV98-0538PHXROS
 )
 )
 )                    AFFIDAVIT
 )               
)
)
 )
 )
)
 )
 

 

       I, Col. Philip J. Corso, (Ret.) do hereby swear, under the penalties of perjury, that the following statements are true:   

       That at all times hereinafter mentioned, I was a member and officer of the defendant.   

       That during my tenure with the defendant I was a member of President Eisenhower’s National Security Council and 
 former head of the Foreign Technology Desk at defendant’s Research & Development department.   

       That on or about July 6, 1947, while stationed at Fort Riley, Kansas, I personally observed a four-foot non-human 
 creature with bizarre-looking four-fingered hands, thin legs and feet, and an oversized incandescent light bulb-shaped 
 head. The eye sockets were oversized and almond shaped and pointed down to its tiny nose. The creature’s skull was 
 overgrown to the point where all its facial features were arranged frontally, occupying only a small circle on the lower 
 part of the head. There were no eyebrows or any indications of facial hair. The creature had only a tiny flat slit for a 
 mouth and it was completely closed, resembling more of a crease or indentation between the nose and the bottom 
 of the chinless skull than a fully functioning orifice.   

       That in 1961, I came into possession of what I refer to as the ‘Roswell File.’ This file contained field reports, medical 
 autopsy reports and technological debris from the crash an extraterrestrial vehicle in Roswell, New Mexico in 1947.  

       That I have personally read the medical autopsy reports which refer to the autopsy of the previously described 
 creature that I saw in 1947 at Fort Riley, Kansas.   

       That said autopsy reports indicated the autopsy was performed at Walter Reed Hospital, which was under the 
 authority of the defendant at the time of the autopsy.   

       That said autopsy report referred to the creature as an ‘extraterrestrial biological entity.’  
__________________________   

Colonel Philip J. Corso (ret.)   

Sworn before me
 this day of ___ May, 1998.   

  On 12/16/05,    
 <Figaro@gemair.com> wrote:  
Dear Don
 
 This has been said many times but, Gene Loscowski, Paul McGovern, Rick Doty, Ed Doty and a retired AF 
 Colonel in DC known to Bill Ryan have all said the SERPO story is true. That makes 5 to your one. They all 
 worked at Area 51 at some point. Paul McGovern says he worked with these Aliens and there is no Clean 
 Sphere or sick Alien, it's bogus he says......  
Best...   

 Robert C  

 Don Deppeller wrote:    
 Dear Robert;  

    

 I'm taking the liberty of copying our ongoing debate with the rest of the 'list' that brought the Serpo story to my attention, 
 and my subsequent replies that contrasted that story (which Dan has gone on record to describe as a disinfo op "dress 
 rehearsal") with Dan's Affidavit, which we are currently wrangling over.  I think you have raised the sorts of questions 
 which many in the 'mainstream' will raise when they are confronted with Dan's debriefing and Disclosure announcement
  next year, and so this is an opportunity for others to weigh in (hopefully with courtesy) and also learn from.  Even if our 
 dialog ends with today's responses, I trust they have been illustrative to the list.  

    

 Regards,  

    

 Don  

    

 ________________  
Following my initial email introduction to this list, Robert replied:  

    

 Dear Don,

 Thank you for all your fine words but I'll cut the chase here. A couple questions, who else knows about this "Clean 
 Sphere?"  Please supply us with names so Mr Doty can check those names.. And, do you really think that an Affidavit 
 will demonstrate  any real sincerity from the person who signed it? Does in fact such an Affidavit really show proof of 
 anything?

 Regards
 
 Robert Collins  

 --------------------------------------------------------  

    


 Dear Robert,  

    

 The many that know about the "Clean Sphere" and how it was constructed (I myself have seen a huge and detailed diagram/"artist's  rendition" notated by those familiar with it) will be involved in Dan's ongoing debriefing.  There will be quite a bit about the "Clean Sphere" not only in the debriefing but in the documentary that will be focusing on Dan's time with the J-rod.  I'm not going to force Dan's hand here; he has a specific timetable, and the world will find out together.  When it does, it will have more than enough corroborative information that it won't need anyone to 'investigate'; all of that will have been done to the nth degree.  Hence the long  delay.  

    

 As for whether an Affidavit demonstrates sincerity; legally, an affidavit is 'presumptively correct'.  That means that it  is considered absolutely true until someone can come along and disprove it, which would warrant legal charges of perjury  on the person swearing to the Affidavit.  Dan alludes to this in his response to Rick.  So yes, it demonstrates sincerity.  Dan is and was fully prepared to be cross-examined by the Crown or Congress, depending on where the Affidavit ends up.  

    

 One of the reasons for having 2 former members of Majestic there as secondary witnesses to the signer of the Affidavit during cross-examination is in the event the one tack is used that could undercut such an historic statement, which is that the deponent is 'insane' or otherwise too mentally ill to swear to a truthful statement.  The additional 2 witnesses will attest to Dan's   "sanity, sobriety, efficacy, authenticity, honesty and truthfulness".  We also have a copy of Dan's psychiatric evaluation, just as the Court had asked for mine.  Seemingly-fantastic claims require equally-demonstrative sanity and sobriety; hence the Dept of Justice's squirming to avoid having to cross-examine Dan.   

    

 Hope that helped.  

    

 Regards,  

 Don  

    

 -----------------------------------------------------------  

    

 Dear Don,

 Who are these many people? I'm sure Mr Doty would love to hear from them. He'd probably love getting a copy of your  "construction  diagram" for his investigation. As for the Affidavit if you presume it's correct I can assure you others don't feel the same way. And, who are these so called two former Majestic members?
  
 Regards  


    

 Robert Collins  

    

 ------------------------------------------------------------  

    

 Dear Robert,  

    

 Let me emphasize that Dan's debriefing will have copious amounts of data regarding the "Clean Sphere".  Mr. Knapp has attempted to force the issue by running his first show on Dan recently, but as you've heard Dan won't be forced to reveal these things before the right time.  Because all of the data along with the personnel allowed to speak openly will be included in the  debriefing, there's no need for Rick or anyone else to try to 'investigate' that which will be fully and thoroughly vetted with all manner of corroboration when the job is complete.  

    

 Again, on the matter of the Affidavit; American jurisprudence contains the concept of 'presumptively correct' when it comes to oaths made in affidavits.  That is, you can run from it, hide from it, and shrilly pout 'it can't be true', but an affidavit is indeed "presumptively correct" and accepted as truthful until tested.  The same holds true in Canada, but up here there is a more  selective application of precedence; here, the concept is known as 'fundamental justice', whereby an eyewitness who swears to a fact or set of facts is presumed truthful (until proven perjurious) simply because without that assumption, swearing a legal oath would mean nothing.  Sorry, that IS the law.  People may not like it because of the implications, but the flip side of that  coin is that if you are able to prove that the facts sworn  to are fraudulent, that the oath was made with intention to deceive, then the original deponent is up for some SERIOUS charges of perjury.  Dan would not have agreed to the terms I outlined in that first Form 255 if he were lying, knowing that he could be jailed for up to 20 years for perjury if a skillful lawyer was able to prove he lied.   

    

 You may want to check with a good lawyer friend to ask about the concept of 'presumptively correct', since without that concept, no eyewitness evidence would hold water in any civil OR criminal proceeding.  

   

 Regards,  
 
Don  

   

---------------------------------------------------------------  

   

Dear Don,

 Heard all that before. In fact I've heard the same type of stories going back years about the "right time." Sorry Don but   this sounds like  politics as usual. Yes, there are good reasons for an independent investigation. And again, as for the Affidavit you may say all that but you'd have to force the issue of perjury and perjury over Aliens would get laughed out of court.

 Regards

 Robert C  
 ----------------------------------------------------------------  

   


 Dear Robert;  

    

 Then let me parse it for you.  You've heard what "same type of stories"?  About a J-rod?  Hadn't you just asked me about who else is talking about J-rods and a "Clean Sphere"?  Or simply that the truth would come out at the "right time"?  Yes, it's frustrating, but I know for a fact that over 100 hours of video has been taken of Dan telling in explicit detail and methodically virtually every facet of his time working for Majestic and in particular the J-rod.  I know that Dan and his 'team' (not to confused with those of us 'outsiders' who are merely following the 'saga') have been gathering tons of corroborative data, setting up meetings with the relevant folks who can validate Dan in virtually every walk of life, collecting the flotsam and jetsam that puts flesh on the whole thing ( e.g. spare parts for the enclosed 'scooters' that were used to transport the ET dignitaries from   their flying craft to the inside of the facilities where the  treaty negotiations took place), etc.  There is a definite date for the Disclosure announcement during 2006, and a not-so-definite time- frame for the release of the contents of the debriefing (Dan thinks it can be accomplished fairly early, say even February, whereas his team members feel that it may take until April or May).  In fact, this is even recounted in general terms on at least one surveillance tape of their meetings held in Las Vegas that was sent to me.  So, to answer your allusion, it will NOT be as vague as  "sometime in the future".   

   

 It's my understanding too that there will be a number of earth changes and related phenomenon that will aid in validating the timing.  

    

 As for the Affidavit, once again; the challenge is for others to take up the gauntlet and press the issue upon the relevant authorities.  That Affidavit is only 'presumptively correct' in a court of appeal for my personal immigration case; the appeal to the Supreme Court will also show the wider public interest that is reflected in the admission of the facts alleged; the next step is to have Intervenors then  go to the legislature and demand that if this document is allowed to stand, then the implications demand that they 'open an investigation', and by the time a responsive legislature initiates a hearing as to the facts, well let's just say that a LOT will happen.  

    

 Also; why would "debate over aliens" get "laughed out of court"?  Because the subject is too complex for some of  the simpletons on the bench to understand?  Why does it alwys have to be the subject of ridicule?  That's how they reinforce our discussion, by playing up to our naivete and reacting negatively against anything that actually WOULD suggest aliens seriously.  You may not have received a copy of the June 12th, 2005 Majestic session, wherein J announced "Gentlemen, if Majestic is the  brains behind the Coverup, the  ufoology community is its gonads....".  People in that 'community' are so sensitized by any reference 'out of the ordinary' that they actually help perpetuate the loonie-bin mentality because they're afraid of coming off just as bad by comparison.   

   

 Just some considerations; what it does show (and you had it posted on your own site, I noticed, Robert) is that, PENDING 
 EXAMINATION (and it carries with it a 'presumption of correctness') the Affidavit can be safely used to account for much more 
 than just my personal circumstances.   

   

 Regards,  

    

 Don  

    

 -----------------------------------------------------------------------  

    

 Dear Don,

 That Affidavit was witnessed by a notary which only says the signature is real and nothing about the content. And, if you don't believe it would get laughed out of court then try it a few times. Also,  you speak about over a 100 hours of video with DB testifying?  They also have hundreds of hours of people testifying before congress in the smallest details who were later found to be lying. That Q94 document  already speaks volumes since three expert Microbiologist (one at the National Academy of Sciences) have declared it a word salad.  

    

 -----------------------------------------------------------------------  

    


 Dear Robert;  

    

 I knew this wouldn't be easy.  Yes, it's true that you aren't compelled by law to admit the authenticity of that affidavit.  As I posted on  the Stargate Forum, an affidavit is nonetheless 'presumptively correct', just as a check - once presented for payment - is presumed to be valid.  The fight is to get it 'cashed', so to speak, which is why the Canadian gov't. is arguing before the court that they shouldn't have to 'cash' it.  Therefore, if you insist on hiding your head in the sand, you are legally enabled to do so and are not compelled to  recognize it.  By the same token, I can also insist that it is true until it is challenged (and possibly found wanting).  Affidavits are legal currency in the judicial economy just as checks are legal currency in the financial one. Don't like it?  Then don't accept payment. Support those who attempt to run from getting paid.  Otherwise, as a true skeptic, you can say "hey, these are fantastic claims; if true, they impact the body politic and we should find out if indeed they ARE true or not".  This is why I suggested that the 'interested few' join in as Intervenors in the appeal.  I mean, you would certainly want to know if they're true, right?  Just because they may not fit your existing paradigm doesn't preclude the possibility that what is being represented isn't triue, and as a truthseeker you should want to know if you also have been bamboozled over the years, right?  Or am I wrong?  

    

 As for the videotape of 'hundreds of others testifying before Congress', let them fight that battle.  If you are that concerned, I would have expected to see you and others on this email list take up that fight in the legal arena just as I am doing in this case. Personally I don't doubt that there ARE many hours of videotaped testimony, but like the CBS story on Bush's Nat'l. Guard (lack of) service, just because there wasn't 'complete authentication' doesn't mean that the facts contained therein are untrue (a reference to the 'found to  be lying' inference).  Another factor is what I addressed in a previous reply, which is that a 'Fact',  if expressed behind a gov't. podium, carries more weight and 'authenticity' than if expressed by a dishevelled fanatic wearing it on a sandwich board and toting a bullhorn on a street corner.  The choice of podium doesn't make the Fact more or less truthful,  only that there is a legally unfounded level of acceptance that is therefore determined.   

   

 As to the Q94 document; I too can muster a cluster of aspiring physicists at the local junior high-school and ask them for an analysis of Einstein's Theory of Relativity, and they too could quite easily claim that it's all a "word salad".  Face it:  there ARE no peers in the field of extraterrestrial biology that are qualified to weigh in on the Q94 document.  Please find at least one that has worked with an extraterrestrial and the public would willingly consider their pronouncements of whether the Q94 is a  "word salad" or not.  Furthermore, the Q94 document was never intended to be "peer-reviewed" so that it could take its place  in the New England Journal of Medicine or similar publication.  You can't continue to use metric yardsticks when either imperial is called for or no yardstick is expected, only results.   

   

 Finally, to get back to the issue of being 'laughed out of court'; since when does fear of ridicule stymy the true researcher?  Yes, I am not only laughed at but attacked constantly, and I fully expect it to get worse before it gets better.  This is one of the primary reasons  for the previous glacial pace of 'Disclosure'; fear of ridicule.  Test the waters; don't assume they're too hot or cold for your liking.  

    

 And enjoy the show, always.  As Dan would say, "the beat goes on".  

    

 Regards,  

    

 Don  

    

 ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------  

    

 Hi Don, see my remarks below...Robert C

 Don Deppeller wrote:  

 Dear Robert;  

    
 I knew this wouldn't be easy.  Yes, it's true that you aren't compelled by law to admit the authenticity of that affidavit.  As I posted on the Stargate Forum, an affidavit is nonetheless 'presumptively correct', just as a check - once presented for payment - is presumed to be valid.  The fight is to get it 'cashed', so to speak, which is why the Canadian gov't. is arguing before the court that they shouldn't have to 'cash' it.  Therefore, if you insist on hiding your head in the sand, you are legally enabled to do so and are not compelled to recognize it.  By the same token, I can also insist that it is true until it is challenged (and possibly found wanting).  Affidavits are legal currency in the judicial economy just as checks are legal currency in the  financial one.  Don't like it?  Then don't accept payment.  Support those who attempt to run from getting paid.  Otherwise, as a true skeptic, you can say "hey,  these are fantastic claims; if true, they impact the body politic and we should find out if indeed they ARE true or not".  This is why I suggested that the 'interested few' join in as Intervenors in the appeal.  I mean, you would certainly want to know if they're true,  right?  Just because they may not fit your existing paradigm doesn't preclude  the possibility that what is being represented isn't  true, and as a truthseeker you should want to know if you also have been  bamboozled over the years, right?  Or am I wrong?
 
Many would not agree that an Affidavit is "presumptively correct." There are many who have done 
 Affidavits but lied....Robert C
  

    

 As for the videotape of 'hundreds of others testifying before Congress', let them fight that battle.  If you are that concerned, I would have expected to see you and others on this email list take up that fight in the legal arena just as I am doing in this case.  Personally I don't doubt that there ARE many hours of videotaped testimony, but like the CBS story on Bush's Nat'l. Guard (lack of) service, just because there wasn't 'complete authentication' doesn't mean that the facts contained therein are untrue (a reference to the 'found to be lying' inference).  Another factor is what I addressed in a previous reply, which is that a 'Fact',  if expressed behind a gov't. podium, carries more weight and 'authenticity' than if expressed by a dishevelled fanatic wearing it on a sandwich board and toting a bullhorn on a street corner.  The choice of podium doesn't make the Fact more or less truthful, only that there is a legally unfounded level of acceptance that is therefore determined.
    

Sorry, but I see the above as sort of posturing with no really convincing arguments......Robert C
    

 As to the Q94 document; I too can muster a cluster of aspiring physicists at the local junior high-school and ask them for an analysis of Einstein's Theory of Relativity, and they too could quite easily claim that it's all a "word salad".  Face it:  there ARE no peers in the field of extraterrestrial biology that are qualified to weigh in on the Q94 document.  Please find at least one that has worked with an extraterrestrial and the public would willingly consider their pronouncements of whether the Q94 is a "word salad" or not.  Furthermore, the Q94 document was never intended to be "peer-reviewed" so that it could take its place in the New England Journal of Medicine or similar publication.  You can't continue to use metric yardsticks when either imperial is  called for or no yardstick is expected, only results.
    

These experts are not from a local High School. Bad comparison, the National Academy of Sciences is not 
 a High School. Terms used in that Q94 document can be found in any Microbiology reference. They are 
 not EBE terms. The best experts would know if the Q94 made any sense biologically since Biological Laws 
 are universal, it didn't........Robert C
    

   

 Finally, to get back to the issue of being 'laughed out of court'; since when does fear of ridicule stymy the true researcher?  Yes, I am not only laughed at but attacked constantly, and I fully expect it to get worse before it gets better.  This is one of the primary reasons for the previous glacial pace of 'Disclosure'; fear of ridicule.  Test the waters; don't assume they're too hot or cold for your liking.  

It doesn't but then again you won't get very far.....

 Regards

 Robert C  

   

--------------------------------------------------------------------------  

   


 Dear Robert;  

    

 You said:  

    

 "Many would not agree that an Affidavit is "presumptively correct." There are many who have done Affidavits but lied."  

    

 My response would be that it may come down to making that argument in court.  The weight of an article of currency being true is favored, versus an assumption it is not true.  Most legal scholars would agree that this basic principle is one of the foundations of the requisite faith in institutions that is required for an orderly society.  The obverse is that to have those articles proved fraudulent carries stiff penalties.  It's true that some affidavits may be fraudulent, just as there are many checks presented for payment to merchants the world over that are fraudulent, but they are a significant minority proportionate to the total.  (In the advent of a world-wide catastrophic Depression, this may change.)  

    

 You go on to characterize my comments regarding the positioning of Facts and the telling of them as "posturing"; that  is your opinion and you are certainly welcome to it.  If you insist on not recognizing the possibility > plausibility > probability that the facts as alleged in the Affidavit are true, I will not attempt to dissuade you.  I will also stand just as firmly for the reverse, as the consequences of the document have a real cost in the real world - to me and my family, personally.  

    

 You then say:  

 "These experts are not from a local High School. Bad comparison, the National Academy of Sciences is not a High School. Terms used in that Q94 document can be found in any Microbiology reference. They are not EBE terms. The best experts would know if the Q94 made any sense biologically since Biological Laws are universal, it didn't."  

    

 I demur; at this point it is merely 'opinion', as one man's treasure is another man's junk.  Until you find a qualified microbiologist that has a familiarity with an extraterrestrial physiology, the point is mute.  To use yet another crude  analogy; an engineer at Ford, schooled in the classic internal combustion engine, isn't qualified to adjudge the efficacy of Toyota's 'hybrid' program.   

   
 
 Robert, I don't know if you have read the following exchange with one of Dan's actual "classmates"; a "peer" as it were. 

 The following synopsis is taken from the conference to be found at:   

   
 
http://www.danburisch.info/b2/dialogues/ccom_2002_george.htm  

    

The biologist in question seems to have been a fellow student and peer of Dan during his studies (1987-1989), presumably at SUNY in 
 Stony Brook.

Biologist X: Okay, I have been provided with a copy of the so called Lotus Protocol and the 18 page document posted on BJ's site. I have 
 some concerns about the protocols employed, but not because they appear wacked out, but because there appears to be multiple levels 
 of protocols being employed simultaneously.  

Throughout the work, this guy alludes to other forms and "pursuant to other protocols." I think we are dealing with 
 paperwork that was never meant to hit the light of day. Certainly no self respecting peer reviewed journal would publish
  it, under current guidelines.

This doesn't mean that it doesn't make sense though, although I wish it made a little less sense as it is giving me some problems with cell 
 origins theory.   

His work appears to bear multiple logic levels and interdisciplinary ability on the level I figured he was bound, all those years ago.... Well, 
 not if you take his theory into account. .... A change occurred in his ideology.

The Lotus Protocol was one of those papers that seems predicated on a set of procedures not mentioned. As I cannot independently confirm the existence of the group that he is allegedly working with, I cannot say for certain that such a set of protocols exists. However, if he does,   it seems reasonable that we are dealing with what I have heard called upper-user reports. I am confused where StarFlower begins and Lotus ends?  

In the Lotus Protocol, he set out to establish a longitudinal study to test the serial endosymbiotic theory of eukaryote cell origins.

BJ WOLF: George, you mentioned a change of ideology that took place with Dan back in 1987 or so. That 
 was when he was working on something about cells in brackish water.....

It appears from his reports that soon after, a series of events began taking place at his research site, that swayed the procedures toward...
 well hold on just a second...

When I knew him, we were both graduate students taking what amounted to a structural biology course. He shared very little with me about
 his research intentions at that time. I will leave the institution out of this, but safe to say we were both trying to get the attention of the prof, 
 I'll put him to his initials WL, and roomed near each other in the Schomburg area. We (or at least I) were more concerned with getting 
 ahead...

He seemed to have the golden spoon with all those people following him around."

_________________________________________________________________________________________  

   

I hope this helps as we grapple with the issues.  

   

Regards,  

   

Don  
    
Dear All –  
12-16-05
I found this intriguing, lucid and intelligent post on the Above Top Secret Forum (this page:
   http://www.abovetopsecret.com/forum/viewthread.php?tid=185069&page=12) and is worth reading carefully in its entirety.

 The writer posts under the moniker “Centrist” and is a patent attorney by profession. He also holds a Master's Degree in Chemical 
 Engineering from Rensselar Polytechnic Institute. He can be contacted at waynej@speakerbuilder.net and I’ve included him on the 
 cc list of this message.  
Best wishes, Bill Ryan
 

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
It's very easy to get caught in the allure of these stories. They're interesting, sometimes well-crafted, and (most of all) I think that 
 many of us want to believe that they're true.

 This case is particularly compelling because, even if it is a hoax, it is well-planned in that it pulls together elements from other stories 
 quite well and makes it all fit together like a nice puzzle.  For example, the detail about the SOM-1.01 being an annex to the "Red Book" 
 makes you believe that this "Red Book" exists and may actually be in Anon's possession, given that various Ufologists believe that the 
 SOM is authentic.

 Further, from an "is this possible" perspective, I offer you this brief analysis which (at least to me) suggests that disclosure may 
 actually be possible.  Not likely, but possible...

 Here we go.

 A theory suggesting why the Project Serpo Disclosure may be genuine

 A little known fact is that in October 2000, it was five-years from the effective date of  
 http://www.dtic.mil/whs/directives/corres/pdf/52001ph1_0500/p5200ph1.pdf  
 Executive Order 12958 (begins on page 19 of the linked file) -- signed by Bill Clinton and mandating the automatic declassification 
 of all government documents over 25 years old UNLESS the agency which classified the document asserts that certain documents 
 are exempt from disclosure.

 
Section 3.4 of EO 12958
http://uploads.abovetopsecret.com/ats27876_EO_S34.jpg  

President Clinton signed EO 12958 on April 17, 1995.  The effective date of the Order was set to be 180 days from the date which 
 he issued the order.  That means that certain documents were declassified, by Presidential proclamation, early in October, 2000.  
 Thereafter, many documents because declassified by proclamation on the 25th anniversary of their classification.

 Of course, during that 180 days between the signing of the order and its effective date, each agency head was supposed to inform 
 the president's office of any exempted file "series".  This is done through the Assistant to the President for National Security Affairs.  
 Interestingly, it was Eisenhower (who was President at the time much of Project Serpo is alleged to have occurred) that created 
 this position. http://www.whitehouse.gov/nsc/hadleybio.html Stephen J. Hadley now serves in that capacity for President Bush, 
 taking over for Condoleeza Rice earlier this year.


The staff of the National Security Council is de jure an element of the Executive Office of the President, but de facto is a central
 element of the White House staff itself. President Eisenhower created a new position to head that staff: the assistant to the 
 President for national security affairs; every President since has continued that office and strengthened the staff. The twenty 
 senior-most NSC officers have presidential titles and rank;  the total staff now numbers nearly two hundred, many of them 
 detailees from State, Defense, and CIA. http://www.americanpresident.org/action/national_security

Ok, so what you ask?  I'm glad you asked!

 "Project SERPO's" final report was written in 1980 http://www.serpo.org/information.html#5

 So... just this year, the Project Serpo documents, if true as alleged, turned 25 years old and became the subject of automatic 
 declassification.  In other words, unless the Head of the DIA (the presumed holder of these documents) has identified the Project 
 Serpo files (assuming they exist) as being exempt from declassification, then they have already been automatically declassified.

 In other words, http://www.navy.mil/navydata/bios/bio.asp?bioID=154 Lowell E. Jacoby, the Director of the DIA, had to identify 
 the files that were exempted from automatic declassification and then make a statement to the National Security Council explaining 
 that the exempted material fell under an exemption to EO 12958 pursuant to section. 3.4.  Information that meets the following 
 conditions may be exempted from declassification, unless the President orders otherwise (the president can order that the material
  be declassified):

(1) reveal the identity of a confidential human source, or reveal information about the application of an intelligence source or 
 method, or reveal the identity of a human intelligence source when the unauthorized disclosure of that source would clearly 
 and demonstrably damage the national security interests of the United States;

 (2) reveal information that would assist in the development or use of weapons of mass destruction;

 (3) reveal information that would impair U.S. cryptologic systems or activities;

 (4) reveal information that would impair the application of state of the art technology within a U.S. weapon system;

 (5) reveal actual U.S. military war plans that remain in effect;

 (6) reveal information that would seriously and demonstrably impair relations between the United States and a foreign 
 government, or seriously and demonstrably undermine ongoing diplomatic activities of the United States;

 (7) reveal information that would clearly and demonstrably impair the current ability of United States Government officials 
 to protect the President, Vice President, and other officials for whom protection services, in the interest of national security, 
 are authorized;

 (8) reveal information that would seriously and demonstrably impair current national security emergency preparedness plans; 
 or

 (9) violate a statute, treaty, or international agreement.  

 Now, here's where we get to the very interesting part.  First, lets assume that the DIA exempted all of their UFO/EBE/ET related
  information from declassification.  Most likely, Condoleeza Rice, the predecessor to Stephen Hadley as the head of the NSC, would 
 have signed-off on this, most likely without ever knowing what she signed off on.  Then again, maybe not.  "Rice was plucked from 
 academia in 1989 by Brent Scowcroft to serve on the National Security Council of former President Bush" --  
 http://archives.cnn.com/2000/ALLPOLITICS/stories/12/17/rice.profile.ap . More on why this is relevant later.

 Stephen Hadley, however, is also an interesting character.  First of all, he's a career intelligence officer going back to the Ford 
 Administration (I included a link to his bio so you would read it, so you should have known this already;)).  Also, Hadley worked for 
 Scowcroft's firm in D.C. for a few years and http://www.fas.org/irp/offdocs/NSChistory.htm#Ford Scowcroft was the National 
 Security Advisor to President Ford and seems to have had a hand in selecting members of the NSC for later Presidents (such has
  his selection of Condi Rice).  Not surprisingly, General Scowcroft http://www.drboylan.com/aviary2.html is often mentioned as 
 the present likely head of MJ-12 or its successor, PI-40.

 What if General Scowcroft, being of aging years and perhaps not seeing the harm in the truth being known, has decided to pledge his 
 full "I won't interfere" (as much cooperation as you could expect) to these people because he knows them and knows that it's very 
 likely that if the NSC fights them, this will get very public, very fast.  This administration does NOT need another scandal.  But more 
 on this aspect later, too.

 Ok, so what is it that makes me believe that the same old cast of characters is any more likely to permit disclosure now than at any
  other time in the past?  Well, when I came across the following, it got me thinking.

  
Sec. 3.1. Definitions. For purposes of this order: (a) "Declassification" means the authorized change in the status of information
 from classified information to unclassified information.

 (b) "Automatic declassification" means the declassification of information based solely upon:

 (1) the occurrence of a specific date or event as determined by the original classification authority; or
 (2) the expiration of a maximum time frame for duration of classification established under this order.

 (c) "Declassification authority" means:

 (1) the official who authorized the original classification, if that official is still serving in the same position;
 (2) the originator's current successor in function;

 (3) a supervisory official of either; or

 (4) officials delegated declassification authority in writing by the agency head or the senior agency official.+  
Now, let’s refer back to what Anon has told us -- that he is part of a group of former DIA officers.  That they are in possession of the 
 debriefing manual ("Red Book") from a classified government project.  And that Project was formally closed 25 years ago.

 Let’s take this one step further.  Let’s guess that at least one member of Anon's group is lawfully in possession of this material,  
 because he was the officer that originally classified the Project.  If that's the case, then this person has the authority under EO 12958 
 to declassify the information.  That would be consistent with Anon's statement that they are trying to release the information with official 
 "sanction".  This may also mean that they are in contact with their successors (people they probably trained or selected for their jobs) 
 and those people have agreed not to attempt to pursue the exemption of this material, provided that it is properly purged of material 
 which, genuinely, should remain classified.

 
Sec. 1.5. Classification Categories.

 Information may not be considered for classification unless it concerns:

 (a) military plans, weapons systems, or operations;
 (b) foreign government information;
 (c) intelligence activities (including special activities), intelligence sources or methods, or cryptology;
 (d) foreign relations or foreign activities of the United States, including confidential sources;
 (e) scientific, technological, or economic matters relating to the national security;
 (f) United States Government programs for safeguarding nuclear materials or facilities; or
 (g) vulnerabilities or capabilities of systems, installations, projects or plans relating to the national security.

  
Ok, so going back to the present administration and whether the current NSC (Stephen Hadley) will authorize the release of this 
 information.  That's the wildcard.  I don't see it happening, but here's what I think may be the facts...

 -- Anon's group has banded together for security.  One old guy can be easily explained away when he passes on in his sleep.  But 
 six, or more, old guys who have banded together and are keeping records of their discussions?  They've made some of these 
 discussions public?  AND they can at least make the case that they have some authority to contest the continued classification of 
 this material?  That might be harder.

 -- I also suggest that these people were, in fact, highly placed DIA officers.  So well connected were they that they were entrusted 
 with stewardship of this highly-secret information.  Respect and connection of this level would dictate that the current administration 
 would find it very difficult and highly embarrassing if anything untowardly came of these people.  In fact, many of the aging leaders 
 of the military and intelligence communities would probably be more likely to "rat out" the administration than their old colleague.

 -- From the "PR” side, these guys are probably savvy and told their predecessors that this can be done in a way that 1) there's no 
 scandal for this administration (although that pesky democratic administration that ordered the cover-up may leave a black mark 
 on the democratic party! Ha!); and, lets face it, "W" will go along with any plan that gets his fanny off the fire for Iraq, Katrina, 
 Scooter Libby, and whatever else he's porked up lately.

 Yes... this is "thin".  Anorexic, perhaps?  I know.

 But look carefully at the facts, the law, and the dates.  It all comes together with many exciting consistencies.

 The only thing we need now is the proof.   
~~~~~~~~

Bill,

 I appreciate your comments, but they will still have to explain this:

 The SERPO story is falsified from the beginning. Let us look at just a few of the statements in the light of our observational scientific knowledge as well as our theoretical knowledge that gives this story a ring of falsity. Why would they do this?

 Quote:
 There was a period of darkness, but not total darkness. The Eben planet is located within a solar system of the Zeta Recticular Star System [two 5th-magnitude yellow double stars, similar to our Sun located near the Large Magellanic Cloud]. The planet had two suns but their angles were small and allowed some darkness on the planet depending on one's location.

 We have the system identified now, but the statement that it is located near the Large Magellanic Cloud must be by direction as it is no where in the vicinity of the LMC which is outside of our galaxy and a satellite thereof, but then...

 Quote:
 Statistics on the Eben planet was collected by our team. Here is the pertinent data for your UFO thread list:

 Diameter: 7,218 miles
 Mass: 5.06 x 1024
 Distance from
 Sun #1: 96.5 million miles
 Sun #2: 91.4 million miles

 Moons: 2
 Surface gravity: 9.60m/s2
 Rotation Periods: 43 hours
 Orbit: 865 days
 Tilt: 43 degrees
 Temperature: Min: 43° / Max: 126°
 Distance from Earth: 38.43 light years
 Planet named by Team: SERPO
 Nearest planet to SERPO: Named: OTTO
 Distance: 88 million miles (colonized by Ebens with research base, but no natural inhabitants on planet)
 Number of planets in Eben Solar System: Six
 Nearest inhabited planet to SERPO:

 Named: SILUS (SILUS is made up of creatures of various types, but no intelligent life forms. Ebens use the planet to mine minerals.)
 Distance: 434 million miles

 Zeta 2 Reticuli is a member of a wide double star system. Zeta 2 Reticuli and its companion star Zeta 1 Reticuli are at least 350 billion miles apart or about 100 times more distant than Pluto is to the Sun. They appear to be moving together through space and probably rotate around a common center every 100,000 years.

 As you can see if you add the distance between the 2 suns of SERPO that it adds up to a little more that 180 million miles apart. The actual separation between Zeta 1 and Zeta 2 is a factor of about 1944.44X more than the SERPO figure. The real problem is how can a planet orbit between two suns that are so close to the planet, approximately in the same range as earth's sun is from earth?

 Exact data that doesn't make scientific sense seems to undermine this story.
   As you say, we need proof and sensible data.

 Bill Hamilton
 AstroScience Research Network
 http://www.astrosciences.info/
 "I don't see the logic of rejecting data just because they seem incredible."
    Fred Hoyle
 ~~~~~  

Bill & Bill,

 I brought that Zeta Reticuli issue up eons ago over the SERPO Story but 116 people complained. Anon is getting his info from an ex-government source so Anon doesn't really know if it's totally true other than the Core Story. That binary system fits perfectly but not with Zeta Reticuli. It also fits perfectly with those numerous pages of calculations that Carl Sagan supposedly did for an "N-Body" problem by hand mind you, no super computers in those days. Or, it may really have been Zeta Reticuli and they just threw in spurious information about a close binary, I really don't know what the intent was. As I mentioned before, I think the Anon SERPO information has spurious information in it but it makes perfect sense at other times. Why that "....." of a government official would do that I don't know if a credible release was really planned .....Robert C

 
 
12-17-05 -   
By Dexxxa



Rick Doty first says:  

   

"Some of us blend a few facts with a lot of fiction as part of our job to protect our nation's security.  We don't ask questions.  We do what is expected of us.  

   

"Others", whose definition of national security may be different from ours, endlessly sift and resift our fictions in an effort to find the facts they feel are rightfully theirs.  Yet on those happy occasions when they actually do stumble upon a real truth, instead of recognizing it for what it is, they immediately seek to transform it into something it isn't - something THEY want it to be.  And this is good, for now it has become fiction again, and, although it may be wearing a new coat, it is as well covered as it was at the beginning.  Of course, I am referring to the Tau-9 treaty.
 

Mr. Burisch, the person of questionable intelligence and verifiable ignorance, claims its factual, but has never released it nor has he stated who signed it.  There isn't one single reference to any treaties with ETs in any USG documents.   
   

"We" all must do what we must do, Mr. Deppeller.  And just as I have no obligations to you, so , in return, you have none to me.  In that sense, some might think we find ourselves at a standoff - except for one small detail.  As in all games, someone has to make the rules; and in this game, that someone is not you.  For you, there are two choices.  You can play on and do the best you can.  Or you can face reality, recognize that the best you can do isn't going to be near good enough to win and save yourself and Mr. Burisch a great deal of future consternation by dropping out here and now.  I have a great deal of information about Mr. Burisch that sits in a filing cabinet.  But its time to open that cabinet and spread the "Word" about this Mr. Burisch.  He cannot win.  Mr. Burisch has been proven to be a liar and his released documents were proven to be hoaxes. I will air all this and let the public be the jury; and they lets see who wins.   

   

Let the games begin."  

   

************  

Wow! if that isn't clear enough. Don, this reads he's acknowledging knowing something about the 'Treaty' he earlier denied to me knowing anything about and is glad it remains for now as a thing of fiction. As far as what they want the public to be aware the 'Treaty' exposure is not one of them.   

   

Gotcha***  

   

His involvement motive appears purely in effort to dislodge and make unbelievable Dan's claims. This may not be the case with some of the other team members. However, they'll probably be used to help confuse in some other way. SERPO's in the background with this guy. What an intelligence test. Obviously, Doty's effort, either through himself or others, will be to release tainted information about Burisch. It feels to me his low opinion about us on the highway justify's his thinking he knows our psychology well enough to expect us to believe what he releases about Dan, despite our knowing his involvement with the disinfo services aspects of our Government.
 

I think his arrogance gave it away. He feels it'll be easy because it's the way we want to think about Dan anyway. A suspected 'hoaxer'. I guess a learned expected effect result on long term debunking candidates.. 
 

A continued self-effort by those who oppose classified information revealing, even though it's been approved by other directly involved agency members.  


 This exposed contaminated effort of theirs, straight from the horses mouth, should help wake up the lot of us and 'further' confirm the possible reality 'truth' of Dan's claim.  

   

Doty expects to win at his disinfo game.
 

SERPO's reality, apparently, has been unimportant from the beginning.
 

A declassified story line means used to gain our trust, bring us into their fold of inner circle secret truths, of which, realistically, isn't there, an illusion created just for us.  

   

Doty's real motive is targeting Dan.  

   

Watch closely everybody as this methodical saga continues to unfold.  

   

It couldn't have been made clearer to us.  

   

Dex  

~~~~~~~~  
Reply from Rick Doty

Don't know who you are but I realize you must be a child with a 3rd grade education if you actually think I acknowledge anything factual regarding the treaty!  I would consider your remarks more like that of an Idiot, that any rational person.  I never acknowledged any truth behind the treaty.  The treaty is a major hoax. Now, if you can't understand that, you need to go back through the 3rd grade.  

~~~~~~~

Dex replies to Rick Doty

Interesting insults Mr. Doty.  

I didn't say you said you acknowledge...I said it 'reads'...to me.  

   

Dex  

~~~~~~

12-17-05

by Victor M.

DON DEPPELLER: 

 I apologize for having taken so long to get back to your thoughtful, well-considered e-mail regarding Dr Burisch/Crain.  I'm still formulating my own response, but in the meantime, former AFOSI SA Rick Doty made an inquiry to contacts he still maintains at the DIA and the following is the response he received.  Remember, I'm only the messenger delivering the message.

 As a brief aside, I'd also like to point out that UNlike Dan Burisch, several key members of the military intell community have come out on RECORD and stated -- in this public forum -- that such a "Project SERPO" did in FACT exist and take place. Please note those names in Capt Bob Collins' carefully crafted response.

 The SERPO.org Web site has also been visited by the CIA and this stream contains one contact at the White House NSC; is Dan's Web site frequently visited by the CIA and has the White House shown ANY interest in Dan? 

 Just asking and thinking aloud....

 QUESTION:  In support of Dan Burisch's wild claims, name three (3) high-ranking USG officials who will go on record to validate the claims
 of Mr Burisch.  We've given you three (3), so I think my asking is only fair, don't you? – 
------------------------------------------
VICTOR:
  
 I forwarded XXXX XXXX's message regarding Mr. Dan Burisch to my friend at the DIA.  Here is his direct response.
  
 Please feel free to print this in your e-mail UFO Thread List list.
  
– RICK DOTY
 ------------------------------------------- 

 RICK:
  
 Who knows what evil lurks in the hearts of men.  The Cassowary do!
  
 The Cassowary has learned that the touted "Tau-9 Treaty" is a designator for a trash-dumpster behind building 19 at Headquarters (DIA), 3rd dumpster on the left, painted heliotrope with orange stripes, open carefully so as not to disturb the homeless alien [Eben] sleeping inside. 

 The purported treaty of the same name is securely taped to the underside of the dumpster and can only be read when the trash dumpster is turned upside down on the night of a full moon. Once done reading it, feel free to PUKE ON THE "TREATY."

 Regarding same, one might gently inquire as to just WHO would be authorized to sign such a document, WHO would do the authorizing, and exactly HOW in this world or out of it could such a treaty ever be enforced?!   

 That otta set, Mr. Burisch on end for a while.  After all, those who claim to have see this delightful piece of FICTION ought to know WHOSE NAMES WERE ON IT, no?

– DIA Contact
 ------------------------------------------
 From: Capt BOB COLLINS, Ret USAF

 To: BURISCH SUPPORTER

 I ask where is your common sense?

 NOTHING Burisch has presented has passed muster; the Q94 is a word salad, and NONE of the documents presented prove anything. [Notarized statements mean NOTHING.] You see no serious discrepancies in Burisch is because you have a whole book devoted to him. I see real problems with him just like I do with SERPO and ANONYMOUS.

 With SERPO yes there are problems, BUT there are also consistencies. As far as the basic SERPO story, you left out Rick Doty, Paul McGovern, Gene Loscowski and that retired AF Colonel in DC; you left out all those people and just mentioned Rick Doty,... cherry picking.

 I've always pointed things out from the beginning while getting jumped on for doing so. I've also done the same with Burisch. I go for the FACTS or EVIDENCE.

 If it doesn't compute, I throw it out. That has got nothing to do with being "open minded," it's the way I work. ANONYMOUS is a patsy in my estimation. You saw where he is getting his info? From an ex-government official or so he says. Right there is the problem I think for the "true/false information." 

 Ed Doty, Rick Doty, Paul McGovern, Gene Loscowski plus that retired AF Colonel in DC say the SERPO story happened. That's A LOT MORE than one Dan Burisch.

 I believe the CORE STORY is TRUE, but I have questions about the details. Don't be so quick to jump when you want to be right as others do the same.

– RMC 
 ~~~~~~~

http://i2.photobucket.com/albums/y14/dondep/000_0538.jpg

From: UFO Thead List Member

 VICTOR: One thing to add to what Rick Doty submitted earlier:  The notary was a representative from the Las Vegas MUFON, or so they say. Does that count for much? I don't think so. That's my opinion. 

– SIGN  ME  

~~~~~~~~  

By Bill Ryan  

Hi, Dex –

Many thanks. I don’t properly understand what you mean by the Serpo “team”. As best I know, there is no phalanx of diehard, unreasonable Serpo “supporters”. To presume their existence as such is a misunderstanding. You’ll find most people on this list, myself included, committed only to whatever the truth is. As long as Anon keeps on posting, we’ll find out in the end.

 I’m not worried about being wrong, because I’m not trying to be right about anything. I just want us all to work together to look at all the available data (and it’s not that simple a story, taking everything into account).

 My own position is one of intellectual honesty. More data is needed to clear up questions asked of each account. If everything were that obvious, we wouldn’t be debating these issues at such length.

 The real challenge is fully understanding what the other person is trying to say. What would it be like to be holding the other point of view? Can we each imagine that, even if just or a moment? The passion which drives us all to debate is fuelled by what unites us – a commitment for the truth, for disclosure, and to help humanity as best as we can.

 With best wishes to you,

 Bill

  
 
12-18-05  
http://www.newscientist.com/channel/fundamentals/mg18825305.800.html

IS STRING THEORY POSSIBLE? KEPLER's LAWS ARE NOT ALWAYS RIGHT!  WHY ARE PHYSICISTS TAKING THE IDEA OF MULTIPLE UNIVERSES SERIOUSLY NOW? STANFORD UNIVERSITY PROFESSOR LEONARD SUSSKIND WITH THE LATEST THINKING ON THIS CONTROVERSIAL AREA OF PHYSICS! –
NewScientist.com news service, 
 Amanda Gefter, 
 Sunday, 18 December 2005

 First, there was the discovery in the past few years that inflation seems right. This theory that the universe expanded spectacularly in the first fraction of a second fits a lot of data. Inflation tells us that the universe is probably extremely big and necessarily diverse. On sufficiently big scales, and if inflation lasts long enough, this diversity will produce every possible universe. 

 The same process that forged our universe in a big bang will happen over and over. The mathematics are rickety, but that's what inflation implies: a huge universe with patches that are very different from one another. The bottom line is that we no longer have any good reason to believe that our tiny patch of universe is representative of the whole thing.

 Second was the discovery that the value of the cosmological constant -- the energy of empty space which contributes to the expansion rate of the universe -- seems absurdly improbable, and nothing in fundamental physics is able to explain why. I remember when Steven Weinberg first suggested that the cosmological constant might be anthropically determined -- that it has to be this way otherwise we would not be here to observe it. I was very impressed with the argument, but troubled by it.

 Like everybody else, I thought the cosmological constant was probably zero -- meaning that all the quantum fluctuations that make up the vacuum energy cancel out, and gravity alone affects the expansion of the universe. It would be much easier to explain if they cancelled out to zero, rather than to nearly zero. The discovery that there is a non-zero cosmological constant changed everything. Still, those two things were not enough to tip the balance for me.

 What finally convinced you?

 The discovery in string theory of this large landscape of solutions, of different vacuums, which describe very different physical environments, tipped the scales for me. At first, string theorists thought there were about a million solutions. Thinking about Weinberg's argument and about the non-zero cosmological constant, I used to go around asking my mathematician friends: are you sure it's only a million? They all assured me it was the best bet.

 But a million is not enough for anthropic explanations - the chances of one of the universes being suitable for life are still too small. When Joe Polchinski and Raphael Bousso wrote their paper in 2000 that revealed there are more like 10500 vacuums in string theory, that to me was the tipping point. The three things seemed to be coming together. I felt I couldn't ignore this possibility, so I wrote a paper saying so. The initial reaction was very hostile, but over the past couple of years people are taking it more seriously. They are worried that it might be true.

 Steven Weinberg recently said that this is one of the great sea changes in fundamental science since Einstein, that it changes the nature of science itself. Is it such a radical change?

 In a way it is very radical but in another way it isn't. The great ambition of physicists like myself was to explain why the laws of nature are just what they are. Why is the proton just about 1800 times heavier than the electron? Why do neutrinos exist? The great hope was that some deep mathematical principle would determine all the constants of nature, like Newton's constant.

 But it seems increasingly likely that the constants of nature are more like the temperature of the Earth -- properties of our local environment that vary from place to place. Like the temperature, many of the constants have to be just so if intelligent life is to exist. So we live where life is possible.

 For some physicists this idea is an incredible disappointment. Personally, I don't see it that way. I find it exciting to think that the universe may be much bigger, richer and full of variety than we ever expected. And it doesn't seem so incredibly philosophically radical to think that some things may be environmental.

 In order to accept the idea that we live in a hospitable patch of a multiverse, must a physicist trade in that dream of a final theory?

 Absolutely not. No more than when physicists discovered that the radii of planetary orbits were NOT determined by some elegant mathematical equation, or by KEPLER's idea of nested Platonic solids. We simply have to reassess which things will be universal consequences of the theory and which will be consequences of cosmic history and local conditions.

 So even if you accept the multiverse and the idea that certain local physical laws are anthropically determined, you still need a unique
 mega-theory to describe the whole multiverse? Surely it just pushes the question back?

 Yes, absolutely. The bottom line is that we need to describe the whole thing, the whole universe or multiverse. It's a scientific question: is the universe on the largest scales big and diverse or is it homogeneous? We can hope to get an answer from string theory and we can hope to get some information from cosmology.

 There is a philosophical objection called Popperism that people raise against the landscape idea. Popperism [after the philosopher Karl Popper] is the assertion that a scientific hypothesis has to be falsifiable, otherwise it's just metaphysics. Other worlds, alternative universes, things we can't see because they are beyond horizons, are in principle unfalsifiable and therefore metaphysical -- that's the objection. But the belief that the universe beyond our causal horizon is homogeneous is just as speculative and just as susceptible to the Popperazzi.

 Could there be some kind of selection principle that will emerge and pick out one unique string theory and one unique universe?

 Anything is possible. My friend David Gross hopes that no selection principle will be necessary because only one universe will prove to make sense mathematically, or something like that. But so far there is no evidence for this view. Even most of the hard-core adherents to the uniqueness view admit that it looks bad.

 Is it premature to invoke anthropic arguments -- which assume that the conditions for life are extremely improbable -- when we don't know how to define life?

 The logic of the anthropic principle requires the strong assumption that our kind of life is the only kind possible. Why should we presume that all life is like us -- carbon-based, needs water, and so forth? How do we know that life cannot exist in radically different environments?

 If life could exist without galaxies, the argument that the cosmological constant seems improbably fine-tuned for life would lose all of its force. And we don't know that life of all kinds can't exist in a wide variety of circumstances, maybe in all circumstances. It a valid
 objection. But in my heart of hearts, I just don't believe that life could exist in the interior of a star, for instance, or in a black hole.

 Is it possible to test the landscape idea through observation?

 One idea is to look for signs that space is negatively curved, meaning the geometry of space-time is saddle-shaped as opposed to flat or like the surface of a sphere. It's a long shot but not as unlikely as I previously thought. Inflation tells us that our observable universe likely began in a different vacuum state, that decayed into our current vacuum state. It's hard to believe that's the whole story.

 It seems more probable that our universe began in some other vacuum state with a much higher cosmological constant, and that the history of the multiverse is a series of quantum tunnelling events from one vacuum to another. If our universe came out of another, it must be negatively curved, and we might see evidence of that today on the largest scales of the cosmic microwave background. So the landscape, at least in principle, is testable.

 If we do not accept the landscape idea are we stuck with intelligent design?

 I doubt that physicists will see it that way. If, for some unforeseen reason, the landscape turns out to be inconsistent -- maybe for mathematical reasons, or because it disagrees with observation -- I am pretty sure that physicists will go on searching for natural explanations of the world.

 But I have to say that if that happens, as things stand now we will be in a very awkward position. Without any explanation of nature's fine-tunings we will be hard pressed to answer the ID critics. One might argue that the hope that a mathematically unique solution will emerge is as faith-based as ID.
 ------------------------------------------
 LEONARD SUSSKIND

 Leonard Susskind is the Felix Bloch Professor of Theoretical Physics at
 Stanford University in California. His book, "Cosmic Landscape: String
 Theory and The Illusion of Intelligent Design," is published this week
 by Little, Brown ($24.95, £14.33, ISBN# 0316155799)

 http://www.newscientist.com/article.ns?id=mg18825305.800&print=true

From Figaro

Victor All, you're mis-reading what the article is saying. In the closing remarks he says, "Without any explanation of nature's fine-tunings we will be hard pressed to answer the ID critics." Fine tuning is the key word which means the physical constants are fined tuned so Kepler's Law is fined tuned for what it does. Please don't act like the Burisch folks and jump the gun...Thanks...Robert C

 From Bill Hamilton

I talked to Linda about this yesterday and she called the SERPO project a tar baby and I agree with her.I feel sure that this will end up being what I see it is:  disinformation.  

   

Now, that Doty has confessed to continued lying in the name of National Security - a hilarious admission since his self-contradictions have done nothing to protect national security - and since he is now distancing himself from these SERPO revelations, I think we will soon see the demise of all this.  

   

We now must use critical thinking in continuing to evaluate data from all sources.  

   

Bill  


----- Original Message -----  

From: Ed Komarek  

Sent: Saturday, December 17, 2005 9:02 AM  

Subject: Re: [exopolitics_institute] Fwd: A lawyer's suggestion documenting why the Project Serpo disclosure may be genuine  

   


Hi Bill, I don't remember.  You might want to post something.  I just wanted to forward something to the advisory board in case some have not been following the postings that we are following.  You might just want to forward your views.   

   

Regardless of whether this is true or not it is getting the spooks to come out more of what they know.  :-)  Things are looking better for us all the time.  This thing might just break one of these days.  

   

Ed
 
 
12-23-05  

 MOVIE: "CLOSE ENCOUNTERS OF THE THIRD KIND"



 http://ufocasebook.com/aliennewstag3.jpg
 -----------------------------------------------------
http://www.ac.wwu.edu/~vawter/StudentSites2002/interstellar_travel/negativemass.html

From:  A U.S. MILITARY SCIENTIST ON THE UFO THREAD LIST POINTING US IN THE RIGHT DIRECTION?

 From: POSTING #11 ["Journal Entries"] and the www.Serpo.org Web site:

 Team Commander: "In the center of these containers is a copper colored coil or something looking like a coil. There is a bright light being shined from a point above into the center of the coil. We hear a very dull hum, but no major loud sounds. 661 thinks it is a NEGATIVE MATTER versus positive matter system."

 AND NOW NASA SAYS,...  

 INTERSTELLAR SPACE TRAVEL: THE IDEA OF NEGATIVE MASS PROPULSION

 The idea of negative mass propulsion was created to eliminate the need for fuel, since fuel limits the feasibility of interstellar travel so much. Theoretically, it would allow faster than light travel without violating Einstein's theory of relativity.

 The way this works is it uses gravity to bend space around the spaceship. A large amount of "negative mass" would be in front of the ship and a large amount of positive mass would be behind it, and the masses would curve space in such a way that it'd accelerate the ship. Apparently, such a process would not violate the conservation of energy, as the space it is travelling through would be warped.

 If this theory were to work, it could be the best form of transportation available. It has been suggested that it would allow a ship to bypass the limitations of relativity, and a ship could actually travel to and from it's destination at speeds far faster than the speed of light without running into the problem of taking several years to do so.

 Unfortunately, we don't even know if negative matter exists, and even if we did discover it, we'd have to develop a way to turn the effect of the matter on and off, so the speed of the ship could be controlled.

http://www.grc.nasa.gov/WWW/PAO/html/warp/ideachev.htm

http://www.dark-planet.com/ortemus/eweasel.htm

--------------------------------------------
 INTERSTELLAR SPACE FLIGHT EXPLAINED BY S4 SCIENTIST BOB LAZAR 

 http://www.gravitywarpdrive.com/Government_Scientist.htm

UFO THREAD LIST MEMBER WRITES:

 VICTOR: Regarding yesterday's POSTING #11 and the Team Members getting ill enroute to SERPO, it seems like they were in some kind of black whole or worm whole?  Or some gravity distortion produced by the power source.  Twilight zone stuff.
  
 From Bob Lazar:

 "In the Delta Configuration, discs operate on all three amplifiers.  This configuration is used in space for long-distance travel. 

 "In space, a disc tilts over on its back so that the gravitational amplifiers focus on where the disc is going, and the propulsion system is powered up, amplifying gravitational waves that are out of phase with Earth's gravity.  The amplified gravitational waves distort space and time or "Space-Time" as it is referred to in the documents.  That gravity distorts or warps space is currently known in mainstream physics. 

 "That is why astronomers, at certain positions during an eclipse, can see stars that are directly behind the sun (the sun's gravity causes the star's light to bend around the sun). That gravity distorts time is also known. 

 "For example, if you and a friend have atomic clocks synchronized to each other and your friend climbs a mountain or goes up in an airplane, the clocks will be out of sync when your friend returns (your clock is in a stronger gravitational field). In short, the disc warps space-time, attaches itself to the warp and snaps back. 

 "Imagine a thin sheet of rubber stretched out (this represents space).  Now, put a ball bearing on the sheet (this represents the disc).  Now, with your fingers under the sheet, pinch the rubber at a point some distance from the ball bearing. 

 "Keeping the rubber pinched, move the pinch to the ball bearing.  As you bring the pinch back to its original position, the ball bearing will follow.  This is an analogy of what happens.

~~~~~

When talking with Gene Loscowski he agreed with the LANL source that it's a "Negative Force Generating System" since he heard that term used while at Area 51 not Anti-gravity but really, it's the same thing.  The way they create this "Negative Force" according to the LANL source is through a series of specially configured super-conducting "capacitors" and "field coils." They tell us they still haven't figured it out yet. All the technical details from the LANL source are in the EfD book which even Hal Puthoff says he doesn't understand which is understandable, since the LANL sources don't really understand it....Robert C
 ~~~~~~

Guys, this message was posted on the Above Top Secret Forum.

 They have 41 pages there so far specifically on Serpo: intelligent, considered, good-natured, creative, amusing, informed debate. Highly recommended if you’ve not checked it out.

http://www.abovetopsecret.com/forum/thread185069/pg38

*************
 
Ok... I just went through today's posting and have compiled every reference to a team member or specific Eben that comes up. I believe that we can infer their duties from what has been given so far:

 The following list of quotes is from the entry of 21 December on Serpo.org:

 899 and 203 will have overall charge of weapons.

 700 and 754 will give each member final check before boarding.

 475 really nervous. 700 will watch him.

 102 sitting next to me and he is faint.

 OK, I guess 203 and myself will sit in different location above these seats.

 420 will try to use his language skills.

 899 will taste it. Well, 899 said it tastes like paper.

 OK, MVC finally showed up. Told us we will begin trip soon.

 Well, 899 figured out how to get out because he is standing up.

 899 said a EBE came in and looked at us and left. Other team members sleeping. 899 and myself walking around this room.

 700 and 754 gave us medicine to settle our stomachs.

 700 and 754 tells us to eat and drink the water we brought along we are doing that and feel a little better...

 Our date recorder isn't working very well, according to 633. He thinks we have been going for 10 days but not really sure.

 700 and 754, who ate the EBE food didn't seem to be as sick as us.

 We drink that and seem to be better, except 518, who seem to be sick.

 633 and 661 were really interested in this [command room]. 633 seemed better.

 OK, MVC finally arrived. He explains in broken English, that we are halfway to home planet.

 633 wants to see the engines. MVC takes four of us to the engine room or whatever they wish to call the room.

 From these passages we can begin to figure out the role of each member of the team:


 ********************************

 Team Commander                    102
 Assistant Team Commander    203  Weapons duties
 Team Pilot #1                          225
 Team Pilot #2                          308
 Linguist #1                              420 - Male
 Linguist #2                              475 - Male
 Biologist                                  518
 Scientist #1                             633 - Male
 Scientist #2                             661
 Doctor #1                                700
 Doctor #2                                754
 Security                                   899 Weapons duties (Male)
 MVC Alien guide/translator

 One of the crew members hasn't been mentioned yet.

 *************

 [And then another forum member responded:]

 The team member not mentioned in the 1st journal entry seems to be the female linguist mentioned in Anon's 2nd posting, since the only linguist mentioned in the journal entry appears to be male.

 "There were two females, one being a doctor and the other being a linguist."
 "420 will try to use his language skills."

 *************

 There’s more interesting analysis there too, of a number of other aspects of Anon’s postings.

 Best, Bill
 
 
12-28-05 - Disinformation notes:   
Thomas,  

   

I cannot say what parts of the Serpo scenario are real but I do know some parts that are false.  The Eben data was first disseminated by Paul Bennewitz.  Rick Doty stated that a disinfo campaign was started against Bennewitz convincing him of the location of the Dulce base, but for those of us who investigated the tales of Dulce, we find that Rick is still a consummate liar and says he does it to protect national security.  

   

Rick is one of the disinfo artists involved in this Serpo story, but now has distanced himself from it.  Others involved are friends of his in the DIA.  They know that some disclosure starts next year and are trying to put out a huge distraction.  

   

There was an exchange program, but it is not exactly as presented.  

   

I will not go into all the details at this point as I may write up an analysis of the errors in the data, but the data given on the planet Serpo and the stars it orbits is erroneous as well as a description of Ebens, J-Rods, and Grays.  

   

Bill  

   
 

1-29-06  
Aloha all, here's a reply to a recent posting by Bill Ryan who is circulating information allegedly about a human military team to Planet Serpo.  

   

Bill's website is http://www.serpo.org/  

   

Aloha,  

   

Michael Salla  

***  


 Thank you Bill for forwarding this and the second part of the log entries after the team's alleged landing on Project Serpo. I have to admit to being disappointed with what I read since I thought this was possibly a genuine disclosure initiative where there may have been a little disinformation thrown in to maintain plausible deniability. I now see the Serpo information more in lines of a fictionalized version of events that has far less accurate information in it than I previously thought. The main reason for my changed position is the communication modalities discussed in the log entries between the EBEs and the human team. It is reported that they communicate via translators, and that the EBEs communicate among themselves by speech. Furthermore, we are also told that the EBEs are capable of above light speed travel which accounts for the rapid flight time between Earth and Serpo. The problem is that in all the whistleblower and experiencer testimonies I have read, the EBEs are generally described in terms of communicating through telepathy, and that the thought-technology interface plays a critical role in above light speed travel.  

   

The most reliable source for these conclusions is the testimony of Philip Corso who discussed his recollections of the mind-technology interface used by the EBEs. He argues that this is the principle behind the propulsion and navigation systems used by the EBEs, and that this is also a part of their communication system. Similarly whistleblowers such as Clifford Stone and Charles Hall report about the telepathic communication modalities used by EBEs, where communication by verbal speech is not common among the EBEs.  When we examine the Betty and Barney Hill case, generally accepted as the first reliable case of human abduction by EBEs, we again have the Hill's reports of telepathic communication by EBEs. Furthermore, Betty Hill identified the star system of Zeta Reticulum as the home of the EBEs which gives us an idea of the communication modalities of the EBEs from Zeta Reticulum or any planet in it such as the alleged Serpo.  

   

I have difficulty recalling the testimony of any 'whistleblower' or 'experiencer' who communicates that EBEs only communicate verbally as described in the Serpo logs. If one reads Sci Fi books, one see that most authors describe EBEs as communicating verbally which is clearly an anthropomorphic generalization. When it comes to the real thing, verbal communication among EBEs is very rare from the reports of whistleblowers/experiencers. In fact, I would argue that any EBE capable of greater than light speed travel must have the necessary telepathic abilities to control the advanced technologies necessary for this modality of transportation. This is something that Corso discussed as the stumbling block of reverse engineering EBE craft since the pilot was a necessary part of the propulsion/navigation systems.  

   

This takes me to the material that you've circulated below. In numerous passages we are told that the EBE's communicate in an EBEN langague, and that a translator is needed for human-EBEN communication. The striking clue for me as to the veracity of the Serpo material is the alleged puzzlement of the EBE translatoer, EBE-2, who often has difficulty understanding the intent of the human team member communicating. For example, we have passages such as:  

   

"I ask her abet the creature we saw, I ask if that was some other type of Eben.  Ebe2 seems confused. She asked me what creature. I used the word creature.  Maybe that was an insult or maybe she didn't know the word.  I pointed to the thing at the other end of the building.  She then saw what I meant.  Ebe2 said, no Eben, just visitor.  Like you, pointing to me."  

   

If we take as an axiom that any greater than light speed faring EBE civilization has developed telepathic abilities, necessary for controlling the navigation/propulsion systems, what occurred above would make little sense. Telepathic abilities from all accounts I've researched are a reliable means of communicating ideas and concepts so it would be extremely unlikely that a genuinely telepathic being would be confused so often as reported in the logs. Again, the reports from numerous whistleblowers and experiencers are that the EBEs read the minds of their human subjects and either reply back telepathically or in a verbal manner.  

   

Then we have passages referring to EBEs communicating verbally in an EBE language:  

   

"Many Ebens are inside.  They look at us with some glares.  But we just walk in and around.  One Eben comes up to us and speaks but in Eben.  He seems to be telling us something.  He points to the ceiling and then to our heads.  Maybe he is telling us to cover our heads. We must find Ebe2."  

   

Again, most reports by whistleblowers/experiencers are that EBEs communicate telepathically and silence is the common situation when around them. Travis Walton for example tried to communicate verbally with the human looking EBEs that allegedly were a part of his 'abduction' experience, yet they did not reply verbally and communicated among themselves in silence.  

   

After noting the repeated references to the communication modalities used by the EBEs, and no mention of telepathic communication, I would have to conclude that the Serpo information is a fictionalized account of a human EBE team traveling to Serpo. Perhaps the author/sources are trying to fill in the details by fictionalizing what might have happened in a genuine human team traveling to Serpo. In my view the communication modalities described in the Serpo logs are a clue that this is largely fictionalized account by an author of some events that may have occurred. While there may be some truth to an actual human team traveling to planet Serpo in the system of Zeta Reticulum, the alleged log entries that have been circulated are fictionalized accounts of what happened. This gives me much less confidence in the veracity of the Serpo material that is being released, and the integrity of the sources releasing this information.  

   

Aloha, Michael Salla  
 
   
 

Project Serpo
The Zeta Reticuli Exchange Program






The gradual release of confidential documents pertaining to a top secret exchange program of twelve US military personnel to Serpo, a planet of Zeta Reticuli, between the years 1965-78

 
 





“We already have the means to travel among the stars, but these technologies are locked up in black projects and it would take an act of God to ever get them out to benefit humanity….. anything you can imagine we already know how to do.”  



Ben Rich, former Head of the Lockheed Skunk Works, in a lecture shortly before he died
_______

 "I printed all the information... and provided [the retired USAF Colonel] a copy... I watched his eyes and facial expressions. After he was finished, he stated, "Oh my God, who on this Earth would release such classified material?" I then asked him if all this information was real. His simple answer was, 'Yes, all real'."

 Air Force Lieutenant Colonel, currently assigned to the Pentagon – name supplied  







Home

 
 
Information released by Anonymous  
 
Comments  
 
Questions and Answers
 
Consistencies  
 
Contact  
 

EDITOR's NOTE:  A brand NEW posting has just arrived from ANONYMOUS which I'll try and get up tonight before "Threshold."  Due to the space limitations of WebTV, all of these seven (7) postings will be deleted after this stream and in order to view back postings, you'll have to go to Bill Ryan's new:  http://www.serpo.org/

 ------------------------------------------
 Part 1a: THE UNUSUAL GEOLOGIC FEATURES OF PLANET SERPO DESCRIBED IN VIVID DETAIL AS WELL AS THE NEAR LIFE-OR-DEATH ENCOUNTERS OUR TEAM MEMBERS HAD WITH 2 VICIOUS SERPO ANIMALS IN WHICH ONE WAS KILLED AND PRONOUNCED "DOA!" 

 Part 1b: ANONYMOUS DETAILS THE SOCIETAL STRUCTURE OF THE EBENS AND COVERS EVERYTHING FROM FOOD, GAMES TO SEX!

 Part 1c: STARTLING NEW REVELATIONS ON THE VICIOUS, RUTHLESS ALIEN RACE THAT THE EBENS ENGAGED IN A 100-YEAR INTERPLANETARY WAR WITH!  DETAILS ON HOW THE U.S. TEAM MEMBERS SURVIVED ON PLANET SERPO AND A GLIMPSE INTO THE SOCIAL STRUCTURE OF THE EBEN SOCIETY AND CULTURE!

 Part 1d: BOMBSHELL NEW INFORMATION REGARDING THE 'WEIRD PHYSICS' OF THE SERPO HOMEWORLD AND THE NON-EXISTENCE OF 'TIME' AS WE KNOW IT, AS WELL AS DETAILS ON THE EVERYDAY LIFE OF THE EBENS, THEIR ANCIENT HISTORY, THEIR FIRST TRIP TO EARTH 2,000 YEARS AGO AND THE HORRIFIC GALACTIC WAR WHICH ALMOST DROVE THEM TO EXTINCTION! 

 Part 1e: SPECIFIC ASTRONOMICAL DATA ON THE ETE's [Ebens] HOMEWORLD OF SERPO PLUS ADDITIONAL INFORMATION ON OTHER STAR SYSTEMS THAT ETE's HAVE ORIGINATED FROM IN EARTH's PAST! 

 Part 1f: POSTING BY "ANONYMOUS I" ON THE ALIEN HOMEWORLD THAT 10 MEN, 2 WOMEN FROM THE U.S. WERE SENT TO!

 Part 1g: ORIGINAL POSTING BY "ANONYMOUS"
 ------------------------------------------
 Part 1a: 

 [ ] = Moderator's comments/insertions 

 EBE = Extraterrestrial Biological Entity: NO! 

 ETE: Extraterrestrial Entity: YES!

 [ Official terminology used by the U. S. Government ]

 THE WEIRD AND UNUSUAL GEOLOGIC FEATURES OF PLANET SERPO ARE DESCRIBED IN VIVID DETAIL AS WELL AS A HARROWING ENCOUNTER WITH A VICIOUS SERPO ANIMAL IN QUADRANT 3 FOLLOWED BY A LIFE-OR-DEATH ENCOUNTER WITH A HUGE SNAKE-LIKE CREATURE IN QUADRANT 4 THAT WILL GIVE YOU NIGHTMARES FOR DAYS
 TO COME!  

 VICTOR: 

 Here are some geological facts regarding SERPO our Team Members compiled: 

 The planet's diameter was measured at about 7,218 miles.

 The surface gravity was 9.60m/s>2.

 The rotation periods was approximately 43 hours.

 Our Team contained two (2) geologists (they were also cross-trained as biologists). The first thing our geologists did was map the entire planet. The first step was to divide the planet in half, thus creating an Equator. Then they established a Northern Hemisphere and Southern Hemisphere. Within each hemisphere, they created four (4) quadrants.

 Finally, they established the "North and South" Poles. This was the easiest method to study the planet. Most of the Eben communities were placed along the Equator. However, there were some communities established north of the equator in each of the four quadrants in the Northern Hemispheres. There were no communities located in either poles. The southern pole was desert.  It was barren land with virtually no precipitation where absolutely nothing grew in this area.

 There were volcanic rock formations and part of the extreme south contained a rock desert. Temperatures in the south pole were measured at between 90° and 135°F.  Going further north from the south pole in Quadrant 1, the Team found extrusive rocks. This indicated some volcanic activity in the area. Our team found numerous volcanoes in this area.

 The Team found several fissure eruptions in this region, with standing water. The water was tested and contained high levels of sulfur, zinc, copper and other unknown chemicals. Moving from east to Quadrant 2, the Team found basically the same volcanic fields of rocks.

However, in one particular location near the north end of Quadrant 2, the Team found an Alkali Flat. On Earth, these were formed by streams flowing into a desert or arid location. Our team found hard mud covered by alkaline salts. Some vegetation was growing in this area.

 Moving to Quadrant 3, the Team found a form of Badlands: An arid region that is lined with deep gullies with sparse vegetation. The gullies or valleys were extremely deep, some going down 3,000 feet.

 The team found the first SERPO animal in this region. It looked like an armadillo. This creature was extremely hostile and tried to attack the Team several times. The Eben guide used some type of sound device (sonic-directed sound beam) to scare away the creature.

 Moving to the Equatorial region, our team found desert-style landscapes which contained patches of vegetation. The team found numerous pockets of water fed to the ground by Artesian Wells. This water was the freshest, containing only the unknown chemicals. It tasted good and the Ebens drank and used it. Our team still boiled it because during culture tests, unknown types of bacteria were detected.

 Moving to the Northern Hemisphere, the Team found a major change in climate and landscape. One Team Member, who had coined it Quadrant 1, in the northern hemisphere, named it "Little Montana." The Team found trees, similar to the Evergreen style of Earth trees. These trees were milked by the Ebens. A white fluid was extracted and drank.

 Numerous other types of vegetation was found in this region. Standing water, possibly fed by either Artesian Wells or fissure eruptions was found. In one area, marsh lands were seen. Large plants were observed growing in the marshy area. The Ebens used these plants for food. The bulb of the plant was very large. The bulb tasted something like a melon.

 Our Team eventually moved to an area in Quadrant 1 in the northern hemisphere. This area contained moderate  temperatures [50° - 80°] and ample amounts of shade. The Eben's built a little community for the team. Most of the remaining exploration of the planet was done from this point. The Team only explored the southern hemisphere once, obtaining geological information.

 Because of the intense heat, the Team decided not to venture back. The Team continued to explore the northern hemisphere, where, as the Team traveled towards the north pole, the temperature cooled considerably.

 The Team found mountains, raising to an elevation of 15,000 feet and valleys that sank below the basic mark the team established for "sea level."  Lush green fields were found containing a form of grass, but contained bulbs. The team coined these fields, "Clover Fields," even though the bulbs were not clover.

 The radiation levels were lower in the northern hemisphere than at the Equator and southern hemisphere. The north pole contained cold weather and the team saw the first sign of snow. Blankets of snow littered the landscape around the north pole. The snow measured about 20 feet, at its deepest.

 The temperature was a constant 33°.  Our Team never found the temperature to vary in this region. The Ebens could not stand to be in
 this region for long. They suffered extreme hypothermia. The Team's guide wore a suit, similar to a space suit with built-in heaters.

 Our Team found evidence of past earthquakes. Fault lines were found along the northern tip of the southern hemisphere. Exfoliation was observed along with extrusive rocks, which indicated magma flows in the past.

 Our Team BROUGHT BACK HUNDREDS OF SAMPLES of SERPO soil, vegetation, water and other items for testing on Earth. During our Team's exploration, they discovered numerous types of animals. The strangest was the "Beast" which looked like a large Ox. The animal was timid and never seen to be hostile.  Another animal looked like a Mountain Lion, but had long fur around the neck. This animal was curious, but was not considered hostile by the Ebens.

 During the exploration of Quadrant 4 of the southern hemisphere, the team found a very long and large creature that appeared to be a snake. This creature was "deadly," as explained by the Ebens. The head of the creature was large and contained almost human-like eyes. This was the only time our Team used their weapons and killed the creature.

 The Ebens didn't appear to be upset that the Team killed the creature, but was upset they used a weapon. The team brought four .45 caliber Colt (standard military issued) handguns and four M2 carbine rifles. After killing the creature, the team disected it. The internal organs were strange and nothing similar to a Earth-style snake. The creature measured 15 feet long and 1.5 feet in diameter. The team was curious about the eyes.

 Examination of the eyes revealed cones, similar to human eyes. The eye contained an iris and the back contained a large nerve, similar to the optic nerve feeding into the creature's brain. The brain was large, much larger than any Earth-based snake. The Team wanted to eat the meat from the creature, but the Eben guides politely told them "No." 

The bodies of water on SERPO did NOT contain fish, as we know. Some bodies, near the equator, did contain strange-looking creatures, similar to eels (small and about 8 – 10" long) and was probably a cousin of the land-based "Snake." 

 There was something like a jungle, near the marshlands, but not the jungles that we're familiar with. SERPO didn't have seasons as we know them (extreme heat then freezing cold). However, the temperature varied.

 Regarding weapons taken: There was a lengthy discussion about weapons. At the end, the Ebens didn't really care. So our Team Members decided to take some just in case. Not for a fight, God knows, as our Team was vastly outnumbered, but for the safety aspects of it.

Remember, the 12 were all military members, so weapons made them FEEL safe. A side note: They only took 50 rounds of ammunication per handgun and 100 rounds of ammunition per rifle.

– ANONYMOUS
 -----------------------------------------
 Part 1b: 

 THE SOCIETAL STRUCTURE OF THE EBENS AND HOW OUR TEAM MEMBERS INTERACTED WITH THEM!

 COMMUNICATING WITH THE EBENS

 This was a gigantic problem, to say the least. It took our linguist specialists several years to adequately establish a form of
 communication with the Ebens. A group of Ebens learned to understand English and a few other Earth languages.

This group contained the "Travelers," as our team called them. Our Team Members connected themselves with the Travelers. Although the Team couldn't always understand their responses, the Eben travelers understood our Team, most of the time. During this time period, the only exchange of information was simple.

 The Ebens, not being able to completely explain something to our team, used a form of sign language by pointing to the object or item they wished to explain and made hand movements. Our team, two (2) members, eventually grasped that method of communication. However, our Team didn't receive much information from the Ebens during this time period.

 The Travelers (the very few who understood English numbered about 30) did not fully understand all words in our language. Later, the Ebens called our language too complicated and difficult to understand. We eventually determined the Eben Tonal Language to be VERY complicated and extremely hard to translate.   We were able to record their language and then play it back, listening to each Tonal dialect and each tonal bar.

 Eventually we crudely translated some of the language. We started with simple items, for example, the flying object that they used to travel around their planet on. Then things like houses, roads, food, clothing, their suns, their planet, etc. Although we did establish some form of communication, it was crude and not always helpful for our Team when something complicated happened.

 For example, when our first Team Member died in an accident, it was hard to communicate with the Ebens. The member died instantly, therefore, no medical care was provided. Our two (2) doctors examined the Member's body and determined the injuries were consistent with an accidental fall. Initially, the Ebens never interfered with our care or offered to provide any of their medical care. 

 However, once the Ebens – a very benevolent and caring people – saw our team members crying, the Ebens stepped in and offered to attempt some sort of medical care. Although our doctors felt the Team Member was medically dead, they allowed the Ebens to try their own medical care. Most of this was either through sign language or speaking to the Travelers who could understand some English.

 The Ebens transported the Team Member's body to a remote area of the largest community. They took the body into a large building, apparently their hospital or medical center. The Ebens used a large examination table to view the body. The Ebens ran a large bluish-green light beam over the body. The Ebens watched a display, that appeared on a large screen that looked like a television screen. The readouts were in the Eben written language and thus our team could not understand it.

However, there was a graphic display, similar to a heat beat graph. The solid line was not wavering. Our doctors understood that meant the same thing that their equipment measured: the heart was not beating. The Ebens administered some liquid through a needle. This was done several times. Eventually, the heart started beating.

 But our doctors knew the internal organs of the body were damaged, but couldn't fully explain that to the Ebens. The Ebens finally made a sign, placing both their hands to the chest and bowing their heads. Our team members knew that meant the body was dead and nothing could be done.

 The Ebens showed affection to our Team. During the last work period, the Ebens had a ceremony for the dead Team Member, the same ceremony used when an Eben died. Our team held their own service, attended by the Ebens. The Ebens were extremely curious about our religious service. One Team Member, who was acting as a minister, performed a death service. Our Team was eternally greatful for the Eben's caring attitude for our dead friend.

 EBEN SOCIETY   

 The Ebens live in a very simple society. The individual Eben family contained a male, female and at least one (1) child. Our team did find some families with as many as four (4) children. We later learned those families were caring for children of Ebens who were either on Traveling Missions (EXPLORING THE UNIVERSE) or dead Ebens.

 Our Team witnessed an aircraft accident that killed four (4) Ebens. The Ebens performed a form of ritual at the crash site. The Ebens
transported the bodies to a medical facility and examined the bodies. Our Team Members were always allowed to accompany the Ebens, except during rest period, when the Ebens closed their doors for privacy.

 Our Team Members saw the sorrow in the eyes of the Ebens during the death of their own. Later, after the last work period of the day, the Eben's had a "funeral," at least that is what our Team concluded it was. The Eben bodies were wrapped in a white cloth. Several types of liquids were poured over the bodies. Large numbers of Ebens would stand in a circle, chanting.

 The sounds became almost nauseating to our Team Members. The ceremony lasted for a long time. Finally, the bodies were placed in metal containers and buried in a remote location away from the communities. After the burial, the Ebens had a feast. Large tables of food were brought out and everyone ate, danced and played games. This occurred at every Eben death witnessed by our team. 

 The individual Eben family lived a simple life. Their homes were constructed of clay, some type of material similar to wood, and some
 metal. The houses all looked the same. They appeared to be something from the Southwest, looking like adobe. The interior of the house consisted of four (4) rooms. One sleeping room where all Ebens slept in the same room on mats, a food preparation room (kitchen), a family room (the largest in the house) and a small waste room.

 THIS brought up an interesting point for our Team. The Ebens did NOT have a physiological need to release body wastes as we did. The Eben's had small collection locations in the residence for their body wastes. But the Eben's body was extremely efficient in processing all food taken in. Their body wastes consisted of a small amount of fecal matter, similar to a small cat dropping.

 Our Team Members never saw any urine excretion from an Eben. On the other hand, our Team Member's wastes consisted of bulk quantity of both fecal matter and urine. The Ebens had to dig large waste reception sites for our 12 Team Member's waste. The Ebens accommodated our team. 

 FOOD & WATER

 Food, as I mentioned previously, was a problem for our Team Members. Our Team consummed mostly military-style C-Rations, but eventually had to switch to Eben food. The Ebens had a variety of food items. They grew vegetables. Our Team found items similar to potatoes, but they tasted different. They had some type of lettuce, turnips, and tomatoes. They were the only items similar to ours. The Eben's had other vegetables grown. 

 These were strange looking round items with long vines. The Ebens cooked the vines and ate the large portion of the plant raw. The Ebens had some type of white liquid, which we first thought was a form of milk. But after tasting it, our Team realized it was different, both in taste and content. The liquid came from a small tree located in the northern portion of the planet. The Eben's literelly milked the tree for the liquid. It appeared to be some sort of pleasure to drink the stuff.

 Our Team Members never got a real "taste" for the liquid. The Ebens cooked food. They make pots of stew, which was extremely tasteless to our team. We used a lot of salt and pepper. They also baked a form of bread. It was non-yeast bread and tasted fairly good, but caused extreme constipation to our Team Members. We had to drink large quantities of water in order to digest the bread.

 The one common food that Ebens and our Team Members liked was the fruit. The Ebens ate a great quantity of fruit. The fruit, although different from anything we saw, was sweet. Some of the fruit tasted something like melons, while others tasted like apples.

 Another problem was water. The water on SERPO contained a number of unknown chemicals found by our team. Our Team eventually had to boil the water before drinking it. Seeing this, the Ebens built a large plant that processed water for our Team.

In our Team's final report, written by the commander (Colonel), the report states that during the exchange period (he was careful NOT to use exact time periods), the Team was able to communicate with the Ebens about 50% of the time. There were some things we were NEVER able to communicate.

 HUMOROUS MOMENTS

 Our Team brought along softball equipment for sporting activity. The Ebens would watch the game and laugh out loud. (The Eben laugh sounded like a high pitched yell.)  Eventually, the Ebens started playing the game, but never got used to catching the ball BEFORE it hit the ground.

 Our Team also played touch football. Again, the Ebens watched the game intensely and then played it themselves. But again, like softball, the Ebens never figured out they had to catch the football before it hit the ground!

 EBEN vs SEX 

 Although our Team Members honored the privacy of the Ebens, our Team was allowed to witness births. Our team, snooping aroud, was able to capture the sexual activity of the Ebens. The males and females had similar sexual organs and performed intercourse. The frequency of sexual activity was not recorded as being as often as our society performed. It was believed that they performed the act for pleasure and reproduction.

– ANONYMOUS
 ------------------------------------------
 Part 1c: 

 The group called MJ-12 -- which wasn't really the group that controlled the information -- but for the sake of clarity, we'll just call them "MJ-12." The actual  name of the group who controlled, managed and oversaw the SERPO project was called XXXXX XXXXX. 

 Current DIA officials have very little knowledge of this subject matter. However, we will move ahead with our plans. Our main supporter is XXXXX XXXXX XXXXX, a former director of XXX.  He is in our corner and will support our gradual release [Public Acclimation Program] plan.

 1) I find some of the questions to be very disturbing. I expected thoughfulness in the responses, rather than criticism. The information I am providing is coming directly from OFFICIAL documents. But I guess it's difficult for our Earth-based [closed minded] scientists to understand something foreign to them.

 The criticism being displayed by your list of scientists doesn't bother me. I'm just stating what the official documents say.  As for the
 scientific calculations, our Earth-based scientists had the SAME questions. Our home-based scientists questioned the collection methods of the team. But in the end, our home-based scientists figured out that our applied scientific principals did NOT always work on Planet SERPO. Once our scientists minds were OPEN, the calculations were made to prove the team's data.

 2) One of the principal home-based scientists (astronomer) contracted to assist us was Dr. Carl Edward Sagan. Initially, he was the BIGGEST SKEPTIC  of the group. But as information was slowly analyzed, Dr. Sagan came back to the middle. I can't say he fully accepted every single piece of data, but HE DID AGREE ON THE FINAL REPORT.

 The laws of physics, as we know them, were different on SERPO. NO ONE walked through walls or flew by themselves. However, the time problem and some other scientific calculations appeared to be different using our laws of physics. 

 Dr. Carl Sagan had a VERY hard time understanding this until he applied some things the Team gave him.  It's very hard for an Earth-based person to understand exactly what the Team had to deal with.   [INability to "think outside of the box."]

 3) Lively discussions brings out some very interesting questions. Some of which I cannot find answers to. Although our team spent over a decade (our time) on SERPO AND NEARBY PLANETS, they did not have a laptop computer to enter all data. They had two recorders, who were responsible for writing down the data. Our team acknowledged that a lot of data was lost or not documented.

4) Regarding Time: The Team Members brought several time pieces, e.g., wrist watches, non-battery style, as it stated in the debriefing data. The time pieces worked, but they had NO reference to time since the Eben days were longer, the dusk and dawn periods were longer and they had NO calendars to reference.

 They did use the time pieces to calculate movement, for example, timing the movement of the Eben two suns. They also calculated the time between work and rest periods. But, after awhile, the team discarded their time pieces and used the Eben's measurement of time periods. The team became confused with the calendars they brought – a 10-year calendar.

 After 24 months, the team lost track of time, as to the calendar since they could not properly calculate days compared to Earth days. They set up one (1) large clock to the earth time when they left. However, this was a battery-controlled  clock and when the battery died, the clock stopped and they forgot to change the battery in time. Consequently, they lost the earth time. The team brought a large quantity of batteries, but they ran out after about five (5) years. The Ebens had no comparable item like batteries.

 5) They also took electric razors, coffee pots, electric heaters, a DIM (no explanation as to what this was), an electric IBM typewriter, a scientific calculator, slide rules (both conventional and scientific), Base Data Collection Recorder (BDCR), three (3) different sized
 telescopes, tangents, both conventional and electrical.

The list goes on and on. But they took about everything they were allowed to take, as to weight. The Ebens did weigh the equipment taken by our team. The weight limit was 4½ (four-and-half) tons or 9,000 lbs. As for food, the team took C-Rations, military style. They carefully planned for 10 (ten) years.

 6) Another question pertained to the team make up. Why were only two females taken?

 If one considers the monumental problem associated with picking a team of 12 (twelve) people, where each person must be TOTALLY ERASED from the military system – NO family ties, NO spouses and NO children – one can see the difficulty that the selection group had. The selection group picked the best team members from a limited pool of military people.

 The original selection group picked 158 (one-hundred & fifty-eight) people. The final 12 (twelve) were selected from that number. If you consider the psychological, medical and other tests that had to be administered, the final 12 were the best qualified from the original number. Why they chose two (2) females was never written. Apparently, those two females were the best qualified in their individual specialty:  a doctor and a linguist.

 7) How did the Ebens advance so quickly? Nothing was written about this. But Earth-based scientists surmised that since the Eben culture consisted of just one (1) species, their advancement excelled and accelerated more rapidly than a civilization that consisted of different species, different languages, etc.

 [as we have here on Earth where an inordinate amount of time is spent fighting amongst ourselves rather than trying to advance our species]

 8) Why are there only 650,000 in the Eben civilization?

 Again, the team never found the answer except that many hundreds of thousands of Ebens died in The Great War. Earth-based social behavior specialists surmised that the Eben civilization was structured to accommodate their own needs. Our team did find limited supplies of commodities on their planet. Large buildings were used to harvest food products.

 The soil wasn't rich in a lot of minerals. Ebens used a form of organic agriculture to harvest food items. Maybe the Ebens were scared that if they over populated the planet, they couldn't provide for their citizens. This is only MY idea, and NOT  anything written in the
 official records.

 9) As to the Eben culture: They had a form of musical entertainment. The music sounded like tonal rhythms. They also listened to a type of chanting. The Ebens were dancers. They celebrated certain work periods with a ritual dance. The Ebens would form a circle and dance around, listening to the chanting type of music. The music was played on bells and drums, or something similar to them.

 There were NO televisions, radio stations or anything like that. The Ebens played a game, something like soccer, but with a larger ball. The object was to kick the ball down a field into a goal. The game had very strange rules and played for long periods of time. They also had another game, mostly played by the children, that consisted of making formations with groups of Ebens. They seemed to really enjoy the game, but our team found little understanding of the game.

 Athough the Eben civilization had no televisions, radios, etc., each Eben had a small device belted to their waists. This device gave orders to perform a particular task, news of pending events, etc. The device displayed a screen, similar to a television screen but in a 3-D style format. Our team brought back one (1) of these devices. (I think today, we could compare it to a palm pilot.)  [Anonymous writing.]

 10) The Eben's energy device was analyzed over and over again by our team. Since our team did not have access to scientific microscopes or other measuring equipment, we could not understand the function of the energy device.

 But, regardless of the electrical demand, the Eben energy device provided the proper current and wattage. Out team surmised the device had some sort of regulator that sensed the required current/wattage and then supplied that specific amount. (Note: Our Team Members brought back two {2} energy devices for analysis.)

 11) SERPO moved around one (1) sun only. The other sun was within the two (2) orbits. As I said before, there are HUNDREDS of pages of calculations in the debriefing explaining all of this.

 12) Why some Team Members remained!

 The debriefing reported that the Team Members who remained, did so voluntarily. They fell in love with the culture of the Ebens and the planet. They were NOT ordered to return. Communication with the remaining crew members lasted until about 1988.
 No other communication was received from those Team Members. The two –who died on the Planet SERPO – were placed in coffins and buried. Their bodies were returned to Earth.

 13) Each Team Member received a large dose or radiation during their stay on SERPO. Most of the Team Members died later of radiation-related illnesses.

 14) The Ebens fought a battle with an enemy for a period of time. Our Team Members estimated the war lasted about 100 [Earth] years, but, again, that is OUR  time. The war was fought using particle beam weapons, developed by both civilizations. The Ebens eventually were able to destroy the enemy planet, killing the remaining enemy forces.

 The Ebens did warn us that several other alien races within OUR galaxy were HOSTILE. The Ebens stay away from those races. The debriefing document never stated the name of the enemy,  probably because they no longer existed.

– ANONYMOUS
 ------------------------------------------
 Part 1d:

 THE "LAWS" OF PHYSICS,... OUT THE WINDOW!

 Our scientists had the SAME questions, as posed by your audience.  Our scientists questioned our team members and the information they gathered.  Our scientists could NOT understand how the orbit of SERPO could revolve around the two (2) suns at the distance measured. 

 In the end, our scientists found that some things relating to that particular system was DIFFERENT IN PHYSICS compared to our system.  There were some questions about how our team measured the orbit and other calculations based on the lack of a stable time base.  For some reason -- and I don't think this was ever determined -- our TIME instruments did NOT WORK on SERPO! 

 Now, considering this, you can understand the difficult job our team members had making calculations without time.  They had to come up with an alternate method to measure speeds, orbits, etc. 

CHALLENGE: Try solving a problem in physics without being able to measure time on Earth!  [This is "Anonymous" still speaking.]

 So you see, our team did the best they could with the instruments they had and the hardships they developed attempting scientific
 calculations.  It is difficult for any Earth-based scientist to UNDERSTAND THE DIFFERENT [laws of] PHYSICS IN OTHER SOLAR SYSTEMS or on other planets. 

 One of the questions sent me involved Kepler's Law of Planetary Motion.  Our team had that information.  We had some of the best
 military scientists on the team.  But if you consider Kepler's Law, it requires time and our team could ONLY measure time in the conventional way. It was determined that Kepler's Laws did NOT apply [at least] to that solar system.

 FACTOID: Scientists now know that Kepler's planetary laws also describe the motion of moons, stars and man-made satellites.]

 CONCLUSION:  One of the things our Earth-based scientists learned was NOT to apply Earth's LAWS OF PHYSICS IN A UNIVERSAL WAY.  [Anonymous speaking again.] 

 HISTORY OF SERPO AND THE SOCIAL STRUCTURE OF THE EBEN CIVILIZATION 

 SERPO was estimated to be about three (3) billion years old.  The two (2) suns were about five (5) billion years old, but only by
estimation. 

 The Eben civilization was estimated to be about 10,000 years old. They evolved from another planet, NOT on SERPO.  The original home planet of the Ebens was threatened with extreme volcanic activity.  The Ebens had to relocate to SERPO in order to protect their civilization. This occurred some 5,000 years ago. 

 The Ebens had a great interplanetary battle with another race about 3,000 years ago.  The Ebens lost many thousands in their battle. 

 The Ebens completely eliminated all of their enemies. The Ebens have NEVER fought another war since. The Ebens have been space travelers for the past 2,000 years. The Ebens FIRST VISITED Earth about 2,000 YEARS AGO.

 [ MODERATOR's NOTE: Did the Ebens plant or "seed" the personage of Jesus Christ as alleged in the famous "Project Aquarius" briefing document?! (I possess a copy.) See the ENTIRE briefing document reproduced word-for-word at the end of Part 1a and see if you think "the dots connect!" ]  

 Why does the Eben population number only about 650,000?  The Ebens have a very stable, structured civilization.  Each male has a mate.  They are allowed to reproduce (in somewhat the same sexual way we do), but are limited to only a specific number of children.  Our team never saw a family with more than two (2) children. 

 The Eben civilization was so structured  that they planned the birth of each and every child, spacing them apart to allow the proper social grouping of the civilization.  Eben children matured at a super rate, compared to Earth children.  Our team watched live births, attended to by an Eben doctor, and then watched the development of the child over a period of time, team member's time. They matured at an alarming rate. 

 The Ebens had scientists, doctors and technicians.  There was one (1) educational facility on the planet. If one  was chosen, you attended the facility and learned the job one was best qualified and suited for.  Although it was extremely difficult to judge or measure, the team estimated each Eben's IQ to be 165. 

The Ebens had no single ruler.  There was a "Council of Governors," which the team named.  This group controlled every single action on the planet.  The members of the council seemed to have been around for a long time.  Since Ebens  didn't age -- or at least our team couldn't detect aging -- it was difficult to judge the age of each member. 

 There were about 100 different villages or living locations for the Ebens.  The Ebens only used a small portion of their planet.  They
 did mine minerals in remote areas of the planet and had a large industrial plant in the southern portion of the planet near a body of
 water.  Our team determined this plant had some sort of hydroelectrical operation. 

 PROPULSION SYSTEM FOR SPACE TRAVEL

 The Ebens developed a different type of electrical and propulsion system.  It was unknown to our team and I don't think we ever really
 understood it.  They were able to tap into a vacuum and bring back an ENORMOUS AMOUNT OF ENERGY  from that vacuum. 

 Our team's living quarters, which consisted of several small buildings, contained electricity powered by a small box.  This small box supplied all the power our team needed.  Ironically, the electrical equipment our team brought on the trip worked using their power source only!  

EBENs ON LIFE, DEATH AND RELIGION / A CREATOR

 Ebens did die.  Our team members saw deaths, some from accidents and some from natural causes.  The Ebens buried the bodies, similar to our method.  Our team saw two (2) air accidents involving their intra-planet flying vehicle [which levitated off the ground]. 

 The Ebens worshipped a Supreme Being.  It appeared to be some sort of deity relating to the Universe [Universal Consciousness, Mind or Life Force].  They conducted daily services, normally at the end of the first work period.  They had a building or church they entered to worship. 

 Our team left Earth in a large Eben spacecraft and flew to SERPO in approximately nine (9) months by OUR  team's measurement of time [suggesting that it might be longer OR shorter].  Upon our team's return, they traveled on a newer Eben craft.  The time, estimated by our team for the return, was seven (7)  months. 
  
– ANONYMOUS

 MODERATOR's ADDENDUM TO PARAGRAPH #18 ABOVE

 "Project Aquarius" briefing document

 "ABOVE TOP SECRET / MAJIC EYES ONLY"

 (TS/ORCON) – Most governmental documents pertaining to UFO sightings, incidents and governmental policies, including "Project Blue Book," have been released to the public under FOIA or under various other release programs. 

 MJ-12 felt the remaining documents and information (not relating to "Project Aquarius" relating to technological facts regarding alien
 medical matters, the fact that an alien was captured alive and survived three (3) years under secrecy, cannot be released to the public for fear the information would be obtained by SHIS.  There was other information obtained from EBE that was deemed sensitive and NOT releasable to the public. 

 Notably, "Project Aquarius," Volume IX, which pertains to tracing the alien's first visitation of Earth back some 5,000 years. EBE reported that 2,000 years ago, his  ancestors PLANTED A HUMAN CREATURE ON EARTH to assist the inhabitants of Earth in developing a civilization.  This information was only vague and the exact identity or background information on this homo-sapien was not obtained. 

 Undoubtedly, if this information was released to the public, it would CAUSE A WORLDWIDE PANIC.  MJ-3 has developed a plan that will allow release of Project Aquarius, Volumes I - III. 

 The release program calls for a GRADUAL RELEASE OF INFORMATION over a period of time in order to CONDITION THE PUBLIC FOR FUTURE DISCLOSURES. Attachment 5 of this briefing contains certain guidelines for future public releases. 
 ------------------------------------------
 Part 1e:

 ABSTRACT ON THE EBEN's HOME PLANET and OTHER ALIEN HOMEWORLDS THAT HAVE VISITED EARTH 

 Statistics on the Eben planet was collected by our team. Here is the pertinent data for your UFO thread list: 

Diameter:                     7,218 miles

Mass:                           5.06X10>24

 Distance from Sun #1:  96.5 million miles

 Sun #2:                        91.4 million miles

 Moons:                         2

 Surface gravity:             9.60m/s>2

 Rotation Periods:          43 hours

 Orbit:                            865 days

 Tilt:                               43 degrees

 Temperature:            Min: 43° / Max: 126°
   
 Distance from Earth:  38.43 light years  

 Planet named by Team: SERPO

 Nearest planet to SERPO:  Named: OTTO

 Distance:  88 million miles colonized by Ebens with research base, but NO natural inhabitants on planet.

 Number of planets in Eben Solar System: Six  (6)

 Nearest inhabited planet to SERPO:  

 Named: SILUS

 Distance: 434 million miles

 SILUS is made up of creatures of various types, but NO intelligent life forms [with sentience]. Ebens use the planet to mine minerals. 

 We DID have visitors from nine (9) other star systems. 

– The Grays, which some people characterize as being like the Ebens, were NOT.  They came from a planet near Alpha Centauri A. 

 The third class of visitors came from a G2 star system in Leo. 

The visitors were classified by a code.  The code, which was classified in itself, was, "Extraterrestrial Entities" (ETE).  ETE-2
 were the Ebens, the Grays were ETE-3, and so on.

 The "Red Book" lists nine (9) different visitors.  We determined recently that some of the visitors were the same type of race but a
 "mechanical lifeform."  They were hybrid beings that were created in a laboratory rather than by natural birth. 

 They creatures were more like robots, although they were intelligent and could make decisions.  They might be the "hostile" visitors that some people report [during reported abduction scenarios]. 

 To the best of my knowledge, we have NOT had any visitation since 1985 from the Ebens.

– ANONYMOUS 
 -----------------------------------------
 Part 1f:

 RIVETING NEW DETAILS ON THE ALIEN HOMEWORLD THAT 12 AMERICANS WERE SENT TO AS PROVIDED BY "ANONYMOUS I"

 Paul [McGovern] is NOT correct. There were two (2) females, one being a doctor and the other being a linguist.

 There was a period of darkness, but not total darkness. The Eben planet is located within a solar system of the Zeta Recticular Star System [two 5th-magnitude yellow double stars, similar to our Sun located near the Large Magellanic Cloud]. The planet had two (2) suns but their angles were small and allowed some darkness on the planet depending on one's location.

 The planet was tilted which allowed the northern part of the planet to be cooler. The planet was a little less than Earth's size. The
 atmosphere was similar to Earths and contained the elements of CHON [Carbon Hydrogen Oxygen Nitrogen]. Zeta Recticular is approximately 37 [38.2] light years from us. It took our team, in an Eben craft, nine (9) months to travel the distance.

 During the trip, each of our team members were frequently dizzy, disoriented and suffered headaches. The craft did not go through any
 weightlessness during the trip. The craft was very large and allowed the team to exercise.

 Once the team arrived on the Eben planet, it took them several months to adjust to the atmosphere. During the adjustment period, they suffered headaches, dizziness and disorientation. The bright suns of the Eben planet also presented problems. Although they had sunglasses, they still suffered from the bright sunlight and the danger of sun exposure. The radiation levels of the planet was a little higher than that of Earth. They were careful to cover their bodies at all times.

 The Ebens had no forms of refrigeration, except in industry. The temperature of the planet, at the center portion [equator], stayed
 between 94° and 115.° They did have clouds and rain, but not frequently. At the northern hemisphere of the planet, the temperature
 dropped to between 55 and 80 degrees. This was too cool for the Ebens, or at least most. Our team did find Ebens living in the north, but in very small villages.

 Our team eventually relocated to the north in order to stay cool. The ground transportation used by our team was similar to a helicopter. The power system was a sealed energy device that provided electrical power and lift for the craft. It was very easy to fly and our pilots learned the system within days. The Ebens did have vehicles, which floated above the ground and did not have any tires or wheels.

 There were leaders, but no real form of government. There was virtually no crime seen by the team. They had an army, which also acted as the [global] police force. But no guns or weapons of any type were seen by our team. There were regular meetings within each small community. There was one large community, which acted as the central point of the civilization. All the industry was at this one large community. There was NO MONEY.

 Every Eben was issued what they needed. No stores, malls or shopping locations. There were central distribution centers where Ebens went to obtain items of needs. All Ebens worked in some capacity. Children were kept very isolated. The only trouble our team members got into was when they attempted to photograph Eben children.

 The Army politely escorted them away and cautioned them NOT to do it again.

– ANONYMOUS 
 ------------------------------------------
 Part 1g:

 INITIAL E-MAIL BY "ANONYMOUS"

 VICTOR:

 First let me introduce myself. My name is Request Anonymous. I am a retired employee of the U.S. Government. I won't go into any great details about my past, but I was involved in a special program.

 As for Roswell, it occurred, but NOT like the story books tell. There were two (2) crash sites. One southwest of Corona, New Mexico and the second site at Pelona Peak, south of Datil, New Mexico.

 The crash involved two (2) extraterrestrial aircraft. The Corona site was found a day later by an archaeology team. This team reported the crash site to the Lincoln County Sheriff's department. A deputy arrived the next day and summoned a state police officer. One live entity [EBE] was found hiding behind a rock. The entity was given water but declined food. The entity was later transferred to Los Alamos. The information eventually went to Roswell Army Air Field. The site was examined and all evidence was removed. The bodies were taken to Los Alamos National Laboratory because they had a freezing system that allowed the bodies to remain frozen for research. The craft was taken to Roswell and then onto Wright Field, Ohio.

 The second site was not discovered until August 1949 by two ranchers. They reported their findings several days later to the sheriff of Catron County, New Mexico. Because of the remote location, it took the sheriff several days to make his way to the crash site. Once at the site, the sheriff took photographs and then drove back to Datil.

 Sandia Army Base, Albuquerque, New Mexico was then notified. A recovery team from Sandia took custody of all evidence, including six (6) bodies. The bodies were taken to Sandia Base, but later transferred to Los Alamos.

 The live entity established communications with us and provided us with a location of his home planet. The entity remained alive until 1952, when he died. But before his death, he provided us with a full explanation of the items found inside the two crafts. One item was a communication device. The entity was allowed to make contact with his planet.

 Somehow, I never knew this information, but a meeting date was set for April 1964 near Alamogordo New Mexico. The Aliens landed and retrieved the bodies of their dead comrades. Information was exchanged. Communication was in English. The aliens had a translation device.

 In 1965, we had AN EXCHANGE PROGRAM WITH THE ALIENS. We carefully selected 12 military personnel; ten (10) men and two (2) women. They were trained, vetted and carefully removed from the military system. The 12 were skilled in various specialties.

 Near the northern part of the Nevada Test Site, the aliens landed and the 12 Americans left. One entity was left on Earth. The original plan was for our 12 people to stay 10 years and then return to Earth.

 But something went wrong. The 12 remained until 1978, when they were returned to the same location in Nevada. Seven (7) men and one (1) woman returned. Two (2) died on the alien's home planet. Four (4) others DECIDED TO REMAIN, according to the returnees. Of the eight (8) that returned, all have died. The last survivor died in 2002.

 The returnees were isolated from 1978 until 1984 at various military installations. The Air Force Office of Special Investigation (AFOSI) was responsible for their security and safety. AFOSI also CONDUCTED DEBRIEFING SESSIONS WITH THE RETURNEES.

 I have never seen or read anything about the exchange program. I once heard a little bit of information from Linda Howe, but she didn't have much information.

 I've monitored your e-mails for about six (6) months. I've read e-mails from you and others. But I've never seen nor heard the truth about the real Roswell incident or the exchange program.

 I'd like to hear what others say about this.

– ANONYMOUS
 ------------------------------------------
 The complete debriefing is contained in: "PROJECT SERPO," Final Report-80HQD893-020, classified TS, Codeword. 


Further information

– The Armadillo-like creature was NOT aggressive, it just scared the Team Members. The Eben guide directed some type of sound (very high pitch) at the Armadillo creature and that scared it away. These creatures were seen at several locations around the planet. Some were larger than others, but they were NOT aggressive.

– Only the snake-like creature was aggressive, which forced the Team to kill one. The snake-like creatures were located in just one (1) location and the Team never saw another one.

– As for birds, there were two (2) types of flying creatures. One resembled a hawk and the other looked like a large flying squirrel. Neither were aggressive and the Team could never catch one for examination.

– As for insects, they had small bugs, similar to cockroaches, but smaller. They were harmless, but did get into the Team's equipment. They had a hardened  shell, with a soft interior body. The Team never observed any flying insects, such as flies, wasps, etc. Several other small bugs were found and identified.

 My next posting of information will be the actual journal entries of one (1) Team Member. Each Team Member was required to keep a journal. I will provide a partial journal entry (since the journals are attachments to the original report, they contain hundreds of pages of written entries). I will provide a few days or possibly a week's worth of entries from one (1) Team Member.

Photographs coming:

– One photograph shows the entire Team standing next to an Eben home, with several Ebens standing in the background;

– another photograph shows the Team's new home in the north;  

– another photograph shows an Eben village in the north;  

– another photograph shows a group of Ebens playing their "soccer" game.  
 ~~~~~ 

ARRIVING ON SERPO

Dear All,

 I've just received a new posting from Anonymous. This was not sent to Victor. It's a continuation from the Team Leader's log.

 I present it here verbatim, precisely as I received it. Nothing has been changed, added or deleted.

 This has just been posted to the website at http://www.serpo.org/information.html#12.

 Best to all, Bill

 ***************

 I  dreamt of earth.  I really had some vivid dreams of Colorado, the mountains, the snow and my family.  It was if I was really there.  I had no worries and never thought of my situation inside the foreign spaceship.  Then I awoke.  I was confused and disoriented.  I was in a bowl, well, it looked like a bowl to me.  I don't remember how I got here.  My first thought was to my crew.  I pushed open the top of this glass bowl and it opened.  I heard a hissing sound coming from the seams or seals.  I looked around and saw that I was inside a room.  Not a room I remember.  But all of us were inside these glass bowls.  All the other crew members were asleep.  I climbed out and realized my legs were really sore.  But I climbed out and went to each glass bowl and checked on the crew.  I found only eleven of us.  Somebody is missing.  But who? I am so confused.  I'm also very thirsty.  I can't find any of those water bottles.  We had some but I can't find any.  My eyes are really having a problem focusing.  But I'm writing this in my log, I have to record everything.  I found number.....  He is alive.  Who is missing.  I have to look at each bowl.  

This room is large.  The ceiling looks like bed mattress.  The walls of this room are soft.  Not very much in this room except for the bowls and some tubes running from the bowls to the floor.  I see lights flashing on the bottom of each bowl.  There are bright lights on in the ceiling.  Inside the mattress or something.  I can't open these bowls.  I've tried everything.  I must get some help from the Ebens.  I found a door but it won't open.  I can't remember how we opened the other doors.  How long have we've been in these bowls? I can't seem to remember much.  Maybe the traveling in space causes problems with a person's mind.  

They told us this during training but we never had anyone travel this far in space before.  We are the specimens.  Maybe I should go back into the bowl.  Maybe I awoke too early.  My wristwatch says it is 1800 hours.  But what day, what month, what year? How long have I been asleep.  The floor seems to be soft with wires running in a cris cross pattern.  I see some type of television screen in the corner of the room.  I think it might monitor the other bowls.  I can't read anything on the screen because it is in Eben language.  I do make out likes, maybe health monitoring lines on the screen.  I hope that means everyone is breathing and is alive.  But we are missing one man.  Did I forget something? Did someone die? I can't remember.  I have some type of rash on my hands.  Real burning sensation.  Maybe it is radiation burns from something.  But where are the radiation monitors we had in our packs? Were are our survival packs? I can't find anything.  I am returning to the bowl.  I am lying down.  I will stop making entries in this diary.

 I am awake again.  Ebens are in the room.  My bowl is open.  Some of my crew are walking around.  The Ebens are helping them.  I climbed out of my bowl.  The English speaking Eben sees me and I asked him if everyone of my crew was alright.  He doesn't understand, “alright”.  I point to the crew.  I say eleven.  Where is number twelve? Ebe1 then points to a bowl that is empty and says, earthman is not living.  Ok, someone died.  But who.  My crew is walking around in a state of confusion.  I can't get anyone's attention.  They look like the living dead.  What is wrong with them? I asked Ebe1, what is wrong with them.  Ebe1 replied, space sick, but will not be sick soon.  Ok, that makes sense.  I have no idea how long.  We are still flying but don't know how long.  Ebe1 brings some fluids and something looking like a biscuit.  Fluid tastes like chalk and the biscuit doesn't have any taste.  We all eat it and drink the fluid.  Almost instantly we feel better.  Ok, get organized.  Told 203 to round up all crew.  Found 308 missing.  Must be the dead crew member.  Ebe1 came back and lead me to 308.  He was in bowl, something like coffin.  700 and 754 will examine 308.  Ebe 1 cautioned us no to take 308 out.  Don't understand the caution.  700 and 754 is here.  I try to tell Ebe 1 that these guys are our doctors and must examine 308.  Ebe 1 said no, because of infection.  I guess 308 must have had some sort of infection and it could be contagious.  But is 308 dead? Don't know.  

We will take Ebe1 advice.  700 and 754 just looked into the bowl and said it looks like 308 is dead.  Everyone else looks ok.  The fluids and biscuit must have contained some type of energy food.  We can focus our eyes and can actually think.  No one can remember how we got into this room.  All our equipment is here.  Everyone is concerned about our status.  Ebes are friendly but won't tell us much.  899 is concerned with being locked into a room.  633 and 661 thinks we should be keeping busy.  I agree.  I order everyone to get their packs and ration belts, inventory everything inside and see if something is missing.  That will occupy the team for some time.  My wristwatch says it is 0400.  But what day? Date? Don't know.  Very strange not being able to gauge time.  We have no reference inside this room or this spaceship.  The year clock that we brought will be unpacked once we can get to the stowed gear.  We don't know where that is.

 All crew inventoried packs and ration belts.  Everything is accounted for.  899 wants to arm himself with handgun.  I said no.  We don't need guns.  No Ebese have been hostel towards us.  We got out a compass.  It doesn't work.  We got out our radios.  We will keep them on our belts.  Don't know if they work away from the room.  But we turned them on and they work.  We can hear each other.  Good, we have communication.  But we must be careful, the battery life is only about two days.  I suggest everyone start writing down their thoughts.  Keep some sort of a diary, like I am doing.  I was ordered to do this and will continue to do as long as I can.  But I won't keep it by day, since I can't tell when a day ends.  661 suggests we make up a calendar and a time system as long as we are here.  Good idea, he will do that.  The calendar will run on a seven day system.  We will use our wristwatches to gauge a 24 hour period and then consider that one day.  We will start at 0600, which is in about 45 minutes.  518 set up the air monitor.  Seems we are breathing regular air.  The team is joking about 518's nomenclature use for regular air.  Good that we have some humor.  Ok, this is the beginning of day 1, it is 0600 hours.  661 will keep calendar.  We should have done this before.  We have no idea how long we have been inside this spaceship, how long we have been traveling.  Didn't we get into the command station? Maybe I dreamed it.  I can't find the first part of my diary.

  Ebe1 came in.  Told us journey almost over.  Lead us to hallway.  We got into moving room and moved to another part of ship.  Came out into large room with many items, I can't identify them but they look like clothing chests or bedroom chests.  We are also lead to a large table with food.  Ebe1 tells us to eat.  He said good food, eat.  We'll, we all look at each other.  700 and 754 says lets eat.  Ok, we find plates.  Seems like ceramic plates real heavy.  I chose something that looks like a stew.  I then got a biscuit, same as we ate earlier.  The drinks were in metal containers.  Same fluid we drank earlier.  We all ate.  Very little taste in the stew.  Something like potatoes, maybe cucumbers, some type of stems.  No really bad.  The biscuits taste the same.  Everyone sat and ate.  We found something like apples but didn't taste like apples.  Sweet and soft, I ate one.  Leaves an after taste in my mouth.  Team looks happy.  Some are joking about not having any ice cream.  Ok, the MVC is in room.  First time we saw him.  He speaks through Ebe1.  The language really bothers my ears.  The high pitch sounds and then the vocal tones sounds very strange.  Ebe1 tells us MVC wants us to prepare for landing.  Ok, how do we do that.  We must get into bowl room and get in bowl.  No one wants to do that but if we have to we will do that.  We must go into bowl room and get in bowl.  No one wants to do that but if we have to we will do it.  We are lead back to moving room and travel back to bowl room.  We climb into the bowl.  Some use pot for relief of our bowels and bladders.  Then climb into bowl.  The lids close but we are awake.  Just lie there.  I fall asleep.
 
 The bowl lids have opened.  My wristwatch says 1100.  I guess it is still day 1.  We climb out.  Ebe1 is at our side.  He tell us.  Landing home.  Ok, I guess we are there.  We gather our gear.  700 reminds us to wear out sunglasses once we exit.  We pack up and walk down long hallway.  Then into another moving room.  We travel for one minute.  Then door open.  We are in large room.  We see our stowed gear.  Large room, many smaller spaceships stored here.  A large door opens.  Bright light.  We see the planet for the first time.  We walk down the ramp.  Large number of ebens waiting for us.  We see a large eben, largest one we have seen yet.   He comes forward and starts speaking to us.  Ebe1 translate a welcome message from the Leader.  I guess this guy is the leader.  About one foot taller than the others.  The leader tells us we are welcome to planet, he called it something we do not understand.  Ebe1 isn't doing a good job translating.  

But we are lead to an open arena.  Looks like a parade field.  The ground is dirt.  Looking up, I see blue skies.  The sky is very clear.  We see two suns.  One brighter than the other.  The landscape looks like a desert, Arizona or new Mexico.  No vegetation that we can see.  There are rolling hills but nothing but dirt.  This must be the central village or town.  We landed in an open area with large structures like electrical towers.  Something is sitting on top of these towers.  On the center of the village is a large tower.  Looks like a concrete structure.  Very large, maybe 300 feet.  Looks like a mirror is placed on top of this tower.  All the buildings looks like adobe or mud huts.  Some are larger than others.  Looking in one direction, can't tell any actual compass readings but there is a very large structure.  All the ebens are dressed in the same clothing, except for some of the ebens who were on the spaceship.  Now I see others dressed in a dark blue outfit, different from the others.  Each eben is wearing some type of box on their belts.  All have belts.  Can't see any children, but maybe they are the same size too.  Our boots leave an imprint into the soil.  The brightness is almost too much for our eyes without sunglasses.  Looking around 360 degrees, I see buildings and barren land.  Can't see any vegetation.  I wonder where they grow their food.  What a planet.  

Hard to believe we will have to live 10 years here.  But a journey of 1000 miles begins with one foot step.  Can't remember who said that but that just came to mind.  But large numbers of ebens are welcoming us.  They seem friendly.  Then, almost shocking us, someone speaks English.  We all look around and see an eben.  This eben speaks very good English.  This eben, we call ebe2, speaks almost fluent English, with exception of not really pronouncing the letter w.  But ebe2 does a good job speaking English.  Ebe2 says we are welcome to the planet serpo.  Ok, that is the name of their planet.  Ebe2 shows us a device and tells us everyone of us must wear it.  It looks like a small transistor radio.  We put it on our belts. 

The weather is extremely hot.  Asked 633 to take temperature.  633 says it is 107 degrees.  Very warm.  We take off top jacket and leave us with one piece flight suit.  

The ebens looks at us but seem very friendly.  Some are wearing some type of shawls.  I asked Ebe2 about that, Ebe2 says they are females.  Ok, I see.  They all look alike.  Really hard to tell one apart except for uniform.  Some have different colored uniforms.  I asked Ebe2 about that, Ebe2 says military uniform.  Ok, that makes sense.  

Ebe2 lead us to a series of huts, looking like adobe style houses.  There are four.  Behind them is an underground room, or storage area.  It is built into the ground, underground.  We have to walk down a ramp.  The doors look like a military igloos that store our atomic bombs on earth.  All our gear taken off the spaceship is stored there.  We walked down into this area.  Very large room.  Very cool, a lot cooler.  We might have to sleep here.  All our gear is there.  Sixteen palates of gear.  This igloo is made up of something like concrete but not the same texture.  Feels like soft rubber but still hard.  The floor is made of the same stuff.  There are lights in the ceiling.  Looks like spot lights.  They have electricity.  We must inventory all our gear sometime.  

We go back to huts.  The huts are cooler than outside.  But still very warm.  We must get organized.  I tell Ebe2, we will need to be alone and get organized.  Ebe2, then I realize Ebe2 is female, says ok, We will be left alone.  

I asked for the body of 308 .   Ebe2 seems to be confused and doesn't know about any body.  I explained to Ebe2 held her hands across her body and bowed her head.  It was really an emotional site because she was almost crying.  Ebe 2 told us that the body would be brought to us but she must check with her trainer.  The word trainer kind of shocked me.  Is Ebe2 in training and someone is teaching her? Or is the word trainer in Eben something different in English.  Maybe that means leader or commander.  Don't know. But Ebe2 left. 

I told 203 to gather everyone in the lower storage area.  We will have a team meeting.  633 suggested we start the calendar as of today.  It is 1300 on our Day 1 on planet Serpo.
 ~~~~~~~~   

Bill, a consistency problem again. In the first postings Anon said,

But something went wrong. The 12 remained until 1978, when they were returned to the same location in Nevada. Seven men and one woman returned. Two died on the alien's home planet. Four others decided to remain, according to the returnees. Of the eight that returned, all have died. The last survivor died in 2002.

Now we've got one dying on the way to the planet. I don't know about others but having been trained in the Sciences consistency is very, very important. As for the Hybrid stuff there are people on this list who don't believe in Abductions or that Aliens are creating Human Hybrids. I think there is enough consistent information on that to say it might be very true......Regards.....Robert C

 Bill Ryan wrote:  


Hi, All –

I’ve just received more information from Anonymous – quite a lot of it. I’ll wait a short while (a few hours) before posting it all, for reasons that will become apparent below. I want everyone to have the chance to read this first.

 This one is a shocker. This preliminary posting is just to prepare everyone to brace themselves. Not wishing to be dramatic, but this is quite something and I have absolutely no idea where it goes from here.

 I received this message below on the website contact form on 7 December, the day after the C2C show. I immediately relayed it to Victor, asking him to check with Anon whether the information was correct or a hoax.

 The reply came back that it was indeed correct but was a very long story which would NOT be made public, and we should under no circumstances release the information. So we didn’t, and sat on it... not knowing quite what to think. Now – in further indication of a policy reversal – we’re being asked to do just that. Here’s the 7 December message in its entirety:

 ******************

 From: "T.G.H." mailto:contact@serpo.org
 Date: 7 Dec 2005 09:11:23 -0000
 To: "Serpo.org" mailto:contact@serpo.org
 Subject: Contact

 There is much, much more to this story. One person, a male, died during the trip to Zeta. He suffered a pulmonary embolism.  In addition, an autopsy was performed at which time the deceased individual's DNA was extracted and stored.  At a later tine, the DNA was used in a cloning type process which actually involved creating a hybrid being, part human, part alien.  Through an advanced aging process and something called rapid-cycling cloning, several hundred hybrid beings were created. Some remain on Zeta, but others were returned to Earth.  This can be verified in documents contained in the ZR Repro Factor file.

 ******************  

Dear All –

I post this new information without comment apart from pointing out that the first piece is the day after the team landed, while the second (which follows next) is eighteen months into their mission. All typos are uncorrected.

 Best wishes, Bill

 *******************************

 We had a serious problem. How do we explain our science to an alien entity, who doesn't know Einstein, Kepler or any of the other scientists of our time.  Simple mathematics, seems so foreign to them.  Ebe2 is the smart one.  She seems to understand our language more than 1 and 2.  She even seems to understand our basic math.  We started with the basic math.  2 plus 2.  Then progressed on.  She understood and even caught on so quick that she continued on without our help.  We realize she has a great IQ when she repeated 1000 times 1000 and came up with an answer.  We showed her our slide rule.  It took her a couple of minutes to figure it out, although I don't think she fully understood all the symbols on the slide rule.    

She is really something.  We found a personality in her.  Maybe because we have more contact with her than the others.  She is very warm hearted, one can just sense that in her.  She really cares about us and she even worries about us.  During our first night, she seemed to make sure everything was just right for us.   

 She warned us of the heat and the light.  She mentioned that SERPO does not get dark, like earth.  I wonder how she knew that?  Has she visited earth? Maybe she is just educated on earth's properties.  Maybe they have books about earth.  Anyway, on the first night, she told us about the winds, what winds.  Gusty winds start just when the one sun sets. The other sun does not but stays in the lower horizon.  The winds blow dust, free dust into our huts.  We had a very difficult first night.  We call it night but it seems that the Ebens just call it a period of their day.  Ebe3 knew the word day but didn't compare it to earth's day.

Maybe she hasn't been to earth.  We didn't sleep well during our night. The Eben's don't sleep, like we do.  They seem to rest for periods of time and then wake and go about their business, whatever that might be, When we awoke, Ebe2 was there, outside our hut.  

I opened the door and she was waiting.  Why?  How did she know we were awake?  Maybe the huts are being monitored by some sensor.  Ebe2 told us to follow her to the eating place.  She didn't use the word dining hall or chow hall or facility.  She used the word place.  Once I gathered the team, we walked across the village, I'll call it a village for the sake of wording.  

We entered a large building.  It seemed to be large, based on the small stature of the Ebens.  There were food on tables.  I guess we'd call this place a chow hall.  Ebens looked at us but carried on eating. Do they not cook inside their huts?  Maybe everyone eats here.  

We walked to the food tables.  Same food we saw and ate on the spaceship except some items were different.  They bad large bowls of something like fruits.  Strange looking things.  They also had something like cottage cheese, it tasted like sour milk but after the initial taste, alright.  I encouraged each team member to eat and drink.  We might as well get use to the food. But 700 tells us to eat just one of their meals a day and stick to our C-rations for the other meals.  That way, our system will adjust to the Eben food.  

We sat at a table, small compared to our standards and ate.  The Ebens numbering, probably about 100, just ate and didn't really bother us.  Every now and then, we would catch Ebens staring at us.  But we were the freaks, not them.  We are the visitors.  We are the aliens.  We must really look strange to them.  We all look different, they all look the same.  How can they compare us to them?  They can't.  We stare at them, they stare at us.  

We then see a different looking Eben.  Very strange looking creature, large, long arms, almost floats along with long legs.  Can't be an Eben. We all stare.  This creature just floats by us and didn't even look at us.  I find Ebe2.  She is eating with three others.  Once I approach her, she stands and almost bows her head towards me.  Maybe just a greeting, have to remember that.  I ask her abet the creature we saw, I ask if that was some other type of Eben.  Ebe2 seems confused. She asked me what creature. I used the word creature.  Maybe that was an insult or maybe she didn't know the word.  

I pointed to the thing at the other end of the building.  She then saw what I meant.  Ebe2 said, no Eben, just visitor.  Like you, pointing to me.  Ok, I see, they have other alien visitors here.  I guess we are not the only ones.  I then asked Ebe2 what planet did that visitor come from? Ebe2 said, something like CORTA, not sure of the exact work although I asked her to repeat it twice.  

Ok, where is CORTA?  She walks me to a television, at least it looks like one. It is positioned in the corner of the building.  It is set up like some type of command station.  She places her finger on the glass and something appears.  The universe?  Star systems.  I don't recognize any of them.  She points to a spot and says CORTA.  

Ok, where is earth?  She points to another spot and says earth.  Based on this television glass space map, CORTA and earth are very close.  But I don't know the  scale of this map. Maybe they are a trillion miles apart or maybe 10 light years.  But they seem close.  I'll have to have one of the scientists look at this and see.  

Ok, I thank Ebe2.  She seems pleased.  She almost looks like a angel.  She seems so very nice.  She touched my hand and pointed to my table and said, eat.  Good eat?  I laughed and said, yes, good chow hall food.  She looked puzzled.  I guess she doesn't know what a chow hall is.  I pointed to the building and said, chow hall, earth eating place. She repeated what I said, chow hall, earth eating place.  I laughed and walked away.  Now she will think all earth restaurants are called chow halls.

 We retuned to our huts.  We must get better organized.  We have a meeting. Everyone seems ok.  We wonder about latrines, Where do we relieve ourselves.  Ebe1 comes by, almost as if he was reading our minds, maybe they can even do that.  He tells shows us pot in hut.  We all wondered what that was.  Ok, that is our latrine.  Realized that won't work very well but we'll do what we can.  Then we realize the pot has some sort of chemical inside.  Our wastes are dissolved or something like that.  Can't really tell.  Each of the four huts have one.  That will work for the time being.  

Ebe2 tells us to walk on ground.  Not sure what he means by that but 420 says that might we to just walk around. Ok, that we will do.  I organize the teams102 will remain with 225.  I want 633 and 661 to look at the television glass map and see if they can tell which star system is CORTA.  I ask 518 to take temperature readings and general weather observations.  I know it is hot.  Very hot.  Most be over 140 degrees.  754 warns us to keep covered from sun radiation.  754 says radiation levels are high.  Doesn't sound very good to me.  This reminds me of Nevada.  1956, during one of the atomic bomb testing.  We had hot weather and we had to worry about the radiation from the atomic blasts.  Now we are on a strange planet 40 light years from earth and we have radiation and heat.  But we have to explore that is why we were sent.  We starting walking around 475 will take photographs with our military cameras. I hope the film is affected by the radiation.  How do we develop it? Maybe we didn't think of everything.  

I team up with 225. We walk to a large open door building.  We walk in and it looks like a classroom but no Ebens are here.  There is a large television tube, it takes up the entire wall. There are some lights flashing on this television tube.  We examine the tube.  It is very thin.  I wonder how it works.  Where are the tubes or the electronics.  But maybe they are more advanced in this area than us.  They must be.  We don't find touch else in this building.  

We move on, wow, it is so very hot, I hope l get use to it. We find a large tower.  Looks like a antenna tower but it has a large mirror.  We saw this when we first arrived yesterday.  We find an Eben standing near the door but he moves to one side.  We ask him if he understands English. He just stares at us but seems friendly.  I guess he doesn't speak English.  We move on into the building, Can't find any stairs.  But we see some type of round glass room.  Maybe it is an elevator.  Then we hear English. 

 We turn around and find Ebe2 standing there.  Where did she come from?  I her if we may explore this building.  She said yes, of course, She points to the glass room and says go up.  Ok, we enter the glass room.  The glass door closes and go up real fast.  In no time we are at the top.  But what is this.  We ask Ebe2, what is this.  She points to the sun and then points to the top of the room, where the mirror is located.  She then points to the ground.  Ok, we see it.  The tower is in the middle of a circle. The circle is situated on the ground.  In each quadrant of the circle is a symbol.  I see that the sun is directed through the mirror maybe this isn't a mirror as we know it since the sunlight travels through it, but once the sunlight travels through it, the light is directed on a symbol within the circle.  Ebe2 says that when light contacts symbol then Ebens make change.  Not sure what that means.  Maybe she means it tells the Ebens what to do.  225 seems to think it is a sun dial.  When the sun strikes a symbol, the Ebens change what they are doing and do something else.  Maybe the Eben day is structured.  Or maybe this is their clock.  Strange.  But we are on an alien planet.

 I'm glad I still have my sense of humor.  This is only our first day, first day of school.  We have a lot to learn.  We have to keep an open mind.  We can't keep comparing things to earth.  We have to open our minds to new ideas and new science.  All these things are foreign to us but we must learn. I pointed to my wristwatch and then pointed to the ground and in a gesture to show Ebe2 that the two items are time pieces.  Not sure if she understood.  But I said time and she then understood..  Yes, she said, Eben time, pointing to the ground.  I pointed again to the wristwatch and said, earth time.  Ebe2 then almost smiled and said, no, no earth time on SERPO.  Ok, that makes sense.  225 said, she just told us that earth time doesn't work on SERPO.  Yes, I guess she did.  What good is our watches or time device here?  They don't work.  We have to start using Eben time.  But we must also maintain our time because we must know when to leave.  Ten years seem like a million.  Maybe based on Eben time that it might just be a million years.  Lets hope not.  

No time to think about home, we have a mission and duties to perform.  We are a military team and we must maintain that idea.  225 and myself go back into the glass bowl and go down to the ground.  We walk onto another building, large again.  Inside we find rolls and rolls of plants.  This must be some sort of greenhouse, They are growing food.  Many Ebens are inside.  They look at us with some glares.  But we just walk in and around.  One Eben comes up to us and speaks but in Eben.  He seems to be telling us something.  He points to the ceiling and then to our heads.  Maybe he is telling us to cover our heads. We must find Ebe2.  

We go back outside and then finds Ebe2, she always seems to be near.  Now we understand why, she is monitoring us by the devices we are wearing on our belts.  I ask Ebe2 what is that building.  She says food making place.  Ok, maybe we contaminated the place.  We told her that another Eben spoke to us and then pointed to our heads.  Ebe2 seemed confused and walked back into the building with us.  The same Eben exchanged words with Ebe2.  Ebe2 then told us that we must wear a cover on our heads in order to enter. Why?  But we don't argue.  This other Eben produces some sort of cloth had and we wear it.  We walk about, the Eben seemed happy, We look at their plants.  They are growing food in soil.  They have a watering system.  They also have some sort of transparent cloth over each plant.  I point to the watering system and ask Ebe2, if that is water, drinking water.  Ebe2 said yes.  Then she senses we are thirsty.  Ebe2 leads us to a place near another entrance and offers us water, at least we think it is water.  Tastes like chemicals but it is water.  Actually tastes good.

The leader of the Ebens is a larger creature than the others.  He seems to be more aggressive than the other Ebens.  When I write aggressive, I don't me in a hostile way. He seems to be the boss, similar to me, as the team commander.  His voice, although after all this time, I still can't understand any words, is harsh and with a tone that is different from the rest.  203 claims the leader has an attitude. I agree.  He is extremely friendly to us and has accommodated all our requests.  The leader has requested many things from us.  Most of which, we have provided.  One strange thing is our blood.   

 He wanted all of us to supply blood samples.  Ebe2 explained that the blood or health fluid as Ebe2 explained it, was necessary for them to supply any medicine to us if we should ever need it.  700 and 754 feels that a blood sample might just be used for other purposes.  We have allowed the Ebens to utilize 308's body for experiments.  They took all 308s blood, that was without my approval.  I wrote about that in log 3888.  We had a very tense situation with the Ebens about that.  When we traveled to the building housing 308s body, we were confronted by several Ebens.  Ebe1 showed up and I explained that we wanted the body of 308.  Ebe 1 told us the body was in storage and we could not take it.  We told Ebe 1 that we will take it.    

The eleven of us walked by the Ebens, numbering six and walked into the building.  They did not attempt to stop us.  While inside, we could not open any of the containers.  There was some type of system, maybe crypto style, that was being used to lock the containers.  We did find the container housing 308's body.  We decided to send 899 to our storage area and get  some explosives to open the container.    

Ebe2 showed up with the leader.  Ebe2 was extremely polite and asked us to wait.  She used the word please several times.  In fact, she actually used the English word beg. We backed off and I told Ebe2 that we wanted our friends body and we wanted to examine it.    

Ebe2 translated that to the leader.  There was a long exchange of words between the two. Finally, Ebe2, who seemed very  frustrated told us that the leader would like us to go to another location and speak with another Eben, a doctor, about the body of 308.  Ebe2 explained that everything wanted to know about 308's body would be explained to us by the Eben doctor, who Ebe2 said spoke English.   

I told Ebe 2 that I would leave 899 and 754 here to guard the body and I would take the others to the location containing  the doctor.  Ebe2 translated that to the leader.  Again, there was a long drawn out exchange of words between the two. It lasted for several minutes. Finally, Ebe2 stated that the leader would like all of us to leave this building and go to visit with the doctor. I told Ebe2, no, I would not leave the body of 308 alone.    

I felt that this was going to be a confrontation.  I told 518 and 420 to go back, obtain our handguns and come back ASAP. I was not going to allow the Ebens to counterman my decisions.  When Ebe2 heard this, she told me to wait and placed her hand against my chest.  I told her to translate that to the leader.  Again, there were several minutes of word exchanges between the two.  Ebe2 then stated that the leader would bring the doctor here to discuss the situation with us.    

Ebe2 asked me to please don't send your men for guns. Guns are not needed, we can settle this without guns.  Please don't.  I told Ebe2 that we would not get the guns but we would not leave until we saw 308's body.  The leader did something with the communication device on his belt.   

 About 20 minutes later, three Ebens showed up inside this building.  One of the Ebens, who identified himself as a doctor and who spoke very good English.  This doctor had a strange sounding voice, almost like a human's voice.  This doctor did not have a high pitch accent, like Ebe1 and Ebe2.  I was very impressed with this doctor.  I just wonder where he has been for these past 18 months. We have never saw him before.   

This doctor told us that 308s body was not inside the container.  The Ebens have done experiments with 308s body because they considered it an honor to have such a specimen to work with.  The doctor told us they have used 308s body to create a type of cloned human being.    

I stopped the doctor at this point.  I told the doctor that the body of my teammate was the property of the United States of America, planet Earth.  The body did not belong to the Ebens.  I did not authorize any experiments on the body of 308.  I explained that humans consider a body to be religious. Only I could have authorized the use of 308s body for experiments.

 I demanded to see the body.  This doctor explained the body was gone.  This doctor said all the blood, body organs were taken out and used to clone other beings.    

The use of the word beings really scared me and the others.  899 became extremely angry.  He called the doctor curse names.  I ordered 899 to be quiet.  I then told 203 to take 899 out of the building.  I realized this matter could really blossom into a major incident.  I could not allow that to happen.  There were just eleven of us and we realized that if the Ebens wanted to imprison us or kill us, they could do it very easily.  But I didn't think the Ebens would resort to such behavior.  I was not going to allow this incident to advance into something worse.  I realized there wasn't much we could do about what the Ebens have done with 308s body.    

Ebe2 looked very upset.  Ebe2 told me that everyone should be nice, she repeated the word nice many times.  Ebe2 did not want this matter to escalate.  I kind of felt sorry for Ebe2.  She was trying to mediate the matter.    

203 suggested we return to our living quarters and have a team meeting.    

I told the leader that I did not want any further interference between whatever is left of 308s body and experiments.  I pointed my finger towards the leader's face.  Ebe2 translated, along with the doctor.  The doctor, who was extremely straightforward, told me that nothing further would happen with the body, but advised me very little was left of the body.

 Ebe2 then told me the leader was concerned that we were upset.  That we were their guests.  That the leader was upset that we were offended.  The leader did not wish to upset us and promised that nothing further would happen to the body.  I thanked Ebe2 and had her relay that to the leader.    

We returned to out huts.  Everyone was upset, especially 899.  I told each member to calm down.  I explained our situation, as if each team member didn't already realize it, that we were only eleven military personnel.  We had no way of fighting the Ebens.  We did not come 40 light years to start a war with the Ebens.  A war we could not win.  We could not even win a simple fist fight with the Ebens.  Yes, maybe we could beat them up but what then. We have to realize out situation and act accordingly.  I ordered each member to reconsider the situation and to except the facts about 308s body.

 I told 633 and 700 to investigate this cloning procedure with the English speaking Eben doctor. Lets get all the facts about what they did with the body and what we can find out about the body and the Ebens experiments with the body.

 Ebe2 came to the hut.  I told Ebe2 that 633 and 700 were going to examine what was left of 308s body.  They would also conduct research into the Ebens experiments done on 308s body.    

Ebe2 look very concerned.    

It is sometimes difficult for us, even after the time we have been on this planet, to determine the meaning of facial expressions on Ebens face.    

Ebe2 replied that she must first obtain approval, approval was a new word for Ebe2.  She was must reading or learning our language. Maybe she is just picking up our words.    

I told Ebe2 that she can go get permission but that we were told when we arrived that we did not have any restrictions on where we went.    

Ebe2 said she would speak with the leader.    

633 and 700 gathered test equipment and prepared themselves for the examination of the Eben laboratory.    

According to our time devices, Ebe2 came back about 80 minutes later.  Ebe2 said it was alright for my men to visit their laboratory.    

I decided that I would also visit it.  Myself, 633 and 700 were escorted by Ebe2 to the laboratory facility.  We had to be taken by the helitransport device, as we call their helicopters.  It took us sometime before arriving at this location. 

 According to our compass readings, which are not really a compass reading but we made points of references and according to them, we traveled north.    

The facility was large, by Eben standards.  The building looked like a large single story windowless school.  We landed on the roof, or maybe just a landing zone on the roof.  We were escorted down a walkway or ramp.  They don't have ladders on this planet.  I think I wrote about this in one of my past entries.  They have ramps.  We arrived in a room.  White walls. We then walked through a hallway into another larger room.  We met our English speaking doctor.  We saw many other Ebens, all dressed in a bluish colored one piece suit.  Different from their ordinary suits I spoke of in past entries.    

The doctor told us that all the experiments done inside this building, he didn't call it a laboratory, just a building, is done to create cloned beings.  We were lead into another room, where there were rolls of containers, looking like glass bathtubs.  

 Inside each bathtub were bodies.  I was shocked, as were 700 and 754.  Bodies.  Strange looking bodies.  Not human bodies, at least not all of them.  We started walking down the space between the tubs.  We looked into the tubs.  These were hideous looking creatures.  I asked the doctor what type of creatures were inside these tubs.  The doctor told us that these creatures came from other planets.  700 asked the doctor were these creatures dead when they arrived? Or did the Ebens bring them here dead.  The doctor said all the creatures were brought to the planet alive.  700 asked if the creatures were kidnapped or brought here against their wishes.    

The doctor was not sure of the word kidnapped.  The doctor seemed puzzled.  The doctor asked about the question.  700 said that these creatures were taken from another planet and brought to Serpo without permission from them or their leaders of their planet.  The doctor said that these beings were brought here for experiments.  These creatures are not intelligent beings.  Ebe2 then used the word animals.    

Ok, now I understand.  All these creatures are animals from other planets.  The doctor didn't seem to understand the word animal. Ebe2 and the doctor exchanged words in Eben and the doctor then said, yes, they are animals.    

I then asked if there were any intelligent creatures in this building.  The doctor said, yes, but that all of them were dead when they arrived on Serpo.  700 asked to see these creatures.  The doctor corrected 700 by saying beings.    

Ok, I guess creatures are animals and beings are like humans.  Let me first write down the description of these creatures inside these tubs.  They are not all alike.    

The first creature I see inside the tub looks like a porcupine.  It appears to have a tube placed inside of it. The tube leads to a box underneath the tub.  The second creature I see looks like a monster.  It has a large head, big deep set eyes, no ears, a mouth, but no teeth.  It is about five feet long and has two lower legs but no feet.  It has two arms but it doesn't appear to have any elbows.  It has hands but no fingers.  This creature also has a tube going through it.    

The next creature looked like nothing I can compare it to.  It had blood red skin, two spots in the middle, maybe eyes.  No arms or legs.  It had a very strange odor.  The skin appeared to be blotchy with scales.  Maybe like a fish.  Maybe it is a fish.    

The next creature was human like.  But the skin was white, not skin white, the color white.  The skin was wrinkled.  The head was large, with two eyes, two ears and a mouth.  The neck was very small.  The head almost looked as if it sat on the lower torso.  The chest was thin, with large bone like protrusions.  The arms were curled, with hands but no thumbs.  The legs were also curled with feet but only three toes.    

I couldn't look at any more creatures. We walked down another hallway, through a room, down a ramp, into another room.  We came into a room that looked like a hospital room.  There were many beds, or at least sometime of bed, Eben style bed.  I described them before.  In each bed was a living being, as the doctor called it.  The doctor told us that each being was alive and well cared for.  700 asked the doctor if these beings were ill or sick.  Ebe2 had to translate that but the doctor said, no, they are being lived.  The three of us seemed really stunned by that word lived.    

I asked Ebe2 what the doctor meant.  Ebe2 exchanged words with the doctor.  Ebe2 then used the word grown.    

700 asked the doctor if these were the cloned beings that he mentioned before.  The doctor said yes that each being was being grown, using the same word as Ebe2 just used.    

754 asked the doctor if these beings were being grown like a plant.  The doctor said yes that is a good comparison.    

700 asked the doctor how are they grown.  The doctor said that certain parts of other beings were used to grow these beings.  The doctor said he could not explain the process in English because he didn't know the words.  700 then asked Ebe2 if she could explain the growing process.  Ebe2 said she did not know the English words. Ebe2 said that parts of the blood and other organs are used to mix a substance that is placed inside the bodies of these beings.  That was all Ebe2 could explain in English.    

I told 700 to go back and get 420 and bring them back.  While we waited for 420, we looked at these beings.  They were breathing. They looked like humans, most of them.  Two of the beings on the end looked like humans with dog heads. These beings were not awake.  They were either sleeping or drugged.    

420 returned.  I told 420 to see if he could translate the method used to grow these beings.  420 then spoke with Ebe2. 420 is really good.  However long we have been hear, some guess about 18 months earth time, 420 learned the language well.  420 then said that the growing process involved cells taken from other beings, grown and mixed with chemicals and then inserted into the bodies of other beings. That was about all 420 could explain.  420 did not know the words Ebe2 used.  But the word cells were used.  Ebe2 then told me that some things were taken from inside the cells.    

700 and 754 then asked if the item take from inside the cells were cell membranes or identification markers for the cells. Ebe2 translated that to the doctor.    

Both seemed confused and said they could not explain the process because they did not know the English words for it. 

 700 used the word advance biological extraction of the cell membranes.  But neither Ebe2 or the doctor knew anything about that process.    

I asked 754 if he might understand what they were doing.    

754 said that human cells contain smaller substance that can identify the structure with the membranes of the cell.  This isn't something that earth technology has advance but 754 has read about it prior to leaving.  But 754 doesn't think that earth technology can be used to grown living cells into what the Ebens have done.    

The Ebens must have found a way to grow cells and to make them into living beings.  700 and 754 said nothing like his is known on earth.    

I then asked the doctor if 308s body was used to create a being.  The doctor said yes, and showed us the being.  I was shocked, as was 700 and 754.  This being, with our teammates blood and cells, looked like a large Eben. But the hands and legs were similar to humans.    

[ SPECIAL NOTE FROM VICTOR MARTINEZ: The dead Team Member's body #308 was cloned with a creature called an "Archquloid" 

 "A-R-C-H-Q-U-L-O-I-D"

 which originates from another star system and is one of 200+ civilizations that the Ebens regularly interface with on either
 exploratory and/or trading routes/missions.

 This information was NOT made known to co-moderator Bill Ryan, but was revealed to me in an "Eyes Only" e-mail on Thursday, December 8, 2005 @ 8:17 p.m., which I've never released, though I am now considering doing so. If "my"  ANONYMOUS asks me to NOT reveal/release his private e-mail to me, I WILL respect his wishes and "kill" it. 

 How could they have grown this being so quick.  Obviously, this is well above our intelligence.  I saw all I wanted to see. I told the doctor that we would like to leave.    

Ebe2 saw that I was upset and touched my hand.  Instantly, I felt concern.  Ebe2 was really concerned about what I saw. Ebe2 said we leave.  We traveled outside this building, a building that I did not wish to see again.  I saw the dark side of this civilization.  The Ebens are not the humane civilization we thought they were.  But I must say they didn't hide anything.  The doctor spoke straight to us.  Just like the Ebens.  They don't know how to lie.  Seeing what we saw will change our impression of the Ebens as long as we stay on this planet.
  

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Posting Sixteen by Anonymous (9 March, 2006)


 [Note by BR: This posting was received by myself while at the Laughlin UFO Congress, Nevada. There are two parts:

1) A sample of the Eben written language (original on left; sample enlargement on right; click on either for a higher-resolution image);

2) A further instalment of the Team Commander's Log, posted verbatim as before. The final sentence is also verbatim, and apparently incomplete.]



 




It was difficult to speak science to the Ebens. How do we explain Einstein? How do they explain their Einstein? We had a difficult time relating our science to them. However, they seemed to understand our physics and chemistry quicker than we can. We managed to observe some strange things about their technology. First, we took apart one of the locators, they placed on our belts. It wasn't easy. There were no screws or bolts holding it together. We had to break the thing. The electronics inside was nothing we have ever observed. There were no transistors, tubes, rectifiers, coils or other electronic components like our technology. This thing had just wires and some bulges in the wires at certain points. There was two components, which none of use have ever seen. We could not use our frequency counter to determine the frequency it transmitted and received. It was out of our range. 633 and 661 used some other equipment to analyze the thing but couldn't understand it. We asked the Eben Scientist, who we called Ebe4. The problem was the translation Ebe 2 had to translate because Ebe 4 didn't speak English. A lost is lost in translation even though Ebe 2 does a pretty good job with English. 

We showed Ebe 4 one of our portable radios. The Motorola FM radio was pretty complex to us. It was new and contained four channels. 661 took apart the radio in front of Ebe 4, explained the parts and the different crystals we use for frequency. Ebe 4 couldn't understand it. He seemed as lost with our radio as we did with theirs. Ebe 2 told us that Ebe 4 couldn't understand the radio or how it worked. So that was our dilemma. How do we exchange science. 

Each of our civilizations must learn from the other. So, we decided to begin a school. Our first days were pretty tough. We started with simple things. which we thought would be similar to what they would know. We chose light. 661, who did some teaching before, started with wavelengths. 661 started with nonvisible light and the different angstroms. Then 661 showed them the spectrum of light. 661 showed them cosmic rays and how we measured them. Then he went to gamma rays, x-rays and ultraviolet light. 661 explained that light was what we called electromagnetic waves. Over a period of eben days, 661 explained everything he knew about light, frequencies and a description of the frequency bands. 

During this time, several other Ebens came in and listened. Ebe 2 was extremely tasked with translating this. Ebe 2 had a difficult time explaining everything 661 said because she didn't know the Eben words for everything. But she did an outstanding job of describing what 661 was saying. I don't think Ebe 4 got everything 661 said but it didn't take long for Ebe 4 to realize what 661 was describing. 661 then showed Ebe 4 a repair manual for one of our test equipment. Since everything, or almost everything we brought was military, it was a military manual. The manual contained schematics of the circuits. Ebe 4 was completely lost. But eventually figured out what 661 was showing him was the inside of the test equipment. 661 then started showing the basics of electricity. Ohms laws, different formulas to figure voltage and amperes. Ebe 4 was confused, to say the least. But one of the other Ebens. who had came in to listen, grasped the idea quickly. We called this Eben, Ebe 5 or the Einstein. This Eben was smart, exceptionally smart. After three years, we finally meet an Eben who can grasped our science. The only problem is he couldn't speak English. But he asked questions, which Ebe 4 didn't really do. Although it took several lessons to teach Ebe 5 what each letter meant in a formula, Ebe 5 finally realized what we were saying. This Eben must of have an IQ of 300. Ebe5 actually solved some simple problems set up by 661. Basic electricity, solving for the amount of resistance in a circuit, simple things like that. It was a remarkable scene. 

Ebe 5 became our ace student. We couldn't get rid of the guy. He followed us around and asked questions through Ebe 2. When Ebe 2 wasn't available, he would simple point and shrug his shoulders. We'd speak to him in English or have 420 or 475 translate to him. But only 420 could understand most of what Ebe 5 was saying. This come to another interesting point. Ebe 5 looked a little different than the rest of the Ebens. During the last several years, we have noticed some of the Ebens, especially the ones who live up north, look different. There heads seem to be bigger. They have a more weathered looking face. Ebe 5 is from the north. He lives in the second village to our north. The distance is approximately 5 kilometers. I drew the map in entry 4432, showing all the villages in the north. I'm sure they have more villages farther away but we haven't visited them yet. Ebe 5 also does not have a mate. This is strange but not totally uncommon. We have found several Ebens without mates. We haven't delved into the personal life of Ebe 5 but 518 wants to. 

I explained in one entry about the Eben technology when it comes to screws, bolts, etc. They don't have any. Everything they make is sealed with some sort of solder or melting method. When we visited their manufacturing plant, we were amazed at how efficient they were with manufacturing furniture, their helicopters or flying devices. We still haven't seen their main spacecraft manufacturing plant. It must be in the far west and south. I'm sure we will visit the place someday. We still have seven years, or at least seven earth years left. 

As I mentioned before, we have totally lost track of earth time. We gave that up many of our years ago. We have gauged our time on Eben time, which is extremely complex, as I mentioned before. We had a feast today. What a feast. We used our last C-Rations but the Ebens didn't really care for our food. We did kill a beast. As I mentioned before, the Ebens allowed us to kill the beasts for meat. The meat isn't really bad, 899 says it tastes like Bear, which I never ate. But Ebens look at us very strange when we eat meat. Strange, they can clone creatures and other species of humans but they can't eat meat. How strange they are. But they allow us to do just about anything we want and eating meat is something we need for the protein. We used the last of our salt and pepper, which does make eating their food more of a challenge. The Ebens don't have anything similar to salt and pepper. They do have an herb, as we, call it, something like Oregano which they use. It has a tart taste but we have developed a taste for it. The feast was great. 

We participated in the dances, which the Ebens really like. They get great pleasure dancing and playing their strange games. I described the games before but this feast, we saw something different. The game was played like chess but with Ebens standing on a large square area of the compound. The squares were divided into 24 sets. Each set had another 2 spots. Just how or why the Ebens moved was a mystery to us. One of the Ebens would say a word and then another Eben would move. It appeared that it was a team game. Six Ebens on each side. We couldn't figure it out but at the end,, the Ebens danced with each other, signifying a victory, we think. It was a fun day. 

My team played softball, with some hard nosed Ebens, who have learned the game. Well for the most part. They still haven't figured out they have to catch the ball before it hits the ground. But they had fun. We have found some extremely gifted athletics among the Ebens. Then again, we found some who had no athletic ability. Just like humans. Our softball game ended when the rains came. We ended up inside the community building. We finished our meals and separated to our living area. 

As we do each day,, we have our end of day briefing. We check each other for psychological condition and medical health. Our day ends and we start our eight hours of rest. Ebens have a different period of time, as I mentioned before. They rest about four hours, for every 10 hours working time. But we must consider their hour is longer and that their days are longer. So we stopped using our time and used the Eben time. It is difficult to understand but this is only a diary. Once I return to Earth, I can explain the time difference and how we had to use their time instead of ours. I keep writing about the time in every diary entry but it is important to note that even though we have been hear for about three years, Earth time, we have given up Earth time and utilized the Eben time. We tried to use their two suns as a counting system but that didn't work. We then tried to use our own watches but that didn't work. So we gave up our time pieces and just use the Eben's time tower. Each village has one and it is easy to understand the symbols. Each symbols means a certain time and certain work period. 

Ebe 2 came by after the feast. Ebe 2 was concerned with 754. As I mentioned in one past entry, 754 became sick. But he has recovered. We don't know what he suffered but 700 treated him with penicillin, which worked. We all have had some sort of sickness since we've been here except 899, that guy is a solid rock. He hasn't been sick, not even a cold. 706 and 754 are keeping details records of each team member and their medical and physical condition. We have tried to keep a steady physical fitness program since we arrived. Some time we follow it and sometime we don't. But everyone is in pretty good shape, at least physically. Mentally, that might be another story. Some team members miss Earth, as I do. But no team member has broke down or has needed some type of psychological help from 700 or 754. Our screening process was great. 

Keeping busy is our medicine. We keep extremely busy, exploring and doing our mission goals. At one of our team meeting recently, 203 and myself decided to give up the military greetings, saluting that each member did the first time they saw us. I decided we maintain our military bearing and manners but we will give up the saluting. Each team member agreed. I have no problem with that. The Ebens just stared at us when we did that. But they also have their greetings. Ebens exchange greetings depending on the time of day. They hug on certain times, touch fingers on other times and bow at other times. We still haven't figure out why they do that. Ebe 2 just explained it was a formal greeting method. Ebens live a very strict life. They keep a regimented life style. We have seen some variances but only by a few. 

The military keeps everyone in line. The military acts as a police force, as I mentioned before. They do not carry any weapons but they do have different uniforms and every Eben respects that uniform. The military are patrolling all the time. They walk in pairs and seem to be extremely friendly but can be very strict. We saw two Ebens walking across a field. Two military members quickly approached the two Ebens and pointed to a building. The two Ebens walked to that building with the military members. The military members were yelling something at them. At the time, neither 420 or 475 were available for translation but I figured those two Ebens violated some custom or law. We have been warned by the military when we approach something we are not suppose to approach. The military are very respectful when they deal with us but they don't allow us to violate any of their customs or laws without warning us. When we first killed one of the sand snakes, we had six military members at the scene in no time. It took a great deal of diplomacy to deal with that situation. But the military never touched us nor threatened us. 

The Ebens have adjusted to us just as we have adjusted to them. We carry on our mission and they allow us to do just about anything. The one forbidden act is not to enter a private living house. We did that once and was politely escorted  out by the military. There seems to be more military than actually needed. 

They do have weapons, as I mentioned before. We rarely see any military member with those weapons. But we have seen them during the alert that occurred some time ago. Ebe 2 came into our living compound, just after one of our rest periods. Ebe 2 was excited and told us to stay inside and not to exit our living quarters. We asked why and Ebe 2 said that an unknown spacecraft had entered their planet's orbit. But Ebe 2 assured us that the military will take care of the problem. We naturally went into our own alert. We issued our weapons and stood by to guard our living area. We violated her instructions and went outside. We watched the skies and saw a lot of air traffic. We then saw all the military members with weapons and something that looked like field packs. They were in full fighting gear, as 899 called it. The alert didn't last very long and Ebe 2 came back, looked at us a little curious and then told us everything was alright and the alert was over. We asked her if the unknown spacecraft was identified. She said it wasn't a spacecraft but just a natural piece of space debris and left it at that. We didn't believe her but we had no way of knowing any difference. We returned to our normal routines.

~~~~~~~~~

http://67.175.66.68/serpo/  

 http://www.serpo.org/

TRAFFIC DETAILS FOR "Project SERPO": 137,457 AND GROWING DAILY ...POSITIVELY AMAZING!  

 http://www.alexa.com/data/details/traffic_details?q=&url=www.serpo.org

– POSTING #17 –  

A "Project SERPO" MISSION SPECIAL POSTING: AN INVENTORY OF NEARLY ALL OF THE 90,500 LBS OF EQUIPMENT THAT OUR BRAVE 12 TEAM MEMBERS TOOK WITH THEM ON THEIR EPIC 13-YEAR JOURNEY TO AN ALIEN WORLD RANGING FROM MUSIC, CLOTHING, MEDICAL SUPPLIES TO VEHICLES TAKEN AND FOOD AND MISCELLANEOUS EQUIPMENT SUPPLIES!

 VICTOR:
  
 The following information pertains to the equipment our Team took to Planet SERPO. All of the military equipment was real,... at least back then.
  
 LIST OF SUPPLIES TAKEN BY "Project CRYSTAL KNIGHT" Team Members [which was later renamed "Project SERPO" once the seven (7) Team Members returned in 1978 and the report was finalized in 1980]:  

 1) MUSIC – The Team Members took the following types of music:

º Elvis Presley, Buddy Holly, Ricky Nelson, The Kingston Trio, Brenda Lee, The Beach Boys, Bob Dylan, 
 Peter, Paul & Mary, The Beatles, Loretta Lynn, Simon & Garfunkel, The Hollies, Chubby Checker, Bing Crosby, 
 Dinah Shore, Vera Lynn, Tommy Dorsey, Ted Lewis, Ethel Merman, Everly Brothers, Lesley Gore, Marline Dietrich, The Patters, Doris Day, Connie Francis, Shirelles Lyrics, Frank Sinatra, Dean Martin, Perry Como, Guy Lombardo, Glenn Miller, Rosemary Clooney, Al Jolson; 

º Christmas Music, U.S. Patriotic Music;  

º Classical Music: Mozart, Hansel, Bach, Schubert, Mendelssohn, Rossini, Strauss, Beethoven, Brahms, Chopin, Tchaikovsky, Vivaldi,

º Indian Chanting Music, Tibetan Chants, African Chants [these last three (3) for the intended benefit of the Eben hosts]. 

  
 2) CLOTHING – Each Team Member took the following clothing:

 24 pairs of specialized flight suits, 112 pairs of underwear (pants/shirts), 220 pairs of socks, 18 hats, including jungle style and regular ball caps, 50 different types of footwear, military clothing, load bearing belts and harnesses, military backpacks, 30 pairs of civilian casual pants, shorts, sleeveless shirts, 15 pairs  of athletic shoes, 100 pairs of athletic socks, eight (8) athletic supports, 24 pairs of thermal underwear, 24 pairs of thermal socks, six (6) pairs of cold weather boots, military-style hot weather clothing, 60 pairs of gloves, military work-style, 10 containers of military-style sanitary
 gloves, six (6) pairs of cold weather gloves, 10 laundry bags, disposal surgical gloves, military-style warm weather jackets, military-style cold weather jackets, civilian-style warm and cold weather jackets, 10 pairs of warm weather sandals, 24 military safety helmets, 24 military-style flight helmets, and 1,000 yards of fabric for the repair and making of clothes.
  
 3) MEDICAL EQUIPMENT – The Team Members  took the following medical equipment: 

 Portable X-ray machine, 100 pre-packed medical kits for advance trauma care (military-style battle field medical kits), examination scopes for the stomach, bladder and rectum, eye examination equipment, 120 pre-packed surgical kits (military style), 120 pre-packed military field medicine kits (containing various medicines), 30 military-style field
 medical sanitation kits, 75 water testing kits (military style), 50 water testing kits (civilian), 75 FAST kits, 1,200 food testing kits (military style), 500 pieces of miscellaneous surgical tools, 5,000 packages of insect repellant (military style), 250 medical intravenous kits/with fluids, 16 pre-packed medical testing kits (military style), 50 pre-packed medical testing kits (civilian), five (5) military Medical Portable Hospital Tents with base, two (2) Military Medical Portable Deployment Kits, 18 Military Medical Blood testing kits, three (3) portable military chemistry testing stations, two (2) Advanced
 Biological Testing Kits (civilian version), 15 Military Radiation Treatment Kits, and 1,000 pounds of miscellaneous medical equipment.

  4) TESTING EQUIPMENT – The Team Members took the following testing equipment:

 100 pieces of geological testing items, 2 military soil testing stations, two (2) chemistry testing stations (civilian), six (6)
 radiation testing meters, two (2) military radiation testing stations, two (2) biological testing stations (civilian), two (2) 100cc tractors, four (4) 100cc digging tool tractors, 10 pre-packed military Soil Testing Kits, 16 astronomical telescopes, two (2) Military Star Stations, for (4)  military power generators (1-10,000 watts), four (4) civilian power generators, experimental solar collecting equipment (military), 50 portable two-way radios with FM frequencies, six (6) military combat radio platform kits, 50 pre-packed military radio repair kits, 1,000 different frequency tubes, 30 pre-packed military electrical testing and repair kits, three (3) solar testing stations (military), one (1)  experimental solar testing station, 10 solar collection panels with collector containers, 10 air sample collection kits (military), five (5) air sample collection kits (civilian), six (6) diamond drills;

 10 military special access kits, 1,000 pounds of C-4 explosives with 500 blasting caps, detonating cord, time fuse, Military shape charges and one (1) NUCLEAR DETONATING KIT.  
  
 5) MISCELLANEOUS EQUIPMENT and ITEMS – The Team Members took the following miscellaneous equipment/items: 

 100 military blankets, 100 military sheets, 24 pre-packed military combat deployment kits, 80 pre-packed military combat tent kits, four (4) military mobile kitchen deployable kits, six (6) military survival stations-warm weather, six (6)  military survival stations-cold weather, 2 military weather stations-combat style, 50 military weather balloons, 24 military handguns, 24 military rifles (M-16s), six (6) M-66 weapons, two (2) M-40 grenade launchers, two (2) military 60mm motor tube (30 rounds), 100 military air burst flares, 5,000 rounds of .223 ammunition [M-16 assault rifles], 500 rounds of .45 ammunition, 60 M-40 rounds, 15 Freon dispersal containers, 15 compressed air dispersal containers, 20 tanks of oxygen gas, 20 tanks of nitrogen gas, 20 tanks of miscellaneous gases for cutting equipment and testing, 75 military-style sleeping
 bags, 60 military-style pillows, 55 military-style sleeping platforms, six (6)  pre-packed military deployment combat field living platforms, 250 different style padlocks, 6,000 feet of different types of rope, 24 repelling kits, 10 seismic deep hole drills, 1,000 gallons of fuel, four (4)  military-style phonographs, 10 Military cassette players, 10 reel-to-reel tape players, 60 belts, 10 military sound collection equipment kits, 25 military Intelligence Collection Kits, 1,000 other miscellaneous items. 
  
 6) VEHICLES – The Team Members took the following vehicles: 

 10 military-style combat motorcycles, three (3) military M-151 Jeeps, three (3)  military trailers, 10 Military repair kits for jeeps, 10 Military repair kits for the motorcycles, one (1) Military lawn mower, 1,500 gallons of fuel for all of the above items. 
  
 7) FOOD – The Team Members took the following food items:

 C-Rations, 25 pre-packed containers, 100 pre-packed containers of freeze-dried food items, 100 cases of various canned food items, seven (7) years worth of vitamins, 100 containers of energy bars/snack items, 1,000 gallons of water, 150 military survival food kits, 16 boxes of various alcoholic wines, 150 cases of drinking fluids, chewing gum, lifesaver candy and various other miscellaneous food items.
  
 8) MISCELLANEOUS ITEMS – The Team Members took 2,000 pounds of various other items.

 More to come.... 

– ANONYMOUS
 ------------------------------------------

 http://www.serpo.org/ 

 http://www.serpo.org/Ebenobject_darkened.gif

 http://www.serpo.org/Ebenobject_original.gif 

– – – SERPONAUTS! – – –

SPECIAL "Project SERPO" ANNOUNCEMENT: ANONYMOUS SPEAKS TO THE WORLD UFO COMMUNITY! / CLARIFIES THE MYSTERIOUS 'EBEN OBJECT' OF POSTING #15 ON THE SERPO.org WEB SITE! / READ CAREFULLY,... PAY ATTENTION EVERYONE!   

 MODERATOR's NOTE: Of all the POSTINGS, perhaps none has been more hotly debated, contested, argued and dismissed as an outright "hoax" than that mysterious, unintelligible and "troublesome" 'Eben Object" which comprises POSTING #15. 

 Respected, widely read and influential  online forums like Above Top Secret, who view everything with a hyper critical eye, and online discussion boards, like those of LuciAnarchy and Laura Knight, have spent countless hours and postings on what -- if anything -- those puzzling 'Eben Objects' -- meant. 

 I e-mailed ANONYMOUS -- the REAL one whom I dealt with from 11-1-05 – 12-21-05 -- about this matter since it subjected "Project SERPO" to such widespread ridicule.

 Following is his response to my repeated inquiries.  Make of it what you will.  I know it WON'T completely quell speculation and healthy online debate, BUT does provide supplementary background information and a much-needed explanation that should have been provided to Bill Ryan in the first place from his "anonymous" sources; better late than never....
 ------------------------------------------
– – – POSTING 15a ADDENDUM – – –

Subject: EXPLANATION OF ALIEN DRAWINGS aka 'EBEN OBJECTS'

 VICTOR: 
  
 Here is the explanation of the Alien Drawing or 'Eben Objects' as referred to on the www.serpo.org/ Web site posted by Bill [Ryan].    
  
 A great deal of planning went into the 10-year mission to SERPO [turned into 13 years].  Several teams of officials planned what equipment to take. These officials tried to imagine every conceivable situation where certain types of tools and other equipment might be needed. 

 One area was capturing the view and makeup of objects, artifacts and landscapes on Planet SERPO. The Mission Team took cameras, 16 (sixteen) different types of cameras and drawing/drafting equipment. 

 Although no Team Member was trained in drafting, three (3) Team Members had drawing experience from their college days.  Several different types of drafting templates were taken on the trip.  The planning officials tried to envision every type of situation where a template might be needed. 
  
 The drawing ['Eben Object'], made by the Team Commander, depicts the base of the sundial [used globally by the Ebens on SERPO].  Each object meant a certain time of day to the Ebens.  When the sun was directed -- through the sundial -- onto the object at the base of the sundial, that meant a specific task [or change of] to the Ebens. 

 For example, it might signal a change in work schedules, a time to rest, a time to eat, a time to celebrate, etc.  After a few years, the Team learned each symbol and learned the meaning of each symbol. 

 This drawing is a copy of the actual drawing made by the Team Commander in 1967.  The Team also took many photographs of the sundial symbols. 

I know our detractors and skeptics will still harbor doubts about our message and incredible mission, but this will have to suffice for now short of the actual photographs which the debunkers would still find problems with. 

 Glad to be in touch with you and I'll be in contact again soon. 

– ANONYMOUS
 ------------------------------------------
 Part 1:  POSTING #12:  THE JOURNAL ENTRIES OF THE TEAM COMMANDER UPON THEIR ARRIVAL ON PLANET SERPO! 

 Part 2: ABSOLUTELY HILARIOUS! COMING SOON TO A THEATER NEAR YOU: THE COMEDY VERSION OF THE INFAMOUS "ALIEN AUTOPSY" FILM!  WILL IT WIN FOR 'BEST COMEDY' CATEGORY AT NEXT YEAR's 2007 "ACADEMY AWARDS?!"   

 Part 3: POSITIVE REAFFIRMATION OF THE ALIEN PROPULSION SYSTEM DESCRIBED BY THE TEAM COMMANDER WITH COMMENTS FROM NASA AND Capt ROBERT M COLLINS, AUTHOR OF "Exempt from Disclosure."
 ------------------------------------------
– "Project SERPO" POSTING #12 –

http://www.serpo.org/information.html#12

 Part 1:   

 MODERATOR's NOTE: To facilitate readability, ALL grammar, style and usage errors have been "vacuumed out," from the raw, UNedited version which my colleague Bill Ryan posted on 1-24-06.

 "Project SERPO" TEAM COMMANDER WRITES IN HIS JOURNAL ENTRY:

 I dreamt of Earth. I really had some vivid dreams of Colorado, the mountains, the snow and my family. It was [as] if I was really there. I had no worries and never thought of my situation inside the foreign spaceship. Then I awoke. I was confused and disoriented. I was in a bowl, well, it looked like a bowl to me. I don't remember how I got here.  

 My first thought was of my crew. I pushed open the top of this glass bowl and it opened. I heard a hissing sound coming from the seams or seals. I looked around and saw that I was inside a room. Not a room I [can] remember. But all of us were inside these glass bowls. All the other crew members were asleep. I climbed out and realized my legs were really sore.  

 But I climbed out and went to each glass bowl and checked on the crew. I found only 11 of us. Somebody is missing. But who? I am so confused.  I'm also very thirsty. I can't find any of those water bottles. We had some but I can't find any. My eyes are really having a problem focusing. But I'm writing this in my log, I have to record everything. I found number.... He is alive. Who is missing? I have to look at each bowl. This room is large. The ceiling looks like [a] bed mattress. The
 walls of this room are soft.

 Not very much in this room except for the bowls and some tubes running from the bowls to the floor. I see lights flashing on the bottom of each bowl. There are bright lights on in the ceiling. Inside the mattress or something. I can't open these bowls. I've tried everything. I must get some help from the Ebens. I found a door but it won't open. I can't remember how we opened the other doors. How long have we been in these bowls? I can't seem to remember much.
  
 Maybe the traveling in space causes problems with a person's mind. They told us this during training, but we never had anyone travel this far in space before. We are the specimens. Maybe I should go back into the bowl. Maybe I awoke too early. My wristwatch says it is 1800 hours. But what day, what month, what year? How long have I been asleep? The floor seems to be soft with wires running in a criss-cross pattern.  

 I see some type of television screen in the corner of the room. I think it might monitor the other bowls. I can't read anything on the screen because it is in Eben language. I do make out lines, maybe health monitoring lines on the screen. I hope that means everyone is breathing and is alive. But we are missing one man. Did I forget something? Did someone die? I can't remember.  

 I have some type of rash on my hands. Real burning sensation. Maybe it is radiation burns from something. But where are the radiation monitors we had in our packs? Where are our survival packs? I can't find anything. I am returning to the bowl. I am lying down. I will stop making entries in this diary [for now]. 

 I am awake again. Ebens are in the room. My bowl is open. Some of my crew are walking around. The Ebens are helping them. I climbed out of my bowl. The English-speaking Eben sees me and I asked him if everyone of my crew was all right. He doesn't understand, "all right."  I point to the crew. I say, "Eleven. Where is number 12?" Ebe #1 then points to a
 bowl that is empty and says, "Earthman is not living." OK, someone died. But who?

 My crew is walking around in a state of confusion.  I can't get anyone's attention. They look like the living dead. What is wrong with them? I asked Ebe #1, what is wrong with them. Ebe #1 replied, "Space sick[ness], but will not be sick soon." OK, that makes sense. I have no idea how long. We are still flying but don't know how long.  

 Ebe #1 brings some fluids and something looking like a biscuit. Fluid tastes like chalk and the biscuit doesn't have any taste. We all eat it and drink the fluid. Almost instantly we feel better. OK, get organized. Told 203 to round up all crew.

 Found 308 missing. Must be the dead crew member. Ebe #1 came back and lead me to 308. He was in bowl, something like coffin. 700 and 754 will examine 308. Ebe #1 cautioned us not to take 308 out. Don't understand the caution. 700 and 754 is here. I try to tell Ebe #1 that these guys are our doctors and must examine 308. Ebe #1 said no, because of infection. I guess 308 must have had some sort of infection and it could be contagious. But is 308 dead? Don't know. We will take Ebe #1's advice. 700 and 754 just looked into the bowl and said it looks like 308 is dead. Everyone else looks OK. 

 The fluids and biscuit must have contained some type of energy food. We can focus our eyes and can actually think. No one can remember how we got into this room. All our equipment is here. Everyone is concerned about our status. Ebens are friendly but won't tell us much. 899 is concerned with being locked into a room.  

 633 and 661 think we should be keeping busy. I agree. I order everyone to get their packs and ration belts, inventory everything inside and see if something is missing. That will occupy the team for some time. My wristwatch says it is 0400. But what day? Date? Don't know.

 Very strange not being able to gauge time. We have no reference inside this room or this spaceship. The year clock that we brought will be unpacked once we can get to the stowed gear. We don't know where that is.

 All crew inventoried packs and ration belts. Everything is accounted for. 899 wants to arm himself with a handgun. I said "no." We don't need guns. No Ebens  have been hostile towards us. We got out a compass. It doesn't work. We got out our radios. We will keep them on our belts. Don't know if they work away from the room. But we turned them on and they work. We can hear each other. Good, we have communication.  

 But we must be careful, the battery life is only about two days. I suggest everyone start writing down their thoughts. Keep some sort of a diary, like I am doing. I was ordered to do this and will continue to do so as long as I can. But I won't keep it by day, since I can't tell when a day ends.

 661 suggests we make up a calendar and a time system as long as we are here. Good idea, he will do that. The calendar will run on a seven-day system. We will use our wristwatches to gauge a 24-hour period and then consider that one day. We will start at 0600, which is in about 45 minutes.  

 518 set up the air monitor. Seems we are breathing regular air. The Team is joking about 518's nomenclature use for regular air. Good that we have some humor. OK, this is the beginning of day 1, it is 0600 hours. 661 will keep [the] calendar. We should have done this before. We have no idea how long we have been inside this spaceship, how long we have been traveling.  Didn't we get into the command station? Maybe I dreamed it. I can't find the first part of my diary. 

 Ebe #1 came in. Told us journey almost over. Lead us to hallway. We got into moving room and moved to another part of ship. Came out into large room with many items, I can't identify them but they look like clothing chests or bedroom chests. We are also lead to a large table with food. Ebe #1 tells us to eat. He said, "Good food, eat."  

 Well, we all look at each other. 700 and 754 says let's eat. OK, we find plates. Seems like ceramic plates real heavy. I chose something that looks like a stew. I then got a biscuit, same as we ate earlier. The drinks were in metal containers. Same fluid we drank earlier. We all ate. Very little taste in the stew. Something like potatoes, maybe cucumbers, some type of stems. Not really bad. The biscuits taste the same. Everyone sat and ate. We found something like apples, but didn't taste like apples. Sweet and soft, I ate one. Leaves an after taste in my mouth. Team looks happy. Some are joking about not having any ice cream.

 OK, the MVC is in [the] room. First time we saw him. He speaks through Ebe #1. The language really bothers my ears. The high-pitched sounds and then the vocal tones sound very strange. Ebe #1 tells us MVC wants us to prepare for landing. OK, how do we do that?  We must get into [the] bowl room and get in a bowl. No one wants to do that, but
 if we have to, we will do that. We must go into the bowl room and get in a bowl. No one wants to do that but if we have to we will do it.  

 We are led back to moving room and travel back to bowl room. We climb into the bowl. Some use pot for relief of our bowels and bladders. Then climb into bowl. The lids close but we are awake. Just lie there. I fall asleep. The bowl lids have opened. My wristwatch says 1100.  I guess it is still day 1. We climb out.

 Ebe #1 is at our side. He tells us. Landing home. OK, I guess we are there. We gather our gear. 700 reminds us to wear our sunglasses once we exit. We pack up and walk down a long hallway. Then into another moving room. We travel for one minute. Then a door opens. We are in a large room. We see our stowed gear.

 Large room, many smaller spaceships stored here. A large door opens. Bright light. We see the planet for the first time. We walk down the ramp. Large number of Ebens waiting for us. We see a large Eben, largest one we have seen yet. He comes forward and starts speaking to us. Ebe #1 translates a welcome message from the Leader. I guess this guy is the
 leader. About one foot taller than the others. The Leader tells us we are welcome to [their] planet; he called it something we do not understand. Ebe #1 isn't doing a good job translating.  

 But we are led to an open arena. Looks like a parade field. The ground is dirt. Looking up, I see blue skies. The sky is very clear.  We see two (2) suns. One [is]  brighter than the other. The landscape looks like a desert, Arizona or New Mexico. No vegetation that we can see. There are rolling hills but nothing but dirt. This must be the central village or town. We landed in an open area with large structures like electrical towers.

 Something is sitting on top of these towers. On the center of the village is a large tower. Looks like a concrete structure. Very large, maybe 300 feet. Looks like a mirror is placed on top of this tower. All the buildings look like adobe or mud huts. Some are larger than others. Looking in one direction, can't tell any actual compass readings, but there is a very large structure. All the Ebens are dressed in the same clothing, except for some of the Ebens who were on the spaceship. Now I see others dressed in a dark blue outfit, different from the others.

 Each Eben is wearing some type of box on their belts. All have belts. Can't see any children, but maybe they are the same size, too. Our boots leave an imprint in the soil. The brightness is almost too much for our eyes without sunglasses. Looking around 360 degrees, I see buildings and barren land.  Can't see any vegetation. I wonder where they grow their
 food. What a planet!  Hard to believe we will have to live [for] 10 years here! 

 But a journey of 1000 miles begins with one [small] foot step.  Can't remember who said that but that just came to mind. But large numbers of Ebens are welcoming us. They seem friendly. Then, almost shocking us, someone speaks English. We all look around and see an Eben. This Eben speaks very good English. This Eben, [who] we call Ebe #2, speaks almost
 fluent English, with [the]  exception of not really pronouncing the letter "w."  

 But Ebe #2 does a good job speaking English. Ebe #2 says we are welcome to the planet SERPO. OK, that is the name of their planet.  Ebe #2 shows us a device and tells us [that] everyone of us must wear it. It looks like a small transistor radio. We put it on our belts. The weather is extremely hot. Asked 633 to take temperature. 633 says it is 107 degrees. Very warm. We take off top jacket and leave us with [a] one-piece flight suit. The Ebens looks at us but seem very friendly.

 Some are wearing some type of shawls. I asked Ebe #2 about that, Ebe #2 says they are females. OK, I see. They all look alike. Really hard to tell one apart [from another] except for [their] uniform. Some have different colored uniforms. I asked Ebe #2 about that, Ebe #2 says [it's a] military uniform. OK, that makes sense. Ebe #2 lead us to a series of
 huts, looking like adobe-style houses. There are four (4). 

 Behind them is an underground room, or storage area. It is built into the ground, underground. We have to walk down a ramp. The doors look like military igloos that store our atomic bombs on Earth. All our gear taken off the spaceship is stored [in] there. We walked down into this area. Very large room. Very cool, a lot cooler. We might have to sleep
 here. All our gear is there. Sixteen (16) pallets of gear.

 This igloo is made up of something like concrete but not the same texture.  Feels like soft rubber but still hard. The floor is made of the same stuff. There are lights in the ceiling. Looks like spot lights. They have electricity. We must inventory all our gear sometime. We go back to huts. The huts are cooler than outside. But still very warm. We must get organized. I tell Ebe #2, we will need to be alone to get organized. Ebe #2, then I realize Ebe #2 is female, says "OK," we will
 be left alone.

 I asked for the body of 308. Ebe #2 seems to be confused and doesn't know about any body. I explained [it] to Ebe #2, held her hands across her body and bowed her head. It was really an emotional site because she was almost crying. Ebe #2 told us that the body would be brought to us, but she must check with her trainer.

 The word "trainer" kind of shocked me. Is Ebe #2 in training and [is] someone  teaching her? Or does the word "trainer" in Eben mean something different [than] in English?  Maybe that means "leader" or "commander."  Don't know. But Ebe #2 left. I told 203 to gather everyone in the lower storage area. We will have a Team meeting. 633 suggested we start the calendar as of today. It is 1300 on our Day 1 on planet SERPO.
 ------------------------------------------
 Part 2: 

 VICTOR:

 Here's a link to a movie that is coming out this year about the infamous "alien autopsy" footage; the movie is a comedy, thankfully! Maybe your UFO Thread List would be interested in this. I am happy to confirm that the title is called "ALIEN AUTOPSY" and you can see more at the following link:

 http://wwws.warnerbros.co.uk/alienautopsy/teaser.html?id=teaser&settings=true

  A comedy about the alien autopsy hoax?! That sounds hilarious! If you'll recall, I am based in the UK and I wanted to ask if you that if you didn't already know, a comedy film is due to be released soon based on the alleged alien autopsy in the early '90s, which should be a laugh! 
 ------------------------------------------
 Part 3:  

 http://www.ac.wwu.edu/~vawter/StudentSites2002/interstellar_travel/negativemass.html

 From: IS A U.S. MILITARY SCIENTIST ON THE UFO THREAD LIST TRYING TO POINT US IN THE RIGHT DIRECTION?

 From: POSTING #11 ["Journal Entries"] and the www.Serpo.org Web site:

 Team Commander: "In the center of these containers is a copper colored coil or something looking like a coil. There is a bright light being shined from a point above into the center of the coil. We hear a very dull hum, but no major loud sounds. 661 thinks it is a NEGATIVE MATTER versus positive matter system."

 AND NOW NASA SAYS,... INTERSTELLAR SPACE TRAVEL: THE IDEA OF NEGATIVE MASS PROPULSION

 The idea of negative mass propulsion was created to eliminate the need for fuel, since fuel limits the feasibility of interstellar travel so much. Theoretically, it would allow faster than light travel without violating Einstein's theory of relativity.

 The way this works is it uses gravity to bend space around the spaceship. A large amount of "negative mass" would be in front of the ship and a large amount of positive mass would be behind it, and the masses would curve space in such a way that it'd accelerate the ship.

 Apparently, such a process would not violate the conservation of energy, as the space it is traveling through would be warped. If this theory were to work, it could be the best form of transportation available.

 It has been suggested that it would allow a ship to bypass the limitations of relativity, and a ship could actually travel to and from it's destination at speeds far faster than the speed of light without running into the problem of taking several years to do so.

 Unfortunately, we don't even know if negative matter exists, and even if we did discover it, we'd have to develop a way to turn the effect of the matter on and off, so the speed of the ship could be controlled.

 http://www.grc.nasa.gov/WWW/PAO/html/warp/ideachev.htm

 http://www.dark-planet.com/ortemus/eweasel.htm

 DARK ENERGY ENIGMA: NEGATIVE PRESSURE & ANTIGRAVITY

 http://www.newscientistspace.com/article/mg18925364.100-dark-energy-enigma-just-wont-go-away.html  

 COMMENT FROM CAPT ROBERT M COLLINS, Ret USAF:

 When talking with Gene Loscowski, he agreed with the LANL source that it's a "Negative Force Generating System" since he heard that term used while at Area 51, not anti-gravity, but in reality, it's the same thing. 

 The way they create this "Negative Force," according to the LANL source, is through a series of specially configured super-conducting "capacitors" and "field coils." They tell us they still haven't figured it out yet.

 All the technical details from the LANL source are in the EfD ["Exempt from Disclosure"] book which even Dr Harold Puthoff says he doesn't understand, which is understandable, since the LANL sources don't really understand it themselves.
 ------------------------------------------

 http://67.175.66.68/serpo/release1.asp

 
 A MUST READ! – – – 

– UFO PUBLIC ACCLIMATION PROGRAM GOES INTO HIGH GEAR! – 

EDITOR's NOTE:  "Anonymous" has just come out with yet another brand NEW posting which addresses the MANY REASONABLE questions that many on this list had on the alien homeworld of SERPO that 12 Americans were sent to which consisted of 10 (ten) men and two (2) women.

 I ask you to keep an OPEN MIND on his startling, new revelations where -- the main thrust of his message is that -- the "laws" of physics on
 Earth do NOT universally apply throughout the cosmos.

 Think OUTside of the box people! 

 NEW READERS: Only the most recent and second to the most recent postings will be displayed here + the ORIGINAL posting by "Anonymous" which lays the groundwork for all his future transmissions.  To view postings #2 #3 #4 #5 and #6, go to: 

 www.serpo.org/

 or contact Web site Administrator Bill Ryan at: 

 Bill.Ryan@virgin.net    
 ------------------------------------------
 Posting #8: HOW THE IDEA FOR A ET-HUMAN EXCHANGE PROGRAM CAME ABOUT / WHERE AND WHEN THE ALIENS FIRST OFFICIALLY LANDED IN THE U.S. / WHERE AND WHEN OUR HEROIC 12 TEAM MEMBERS DEPARTED FOR PLANET SERPO FOR AN INCREDIBLE 13 YEARS!

 Posting #7: THE UNUSUAL GEOLOGIC FEATURES OF PLANET SERPO DESCRIBED IN VIVID DETAIL AS WELL AS THE NEAR LIFE-OR-DEATH ENCOUNTERS OUR TEAM MEMBERS HAD WITH 2 VICIOUS SERPO ANIMALS IN WHICH ONE WAS KILLED AND PRONOUNCED "DOA!" 

 Posting #1 – THE ORIGINAL POSTING BY "ANONYMOUS" WHICH WHCH THE DISCLOSURE PROCESS INTO OVERDRIVE,... A TRUE CLASSIC!
 ------------------------------------------
 POSTING #8

 [ ] = Moderator's comments/insertions 

 EBE = Extraterrestrial Biological Entity: NO! 

 ETE: Extraterrestrial Entity: YES!

 [ Official terminology used by the U. S. Government ]

 HOW IT ALL BEGAN: WHO FIRST PROPOSED AN 'ET-HUMAN' EXCHANGE PROGRAM /WHEN AND WHERE THE ETE's FIRST OFFICIALLY LANDED TO A U.S. WELCOMING COMMITTEE / HOW THE JFK ASSASSINATION ALMOST NIXED THE EXCHANGE PROGRAM! / WHAT HAPPENED TO ALL OF THE OFFICIAL RECORDS OF THE 'TEAM MEMBERS' AND HOW 2 "OFFICIAL" SETS OF RECORDS WERE KEPT ON THEM!

 VICTOR:  

 I decided to concentrate this release on the "TEAM" and their selection process, communication problems and THE FINAL EXCHANGE. There have been many  questions pertaining to these issues.

 BACKGROUND: Ebe #1 provided a communication device that allowed us to contact SERPO. This communication device was onboard the Eben craft that crashed in July 1947 near Corona, New Mexico. Ebe #1 showed us the proper use of this communication device prior to his death.

 However, the device did not function properly and no contact could be made with SERPO.  Just prior to Ebe #1's death, an American scientist from Los Alamos figured out the device worked and connected an energy source found in the Eben craft to the communication device. With Ebe#1's assistance and language input, several signals were sent during the summer of 1952. In early fall of 1952, we received several signals on the device.

 Ebe #1 translated the messages and provided us with that information.
 Ebe #1  sent six (6) messages.

– The first message was just letting his planet know he was alive; 

– The second message explained the crash in 1947 and the death of his crew; 

– The third message asked for a rescue craft for him; 

– The fourth message suggested a formal meeting with leaders of Earth; 

– The fifth message suggested AN EXCHANGE PROGRAM; 

 (NOTE: It is believed, but NOT documented, that Ebe #1's U.S. military caretaker had suggested to Ebe #1 that an exchange program be set up which would allow our people to visit and exchange culture, scientific information and collect astronomical during a space trip by an American military team or what eventually became known as The Team Members.)

– The sixth message provided landing coordinates for any future rescue or visitation mission to Earth. The incoming messages gave a time and date (Eben date and time system), and confirmed a landing location.

 However, once the message was translated by Ebe #1, it was determined the date was over 10 years away. Fearing that Ebe #1, who was sick at this point, did not translate the message correctly, our scientists began to translate the message, based on the Eben language that was taught to us by Ebe #1.

 (NOTE: Ebe #1 was a mechanic, NOT a scientist. He was still able to teach us some of the Eben language. According to the document which I read, we translated about 30% of the Eben language.  Complex sentences and numbers could NOT be recognized.)

 Ebe #1 assisted us as long as he was alive. But once he died, then we were on our own. We sent several messages over a six-month period (1953). But we did not receive any return messages. We fine tuned our efforts over the next 18 months and finally sent two (2) messages in 1955 and received a reply.

 We were able to translate about 30% of the messages. We turned to several linguist specialists from several U.S.  universities and even several from foreign universities. Finally, we were able to translate most of the messages. We decided to reply in English and see if the Eben's could translate our language easier than we could theirs. 

 Approximately four (4) months later, we received a reply in broken English. Sentences that contained nouns, adjectives, but no verbs. It took us several months to translate the messages. We then sent Eben our typed English lessons. Six months later, we received another English message. This time it was clearer, but not clear enough. Ebens were confusing several different English words and still failed to complete a proper sentence.

 But we were able to provide the basic skill level for them to communicate in English. In one message, they provided us with a form of
 the Eben alphabet, with the equivalent English letter. Our linguist specialist had a very difficult time figuring this out. The written Eben
 language was simple characters and symbols, but our linguist specialist had an extremely difficult time comparing the two written languages.

 Over the next five (5) years, we were able to perfect our understanding of the Eben language (somewhat) and the Ebens were able to better understand English. However, we had a major problem. Trying to coordinate a date, time and location for an Eben landing on Earth.

 Even though we could basically understand some Eben and the Ebens could understand some English, we could NOT understand their time and date system and they could not understand ours. We sent them our Earth's rotation schedule, revolution, date system, etc. For some reason, the Eben's never understood this.

 In return, the Ebens sent us their system, which WAS DIFFICULT FOR OUR SCIENTISTS TO UNDERSTAND  because we had no reference to their planet. The Ebens did not explain any astronomical data of SERPO or their system. We then decided to just send pictures showing the Earth, landmarks and a simple numbering system for time periods.

 The Ebens sent back a message indicating they would return to Earth on a particular number date and location that we chose. The date was April 24, 1964 and the location was in the southern sector of White Sands Missile Range, New Mexico.

 Now, our Government officials met in secret to plan the event. Decisions were made, then changed and then changed again. We had just about 25 months to plan for the event. Special teams, mostly military, were formed to plan the event.

 Several months into the planning process, PRESIDENT KENNEDY DECIDED TO APPROVE A PLAN TO EXCHANGE A SPECIAL MILITARY TEAM. The USAF was tasked as the lead agency. The USAF officials picked special civilian scientists to assist in planning and crew selection. 

 The Team Member selection process was the hardest to accomplish. Several plans were suggested in the make-up of the team. It took several months for the planners to decide on criteria for each Team Member. They decided that each Team Member must be military. They must be single, with no children. They must be career military (over four years of service). They must have special skills.

 They must have cross-trained skills, meaning that they must have more than one (1) speciality. They must be entirely "sheep dipped" and cleared of any identification problems that would haunt them while on the trip. One suggestion was to list all members as being dead.

 This was thrown around until it was decided each Team Member selected would be listed as "missing" on the official records and discharged on the UNofficial records. That way, all connections between the team and their individual service was covered.

 EVERY SINGLE RECORD on each Team Member selected WAS PURGED,  including their Social Security records, Internal Revenue tax returns, medical records, military records, and any other identification records were either destroyed or collected and placed in a special storage location.

 Originally, about 56,000 files were screened for possible selectees. The screening process finally got down to 12. These were the best of the best. During training, which lasted roughly six (6) months, there were 16 going through training. The four (4) were replacements just in case one of the originals was injured or released for some other reason. TEAM TRAINING:  Each Team Member selected was sent to a special facility located at Camp Perry, Virginia. This was an intelligence training location. We took over a complete complex inside Perry. Most of the training took place there, but some special training was accomplished at Sheppard Air Force Base, Wichita Falls Texas; Ellsworth AFB, South Dakota; Dow AFB, Maine; and isolated locations in Mexico and Chile.

 The training lasted for 167 days. The Team was allowed about 15 days off during this time period, but they were closely guarded. Just prior to their trip, each team member was transported to the United States Disciplinary Barracks, Ft. Leavenworth, KS and confined in locked cells. This prevented them from communicating with anyone from the outside world and kept each under close watch.

 CHANGE OF PLANS:  We received a message from the Ebens stating that they did not wish to make the exchange during their initial visit to Earth. They wanted to meet first and then plan the exchange in person. This created many problems since our Team was ready for the exchange. We sent a return message, but we did not receive a reply.

 THE LANDING: In December 1963, the Eben's sent a message confirming the time, date and location of their landing. The message stated that two (2) crafts were enroute to Earth and would make the appropriate landing at the pre-arranged location.

 (NOTE: During this time period, our government was suffering from the loss of President Kennedy. Some on the project wanted to cancel the exchange because of his death. But President Johnson was briefed and decided to continue the event, although, it was noted, that Johnson didn't really believe it would happen.)

 Our Team planned for two (2) locations. One "cover" location on Holloman Air Force Base near Alamogordo, New Mexico and the other, which would be THE ACTUAL LANDING LOCATION, was west of Holloman near the southern entrance to White Sands Army Post.

 The first Eben craft entered our atmosphere during the afternoon of April 24, 1964. the Eben craft LANDED AT THE WRONG LOCATION, near Socorro, New Mexico. Our team was in place at White Sands. We were able to communicate a message to the Eben craft that they landed at the wrong location. The second Eben craft picked up the message and landed at the correct location.

 MEETING: The Eben craft landed exactly at the location we sent. There were 16  senior U.S. Government officials on the  ground. Some were political and some were senior officials, including military officers. The Ebens exited their craft and walked under a pre-located canopy. The Ebens gave gifts of their technology. The Ebens had a crude translator device. It appeared to be some sort of microphone with a read-out screen.

 The senior U.S. official was given one of the devices and the Eben kept the other one. The officials spoke into the device and the screen showed a printed form of the voice message, both in Eben and English. It was crude and hard to understand everything that was said. The EXACT TRANSCRIPT of the meeting WON'T BE DISCUSSED AT THIS TIME.
  
 The Ebens decided to make the exchange, but not until the following year. July 1965 was set and the location decided upon was the Nevada Test Site. Planners did not wish to keep the same location for fear that something might leak.

 The Team Members were kept at Ft. Leavenworth until May 1964. They were transported to Camp Perry. The Team was isolated for the next six (6) months, going over the same training they received. Fine tuning their individual skills and learning some newer skills. This gave the team an opportunity to better understand the Eben language. Although most team members had difficulty learning the language, the two linguists on the team were able to hone their language skills.

 In April 1965, the team was transported to Ft. Leavenworth and confined until July 1965, when they were transported to Nevada. During the exchange, ONLY A SELECTED FEW OFFICIALS WERE PRESENT, other than the preparation crew for the exchange team. The Eben craft landed and our Team was placed on board.

 (NOTE: One item that was MISstated by me in an earlier e-mail, was the amount of equipment that was taken to Planet SERPO by our Team Members. The correct amount loaded on board the Eben crafts was 90,500 lbs of equipment.)  

 More to come.....

–  ANONYMOUS
 ------------------------------------------
 POSTING #7

 THE WEIRD AND UNUSUAL GEOLOGIC FEATURES OF PLANET SERPO ARE DESCRIBED IN VIVID DETAIL AS WELL AS A HARROWING ENCOUNTER WITH A VICIOUS SERPO ANIMAL IN QUADRANT 3 FOLLOWED BY A LIFE-OR-DEATH ENCOUNTER WITH A HUGE SNAKE-LIKE CREATURE IN QUADRANT 4 THAT WILL GIVE YOU NIGHTMARES FOR DAYS TO COME!  

 Here are some geological facts regarding SERPO our Team Members compiled: 

 The planet's diameter was measured at about 7,218 miles.

 The surface gravity was 9.60m/s>2.

 The rotation periods was approximately 43 hours.

 Our Team contained two (2) geologists (they were also cross-trained as biologists). The first thing our geologists did was map the entire planet. The first step was to divide the planet in half, thus creating an Equator. Then they established a Northern Hemisphere and Southern Hemisphere. Within each hemisphere, they created four (4) quadrants.

 Finally, they established the "North and South" Poles. This was the easiest method to study the planet. Most of the Eben communities were placed along the Equator. However, there were some communities established north of the equator in each of the four quadrants in the Northern Hemispheres. There were no communities located in either poles. The southern pole was desert.  It was barren land with virtually no precipitation where absolutely nothing grew in this area.

 There were volcanic rock formations and part of the extreme south contained a rock desert. Temperatures in the south pole were measured at between 90° and 135°F.  Going further north from the south pole in Quadrant 1, the Team found extrusive rocks. This indicated some volcanic activity in the area. Our team found numerous volcanoes in this area.

 The Team found several fissure eruptions in this region, with standing water. The water was tested and contained high levels of sulfur, zinc, copper and other unknown chemicals. Moving from east to Quadrant 2, the Team found basically the same volcanic fields of rocks.

 However, in one particular location near the north end of Quadrant 2, the Team found an Alkali Flat. On Earth, these were formed by streams flowing into a desert or arid location. Our team found hard mud covered by alkaline salts. Some vegetation was growing in this area.

 Moving to Quadrant 3, the Team found a form of Badlands: An arid region that is lined with deep gullies with sparse vegetation. The gullies or valleys were extremely deep, some going down 3,000 feet.

 The team found the first SERPO animal in this region. It looked like an armadillo. This creature was extremely hostile and tried to attack the Team several times. The Eben guide used some type of sound device (sonic-directed sound beam) to scare away the creature.

 Moving to the Equatorial region, our team found desert-style landscapes which contained patches of vegetation. The team found numerous pockets of water fed to the ground by Artesian Wells. This water was the freshest, containing only the unknown chemicals. It tasted good and the Ebens drank and used it. Our team still boiled it because during culture tests, unknown types of bacteria were detected.

 Moving to the Northern Hemisphere, the Team found a major change in climate and landscape. One Team Member, who had coined it Quadrant 1, in the northern hemisphere, named it "Little Montana." The Team found trees, similar to the Evergreen style of Earth trees. These trees were milked by the Ebens. A white fluid was extracted and drank.

 Numerous other types of vegetation was found in this region. Standing water, possibly fed by either Artesian Wells or fissure eruptions was found. In one area, marsh lands were seen. Large plants were observed growing in the marshy area. The Ebens used these plants for food. The bulb of the plant was very large. The bulb tasted something like a mellon.

 Our Team eventually moved to an area in Quadrant 1 in the northern hemisphere. This area contained moderate  temperatures [50° - 80°] and ample amounts of shade. The Eben's built a little community for the team. Most of the remaining exploration of the planet was done from this point. The Team only explored the southern hemisphere once, obtaining geological information.

 Because of the intense heat, the Team decided not to venture back. The Team continued to explore the northern hemisphere, where, as the Team traveled towards the north pole, the temperature cooled considerably.

 The Team found mountains, raising to an elevation of 15,000 feet and valleys that sank below the basic mark the team established for "sea level."  Lush green fields were found containing a form of grass, but contained bulbs. The team coined these fields, "Clover Fields," even though the bulbs were not clover.

 The radiation levels were lower in the northern hemisphere than at the Equator and southern hemisphere. The north pole contained cold weather and the team saw the first sign of snow. Blankets of snow littered the landscape around the north pole. The snow measured about 20 feet, at its deepest.

 The temperature was a constant 33°.  Our Team never found the temperature to vary in this region. The Ebens could not stand to be in
 this region for long. They suffered extreme hypothermia. The Team's guide wore a suit, similar to a space suit with built-in heaters.

 Our Team found evidence of past earthquakes. Fault lines were found along the northern tip of the southern hemisphere. Exfoliation was observed along with extrusive rocks, which indicated magma flows in the past.

 Our Team BROUGHT BACK HUNDREDS OF SAMPLES of SERPO soil, vegetation, water and other items for testing on Earth. During our Team's exploration, they discovered numerous types of animals. The strangest was the "Beast" which looked like a large Ox. The animal was timid and never seen to be hostile.  Another animal looked like a Mountain Lion, but had long fur around the
 neck. This animal was curious, but was not considered hostile by the Ebens.

 During the exploration of Quadrant 4 of the southern hemisphere, the team found a very long and large creature that appeared to be a snake. This creature was "deadly," as explained by the Ebens. The head of the creature was large and contained almost human-like eyes. This was the only time our Team used their weapons and killed the creature.

 The Ebens didn't appear to be upset that the Team killed the creature, but was upset they used a weapon. The team brought four .45 caliber Colt (standard military issued) handguns and four M2 carbine rifles. After killing the creature, the team disected it. The internal organs were strange and nothing similar to a Earth-style snake. The creature measured 15 feet long and 1.5 feet in diameter. The team was curious about the eyes.

 Examination of the eyes revealed cones, similar to human eyes. The eye contained an iris and the back contained a large nerve, similar to the optic nerve feeding into the creature's brain. The brain was large, much larger than any Earth-based snake. The Team wanted to eat the meat from the creature, but the Eben guides politely told them "No." 

 The bodies of water on SERPO did NOT contain fish, as we know. Some bodies, near the equator, did contain strange-looking creatures, similar to eels (small and about 8 – 10" long) and was probably a cousin of the land-based "Snake." 

 There was something like a jungle, near the marshlands, but not the jungles that we're familiar with. SERPO didn't have seasons as we know them (extreme heat then freezing cold). However, the temperature varied.

 Regarding weapons taken: There was a lengthy discussion about weapons. At the end, the Ebens didn't really care. So our Team Members decided to take some just in case. Not for a fight, God knows, as our Team was vastly outnumbered, but for the safety aspects of it.

 Remember, the 12 were all military members, so weapons made them FEEL safe. A side note: They only took 50 rounds of ammunication per handgun and 100 rounds of ammunition per rifle.

– ANONYMOUS
 ------------------------------------------
 POSTING #1

 INITIAL E-MAIL BY "ANONYMOUS"

 VICTOR:

 First let me introduce myself. My name is Request Anonymous. I am a retired employee of the U.S. Government. I won't go into any great details about my past, but I was involved in a special program.

 As for Roswell, it occurred, but NOT like the story books tell. There were two (2) crash sites. One southwest of Corona, New Mexico and the second site at Pelona Peak, south of Datil, New Mexico.

 The crash involved two (2) extraterrestrial aircraft. The Corona site was found a day later by an archaeology team. This team reported the crash site to the Lincoln County Sheriff's department. A deputy arrived the next day and summoned a state police officer. One live entity [EBE] was found hiding behind a rock. The entity was given water but declined food. The entity was later transferred to Los Alamos. The information eventually went to Roswell Army Air Field. The site was examined and all evidence was removed. The bodies were taken to Los Alamos National Laboratory because they had a freezing system that allowed the bodies to remain frozen for research. The craft was taken to Roswell and then onto Wright Field, Ohio.

 The second site was not discovered until August 1949 by two ranchers. They reported their findings several days later to the sheriff of Catron County, New Mexico. Because of the remote location, it took the sheriff several days to make his way to the crash site. Once at the site, the sheriff took photographs and then drove back to Datil.

 Sandia Army Base, Albuquerque, New Mexico was then notified. A recovery team from Sandia took custody of all evidence, including six (6) bodies. The bodies were taken to Sandia Base, but later transferred to Los Alamos.

 The live entity established communications with us and provided us with a location of his home planet. The entity remained alive until 1952, when he died. But before his death, he provided us with a full explanation of the items found inside the two crafts. One item was a communication device. The entity was allowed to make contact with his planet.

 Somehow, I never knew this information, but a meeting date was set for April 1964 near Alamogordo New Mexico. The Aliens landed and retrieved the bodies of their dead comrades. Information was exchanged. Communication was in English. The aliens had a translation device.

 In 1965, we had AN EXCHANGE PROGRAM WITH THE ALIENS. We carefully selected 12 military personnel; ten (10) men and two (2) women. They were trained, vetted and carefully removed from the military system. The 12 were skilled in various specialties.

 Near the northern part of the Nevada Test Site, the aliens landed and the 12 Americans left. One entity was left on Earth. The original plan was for our 12 people to stay 10 years and then return to Earth.

 But something went wrong. The 12 remained until 1978, when they were returned to the same location in Nevada. Seven (7) men and one (1) woman returned. Two (2) died on the alien's home planet. Four (4) others DECIDED TO REMAIN, according to the returnees. Of the eight (8) that returned, all have died. The last survivor died in 2002.

 The returnees were isolated from 1978 until 1984 at various military installations. The Air Force Office of Special Investigation (AFOSI) was responsible for their security and safety. AFOSI also CONDUCTED DEBRIEFING SESSIONS WITH THE RETURNEES.

 I have never seen or read anything about the exchange program. I once heard a little bit of information from Linda Howe, but she didn't have much information.

 I've monitored your e-mails for about six (6) months. I've read e-mails from you and others. But I've never seen nor heard the truth about the real Roswell incident or the exchange program.

 I'd like to hear what others say about this.

– ANONYMOUS
 ------------------------------------------
 The complete debriefing is contained in: "PROJECT SERPO," Final
 Report-80HQD893-020, classified TS, Codeword. 

  

‘Project SERPO’ mission to visitors’ home planet described in detail  

   

By Steve Hammons  

December 16, 2005  

Reports and rumors have been floating around for decades that contact between the U.S. Government and beings from another planet, or other planets, has been established.  

These stories include information about government acquisition of advanced technologies, greater scientific knowledge and other important assets. Some people claim that top secret organizations and agencies were created to coordinate these sensitive operations.  

Now, reports have surfaced about an alleged U.S. Government military effort called “Project SERPO.” This program allegedly selected and trained a joint-service military team to accompany friendly “visitors” from another planet back to their home for a planned ten-year stay, conducting a wide range of scientific research.  

On the newly-developed Web site serpo.org, this alleged project is explained and the Web site itself is described as “the gradual release of confidential documents pertaining to a top secret exchange program of twelve  U.S.  military personnel to Serpo, a planet of Zeta Reticuli, between the years 1965-78.”   

Movies, books, TV programs and other media platforms have been used to comment on UFOs and these kinds of ideas over the years. Some of us may think these concepts are based on actual facts. Some may feel that think these ideas might possibly be based on realities. Some of us seem to think they are probably not at all accurate and are simply creative storytelling and wishful thinking.  

According to Bill Ryan, a UFO researcher and coordinator of the serpo.org Web site, early last month, an interesting source came to his attention and to the attention of his associates. Ryan says “a retired senior official” within the U.S. Defense Intelligence Agency (DIA), who requested to not be named at this time, stated that he represented a group of six current and former DIA officials. These sources began providing information to Ryan and his colleagues on November 2 and have continued through December.  

Ryan states on the Web site that he considers the possibilities that the information presented is not true, is partially true, is completely true or some combination of these. He explains that other “insiders” have previously reported on a project such as this and seem to believe that the information is possibly accurate.  

In fact, he mentions a discussion he learned about between an active duty Air Force lieutenant colonel and a retired Air Force intelligence colonel. The younger man had been following the alleged Project SERPO information being released and wanted to bounce it off the senior officer. In person, he provided the retired colonel with the written material.  

”After he was finished, he stated, ‘Oh my God, who on this Earth would release such classified material?’ I then asked him if all this information was real. His simple answer was, ‘yes, all real.’ I then asked the colonel if he had been involved with this project. He said, yes, he was involved in the communications aspect of this operation from about 1961 until 1965. He was also on the debriefing team. He wouldn't provide too much information, saying that unless he saw that all information was declassified, he could not comment on details. I thanked him and left.”  

FIRST REPORT FROM 'ANONYMOUS'   

“First let me introduce myself. My name is Request Anonymous. I am a retired employee of the U.S. Government. I won't go into any great details about my past, but I was involved in a special program.”  

Thus apparently began the recounting of a very interesting series of reports on alleged events involving visitors from another planet and their contact with the United States Government.  

“Anonymous” stated that there were two crash sites in  New Mexico near  Roswell  . One crash was near  Corona  and the other near Datil. The first was discovered in 1947 and the second not until 1949. A crash survivor was found near the  Corona  crash. Other occupants apparently did not survive. However, their bodies were recovered, he says. The craft were eventually taken to Wright Field in  Dayton ,  Ohio  (now Wright-Patterson Air Force Base).  

The surviving “visitor” was housed on U.S. Government facilities and lived until 1952, Anonymous states. Using communication equipment from the craft, the visitor was able to, and allowed to, make contact with his home planet.  

Anonymous claims that by 1962, an “exchange program” was developed between the  U.S.  and the visitors. A twelve-person, joint-service military team of ten men and two women were selected from a large pool of candidates. Special training programs were developed for them. (Of interest, U.S. Army Special Forces teams typically consist of twelve men. This has been found to be an optimal team size in some ways for certain operations.)  

Then, in July 1965, at the Nevada Test Site, the visitors landed, the twelve Americans boarded the spacecraft and departed for a planned ten-year stay with the visitors.  

The Americans returned in 1978. That is, eight returned alive along with the bodies of two who died on the visitors’ planet, according to Anonymous. Two others chose to remain there. All of those who returned alive have since passed on, he says.  

TEAM SELECTION AND TRAINING   

Anonymous states that there was a rigorous selection and training process for the team members. Their military backgrounds, psychological profiles and other aspects of fitness for the mission were taken into consideration. He states that over 56,000 people were initially considered, and this was whittled down to the final twelve, with some back-ups if needed.  

He says they went through many months of training that included various scientific disciplines, military skills and other needed preparedness. The training took place at several military installations and sites inside and outside of the  U.S.   

The team was “sheep-dipped,” intelligence community lingo for bringing them into a clandestine, covert, “black” operating modality. And, in this case, attempting to coordinate explanations for a ten-year absence from family, friends and associates.  

Anonymous claims 90,500 pounds of equipment, food and supplies were taken with them when they departed with the visitors onboard one of their larger spacecraft. The trip took nine months to reach the planet Serpo.  

AMERICANS ON SERPO  

Anonymous says detailed reports from our team reveal a huge amount of information about the visitors and their home planet. He states the planet lies within a solar system of the Zeta Recticular Star System, two yellow double stars, similar to our Sun. The atmosphere was similar to Earth’s, he says.  

The team took several months to adjust. There was strong radiation on the planet and the temperature was hot – between 94 and 115 degrees. However, in the planet’s northern hemisphere, the temperature ranged from about 55 to 80 degrees. The climate was generally quite dry.  

The  U.S.  team studied the “Eben” society and lived among them. They learned that the Eben civilization was approximately 10,000 years old and had evolved on another planet.  

In many ways, the Eben culture was similar to our own, with leaders, communities, family life of male and female couples with children, occupations, music, games and worship of a Supreme Being. Anonymous states they had advanced and effective technologies, though the American team did not understand all of it.   

The Ebens were friendly and caring toward the Americans. Communication between the human team members and Ebens was often difficult, though both groups learned some of the others’ language. Some individuals of both groups were better at it than others, Anonymous states. Hand signs were also used as well as translation devices that had limited capabilities.  

When the two Americans died on Serpo, the Ebens offered medical services and demonstrated sadness. Ebens attended the burial ceremonies that the humans held.  

The  U.S.  team explored the planet as much as possible, examined the animal and plant life as well as the climate, geology, geography, physics and other areas of interest.  

HOW MUCH TRUTH?  

If the information revealed by Anonymous and his associates has truth to it, this would seem to be signal that responsible people now feel that further disclosure about such matters is appropriate at this time.  

Some UFO researchers have indicated that a plan of gradual release of information about these issues, within the  U.S.  and internationally, has been ongoing for decades using various public media platforms of open source intelligence (OSINT).  

The purpose of a gradual disclosure of some information about this area has allegedly been to carefully analyze various risk factors and maintain proper security of sensitive intelligence.  

At the same time, some investigators have said that there is a range of opinion among experts and insiders on these kinds of projects about what kind and how much information, if any at all, should be disclosed to the general public. However, the gradual preparation of human society about these alleged discoveries seems to have proceeded, according to some researchers.  

In light of the Project SERPO story, some people are taking a second look at Steven Spielberg’s movie “Close Encounters of the Third Kind.” In that film, a coordinated meeting took place with extraterrestrial visitors. Then, a twelve-person team, ten men and two women, went with the visitors. Spielberg reportedly had advisors and consultants on the film who provided him with insight on these subjects.   

Anonymous says he and his team are planning to release more information about Project SERPO. Many in the  U.S.  and around the world will surely continue to analyze these reports carefully and try to determine if they are accurate, a psychological operation (PSYOP) for some purpose, some kind of deceptive disinformation or a creative work of fiction.  

Maybe we’ll find out if Anonymous and his friends are right – that Americans and humankind are ready for this kind of knowledge.  

    
 
– – –  A MUST READ! – – –   
12-22-05

– UFO PUBLIC ACCLIMATION PROGRAM GOES INTO HIGH GEAR! – 

EDITOR's NOTE:  "Anonymous" has just come out with yet another brand NEW posting which addresses the MANY REASONABLE questions that many on this list had on the alien homeworld of SERPO that 12 Americans were sent to which consisted of 10 (ten) men and two (2) women.

 I ask you to keep an OPEN MIND on his startling, new revelations where -- the main thrust of his message is that -- the "laws" of physics on Earth do NOT universally apply throughout the cosmos.

 Think OUTside of the box people! 

 NEW READERS: Only the most recent and second to the most recent postings will be displayed here + the ORIGINAL posting by "Anonymous" which lays the groundwork for all his future transmissions.  To view postings #2 #3 #4 #5 #6,  #7 and #8, go to: 

 http://www.serpo.org/

 or contact Web site Administrator Bill Ryan at: Bill.Ryan@virgin.net

------------------------------------------
 Posting #11: 2005 CHRISTMAS SPECIAL! THE WORD-FOR-WORD JOURNAL ENTRIES OF THE TEAM COMMANDER + THE CODE NAMES AND 3-DIGIT NOS. THE TEAM MEMBERS REFERRED TO EACH OTHER AS FOR THE NEXT 13 YEARS! THEY NEVER USED THEIR REAL NAMES! PLUS: THE ALIEN ED DEVICE EXPLAINED IN DETAIL! SPECIAL BONUS: YOUR VARIOUS QUESTIONS ABOUT THE EBENS ADDRESSED IN THIS HOLIDAY SPECIAL EDITION!

 Posting #10:  THE SPECIFIC TRAINING/EDUCATIONAL REQUIREMENTS OUR TEAM MEMBERS HAD TO SUCCESSFULLY PASS / INTRODUCING "NOAH," THE EBEN ENGLISH LANGUAGE "EXPERT" WHO ASSISTED OUR TEAM MEMBERS GREATLY WITH TRANSLATIONS! / "FALCON's" PAST STATEMENTS ARE ADDRESSED AS WELL AS "THE YELLOW BOOK," THE FAMOUS 'ALIEN AUTOPSY FILM' AND SO MUCH MORE!

 Posting #9: ADDENDUM: ADDITIONAL DETAILS ON THE GRUELING TRAINING FOR SERPO AND THE 'SECRET WEAPON' OUR TEAM MEMBERS TOOK WITH THEM! 

 Posting #1 – THE ORIGINAL POSTING BY "ANONYMOUS" WHICH PUT THE DISCLOSURE PROCESS INTO OVERDRIVE,... A TRUE CLASSIC!
 ------------------------------------------
 POSTING #11 

 [ ] = Moderator's comments/insertions 

 EBE = Extraterrestrial Biological Entity: NO! 
 ETE: Extraterrestrial Entity: YES!

 [ Official terminology used by the U. S. Government ]

 SERPO spelled backwards =  OPRES:  "Office-Of-Primary Responsibility for Extraterrestrial Security" = Defense Intelligence Agency


 MERRY CHRISTMAS FROM SERPO! THE JOURNAL ENTRIES FROM THE TEAM COMMANDER, THE CODE NAMES FOR OUR BRAVE TEAM MEMBERS, THE ZPE-LIKE, ALIEN ENERGY DEVICE SPECS ARE DETAILED, THE VARIOUS EBEN CATEGORIES AND WHEN THE EXCHANGE PROGRAM CAME TO AN ABRUPT END / YOUR QUESTIONS ANSWERED FROM ANONYMOUS IN THIS YEAR-END HOLIDAY SPECIAL EDITION!  

 REGARDING OUR TEAM MEMBERS

 QUESTION: If our Team Members had their identities "sheep dipped," how did they refer to one another as?

 ANONYMOUS: Each Team Member was NOT identified by name.  Once the final 16 were selected, (remember, we had four {4} alternates), each Team Member got a number (three digit). 

 From that point on, they were identified by number ONLY.  Even each Team Member identified the others by their three-digit number. They were NEVER to use their real names. Once they left planet Earth and traveled on to SERPO, they gave each other nicknames. 

 For example, the Team Commander was identified as, "Skipper," the medical officers were identified as "Doc-1" and "Doc-2," the pilots were identified as, "Sky-King" and "Flash-Gordon."  Even though it wouldn't make any difference if they used their real names on SERPO, they were disciplined enough to continue either using the nicknames or the three-digit numbers. 
 ------------------------------------------
 THE TEAM COMMANDER's JOURNAL ENTRIES,... A MUST READ!

 VICTOR: I hope you didn't lose hope and faith in me; I needed to take a break during the holidays as I'm sure you did!  I have been coordinating this very complex subject matter with various people in the USG intell community. 

 Additionally, I and the rest of the DIA-6 are feverishly working on the photographs. Let's keep our fingers crossed! 

 Attached for your UFO Thread List are just four (4) pages of the Team Commander's diary. The diary contains a large number of pages, all hand written. It took me several days to prepare the attached four (4) pages from the diary.

 This is the actual, VERBATIM DIARY of the Team Commander.  It was started the morning of the departure. There were code names for control personnel and three-digit numbers for each Team Member [addressed above].  There are other codes and abbreviations for certain things, which is not explained. 

 I've typed the EXACT words, phrases and abbreviations. Nothing has been changed. And likewise, I will ask YOU to NOT alter, change, correct any of the text here as you often do with mine to make it grammatically correct (you make me feel like I was an English major like you!)  This includes your use of CAPS to emphasize things I've written; I ask you to NOT do this with these journal entries, Victor. 
  
 DAY 1

 We are ready. Hard to think we finally made it. Team is motivated and calm. Final briefing by MTC and MTB.  Cargo packed in EBE craft. Might have some problems with guns. Will be talking to the MVC. 899 and 203 will have overall charge of weapons. No sync system or we don't know about them. Everything moving smoothly. 700 and 754 will give each member final check before boarding. 

 OK, we loaded everything and it fits. But we have to transfer all of it to the bigger ship once we get to rendevous point. Really excited about this. No reservations by anyone. MTC asked all members to make final decision.  The team all said go.  We go. Interior of Ebe craft is big.  There are three levels, this is different than the one we trained on.  I think that was a scout craft, this one is a shuttle craft. 

 We stored the cargo in lower level.  We will sit in the center level and the crew will sit in the upper level.  Strange looking walls. 
 They seem to be dimensional.  There are three stations, four of us will sit in each station.  No seats just benches.  We wouldn't fit
 in those small crew seats. 

 The MVC says we don't need anything special, no O2 or helmets.  Don't know what to do with them.  OK, final checks.  MTC gave us final words.  One pray said.  We board the Ebe craft.  475 really nervous.  700 will watch him.  The hatch is closed. No windows. 
 We can't see out.  Everyone is seated in their respective seats on the bench.  No retention harnesses.  OK, well, bar across us. 

 The craft is starting engine, or what they call energy thrusters.  Seems like we are moving but nothing happening inside.  Still able to
 write this. Really dizzy now. 102 sitting next to me and he is faint.  Something feels really funny. Have to rewrite this because I can't think straight.
  
 DAY 1 – Entry 2

 We made it to the rendevous craft.  We don't know where we are, but it seemed like we all fainted or was really confused during this trip.  According to my wrist watch, it took about six hours.  Or maybe more.  We left at 1325 and it is 1939.  But not sure of the day. 
 We flew into the big ship. We are standing in a bay or something.

 There are many EBES helping us.  They seem to understand we are confused. The cargo was off loaded in one big move.  The platform containing the cargo was moved without unloading the individual cargo.  This ship looks like the inside of a real big building.  The ceiling is about 100 feet high in this area of the ship. 

 OK, we are being moved into another part of the ship.  OK, we moved to another room or area.  What a big ship. I just can't describe how big this is.  It took us about 15 minutes to walk to our area.  Seems like it is something special for us.  The chairs are bigger.  But
 there are only 10 of them. OK, I guess 203 and myself will sit in different location above these seats. 

 We are moved by some sort of elevator, but I can't understand how it worked.  Everyone his hungry.  We have our backpacks containing some C-rats and I guess we eat now.  But must ask the MVC.  I can't find him and we can't communicate with the two EBEs here. 

 They seem to be real nice.  420 will try to use his language skills.  Almost funny.  Sounds like a screaming match.  We just used sign language indicating we want to eat.  One of the EBE brought us a container with something it.  Doesn't look good but I think it is
 their food.  Looks like mush or oatmeal.  899 will taste it.  Well, 899 said it tastes like paper.  Think we will all stick to C-rats. 

 OK, MVC finally showed up.  Told us we will begin trip soon.  Two mils I think he means minutes but don't really know.  Maybe it wasn't such a good idea to eat before leaving.  We don't feel any weightlessness and we don't feel dizzy.  But we don't know what to
 expect from this point on.  They are indicating we must sit in the chairs. 
  
 DAY 2
  
 I'm not sure just how long we were in the containers.  We sat in the chairs and a clear container was placed over us and the chair.  We
 were isolated in this bubble or sphere.  We could breath OK and could see out, but we really felt dizzy and confused.  I think I fell asleep or fainted.  I think this is another day, but my watch says one hour since we sat, but I think it is the next day. 

 Our time instruments are located in our backpacks which are stored in another area of this room. We are still in these spheres but it seems OK.  Well, 899 figured out how to get out because he is standing up.  He opened my sphere.  Not sure if we should be out of this
 thing.  899 said a EBE came in and looked at us and left.  Other team members sleeping. 899 and myself walking around this room. 

 I retrieved the time instruments.  Seems like we have been traveling about 24 hours or so.  No windows to see.  Originally we were told it would take about 270 of our days.  OK, EBE came in and pointed to the chairs, I guess we need to go back and get into them. 
  
 ENTRY 

 Since I am not sure of which day it is I won't state a day as to my entry, [so] I'll just say entry.  We are all sick.  Dizzy, upset stomachs.  700 and 754 gave us medicine to settle our stomachs.  But we really feel bad.  We seem to be unable to focus our eyes and seem to not know which way way to turn up or down and don't know the way to sit down. Really bad feeling.

 Medicine helps a little we are able to eat a little. 700 and 754 tells us to eat and drink the water we brought along we are doing that and feel a little better can't concentrate on anything so I can't rite [sic] anymore right now.
  
 ENTRY
  
 Feel a lot better. EBES came in and did something to the room.  It all seems clearer and we are not so confused and dizzy. We ate again and drink more water.  Feeling a lot better. We are out of sphere, but must stay in them at certain times. 

 EBE showed us a series of lights above the entry panel.  Green, Red and White lights.  If the light is red, we must sit in sphere.  If
 light is white, we are OK.  EBE never explained the Green light.  Maybe that isn't good. 

 We have no idea what day it is, only that it is 2319.  Our date recorder isn't working very well, according to 633. He thinks we have
 been going for 10 days but not really sure.  We have been confined to this room for the entire time.  I think this room was made for us and we are safe in this room. 

 Maybe it wouldn't be wise to leave it.  No weightlessness.  Don't know how they do it. But we do feel a little lightheaded when we
 walk. Seems room is pressurized.  Ears are popping a lot. If we have to sit in this room for 270 days we will really be bored.  We
 can't really do much, all our equipment is packed away. 

 We have our backpacks but they only contain a few items.  We want to clean up, but can't find a bathroom except the containers we are using to relieve ourselves.  They are small metal containers that are emptied by the EBE every now and then. EBE brings us food, their food. We tried it and it tastes like paper really no taste but maybe it is something special for space travel.  700 is eating it.  He seems OK but it is upsetting his bowels.  Their water is milky looking but tastes like apples. Strange.

[Editor's note: "EBE brings us food, their food. We tried it and it tastes like paper really no taste but maybe it is something special for space travel.:"    EBE food looks like mushed paper, but they use telepathic 'taste' to flavor it according to whatever the eater likes. The same 'papery mush' can taste like any food.  Water is H2o - a milky looking water, is another substance with flavor in it.
 EBE's really like J-ello. In fact they sometimes telepath to abductees to make 'orange J-ello' and then they abduct the orange J-ello' as well as the people. ]
  
 ENTRY
  
 It has been a long time since I have made an entry.  We are guessing we have been on the ship for 25 days.  But we might be off about five days.  We were locked into our sphere for a long period of time.  We had to leave in order to relieve ourselves and finally were able to open the sphere. 

 But when we did, we all got sick, really sick. Dizzy, confused and some couldn't walk. We had trouble urinating and moving our bowels.  700 and 754, who ate the EBE food didn't seem to be as sick as us. They treated us with medicine.  EBE came in and pointed a blueish light on our heads.  We felt better, much better after this. 

 But pointed to the chairs and we figure we must get back into them. We showed him our waste containers and pointed to the chairs in a confused manner. He understood and then left the room.  EBE came back with small containers we could place inside the sphere. 

 He also brought in small jugs of the milky liquid and made a motion for us to drink it.  So we went back into the sphere and just sat there with the waste containers and the jug of the milky stuff.  We drink that and seem to be better, except 518, who seem to be sick. But we were cautioned to stay inside the sphere. 
  
 ENTRY
  
 I don't have any idea how long we stayed in that sphere this time.  But EBE came in and made a motion for us to come out.  We were able to move around without being dizzy or sick.  EBE even allowed us to leave the room.  We walked along a very narrow hallway for a long period of time, maybe 20 minutes.  We then got into some sort of elevator, which moved fast because we could feel the motion. 

 We came out into a very large room that contained many EBENS sitting in seats.  Maybe this is the control center.  Our escort made a motion to go into the room.  We could see control panels which contained many lights.  There were four different stations containing six EBENs each.  They were in levels.

 The top level inside this room contained just one seat.  One EBEN was seated in that chair.  We figure he must be the pilot or commander.  He seemed busy with an instrument panel.  There were many television screens, but they all showed EBEN language and series of lines, both vertical and horizontal.  Maybe some sort of graph. 

 We were able to wander around without any EBEN bothering us.  633 and 661 were really interested in this.  633 seemed better.  There was one window.  But we could see anything. It was dark but we could make out wavy lines.  Maybe some sort of distortion in time.  We must be moving faster that light speed, but we can't see anything out the window. 

 OK,  MVC finally arrived.  He explains in broken english, that we are halfway to home planet. Everything is functioning properly and we all will feel better once the craft gets out of this time wave, as he calls it.  MVC says we can walk around any part of the ship, but we must stay together. 

[Editor's note:  EBE's think and speak perfect English.  I don't know about every one of them.  But I know the ones I know don't have any problems with it.   That said, they seldom verbally speak English.  They speak in their own tongue which contains a lot of slurs and clicking sounds... but when they talk English, a lot of the time they use telepathy instead.  It the reptilian guys who have a hard time with talking English.]


 We must be shown how to operate the movement centers.  We are thinking he is referring to the elevators.  It seems simple, just placing your hand over one of the operating lights.  White and red.  White moves it and red stops it.  We hear some type of ringing sound, but MVC says it is only space sounds.  Whatever he means by that. We were able to walk around the ship, but it is so large it is difficult to understand how such a large ship can move so fast. 

 633 wants to see the engines.  MVC takes four of us to the engine room or whatever they wish to call the room.  It contains large, very large metal containers.  They are in a circle, with the ends of each pointing into the center.  Many pipes or some type of large tubes
 connects them. 

 In the center of these containers is a copper colored coil or something looking like a coil.  There is a bright light being shined from a
 point above into the center of the coil.  We hear a very dull hum, but no major loud sounds.  661 thinks it is a negative matter versus
 positive matter system. 

 [ END JOURNAL ENTRIES FROM TEAM COMMANDER ]
 ------------------------------------------
 QUESTION: Please explain, for the enlightenment of all, the Eben Energy Device (ED) found at the crash site.

 ANONYMOUS: OK, I will answer this question. Dimensions: 9" x 11" x 1½", weight 26.7 oz.  The ED [Energy Device] is clear and made of something similar to hard plastic. 

 On the bottom left, there is a small square metal plate, possibly a chip. It is one of the connector points. 

 On the bottom right, there is another small square metal point, which is the second connector point. 

 Viewed from an electron microscope, the ED contains small circular-shaped bubbles. Within these bubbles are extremely minute
 small particles. When a demand for electric power is applied to the ED, the particles always move clockwise at a great speed, not
 measurable. There is also some type of unidentified fluid located around the bubbles. When a demand is placed on the ED, this fluid
 turns from a clear color to a hazy pink color. The fluid becomes warm between 102° - 115° F. 

 However, the little bubbles would not heat up, ONLY the fluid.  The bubbles maintained a constant temperature of 72°  F.  The boundary of the ED contains small (micron sized) wires.  When a demand is placed on the ED, the wires expand in size.  This expanding process depended on the amount of demand placed on the ED.  We did extensive, exhaustive  experimentation with the ED.  We could power everything from a .5 watt bulb to AN ENTIRE HOUSE! 

 The ED automatically detects the required demand and then outputs that exact amount.  It worked on everything electrical EXCEPT equipment that contained a magnetic field.  Somehow, our magnetic field interferes with the output demand of the ED.  However, we have developed a shielding process to correct this. 

 I won't go into all the scientific nomenclature at this time [due to national security implications]. This is just the basic information on
 the ED, which is what a reader wanted to know. 

 Interestingly, when our recovery team first found the ED, they thought it was a window because of its clear plastic-like qualities.  Ebe #1 had to show us how it worked.  It still took us MANY YEARS to FULLY UNDERSTAND the ED's  operational qualities.  I'm SURE we fully understand everything about it today, BUT that isn't written in the final [SERPO] report. 
 ------------------------------------------
 REGARDING EBENS #1 - #5:  

 Ebe #1 was the crash survivor from the craft found in Corona, NM in July, 1947.  

 Ebe #2 was the first exchange of an Eben scientist and was the second visitor left on Earth. I don't know the exact time period of his stay. 

 Ebe #3 was a female scientist. 

 J-ROD was a cloned Eben, created by the Ebens, who came as another type of visitor.  J-ROD is a very complicated matter and the entire story will NEVER be made public.  The exact type of entity J-ROD was shall remain classified as "Above Top Secret."  

 Let your exclusive UFO Thread List membership know that THIS SUBJECT MATTER IS CLOSED and no future questions regarding this topic will be addressed.

 Why s/he or it was named J-ROD is classified. People have speculated about that, and officially it means something, but that information shall remain shielded from the public domain.  
  
 President Bill Clinton wanted to continue the exchange program, but others in his administration thought it would be a mistake and overruled him. It was terminated in 1994 with Ebe #5.

 It's also important to note that the Eben communication device failed to work altogether in 1996 and we've not had any contact with them [the Ebens] nor can we initiate any with them from our end.
 ------------------------------------------
 QUESTION: UFO author Whitley Strieber claims to have been contacted by a man claiming that he was part of a human-alien exchange program in the '60s. Was Whitley "played" or did he actually meet one of the Team Members?

 ANONYMOUS: The guy who approached Whtiley Strieber in 1989-'90, WAS a Team Member. We know him and knew the contact he made with Strieber, not once, not twice, but THREE (3) times. 

 All surviving Team Members were carefully monitored and watched by a special branch of the DIA. The last surviving Team Member died in 2002 in the State of Florida.
 ------------------------------------------
 QUESTION FROM ROBERT STANLEY:

 VICTOR: 

 Can you give me more details re. this statement?:

 "However, when he [Ebe #1] was taken to Washington, D.C., (VERY closely controlled), the climate there (in late fall) was too cold for him."

 When did this occur?

 How long was EBE #1 there?

 Where did he stay?

 Thank you.

 ROBERT STANLEY
 Unicus magazine

 ANONYMOUS: I will NOT supply that information. 

 For your information only (not for public view), Ebe #1 visited Washington D.C. in 19XX and stayed at XXXX XXXX, XX in a special
 XXXXX. He did NOT meet with President XXXXX!

 [Withheld for reasons of national security.]
 ------------------------------------------
 FACTOID: The final segment of CLOSE ENCOUNTERS OF THE THIRD KIND which I viewed does have 12 (twelve) people, 10 men and two women. Twelve people are also the number given in Spielberg's book version.

 However, I got around to reading the end of Spielberg's paperback version of CE3. It reads the same as the movie EXCEPT  for two (2) interesting things. The 12 (twelve) Team Members are introduced as ALL MEN.

 An additional dialogue not in the movie also takes place. They have a sit down with Roy Neary and have him sign a number of documents. While he signs the last one he is told the following:

 "We have a possible problem in the area of canon and common jurisprudence outside of the parameters of our astronomy. The case could be made that you are, in effect, technically speaking... dead."

 Is this a fancy way of saying that if anybody comes snooping around about what happened to Roy, they now have the legal right to tell them he is dead? Does that sound familiar?

 "Spielberg tells me about the film. It's about UFOs, he says, but it is not science fiction. He calls it 'science fact.'"

 COMMENT: Makes you wonder how Spielberg got the numbers and gender count right.

 It is reported that after President Ronald Reagan watched a special screening of "Close Encounters of the Third Kind," he privately spoke to Steven Spielberg and said, "You don't know how true this really is!"

 [ The actual quote by President Reagan ]
 ------------------------------------------
 FLASH:  

 I received a very interesting e-mail (which I promised not to disclose) from a senior USG official, who works within the Bush administration.  This official stated: 

 "Everyone within the NSC [National Security Council] is extremely interested in Mr. Anonymous' information. Naturally, we cannot make any official statements or comments on the subject matter.

 "However, we are hopeful the public is accepting the information with an OPEN MIND."   

 So, as you can see, everyone is getting this information.  If the NSC is aware of it, then I would say -- without a doubt -- it is officially
 sanctioned! 

 Hope the wind picks up!

 [ NAME WITHHELD PER REQUEST ]
 ------------------------------------------
 REGARDING THE TEAM MEMBER PHOTOGRAPHS

 We are working on obtaining four (4) photographs taken by our Team Members of SERPO. I will scan them into my computer and then e-mail them to you. You can send them to Bill Ryan for inclusion into the SERPO Web site.

 DON'T distribute the photographs through your huge UFO thread list. Just leave it on the Serpo.org Web site for Web site Administrator Bill Ryan to post.

 We are in the process of scanning photographs from SERPO. I'm not sure how well they will turn out, but once I get them finalized, I will e-mail them to you and you can provide them to Bill for the SERPO Web site.  I just hope they turn out alright. 

 Once the public sees these photographs, even our skeptics, die-hard debunkers and those who claim that this is all a "non-event disclosure," will scratch their heads in total amazement! [They're NOT from a Hollywood movie set!]

– One photograph shows the entire Team standing next to an Eben home, with several Ebens standing in the background;

– another photograph shows the Team's new home in the north;  

– another photograph shows an Eben village in the north;  

– another photograph shows a group of Eben's playing their "soccer" game.    

 You'll love them!

 One group member has a fool-proof way of sending them. I'm not sure of the exact method, but I'll let you know just prior to his sending them. Either they'll be sent to you (or Bill directly) in encrypted form or a special military courier will bring them to you from a special unit within the DIA.

 We'll let you know.
 ------------------------------------------
 One final thing:  Someone mentioned the planet "Sieu." That was the pronunciation of SERPO by the Ebens. They're both  one and the SAME.

– ANONYMOUS
 -----------------------------------------
 POSTING #10

 THE SPECIFIC CURRICULUM VITAE OF THE 12 TEAM MEMBERS / THE CONTINUING LANGUAGE PROBLEMS WITH THE EBEN LANGUAGE / INTRODUCING "NOAH," THE EBEN ENGLISH LANGUAGE EXPERT AND SPACE TRAVELLER! / THE "CONTRADICTION" PROVIDED BY "FALCON" ON THE EBEN CLIMATE IS ADDRESSED! / THE EBEN's HAND
 IN EARTH's PAST HISTORY AND RELIGION, AND THE INFAMOUS "ALIEN AUTOPSY FILM" ARE ANSWERED AS WELL IN THIS BOMBSHELL, MUST-READ POSTING!

 After the extensive selection process,  each Team Member had to demonstrate their abilities to endure hardship, which included a battery of psychological tests, medical screenings and a PAT (Positive Attitude Tests which is a military test given to pilots and special forces personnel).

 The training consisted of the following:

 1) Introduction to Space Exploration (taught by NASA personnel); 

 2) Astronomy, identification of stars, use of telescopes and general astrophysics; 

 3) Eben anthropology (information received from Ebe #1); 

 4. Eben History (basic information received from Ebe #1); 

 5. U.S. Army Field Medical Training (trauma care). This was given to the non-medical personnel on the Team; 

 6. High Altitude training-parachute and weightless/zero oxygen environment training; 

 7. Survival, escape and evasion training; 

 8. Basic weapons and explosive training (six [6] pounds of C-4 [Composition-4] was taken);

http://science.howstuffworks.com/c-42.htm  (How C-4 works)

9. Psychological Operations Training and anti-interrogation preparation; 

 10. Small Unit Tactical Training (Mini 4-week U.S. Army Ranger Course); 

 11. Intelligence Gathering Course; 

 12. Space Geology-collection methods and use of specialized geological equipment;  

 13. Physical Stress Training; 

 14. Methods to cope with confinement/isolation;  

 15. Nurtrition course;  

 16. Equipment use training;  

 17. Individual speciality training;  

 18. Basic Biology;  

 19. Other training which is still considered EXTREMELY HIGHLY CLASSIFIED EVEN AFTER 40 YEARS [1965 - 2005]. 

 Humans could make the Eben tonal sounds, but one had to practice and practice and practice. It took a long time for anyone studying the Eben language to make the sounds.  Some of the sounds were similar to high pitch singing sounds. The bottom line is that it COULD be done.

 Now consider this:  Even though each Team Member was taught the Eben tonal sounds/language, it was difficult for the Team Members to remember each tone and the use of other sounds with the tones.  The two (2) linguists on the Team practiced and learned enough to basically communicate, according to the documents I read.

 The Ebens learned English, but had difficulty pronouncing words exactly correct.  For example, according to the document, Ebens could not say the letter "L."  So, if the Eben's were trying to say the word "look," it came out "ook."

 Between the first message sent by our Earth-based team in the summer of 1952 to the first message received from the Ebens was about four (4) months.  We have no way of knowing when the Ebens received our message, how long it took them to study it and how long it took them to send it back.  The signals were in Eben language, with a readout and sounds, tonal, etc. 
  
 One interesting note:  There was one Eben, who was a space traveller and who could speak English better than the other Ebens who had learned it.  This Eben was codenamed "Noah" by the Team.  Every time the team had to communicate important information, they turned to Noah. But during the latter part of our Team's stay, Noah left for an away mission. By then, our two linguists were able to communicate better than any other Team Member. 

 QUESTION: Why didn't our Team use the Eben communication device? 

 ANONYMOUS: They had it, but it contained only about 500 English words.  Not enough to fully communicate.  The Team discarded the device early in their stay.

 Who is "Falcon?!"  I AM READING FROM THE ACTUAL DEBRIEFING DOCUMENTS.
 There is no mention of a "Falcon."  There is no mention of a "Falcon" on the Briefing Control Access Roster. If you're referring to the 1989 TV special, "UFOs Coverup,... LIVE!" in which a "Falcon" and a "Condor" appeared in shadowed form, THEY NEVER HAD ACCESS to the actual "Project SERPO" Report.

 I would guess that whomever Falcon is was spreading DISinformation.  Ebens lived on a warm planet, except the northern hemisphere, which was cooler.  Some Ebens lived in the cooler climate,  but the Ebens could NOT stand extreme cold. 

 I think one is confusing what Ebe #1 said about "OUR" planet. It liked the cooler places on "OUR" planet.  He was NOT referring to
 SERPO. Ebe #1 was a visitor on our planet and was taken to several different locations, mostly warm.  When he arrived at Los Alamos, he remarked that he liked the "cooler" climate, meaning Los Alamos in the LATE summer. 

 However, when he [Ebe #1] was taken to Washington, D.C., (VERY closely controlled), the climate there (in late fall) was too cold for him.  I don't know about a "Falcon" or his/her information, but I DO KNOW THE FACTS surrounding Ebe #1.

 QUESTION: What do you make of what Ebe #1 ALLEGEDLY said about Mankind being genetically altered throughout time AND that they established religions and Christ in particular on our planet?

 [An idea that was popularized in the 1989 bestseller, "The Gods of Eden" by William Bramley, ISBN# 0380718073]

 ANONYMOUS: If one reads the "Yellow Book" [the true and correct history of Mankind as relayed by the ETEs] and reads between the lines, one would come away with the thought and clear impression that the Ebens had something to do with Jesus Christ or, possibly, Jesus was one of THEM.

 Also, if you look at some events that are shown in the "Yellow Book," (remember, there are NO dates shown in the "Yellow Book"), you can connect some incidents, such as Fatima, etc., with an Eben landing.

http://archive.alienzoo.com/filmandtv/mikefarrellcoverup.html

http://www.ufoseek.org/fatimajv.htm

QUESTION: Is the much ballyhooed and hyped "Alien Autopsy Film" released by Ray Santilli REAL or FAKE?

 ANONYMOUS: That film is a fake. We did perform four (4) autopsies of the five (5) dead Ebens found in the Corona crash site and did photograph them, however the bodies from the western New Mexico crash site were too decomposed to be autopsied. But the Ray Santilli film is an absolute 100% FAKE.

http://www.soc.org/opcam/a_autopsy/alienautopsy.html

The "DIM" was the Duty Information Manual.  It was their "bible," for all of the information they would need.  The operations plans, how to execute the plans, emergency action procedures, etc.
 -----------------------------------------
 POSTING #9

 ADDENDUM to Posting #8:  ADDITIONAL DETAILS ON THE GRUELING TRAINING REGIMEN FOR THEIR 13-YEAR JOURNEY TO PLANET SERPO INCLUDING PLANS FOR MASS SUICIDE, THE SECRET WEAPON OUR TEAM MEMBERS TOOK WITH THEM TO NEUTRALIZE THE EBENS AND HOW THEY PLANNED TO ESCAPE PLANET SERPO WITH A
 "SAUCER-JACKED" EBEN CRAFT BACK TO EARTH!      

 Each Team Member had to endure extreme psychological and physical training.  In one training test, each Team Member was locked inside a 5' x 7' box buried seven (7) feet underground for five (5) days, with just food and water, no  contact with anyone else and in total darkness. This tested several factors. 

 Each Team Member also took a "pill" with them. The pill was standard issue for intelligence agents operating behind enemy lines.  The pill could end their life if, for some reason, the Ebens turned out to be hostile [they never did]. 

 Several selected Team Members (pilots) were trained on flying an Eben craft, one of which was the one captured near western New Mexico in 1949.  The plan called for these selected few to fly the craft back to Earth in case of an emergency. 

 There were four (4) pilots on the team.  These four (4) spent many weeks at the Nevada complex [Area 51/S4/Groom Lake / Dreamland] learning to fly the recovered Eben alien craft. It wasn't hard to fly, once one could understand the operation of the controls. I'm SURE many of the UFO sightings back in 1964/'65 around the West could be attributed to these test flights by our Team Members. 

 Selected Team Members carried small containers of liquid nitrogen. Ebens were vulnerable to extreme cold. In case the Eben's
 turned hostile, the liquid nitrogen could be used to neutralize Ebens during an escape attempt. The Team Members were instructed to spray the substance directly into the face of an Eben. Ebe #1 was found to be vulnerable to this. 

 As for the liquid nitrogen matter.  The liquid nitrogen was placed in special containers, just like we do today.  The debriefing document
 doesn't state the type of containers, just that each member had a small container.

 [NEVER materialized; ONLY the Earth human is a violently predisposed and hostile sentient creature.]

 However, during the return debriefing,  the Team found the Ebens to be so docile, each Team Member quickly DISCARDED THESE BOTTLES of liquid nitrogen when they arrived on SERPO. The Ebens realized the Team had this substance, but never questioned the reason for bringing it. 

 As with weapons, each Team Member had a handgun and rifle. The Ebens realized these were weapons, but again never questioned why the Team Members were bringing them along. 

 But each Team Member never carried the weapons EXCEPT during their exploration of SERPO and then ONLY CERTAIN  Team Members carried them. 
 ------------------------------------------
 POSTING #1

 INITIAL E-MAIL BY "ANONYMOUS"

 VICTOR:

 First let me introduce myself. My name is Request Anonymous. I am a retired employee of the U.S. Government. I won't go into any great details about my past, but I was involved in a special program.

 As for Roswell, it occurred, but NOT like the story books tell. There were two (2) crash sites. One southwest of Corona, New Mexico and the second site at Pelona Peak, south of Datil, New Mexico.

 The crash involved two (2) extraterrestrial aircraft. The Corona site was found a day later by an archaeology team. This team reported the crash site to the Lincoln County Sheriff's department. A deputy arrived the next day and summoned a state police officer. One live entity [EBE] was found hiding behind a rock. The entity was given water but declined food. The entity was later transferred to Los Alamos.

 The information eventually went to Roswell Army Air Field. The site was examined and all evidence was removed. The bodies were taken to Los Alamos National Laboratory because they had a freezing system that allowed the bodies to remain frozen for research. The craft was taken to Roswell and then onto Wright Field, Ohio.

 The second site was not discovered until August 1949 by two ranchers. They reported their findings several days later to the sheriff of Catron County, New Mexico. Because of the remote location, it took the sheriff several days to make his way to the crash site. Once at the site, the sheriff took photographs and then drove back to Datil.

 Sandia Army Base, Albuquerque, New Mexico was then notified. A recovery team from Sandia took custody of all evidence, including six (6) bodies. The bodies were taken to Sandia Base, but later transferred to Los Alamos.

 The live entity established communications with us and provided us with a location of his home planet. The entity remained alive until 1952, when he died. But before his death, he provided us with a full explanation of the items found inside the two crafts. One item was a communication device. The entity was allowed to make contact with his planet.

 Somehow, I never knew this information, but a meeting date was set for April 1964 near Alamogordo New Mexico. The Aliens landed and retrieved the bodies of their dead comrades. Information was exchanged. Communication was in English. The aliens had a translation device.

 In 1965, we had AN EXCHANGE PROGRAM WITH THE ALIENS. We carefully selected 12 military personnel; ten (10) men and two (2) women. They were trained, vetted and carefully removed from the military system. The 12 were skilled in various specialities.

 Near the northern part of the Nevada Test Site, the aliens landed and the 12 Americans left. One entity was left on Earth. The original plan was for our 12 people to stay 10 years and then return to Earth.

 But something went wrong. The 12 remained until 1978, when they were returned to the same location in Nevada. Seven (7) men and one (1) woman returned. Two (2) died on the alien's home planet. Four (4) others DECIDED TO REMAIN, according to the returnees. Of the eight (8) that returned, all have died. The last survivor died in 2002.

 The returnees were isolated from 1978 until 1984 at various military installations. The Air Force Office of Special Investigation (AFOSI) was responsible for their security and safety. AFOSI also CONDUCTED DEBRIEFING SESSIONS WITH THE RETURNEES.

 I have never seen or read anything about the exchange program. I once heard a little bit of information from Linda Howe, but she didn't have much information.

 I've monitored your e-mails for about six (6) months. I've read e-mails from you and others. But I've never seen nor heard the truth about the real Roswell incident or the exchange program.

 I'd like to hear what others say about this.

– ANONYMOUS
 ------------------------------------------
 The complete debriefing is contained in: "PROJECT SERPO," Final
 Report-80HQD893-020, classified TS, Codeword. 

 
 
A comment on the SERPO revelation:  
As for the laws of physics, your Anonymous is twisting the facts. The orbits of those two stars Zeta1 & 2 is an observational fact, not some law of physics although all galaxies, stars & planets operate under those laws from what's been observed. The two stars are spread wide apart by 350 billion miles called a wide binary. And Kepler's law was applied to the planets of Zeta 2 and it works pretty good even for elliptical orbits. Puts EBE-1's home planet #4 right where it should be, see table below. The game I think is to convince everyone that yes Anonymous does have some good information. But beware, good information from what I see is being sprinkled with bad information or disinfo. For Zeta 1 & 2 see link. For Zeta 2 Planets see table.
www.solstation.com/stars2/zeta-ret.htm
 EBE-1 came from the 4th planet around Zeta 2. See the AU place planet 4 is sitting around Zeta 2 or 1.12 AU. Very nice place to live.... Notice that Zeta-4 orbital period is 432 days but yet it's further out than SERPO was in that Anonymous report which gave a ridiculous 865....

 Planets of the Zeta 2 Reticulum System
 ===============================================================
 Planet        Semi-Major axis        Period(days)      Period(years)
 ---------------------------------------------------------------
 Reticulum 1    0.14 (AU)            18.9 (days)      0.052 (years)
 Reticulum 2    0.28                     54.0                0.1481
 Reticulum 3    0.56                     152.9              0.4196
 Reticulum 4    1.12                     432.6              1.12
 ---------------------------------------------------------------
 So one Reticulum 4 year is equal to roughly 1.12 earth years or 432 days. And it is in roughly the same position in Zeta 2 Ret's "life-zone" as the Earth is in the Sun's. Zeta 2 Ret is a G1V spectral class star, the sun is a G2V

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

10 November
 Kepler's laws apply to normal star systems. Zeta 1 & 2 are a wide binary which is observed not calculated, repeat, observed not calculated. Their masses are roughly
 that of our own sun so that constant in Kepler's law can get set to 1. Then you just do the rest. I'm not talking about the physical conditions on SERPO. I'm talking about the orbits of the planets and stars. See link below, Zeta 1 & 2 are separated by one tenth of a light year or 350 billion miles. Said those things a million times also. It's not me, all those numbers can be referenced... www.solstation.com/stars2/zeta-ret.htm


--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

10 November
 I'm a military scientist. Here are my observations regarding the SERPO information:

 The question of whether the "laws of physics" apply differently from galaxy to galaxy dependent upon their spin is irrelevant to any discussion of Reticuli twins in that they are both part of the same Milky Way galaxy as is our Sun. Moreover, any distortion in our observations of OTHER galaxies which MIGHT result from the spin of our own, would apply across the board, and thus in essence negate itself since there would be no way to logically compare it to similar distortional effects which would effect observers in other galaxies in their efforts to observe us, presuming that both observations were initiated at the exact same moment of Universal time. In other words, if a third observer in some other dimension were able to compare 1 unit of time (say a single oscillation of one atom of cesium) as observed on planet earth, with 1 unit of time equally measured on the planet X in the far-away galaxy of XXXXX, that observer might conclude(after removing all other variables) that the two units were different from his perspective even though both observers in both galaxies might observe and report what they though were the same results.

 A cesium clock ticks off one second on planet earth. A twin cesium clock placed in orbit and traveling at orbital velocity also ticks off one second. Observers at each location agree that one second has passed as confirmed by the read-out on their instrumentation. It is only when the two clocks are compared that it becomes obvious that there has been some distortion; yet in attempting to compare them it becomes equally obvious that the same observer cannot ever observe both at EXACTLY the same time (with a bow to Heisenberg). Thus, differences arise NOT from the observation, but from the perspective used to interpret it.

 The basic Theorem: Only from an observation platform set in ANOTHER universe would an observer be able to detect and have some basis of accurately comparing distortions being produced locally in THIS universe by differences in the spin rates of the various galaxies of which it is composed. All this aside, unless the inhabitants of SERPO routinely walk on ceilings and through walls, the laws of physics apply the same there as they do here.
 Lieutenant Colonel ____ ____
 USAF Scientific Advisory Group

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

11 November
 If the "Away Team" couldn't make their measuring devices work properly, then why even quote numbers like these?

 Is a mile on earth a mile on SERPO? Recall that lengths are now referred to the wavelength of light. Is the light wavelength to be trusted? Does red light generated by excited neon atoms, which has a wavelength of 6328 Angstroms on earth, have some other value in SERPIAN length measurement units? Is there neon on SERPO? (Are their elements the same? Some have speculated that there could be different values for Planck's Constant, c, etc., in different universes.

 If SERPO is in another universe all bets are off as to whether or not we could make sense of what is "normal" to them. Talk about "out of the box" thinking.)

 Some of you may recognize this as the wavelength of red HeNe laser light.

 If a HeNe laser were built on SERPO and the the laser light directed toward earth would the wavelength when received on earth be 6328 Å ? If so, then there should be a simple ratio between SERPIAN length units and ours. If not, then it would be much more difficult or perhaps impossible to derive SERPO physics from our own.

 Moons: SERPO has two.
 Complicated tides? Distances from planet? relative sizes? Periods?

 Day: 43 hours
 Whose hours? Makes no sense to quote this as hours unless it is intended to mean our hours, which are related to our seconds (3600 per hour) and each second is a number of oscillations of the atomic clock. If atoms "run differently" on SERPO then not only will wavelengths be different (see above) but also frequencies (time durations of oscillation). Which type of day? Does this refer to rotation of the planet relative to one of the nearby stars or relative to the distant stars? (we measure "sun days" and "distant star" days... they differ slightly because the earth rotates around the sun) ASSUME this "day" is 43 of our hours so there are 154800 of OUR sec in THEIR day as compared to 86400 of OUR sec in our day (approximations used liberally!)

 Year: 865 days.
 Does this mean our years? Probably not! For someone on SERPO it would be natural to measure a complete rotation around a sun (relative to distant stars) in terms of the rotations of the planet.If we assume this means THEIR days of 43 hours, then their year is (all numbers approximate) 1.3x 108 of OUR seconds, whereas our year is 3.1x107 of OUR seconds. Previously the Kepler law was applied under the assumption that the mass of the sun about which the planet rotates was the same as our sun. However, I, probably incorrectly, used 865 days as 865 of "our" days, which would be 2.37 of our years. I should have accounted for the 43 hour day. A day this long means that the rotation period is actually 865/365 x 43/24 = 4.2 of our years. For the earth, Kepler's rule can be written as follows, using years and AU
 as the units of measurement (with 1 AU = radius of earth from sun)
 (1)3/(1)2 = 1 (AU)3/(year)2. For a planet rotating about a sun with the mass of or sun in 4.2 years
 Kepler's rule is written as r3/(4.2)2 = 1 which leads to a radius of 2.6 AU or 240 million miles, noticeably larger than the 164 million I calculated before.

 One problem with this sun data: if strictly interpreted as the distance from one sun is ALWAYS 91.4 million and the distance from the other is ALWAYS 96.5 then we have an "impossibility".... or at least I can't conceive of an orbit that keeps the distance from one constant at one value and at the same time keeps the distance from the other also at one value. I could conceive of an orbit that keeps the distance from one constant while the distance to the other varies with a periodicity that depends upon the period of rotation of the suns about one another and the rotation period (SERPO year) of the planet. If interpreted as average distances from the suns as SERPO travels in an elliptical (or more complicated) orbit, then there may be some way to explain this. Of course, those suns would be orbiting one another at some distance apart so if SERPO did have an orbit that encompassed both suns, then it must orbit the center of mass of the suns (unless there is some complex orbit, as I suggested previously, like a figure 8 or a warped ellipse). Need more info on the suns, orbit, etc.

 OTHER AMUSING CALCULATIONS:
 DIAMETER: earth: 7,900 mi = 12,700 KM. SERPO 7,200 mi.= 11,600 km
 MASS: earth - 6 x 1024 kg SERPO 5 x 1024 kg (assumed to be mass in kg)
 AVG DENSITY = mass/([pi/6]D3)
 For Earth = 5590 kg/m3
 For SERPO = 6,100 kg/m3
 g (accel of grav at surface) = GM/(Rsurf)2 where G = 6.7 x 10-11 m3kg-1s-2....
 for earth (if you multiply the approximate numbers used here) g = 9.97 m/s2
 (when done more accurately, 9.8 m/s2) for SERPO: 9.96 m/s2

 AMAZING! (I had no idea that these numbers would come out so close)
 (But why does the data table above show 9.60 m/s2. Is G different in the SERPIAN system? )

 Tilt 43 degrees.
 Are these "earth degrees" of arc? That is quite a tilt, by the way. Would make considerable winter-summer differences in each hemisphere (upper, lower).

 Temperature: 43 to 126 deg (F? C?).
 Are these their degrees or ours? I presume ours (else why quote them). An interesting experiment would be to determine whether or not the blackbody curve on their planet is the same as on earth. If the physics is really different there might be a difference in BB radiation (which relates electromagnetic wave, thermodynamics and
 quantum physics) There are lots more numerical "tests" one could do to compare these two systems. Only by doing such tests can one learn where the differences really are... or if things are the same after all. First applying what is known to some new phenomenon is part of the scientific method. IF what is known
 fails to explain the phenomenon, then it is time to move out of the box.

 Incidentally, people have been accused of not having an "open mind" because they have asked questions that might illuminate inconsistencies in the story and numerical data. However, I would guess that anyone on this email list has an open mind..... or wouldn't be here. Just be sure not to let your brains fall out.

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

1 December
 I would like to suggest a new way of looking at time, which seems to clear up some of the Anonymous references.

 If any particle, say an electron, is given a 'push', it doesn't move immediately: it just sits there for a time known as 'Tau': 2e2/3mc3, or 6.26 x 10-24 seconds. After that time, it is instantaneously found to be moving at whatever velocity the 'push' imparts to it. This non-local behavior in time has been known for better than half a century, and is mostly just ignored as 'too small' to worry about. This was the conclusion of F. Rohrlich in 1962: "The Theory of the Electron":

www.philsoc.org/1962Spring/1526transcript.html

 In his equation 9, he (incorrectly) derives this same time, 6 x 10-24 seconds, noting that it represents "a non-local behavior in time" with "a lack of causality" at these time-intervals, but 'too small' to inviolate the theory.

 However in particle colliders, this time interval can't be ignored, for every interaction, however violent, takes this minimum time before anything 'happens'. Modern non-technical 'explanations' of this can be found several places, for instance in Dr. Sam Treiman's book "The Odd Quantum" (Princeton University Press, 2000) pp. 97-98 in which he shows that the wave function does not change from T = 0 to T = Tau, with all the change happening at the latter point.

 If this same behavior were measured as the output of an analog-to-digital converter, say a music synthesizer, it would be instantly recognized that the time Tau was the interval between digital slices of the analog wave. To put it more simply, a digital converter puts an analog wave, say a musical sequence, through a 'baloney slicer', giving a digital number to each intercept of the wave by each 'slice'. In the electron's case, the impulse is delivered at T = 0, but there is no measurement until the later time T = Tau, at which time the next 'slice' shows all the change in the analog wave over the (unmeasured) interval Tau. (The digital number is a 'point-particle' result, although the electron is and has evolved as 'wave'.)

 This leads directly to the conclusion that time is quantized, a frequency, the interval Tau being the time between 'baloney slices' of an analog wave, the 'refresh rate' of our reality. Heisenberg was groping toward this conclusion, noting that Planck's Constant 'h' was not a 'pure' constant, but a constant of proportionality. He always thought it was the 'shadow' of some 'pure' constant in some other dimension: he chose distance, deriving the above relationship as a distance, 2e2/3mc2, or about 1.8 x 10-15 meters. (This is the measured diameter of the nucleon, NOT a coincidence.) He tried to slice the universe into tiny cubes this size, but this didn't work, so he abandoned it.

 However Planck's Constant has the dimensions of energy times time. Since Planck was working with black-body energy, it has always simply been assumed that energy is quantized. However everything works exactly the same if one assumes that time is the quantized entity. And as Heisenberg noted, this interval, whether measured as distance or time, is exactly the 'width' of the uncertainty relationship, as of course the analog wave is unmeasured, hence uncertain, anywhere between 'slices'.

 This conclusion, that time is quantized, or a frequency, of course has immense implications, the most startling perhaps being that we may live in a 'virtual', rather than a 'real', reality.

 However if one recognizes that time is a frequency, one can then look for means of altering this frequency. This might mean that ones subjective time might remain the same, but the 'rest of the universe' might flash by much faster. "Visitors" have always said that time is much different from our understanding of it. I don't have the reference in front of me, but in the book "Witnessed" by Budd Hopkins an abductee describes being taken from a pool party in the midst of her family, which was frozen in place, splash from the pool hanging in air. Such a change in time's frequency might result in a journey of thirty-some light years taking only seven months or so.

 Further implications of quantized time can be found in my papers, published in "Infinite Energy" magazine, issues 43, and 44, and available on the web at
www.openseti.org/Docs/HotsonPart1.pdf
 and
www.openseti.org/Docs/HotsonPart2.pdf

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------


Note: There is an internet forum dedicated to discussing the ongoing Serpo release. Please click here to visit.

The forum is not formally connected to this site, and this site's webmaster (Bill Ryan) is in no way responsible for its content. But he does support its intention, which is to provide a place where Serpo questions can be debated intelligently and in friendship.
___________________________________

  The following information was sent to Victor Martinez from someone claiming to represent a British Intelligence (MI6) source, and was published by him on 24 August. This did not come from the same source as did the previous release, #19. The original Anonymous – who provided releases #1-11 and also #19 – wrote the following short message to Victor after he had been consulted about it:

“What's new in this? Someone just took information from the other postings we did together and made this up. I don't see anything new. 
  
“I doubt this came from British Intelligence. I think someone just fabricated this.

“I should also mention to you that we have two members on your list who monitor it for relevant Serpo-related information which is then forwarded to me and my group.”

Victor Martinez has requested that if the information below is proved to be bogus it will be removed from this site.

 The information that Victor Martinez received:

   XXXXXX became involved in "Project CRYSTAL KNIGHT" in the summer of 1958. XXXXXX was assigned to Holloman AFB when he was briefed into a program that involved communication with an Extraterrestrial Race. XXXXXX had known about Roswell as part of an earlier briefing in 1952.

 Although XXXXXX never had any contact with Ebe-1, he did see photographs and a film showing the creature with its handler. This would be the same film shown to others who were briefed into the program.

 During the summer of 1958, XXXXXX was called to Sandia Base (Kirtland AFB) for a top secret meeting. There were command officials present. [General] Charles Cabell, USAF was in charge of a group that would eventually control "Project CRYSTAL KNIGHT."

 [MODERATOR's NOTE: General Charles Cabell was the brother of Earle Cabell, who was the mayor of Dallas at the time of the JFK Assassination; see further notes at END of POSTING #20.]

 Other members in the group were: Phil Howell, George Simler, Miles Doyle, Bob Hall, Curtis Frisbie, Harry Robb, Earl Butts, Richard Hamaski and Jack Thomas. All were members of USAF, and most were in AF Security Groups (AF Intelligence back then).

 A presentation was given on an extraordinary planned event involving contact with an Extraterrestrial Intelligence located on another planet. The project called for several levels.

 First, establishing a series of communication relay stations around the world that would receive signals from this ET civilization and relay it to a central location, Sandia Base. Sandia Base (Kirtland AFB) had recently (in the late 1950s) established "space dishes" (these are XXXXXX's words), that could gather signals from outer space.

 The group was also told that a "sophisticated" communication system was found on the alien space craft recovered near Roswell and this communication system was actively in contact with this ET civilization.

 The 2044th Communication Squadron (AF) was responsible for interrupting the communication system, along with personnel from U.S. Army Communications Service and a selected number of civilians from Los Alamos National Laboratory. The live alien, which [who] was captured near Roswell, provided the technical information to function [properly operate] the communication system.

 Three members of the 2044th were trained in the technical means to work the ET system. The system was complicated and required a special power system that was found inside the crashed alien spacecraft [The alien
 "Energy Device", "The Crystal Rectangle", or the PVEED-1]. Once the 2044th technicians learned the system, the communication was ready to function.

 However, the biggest problem was understanding the language of the aliens. The communication system worked on the alien language, which only one or two USAF officers, who worked with the alien, knew. But the complication was that the communication system worked on a written alien language, which the AF officers did not know. From 1952 until 1958, language specialists (both U.S. Army and Air Force) worked on translating the written language.

 However, without some sort of [linguistic] base, that was very difficult. The live alien provided the alien alphabet, but the alien did not have [possess] enough [sufficient] English language skills to translate the alphabet from his language to English. He did manage to crudely provide some basic comparison between the two languages,  but
 not enough to allow us to fully understand their language.

 Apparently, the communication system was functioning because the 2044th were receiving signals on the communication system. However, no one could translate them. The signals came through on a screen, similar to a
 very small television monitor, but they came through in the alien language.

 All we could do was copy the symbols of the alien language and hope to translate it some day. XXXXXX thought that someone, probably back during the time when the alien was living, had done some type of testing on the communication system because two people knew something about it and how it functioned. They also knew some key symbols from the alien language.

 Finally, after some effort by several smart people, we were able to translate the language, but only about 70% of each message. That gave us enough information to understand what the aliens were sending. The aliens wanted to return to Earth and pick up their comrades [alive and deceased]. Our mission was to plan the event and provide all of the necessary logistics to pull this off.

 Somewhere along the way, one of the AF communications specialists decided to send an English message to the aliens. Now this would be difficult since the alien communication system did not have English letters. But our AF ingenuity came into play.

 Utilizing a newly created classified military communication system (TAC-STAR), we were able to somehow (never understood how) wire in the keyboard of a TAC-STAR. This would enable us to type English letters into the alien communication system. It took some time and effort but it worked.

 We sent messages in English, along with our alphabet and numbering system. Our numbering system was similar to that of the aliens, and although our number [numerical] designations were different, we were able to use lines to indicate the corresponding number.

  After several exchanges of messages, the aliens got it before we got theirs. It was obvious to us that we were dealing with a highly advanced civilization. From about June 1960 on, we began receiving messages in English from the aliens. They did not send complete sentences, but they sent enough for us to understand the meaning of the message.

 From that point on, we communicated only in English except for numbers. We grasped their numbering system pretty quickly and used their numbering system since we did not wish to provide them with wrong [incorrect] landing coordinates. We eventually provided them with the latitude and longitude [coordinates]. We also provided them with the military coordinate system used by our pilots back in the early days.

 Sometime in 1962, we figured out how to send photographs in message form. Don't ask me how they did this. XXXXXX wasn't technical enough to know this. But we sent them black and white photographs of Earth and landing locations. This was another difficult decision to make. Where do they [want to] land? We had to have a remote location which would not give way to any adverse public knowledge.

 There were literately hundreds of locations selected and analyzed. Most of the locations first selected were remote islands. But there were logistical problems with those locations. We would have to sail ships to these remote locations and that just might give us away. We had to chose a location that would not be suspicious, but still remote.

  The group decided on a location west of Holloman AFB near Alamogordo, NM. They actually decided on two locations. One was a fake location on Holloman, and the actual landing location was at White Sands. Sometime in late 1962, we all met again, this time at a very secure underground facility at Los Alamos.

 We got the real startling news: Our government planned to exchange a U.S.  Military Team with the aliens. XXXXXX doesn't remember all of the details, but he remembers that a lot of key officials in the meeting thought that was a wrong [bad] idea.

 The reasoning behind the skepticism was this: We knew virtually nothing of this alien race, except what one surviving alien told us [Ebe-1]. How could we trust sending a team of people to another planet? We knew very little about the planet except it was about 40 [38.42] light years away. How long would the trip last and how could our team prepare for such a trip? These were questions all members asked.

 But the powers that be, mainly General Cabell, said all of that had been worked out. How? Maybe we established better communications with the aliens. It's doubtful that most of the members knew it all. A lot was compartmented and not everyone knew everything. XXXXXX surmised that maybe the aliens landed prior to the scheduled 1964 date and possibly exchanged information. But he never had any official knowledge of this.

 The next big problem was selecting a team. Bob Hall, the commander of a space flight training squadron, was in charge of this. We also had CIA people and some people from the newly created DIA [Defense Intelligence Agency; see footnotes] on board. It took months of deciding on just how to do that.

 Finally, a plan was in place to 'sheep-dip' all the Team Members. The advertisement which was sent out asked anyone interested in volunteering for a space program apply. It was a semi-classified announcement.

 The disguise was that the USAF was selecting a special team to travel to the moon and these people must undergo special training and a special selection process. None of the military people trying out for this team knew the real mission.

 About 500 people applied and that narrowed down to about 160. But there was a problem. Some specialists required on this mission were missing. Besides, the requirement called for each Team Member to be single, never married, no children and if possible, orphans. The USAF had to go out and recruit two doctors and several other specialists.

 Finally, after several months of the selection process, 16 team members were selected, 12 who would go and four (4) alternates. Once the team was selected, they underwent about six (6) months of extensive training at various locations around the world. Their identities were removed from all agencies, including the IRS, Social Security Administration, military and hometown records.

 They became 'no-named' people. Each was given a three digit number. They utilized this number from the first day of training until after the mission was completed 13 years later. Another very curious thing each Team Member had to do was that they signed an agreement (remember, they didn't know the mission at this point) that if any dropped out of the mission for whatever reason, they would agree to be confined until the entire mission was complete.

 This meant that any Team Member, including the four alternates, would have to be confined for the duration of the mission. At this point, the exact length of the mission was unknown. Most of the training was done at Camp Perry, Virginia. The exact mission of the team was not disclosed until during the final phase of the training.

  Each selectee went through the most difficult and demanding training in the world. Most of it was similar to astronaut training. A lot of physiological stress training, high-altitude training, and also parachute training at Ft. Bragg. Each member went through weapons and combat training and the possibility of capture by going through survival, evasion and escape training.

 Since we had a captured alien space craft, every single Team Member was trained on how it functioned and how to fly it just in case they had to escape in one. [Team Member and pilot #225 would have flown any escape from SERPO; #308 died of a pulmonary embolism].

 They also learned the basic alien language, alphabet and phrases. This was difficult since the alien spoke a tonal dialect, basically like singing in a high pitch voice. Most had extreme difficulty learning this, but the two linguists on the team learned it quickly [Team Members #420 and #475].
 
  During the training one member decided he could not go on such a dangerous mission. After learning that he would be confined at Leavenworth until the duration of the mission, the man decided to go on the mission.

 The landing date was set for April 24, 1964. The entire group assembled at White Sands under a cover. We posed as  inspectors for a no-notice inspection of Holloman. There was a mistake by the first alien craft entering the area. It apparently got the landing coordinates wrong and landed near Socorro (the Lonnie Zamora incident). The second craft
 landed at the correct location. There were members of the Johnson Administration along with the special group.

  The aliens exchanged some gifts and we were able to communicate with them through a translator wand given to us by the aliens. The meeting lasted about four (4) hours. It was decided that the exchange would not occur until the following year. Our Team Members were present and ready to go,  but the aliens decided to wait until the next year.

 The date was set for July 1965. XXXXXX was present during this meeting, but was in the background. Everything said and done during this meeting was recorded on audio tape and film.

 The delay presented a problem for our Team Members. What do we do with them for the next 15 months? The Team Members went back into training for about 12 months. The last few months were spent locked up at the U.S. Military Prison [Penitentiary], Ft. Leavenworth.

 We had to decide on another location for the exchange. During the April 1964 meeting, we did not supply a pick up location. We informed our alien visitors that a location would be selected and they would be informed through the communication system.

 We finally decided on a remote location at the Nevada Test Site. Since we had hundreds of people employed at that location, we could move almost anything into that area without anyone becoming suspicious. We had a good counterintelligence program in place that would mask the landing and provide plausible stories about the build up at NTS.
 
  To cover [mask] any possible strange sightings in the area, we increased the number of U-2 and SR-71 flights in the [immediate] area. We even increased our low-level flights, just to give the people (the few who did live in the area) enough to see that once the alien craft arrived, they would not think any different.

 On July 16, 1965, the aliens landed at exactly the precise location at NTS. It was a low level meeting. Only a few members of the Johnson Administration were  present. The group was present and the exchange took place without any problems. We had equipment in place for the team, approximately 40 tons [90,500 lbs].

 The aliens had no problem carrying all of this on the two (2) crafts that landed. It was later learned that the two crafts that landed were only shuttle crafts. The larger craft was located somewhere between our moon and Mars. Our team later told us (during the debriefing in '78) that THE ALIEN CRAFT WAS ENORMOUS.

 We maintained contact with our Team Members by use of the alien communication system during the space trip, which lasted about 10 months. Once they landed, we continued contact, but only on a irregular time schedule.

 The Team Members returned in August 1978 at the exact location. Eight (8) members returned. Two (2) died on the planet and their bodies were returned. Two (2) others decided to remain on the alien planet. The eight members were isolated for one (1) complete year at a special facility located at Los Alamos.
 
  After the one year of isolation and debriefing, they were given new identities, a large bonus and the offer to return to military service or retire. Six decided to retire and two remained on active duty. ALL EIGHT ARE NOW DEAD.

 XXXXXX does not believe all of the information supplied by your [original] ANONYMOUS. Anonymous has several discrepancies in the training, selection process, communication sequence and the females on the team. XXXXXX does NOT remember any females going on the mission, although all members were given three-digit numbers during training, MOST OF WHAT ANONYMOUS STATED WAS FACTUAL, but there are SOME discrepancies.

 XXXXXX does not wish any special attention to this matter. He is a private person and has never gone public with this or any other information regarding UFOs or the U.S. Government's involvement with the investigation of UFOs.

– ANONYMOUS II/MI6

 [General CHARLES CABELL was fired by President Kennedy along with CIA Director Allen Dulles and Richard Bissell for their involvement in the Bay of Pigs fiasco. Cabell, whose brother Earle Cabell was the mayor of Dallas at the time of the JFK Assassination, was head of clandestine operations [CIA] for the Bay of Pigs while Bissell headed up the overall
 operation.

 General Cabell, as Deputy Director of the   CIA, was fired by Kennedy on 1-31-62 while Dulles and Bissell were told that they would be fired in May 1961. Kennedy fired Cabell because he assumed (incorrectly) that Cabell had leaked classified information from a White House meeting to the press.]   

 

THE BINARY STAR  

Or Binary Star System  

A Binary Star or star system is a pair of stars that are held together by their mutual gravitational attraction and revolve about their common center of mass. In 1650 Riccioli made the first binary system discovery, that of the middle star in the Big Dipper's handle, Zeta Urase Majoris. True binary stars are distinct from optical doubles—pairs of stars that lie nearly along the same line of sight from the earth but are not physically associated.   

Binary stars are grouped into three classes. A visual binary is a pair of stars that can be seen by direct telescopic observation to be a distinct pair with shared motion. A spectroscopic binary cannot be seen as two separate stars, even with the most powerful telescopes, but spectral lines from the pair show a periodic Doppler effect that indicates mutual revolution. Some lines indicate motion toward the earth while others indicate motion away; later, as the stars revolve around in their orbit, this pattern reverses. An eclipsing binary has the plane of its orbit lying near the line of sight, and shows a periodic fluctuation in brightness as one star passes in front of the other.

The more massive star (A) of a binary is called the primary, and the less massive (B) is called the secondary; e.g., Sirius A and Sirius B are the primary and secondary components of the Sirius system. It seems likely that more than two-thirds of the stars in our galaxy are binary or multiple (a system of more than two stars moving around their mutual center of mass), since many stars within 30 light-years of the sun are binary or multiple. The masses of the components of a spectroscopic binary can be determined from the observed motions and Newton's law of gravitation; binary stars are the only stars outside the solar system for which masses have been directly determined. Binary stars are thus important indicators from which the masses of all similar stars can be deduced. Measurements of the masses of some of the visual binary stars have been used to verify the mass-luminosity relation. Although most binary stars have distance between them, the components of W Ursae Majoris binaries are actually in contact with each other, their mutual gravity distorting their shapes into teardrops. There are binary systems in which one member is a pulsar: PSR 1913+16, for example, has an orbital period of 7 hr 45 min; in this case the other star is also a neutron star. The orbit period decreases as the system loses energy in the form of gravitational waves; used as a clock to measure the effect of the curvature of space-time on the binary's orbit, such a system confirms Einstein's theory of general relativity.

Sirius B has 5 planets orbiting it and three of them have life on it.

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

August 31, 2006
 [BR: The following is a composite of information that is important enough to justify a release in itself.]

 Linda Moulton Howe has clarified what she was told about the exchange program:  


I learned back in the 1983-1984 time period about an alleged exchange program of humans leaving Holloman AFB on April 25, 1964, for Zeta Reticuli with non-humans while I was working on a Home Box Office television special entitled, "UFOs: The E. T. Factor." I was told three human men went: one died on the alien planet; one went insane (don't know fate); and one returned to Earth and was given a safe house in which to live the rest of his life on an island provided for by the U. S. government.



She then wrote again to clarify who her source was:



My main source was Robert Emenegger, the writer of UFOs: Past, Present and Future , which was broadcast in the U. S. on television in the late 1970s.

I referred this to John Lear, who had told Kerry Cassidy and myself exactly the same information (“three went, one died, one went crazy, and one returned safely”) when we met with him in person a couple of weeks ago. Lear clarified:   


It was from a completely different source who does not know Linda or Robert. 
 He lived in Houston and had access to NASA but did not work for NASA.

I then referred this to a number of researchers. One discovered the following at  http://www.virtuallystrange.net/ufo/updates/1998/nov/m18-010.shtml :   


From: Errol Bruce-Knapp, Moderator, UFO UpDates - Toronto
 Date: Wed, 18 Nov 1998

 [extract]
 Speaking of which - Holloman came up again in my life this past weekend.

 During a phone conversation with James M. McCampbell, author of ‘Ufology: New Insights from Science and Common Sense' (Belmont, Ca.: Jaymac Company, 1973) this past Saturday, November 14, Jim dropped a new-one on me re. The Holloman 'Landing'. He almost casually mentioned that three military "Bird-Colonels" – MDs – "left with the visitors"! On their return, one Colonel went insane, one died, and Jim didn't know what happened to the other.

This is all potentially very important. Was the Serpo story essentially correct, but that only three humans went? There are now suddenly two or maybe even three separate sources stating exactly the same story – that three went on the “Serpo” mission (not 12), and that the outcome had not been favorable.

 Entirely separately, 24 hours ago I received two messages from a claimed intelligence source who told me that several important details were just plain wrong, and suggested that either I’d got lucky and guessed uncannily accurately (in the event that I’d made it up), or that I’d been deliberately disinformed.

 He said no more, telling me that I was heavily monitored. This person appears only to have just now come across the Serpo story on the web. It’s significant that he was astonished that so much of this “invented” story was accurate compared with what he knew.

 I forwarded all the above information to a number of people on my private circulation list and invited them to pass the information freely on to whomever they wished, and wondered what would happen next today.

 Several hours later, I received this message, from an anonymous source in US intelligence.   


Every single bit of information from the postings regarding the crew logs is absolutely correct. I’ve verified that the logs are real and were transcribed from official tape recordings made by the crew. There are 5,419 cassette tapes that contain voice recordings. I've heard one of them, but saw all of them in a secure environment.
  
 I know these logs are genuine. I was given the opportunity to see them, and listen to one in its entirety, which was made by the Team Commander himself. How could someone fake 5,419 x 90 minute tapes? Do the math: it would have taken someone 338 days to fabricate the tapes.

 That type of government cassette tape is no longer sold today, but they were military issue then. There were no cassette tapes available to the public until 1968. The crew took 60 boxes each containing 100 x 90 minute cassette tapes, which is 6,000 tapes.

 These tapes were recorded during the mission to Serpo, over the course of their years away from Earth. Each crew member had a recording device and recorded their observations. Once they returned, the tapes were transcribed over a period of seven years.
  
 Look at the critics trying to destroy this fantastic true story. If I were the keeper of this information, I wouldn't release it to anyone... except the general public, through the news media. There are some true disbelievers in the UFO community who wouldn't believe the story if God himself told it.

The game may have changed now. Let’s forget the details of the story: how many went, what the dates were, even the alien culture. Only one question is really important. Was there an exchange program?

 I suggest that the answer is that there was. The circumstantial evidence mounts. To resolve the apparent discrepancies in details, there may even have been two different exchange programs... or more. (Why not?) If the Serpo story is indeed disinformation (and remember: disinformation could be 80% false and 20% true – or 80% true and 20% false) ...it surrounds and protects the details of an incredible true event.

 And if it is disinformation, another important question is what other untold truth the disinformation may be designed to conceal.
 Bill Ryan, 30 August 2006  

 ___________________________________

 
 

6-27-2001 -  

RECORD OF CONVERSATION WITH SOMEONE IN THE KNOW - NAME WITHHELD FOR SECURITY REASONS  

PILOT: I was a navigator in the Aurora program for 12 years. During that time, I was on another planet for 3 years.  

I've been lecturing for about 3 weeks now. I wrote to Dr. Greer and haven't heard back from him yet.  I'm 55 years old now and decided to talk because I don't have much longer to live because of health reasons.  The ETs have been here a long time through out history. Early in the 40's, the ETs genetically enhanced 216 children. I am child #9.  I worked on a lot of government programs since then, including helping to develop the trip to the moon. I worked on Aurora 3. It can fly at almost the speed of light. I volunteered to do that. Unfortunately, the shielding on the plane from the plasma had a leak and it did a lot of damage to my body.  The damage was to all my organs including my skin. My skin actually falls off like powder. The body's molecular structure gets rearranged in a subtle way when you are in space.  I was picked up by a mother ship. It took 3 years to get to the planet, spent 3 years there and it took 3 years to get back.  ET's can't live in gravity anymore. They can only work in outer space, except for quick jaunts on earth.  

Abductions are done in family lines for the most part because the are collecting the DNA the originally implanted in human beings a long time ago.  

The moon we see in the sky is not a real body... it's artificial. 70 feet down is metal.  On the dark side of the moon is mining operations and bases. They have a base where they fly from the moon to other star systems 250 light years away.  

Most ET species are over 10,000 years advanced ahead of us. Some species are even 100,000 or 1,000,000 years ahead of us. They are working to try to get us to have a one-world governmental system. This is starting to happen in Europe now.  Communications is the biggest problem. There are too many people with a negative nature.  

Other advanced planets have had these types of being eliminated. The ETs want only positive oriented beings. They have helped mankind over the century with technology.  Unfortunately, other cultures in our history haven't capitalized on it, some only a little.  They have given various cultures different things, trying to spread the technology out. They gave rockets to the Chinese first but the Chinese didn't do anything with it but make fireworks and small rockets. The U.S. has made the best progress technologically.  We went from the Wright brothers to flying to the moon in only 50 years. That's pretty outstanding. However, they don't want to make the greatest benefits for the greatest amounts of people.  

The technology has to be trickled out or there won't be any work for people. Dymler-Chrysler is coming out with the new engine which is technology from them.  

We need more spiritual development because we are too violent. Off worlders believe in the Trinity and God, but there are too many religions here that disagree with each other.  

The Planet is near Sirius. The planet is about 1/3 the size of earth. There is a lot of water there, but they don't have rain like we do, it's more like mist.  The sky is light purple because their sun is not like our sun. Their sun is white and it creates a different light refraction the our sun does. Their sun is a lot smaller than ours too.  

There are some air breathers there and some methane breathers, which is like going into an aquarium.    

The planet is actually going around Sirius B.  There are 82 races of people on that planet and many other sub-species.  It belongs to the United Federation of Planets.  Humans are pretty crude in comparison to them.  

NOTE:  See this page:  http://www.greatdreams.com/dogstar.htm  

One of the greys who comes here are not very nice, and the beings they work for don't look the same as them.  Those greys are more like worker bees.  There is a Reptilian group like them too, not very nice.  

The ETs use thought adjustments on humans during the night.  People should watch the movies, " The Day the Earth stood still" also "Independence Day'   There are still two hostile groups we are still dealing with.  

The Triangle Platform craft actually has other crafts inside of it.  The craft over Phoenix was a TR-4.  There is also a TR-5 which carries the TR-3 and TR-5 inside of it.  The TR-5 is a carrier craft.  They are building 219 of these craft right now.  

Also See: SCOT UFO INVESTIGATION

There is also a TR-5 which carries the TR-3 and TR-5 inside of it. The TR-5 is a carrier craft. They are building 219 of these craft right now. ...
www.greatdreams.com/ufos/scot_ufo_investigation.htm 

They are doing a massive cleanup of Area 51 because the Aurora flights did so much pollution there.  They are now increasing the size of Area 51  There are also 5 other places where they do some of the work also.  The more advanced stuff is in other places. Most of the work being done at area 51 now is cleanup from the TR-2 pollution.

 The government doesn't want the public to know all the dangerous stuff they did there that polluted the area. They are trapping the small animals so they don't get out of the area.  But you didn't hear that from me.  (smile)

The US and Great Britain is looked upon as the most positive races of humans  

The ACIO controls everything  

NOTE: ACIO is a secret or unacknowledged department of the NSA. It is headquartered in Virginia, but also have personnel in Belgium, India, and Indonesia.  They are largely unknown, even to senior directors within the NSA. The ACIO is the lowest profile organization within the entire intelligence community. Its agenda is to research, assimilate, and replicate any technologies or discoveries of extraterrestrial origin.

 
 
COMMENTS  
Thanks Caryn,

 Jack is confused, first he gets my email address wrong then confuses what I'm saying with what Victor says or even Rick Doty et al who both think the laws of Physics are different depending where you're at in the Cosmos. Richard Hoagland is no help since he contributes to those ideas. As for Zeta Reticuli it's 39.4 to 39.5 light years away. The one tenth is the binary's separation in light years which makes it a wide binary by 367 billion miles. The binary information coming from Anon only makes sense if it's not Zeta Reticuli. Of course with 116 people complaining I must be wrong right? With all those government contacts saying it's "ALL REAL" I must be dead wrong right?  The Science on Zeta 1 & 2 must be dead wrong because those GOV HUMINT sources have it right since they know their Science right? Another label is being closed minded.

 As for the biology, you can have extreme diversity just like on Earth. DNA can have billions of different possible combinations creating some very exotic creatures. Biological Laws are not different. It's just that DNA can create diversity without new or different laws. Same goes for Physical Laws. You can have a wide diversity without new laws

 Best

 Robert C

 caryn anscomb wrote:  


Not sure you got this? I think Jack used your old e-mail addy.  


 Jack Sarfatti mailto:sarfatti@pacbell.net wrote:  
Ron Stahl says Martinez is simply mainly copying Robert Collins's book Exempt from Disclosure in the Serpo story. Martinez is an idiot and so is Collins. Therefore, the physics anomalies are because they are incompetent not because of any real anomalies. This certainly seems to be a plausible hypothesis. Allegedly some other idiot in DIA is an accomplice. You can guess who I guess that is? :-)  
   

On Dec 8, 2005, at 8:46 PM, Jack Sarfatti wrote:  
   


<chaosandorder.jpg>  
 
   

One cannot violate battle-tested laws of physics. Any story that does will be rejected by the physics community as complete fraud or idiocy. The physicists CONTROL the Military-Industrial-Intelligence Complex of The Western Wor! ld and even China. No politician will go against them. I mean no politician in his right mind of course. You see what is happening in the Intelligent Design Debate for example. That's another story - too complex for now. BOTH SIDES are wrong and both sides are right. The UNKNOWN is the NEW PHYSICS of Warp & Wormhole and Time Travel from the discovery of Dark Energy in only the past few years. That's The Joker, the Wild Card in The Cosmic Poker Game.  
   

On Dec 8, 2005, at 8:22 PM, Jack Sarfatti wrote:  


   

On Dec 8, 2005, at 7:32 PM, Bill Ryan on George Noory's C2C the other night wrote:  

   

Hi, Jack –
I enjoyed our coffee this morning, and wide-ranging discussion!

 Zeta R is 38.43 light years away, as I understand.

 Best, Bill  
OK that means for a 9-month trip (ship time)
 
Gamma = 1/(1 - (v/c)^2)^1/2 ~ (38.43)/(3/4) ~ 51  time dilation factor
 

Basically they are going very close to speed of light relative to Earth and from their POV ~ 40 light years Lorentz contracts by a factor ~ 50 so their actual distance in their proper frame is only ~ 9 light months going and what they said 13 months back (I will not adjust the numbers - exact figures don't matter - only qualitative idea of a BIG TIME DILATION FACTOR.  

   

For round trip, if they did not use geod! esic warp drive without any time dilation as in Alcubierre's toy model, if they used conventional non-geodesic propulsion - with enormous energy needed, then if say they took say about 2 years of their time to make the trip backwards and forwards Earth to Serpo, then ~ 100 years of Earth time would pass before they got back. If they left in 1965 they could not get back here until ~ 2065! (actually later than that but exact numbers don't matter). No cheap way out of this like Richard Hoagland suggested. No physicist will buy that one.
 

Therefore, the SERPO disinformation is inconsistent with GLOBAL SPECIAL RELATIVITY though not with General Relativity necessarily - though they do not give enough information.  

   
"A nice dilemma we have here.  
 That calls for all our wit"  Trial by Jury ?
 

"Quiet calm deliberation disentangles every knot" Gondoliers
 

"A paradox, a paradox, a most unusual paradox"  Pirates of Penzance  

   

What is happening is not only weirder than we imagine, it is weirder than most humans CAN imagine.  

   

B & K listen to  

   

http://qedcorp.com/book/psi/hitweapon.html  

look at  

http://stardrive.org/cartoon/spectra.html  

http://stardrive.org/cartoon/MagicBean.html  

http://stardrive.org/cartoon/dan.html  

 
 

RELEASE 24 - 20 June 2007: Area 51 Scientist tell-ALL of ALIENcraft!

Attention: SCIENTISTS, PHYSICISTS and OTHER ASSORTED 'BACKYARD' SCIENTIFIC TYPES: LEARN FROM AN ACTUAL INSIDER THE SECRETS OF THE ALIEN PROPULSION SYSTEM AND WHY WE CAN'T 'CRACK' AND DUPLICATE IT! / LEARN WHAT MAKES THE ET CRAFT GO FROM POINT "A" to "B" WITH LITTLE FUEL ON HAND, BUT "WHICH CREATES ENORMOUS AMOUNTS OF ENERGY!" / UNDERSTAND WHY "2 + 2 = 5" IN THE REST OF THE COSMOS EXCEPT HERE ON PRIMITIVE PLANET EARTH! / LEARN THE PROPER PLACE FOR OUR QUANTUM PHYSICS and MECHANICS ... IN THE LATRINE! / THIS IS A "KEEPER!" 

 MODERATOR's NOTES and EXPLANATION: What follows is an exclusive interview between an Area 51 scientist and Linda Moulton-Howe conducted in April of 1995.  

 To the best of ANONYMOUS and the DIA-6's knowledge, THE CONTENTS OF THIS EXPLOSIVE INTERVIEW HAVE NEVER BEEN MADE PUBLIC perhaps due to the agreement Moulton-Howe entered into with the USG at the time of the interview. 

 In a telephone call I placed to the residence of Moulton-Howe on Sunday morning, 6-17-07, I have confirmed with her that the following interview never appeared on her Web site:  http://www.earthfiles.com/  

 Regardless, ANONYMOUS has now directed me to release an abstract of the 5-page interview which is reproduced below.  

 As always, my OWN comments/notes are offset by the use of [ ] brackets.  

 - BEGIN - 
 ------------------------------------------ 
 This is raw intelligence material and dissemination to unauthorized personnel is prohibited.  

 This attachment was not given a security classification.  

 Interview with Dr Craig McPherson, scientist and former employee of Area 
 51. 

 Dr McPherson worked at Area 51 from May 1956 until September 1988. This interview was made by Linda Howe during a meeting at the Las Vegas Hilton on April 8, 1995. Under a written agreement between Linda Howe and Dr McPherson, the contents of the interview could NOT be made public. A U.S. government source recorded the interview. What follows is a summary of the information given by Dr McPherson.   

 NOTE: A background check of Dr Craig H McPherson was conducted. Dr McPherson obtained a security clearance based on an "Expanded Background Investigation" in August of 1956. The clearance was upgraded at various intervals until his retirement. Dr McPherson was a Federal Civil Service employee from May 23, 1956 until October 1, 1988.   

 Dr McPherson retired at the Federal Civil Service grade of GS-16. Dr McPherson was born on April 8, 1920 in Scranton, PA. Dr McPherson served in the U.S. Army Infantry in Europe from June 1944 until October 1946. Dr McPherson obtained the military rank of Sergeant at the time of his discharge. Dr McPherson attended Penn State University, the University of Pennsylvania and MIT.  

 Interview of Dr Craig McPherson by Linda Howe on April 8, 1995. 
 Location: Las Vegas, NV. Time frame: 1224 hrs - 1713 hrs. 

 [Dr Craig McPherson begins speaking.]  

 I served in the U.S. Army from 1944 to 1946. After discharge, I attended college and eventually obtained a PhD in physics. I worked for private industry from 1955 to 1956. In May 1956, I was hired by the U.S. Air Force as an Applied Physics Specialist.  

 My first assignment was at the Nellis AFB, NV, test facility. I worked at Indian Springs AFB, NV, for the first seven months. My work pertained to the examination of Foreign Technology. The foreign technology consisted of Soviet and Chinese equipment. Most of the equipment was obtained from a friendly government. The equipment consisted of tanks,  electronics equipment, weapon systems and other related items. 

 During this time frame, the Air Force built an underground facility at Groom Lake. The construction started in 1955 and ended sometime during the summer of 1959. I worked in the Foreign Technology Applications Studies Division (FTASD). We had three (3) different facilities, two of them at Groom Lake and one at Indian Springs. We later obtained a facility at Tonopah. 

 Once the underground facility was ready, we moved in. This was sometime in early 1960. The facility was one of the biggest underground facilities ever built. We must have had over a billion square feet of space. In later years, the underground facility, code named "Deep Space," was expanded to include three (3) different levels.  

 I was involved in the research and development of the SR-71. We had several different aircraft on the drawing board. The FTASD had more than 65 scientists, technicians and military personnel assigned. Most of our work was very unique. We would obtain some information from the Foreign Technology Acquisition Group (FTAG). 

 This group obtained information from foreign governments or from intelligence agencies. Along with the studies of the foreign equipment that we had available at the facility, we could apply advanced scientific principles to further our own technology. We made terrific advancements during this time frame.   

 During this time period, I NEVER saw a UFO or anything resembling a UFO at the Groom Lake Test Facility. I did NOT see any ETs nor did I ever hear anyone mention that our government was reverse engineering an ET device.  

 In the summer of 1969, I was transferred from the FTASD to the Advance Studies Group (ASG). The ASG was a very secret group located in the second level of Area 51, Complex III. When I first entered the facility, I had to obtain an additional security clearance. During my in-briefing of the ASG, I was informed that our group was working on advanced research principles involving NONconventional flying devices. 

 I saw my first nonconventional device within a few days of being assigned to the ASG. The flying device was code named "Atlas-Tank" (AT). It was A FLYING SAUCER. I worked on specific physics problems associated with this unique design. We had manufactured the AT over a period of eight (8) years.  

 I was brought into the program during the latter part of the ground testing. We solved most of the unique problems, but we still could not get the AT to fly. Several different propulsion systems were used, but none of them worked. Sometime in 1973, I was given another security clearance. I was moved to another facility within Complex III. This was a new facility. I was assigned to the ASG-Alpha. 

 Once in the facility, I was given access to another "flying saucer." This appeared to be the same shape as the AT. However, it was code named "Blue Chariot." Although I did not have access to the interior of the BC, I did observe the outer area of the flying craft. At no time was I told that either of these flying machines were ET related. I worked in the Alpha branch for several months before moving back to ASG. 

 In 1973, a terrible accident occurred at the Complex III facility. The propulsion system on the BC was activated and an explosion occurred killing six (6) technicians. Actually, it was NOT an explosion. A bolt or plasma ball came out of the propulsion system and struck the technicians, VAPORIZING THEM. The BC was then taken to another facility, which was located in a very remote area of Area 51. This area was adjacent to the old above ground nuclear testing land. 

 Scientists learned how the propulsion system worked. They could activate the system, which would generate an enormous amount of energy. The energy could be formed into "balls of plasma" or a steady stream of energy. The system could generate energy equivalent to a nuclear explosion from a range of 0.1 kT up to 350 kT. 

 The strange thing about this energy system was the lack of radiation.  The system could generate this enormous amount of power, but it would NOT leave any residual radiation. This puzzled scientists. When I retired in 1988, NO ONE could understand the system. They could activate it, but could NOT understand how it worked.   

 At no time was I ever told that the new propulsion system was given to us by ETs. Nor was I ever told that ETs provided us with any technology. We assumed the new propulsion system was developed by the Soviets. Although no one told us that the new propulsion system and the BC were ET related, we figured they that were.   

 We had our own private discussions about the technology. I could give you the technical details of the propulsion system, but that is still HIGHLY CLASSIFIED. I can say the system operates on some unknown principles. We tried, quite unsuccessfully, to apply our knowledge of physics, quantum theory and other principles to this new system. 

 In OUR science, there are two (2) basic types of bonds by which atoms form molecules - ionic and covalent bonds. An atom is normally electrically neutral. It has the same number of positively charged protons in its nucleus as it has negatively charged electrons in captive orbits. 

 In THIS system things are different. There is an UNKNOWN METHOD by which the atoms are changed. Instead of ionic or covalent bonds, this new system creates a THIRD TYPE of bonding principle. This new type of bonding causes atoms to take on a different form. Atoms go from a normal state -- and when I say "normal," I mean normal in OUR science -- to a "multiplexed" form. In other words, the atoms are doubled or "piggy-backed" onto each other.   

 The atoms are somewhat mutated, but maintain their original shape. I KNOW THIS IS VERY DIFFICULT TO UNDERSTAND. That is why we still DON'T understand it. I'll give you a simple example.  

 If you can recall basic chemistry, you will remember that a hydrogen atom consists of a single proton -- the nucleus -- with one electron in a captive state. When two hydrogen atoms approach each other, their combined energy becomes lower if they SHARE their electrons. Well, in this new system, a hydrogen atom, subjected to this new system (inside this propulsion system) changes to a NEW principle.  

 First, when two hydrogen atoms approach each other, their combined energy level becomes MULTIPLIED through this strange bonding principle. So, instead of having a lower energy level, the energy is MULTIPLIED by the number of atoms of hydrogen that is bonded. If we used the QUANTUM IDEA to understand this, we would conclude that quantum principles do NOT work in this new system.   

 Normally, in our system, positively-charged ions attract and bond to negatively-charged ions to form molecules. This is NOT the case in this new system. It makes NO difference whether the ions are positive or negative as they bond together regardless of valence. We do know that inside this propulsion system, something causes these strange unnatural phenomena to occur.   

 Two plates of metal sit inside a chamber. This chamber is a vacuum. The chamber is a PERFECT VACUUM, that is, there is no outside air or other gases inside this chamber. A tube running from one chamber into another, pushes a gas inside. A third chamber forces still another gas to enter the first chamber. We know that the gases push against these two plates of metal and cause an ENORMOUS AMOUNT OF ENERGY TO BE CREATED.  

 Lastly, just before the gases are "mixed," there is a form of light that is focused against the outgoing energy. This light is of a lower frequency. Normally, in our quantum theory, a small frequency means a lower energy. However, is this system, the lower frequency of light was measured to contain an enormous amount of energy exerted upon this outgoing energy. When I left in 1988, we could NOT understand how the gases were mixed nor could we determine HOW the light was generated.  

 You ask about the metals inside this vacuum container. Quite intriguing. First, the metal strips are located inside Container #1. They are setting perpendicular to each other at exactly 6.54 cm apart. Each metal strip measures 18.45 cm x 9.43 cm. Each metal strip is 3.46 cm wide. The sides of the strips facing each other contain a shiny metal coating. The opposite sides contain a dull coating. 

 Looking at the metal strips from above, one will notice that another substance is sandwiched between the outer two substances. The materials in each of the metal strips have never been identified. We do know the density of the metal strips and the hardness as measured by the Mohs scale. 

 The density of the metal strips are 94.5 [9.45?] on the shiny side and 34.2 [3.42?] on the opposite side. I believe the density or specific gravity was measured by the conventional method, in that the value is grams per centimeter cubed. NOT being a metallurgist, I cannot make comments on these values. But what IS interesting is that these two strips of metals are located inside a somewhat round vacuum container. The outer coating of this container is also shiny. 

 You mention the gases. I am not a chemist. I knew very little about the gases contained in Containers #2 and #3. These gases are two distinct types. One is a gas-liquid type and the other is a solid gas. Don't ask me to explain these two; I don't believe that our chemical engineers could do that. I just know that once the device is activated, the two gases mix and create energy by some method. 

 I DON'T want my name connected to a story about ETs. 

 - END - 

 More to come.... 

 - ANONYMOUS   
 ------------------------------------------ 
 MODERATOR's FOOTNOTES:  

 COVALENT BOND: A chemical bond formed when electrons are shared between two atoms. Usually, each atom contributes one electron to form a pair of electrons that are shared by both atoms.  

 IONIC BOND: A chemical bond formed between two ions with opposite charges. Ionic bonds form when one atom gives up one or more electrons to another atom. These bonds can form between a pair of atoms or between molecules and are the type of bond found in salts. 

 IONIC PROPULSION: Propulsion by the reactive thrust of a high-speed beam of similarly charged ions ejected by an ion engine.   

 KILOTON: The explosive force of 1,000 tons of TNT; a unit for measuring the power of thermonuclear weapons.  

 MOHS SCALE: Hardness is one of the chief ways used to recognize a mineral. It is a scale used to measure the relative hardness of a mineral by its resistance to scratching. In 1822, Friedrich Mohs [German-Austrian: 1773-1839] created a hardness scale based on assigning numbers to common minerals. The concept is that a harder mineral (one with a higher number) can scratch a softer one. 

 Other materials may be correlated to this scale. For example, steel used in a pocketknife is about 5.5 and glass is about 6, so glass can scratch steel, but a common pocketknife will NOT scratch glass.   

 From softest to hardest, the 10 minerals of the Mohs scale are: 

 talc = measuring 1 on the hardness scale   
 gypsum = 2     
 calcite = 3   
 fluorite = 4  
 apatite = 5  
 orthoclase feldspar = 6  
 quartz = 7  
 topaz =  8   
 corundum = 9 (including ruby and sapphire) 
 diamond = 10 / A mineral form of carbon that is extremely hard and transparent. It usually occurs as crystals shaped as octahedrons. Diamonds come from unusual structures similar to volcanoes called pipes; the diamonds are embedded in a mineral called kimberlite. Diamonds form at great depths under high pressure and temperature, then are carried to the surface in a kimberlite pipe. Because diamonds are hard and resist wear, they also survive passage from original locations into gravel 
 deposits in rivers and on beaches.     

 Reference:   

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mohs_hardness_scale 

 METALS/MINERALS ADDENDUM:   

 The Mohs scale is a RELATIVE hardness scale (minerals relative to each other.)  There are several more hardness scales. One scale is known as the ABSOLUTE HARDNESS scale: 

 Talc = 1 
 Gypsum = 2 
 Calcite = 9   
 Fluorite = 21 
 Apatite = 48  
 Orthoclase = 72  
 Quartz = 100 
 Topaz = 200   
 Corundum = 400  
 Diamond = 1500   

 For example, this scale indicates that corundum is twice as hard as topaz, and diamond is almost four times as hard as corundum.   

 Reference: 

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Corundum 

 It is unclear whether Dr Craig McPherson was giving hardness numbers on the Absolute scale, such as 94.5, while previously referring to the Mohs scale. Metals (such as a typical knife blade) can be above 50 on the Absolute hardness scale, and hardened steel can be 100 or more.   
 ------------------------------------------ 
 Sources: THE AMERICAN HERITAGE SCIENCE DICTIONARY, ISBN# 0618455043,$19.95, 695 pp.  

 DISCOVER THE SCIENCE ALMANAC: THE DEFINITIVE SCIENCE RESOURCE, ISBN# 0786887591, $13.99, 790 pp.  
 ------------------------------------------ 
 LATE-BREAKING RELATED DEVELOPMENT TO "Project SERPO" POSTING #24: 
 ENORMOUS NEW HANGAR UNDER CONSTRUCTION AT AREA 51 ... IS ET MOVING IN PERMANENTLY COME NOVEMBER 2009?!    

 FLASH NOTICE: Here is an item of interest for the public, since our hard-earned tax dollars are involved, and hopefully, at work at the base for our "Visitor" friends! The estimated size is 200 ft x 500 ft and 100 feet tall. 

 http://www.dreamlandresort.com/forum/messages/22327.html 

 http://www.dreamlandresort.com/area51/new_structure_2006.html 

 http://www.dreamlandresort.com/area51/new_structure_2006.html 

 http://www.dreamlandresort.com/ 

 After the Air Force took over in the late 1980s, the name Area 51 was officially changed to: AIR FORCE FLIGHT TEST CENTER, DETACHMENT 3 or AFFTC DET 3. This is still the official designation of the Groom Lake base. 

© 2007 Dreamland Resort.com / PHOTO: June 10, 2007 from Tikaboo Peak. 
  
 

Attention: SCIENTISTS and PHYSICISTS: THIS IS THE "Project SERPO" POSTING YOU'VE ALL BEEN BREATHLESSLY WAITING FOR! / A BOMBSHELL WORLDWIDE EXCLUSIVE: A HIGHLY DETAILED DESCRIPTION and SCIENTIFIC EXPLANATION OF THE INTERIOR OF THE EBEN ALIEN CRAFT FROM THE  ROSWELL CRASH OF JULY 1947! / COMPILED AND WRITTEN BY THE "WHIZ KIDS" OF THE ALPHA TEAM AT THE LOS ALAMOS NATIONAL LABORATORY, THIS WILL GIVE YOU THE  SCIENTIFIC NOMENCLATURE YOU'VE ALL BEEN WAITING A LIFETIME FOR! / DO ALL OF YOU HAVE YOUR "EYES ONLY" MAJIC CLEARANCE?! / IF NOT, HIT THAT DELETE" KEY BEFORE PROCEEDING! 

 - BEGIN -  
 ------------------------------------------  
 EXAMINATION OF THE EBEN TRANSPORT CRAFT  

 ALPHA TEAM RESEARCH:  

 1) While electric charges cannot be conducted from the charge-accumulating fluid (Sims-Kyle) directly through the Toroid walls 
 and edges, there will be a capacitive effect which will accumulate charges of an opposite polarity, on the outside surfaces which will correspond to the inner ones in intensity and location.  

 This "diffuse layer," as it's called by the LANL Bravo Team, of electric charges, occurs most effectively when the liquid (e-plasma), is moving, and the faster the e-plasma moves, the more pronounced will be the separation effect of its electric ions from the ions in the differently moving diffused layer outside.  

 2) In this respect, the charges that accumulate outside in the space around the lower inner edge of the Toroid in its diffuse layer that encircles the base disc assembly (Tarabin) would be negative.  And the charges accumulating around the outside of the whole of the outer circumference of the Toroid would be positive. The result being much the same as dipolar electrodes -- building up between them electrostatic field lines and a potential magnetic field around those lines.  

 3) Inside the craft, over the top horizontal place of the Toroid, which also forms the lower face of the radial planar guide (Merdan), the induced electrical charges react with the Toroid's magnetic field so as to form a horizontally rotating field of polarized (positive) ions.  

 This revolving positive field reacts with the normal air outside of the craft to initiate an inflowing of polarized and neutrally-charged air which, as soon as it passes through the craft's circumferential duct and over the Toroid's electrically-charged outer edge, becomes positively ionized from the effect of sharp-edge ionization.   

 When the inflowing air passes through the duct, its specially designed curved surface acts as a constrictor to speed up the air flow thereby creating a low-pressure area inside the duct. A computer-like system controls air flow pressure and the diffusing of the Toroid's actuator trim system.    

 4) The increase in the circumferential duct's peripheral potential correspondingly increases the oppositely-charged potential of the fluid on the outside of the Toroid.   

 5) When the magnetic fields begin to resonate, the flux lines will create electrical eddy currents over the under-face of the floor 
 surface, so that a skin of charged particles will circulate around the surface. The base can be capacitively coupled to the upper outside dome-shell of the craft, so as to enable the metallic dome to acquire an outside positive charge. The dome itself can be made to store tremendous amounts of electrical energy, over its whole surface area, just like a standard capacitor.   

 6) The central rotating assembly is made up of four (4) bi-polar sphere-sets held equally spaced on a metallic plate. The plate is formed in such a way as to fit inside the perimeter of the inner edge of the Toroid, so as to be able to rotate freely with the sphere-set, but to also form an electrostatic coupling with the charges on the lower edge of the Toroid. This base plate also has a small diameter emission hole at its center. Pico-initiated jets push the air flow through this hole.  

 7) The base plates, as well as holding the four (4) bi-poles, also have to impede and constrict the lower magnetic field of the Toroid, so as to direct the flux lines (Reno-Saber) through, or mainly through, its central hole. This then would not be made of the same construction as the Toroid Shell and would be made of a non-magnetic metal (similar to the magnesium/bismuth/zinc-like material found in Roswell (Number 1) on the lower plates. The base plate material is similar to the Roswell Number 1 material, but differs in composition since it contains an aluminum-like substance as the bonding agent.   

 The base plate must contain some bismuth-like material since bismuth  does have a sort of quality needed as it does exhibit what is called "leg current" when pulsed currents are applied to it at a very low frequency (2 MHz - 8 MHz), and in a strong magnetic field indicating that it has capacitance. Bismuth also has a high atomic mass and, of course, a Hall-affects [effects?] resistance or diamagnetism. 

 [NOTE: See "MODERATOR's NOTES" at end.]  

 Either way, non-magnetic material, while not able to prevent all magnetic flux lines from penetrating through it, will convert some of the flux to a rotating electric field (eddy currents) over its surfaces, which will be supplemental to the actions of other charged particles spinning around the large, lower spheres by other interactions, and these rotations will coalesce into a flux-constricting force. The base plate metal could also be laminated on its outside with some sort of insulating material that has not yet been found. 

 8) During recent tests, it was determined that Eben 1 sent out an electronic signature of super-high radio frequency electromagnetic pulses. The pulses are in the three (3) GHz region of the electromagnetic spectrum at a wavelength of one (1) centimeter. Because the waves are so short, and their frequency is so high, the normal sort of capacitance-inductance oscillator with its conductor/antenna emission systems can't cope, and so a different sort of electronics technology is needed to radiate these waves out of the craft into the air or space around it.   

 There are various methods of doing this with short "millimeter" waves, one of which is called the transmission line, yet another is with parabolic antennas, and still another is the waveguide. Of these three (3), the best-suited systems for propagated electric field propulsion is the waveguide, which basically is a rectangular metal tube whereby at one end, the microwave power is pumped in and, at the other end, the delivery of these power waves occurs with almost undiminished intensity.   

 The science of waveguides is quite fascinating and is nothing like cable or conductor-type electronics; the size and the very shape of a waveguide computes in an entirely different fashion toward the end result. Microwaves though, have a very useful range of frequencies; at one particular frequency (3 GHz for atmospheric air), they can create the spin-resonance in the electrons of atoms of the gases in the surrounding air. 

 Electron spin resonance -- ESR -- raises the normal mode "lower" energy state, the visual effect of which is an emission of light photons of various colors (the subject of which is already covered in LANL-Z Alpha Report).   

 - END -  

 More to come.... 

 - ANONYMOUS    
 ------------------------------------------ 
 MODERATOR's NOTES:  

 Name: Bismuth  
 Symbol: Bi  
 Atomic No.: 83  
 Atomic Weight: 208.98038  
 Density: 9.79 (g/cc or g/L)  
 Specific Gravity: 9.747  
 Valence: 3, 5  
 Melting Point: 271.40° Celsius / 520° Fahrenheit    
 Boiling Point: 1,564° Celsius / 2,847° Fahrenheit     

 BISMUTH:  A hard, brittle, metallic chemical element discovered in 1753 and derives its name from the German "weisse masse," or "white mass." It is grayish-white with a tinge of red, or pinkish-white that is used chiefly in making alloys of a low melting point and in medicine, as well as for fire-safety devices. It is a crystalline metallic element that occurs in nature as a free metal and in various ores. 

 Bismuth is the most strongly diamagnetic element and has the highest atomic number of all the stable elements. It is the element most repelled by a magnetic field, and its electrical resistance increases the most in a magnetic field. Like water, it expands upon 
 solidification.  

 FACTOID: It is the "bis" in Pepto BISmol.  
 ------------------------------------------ 
 SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION FOR THE ROSWELL, NM, 1947 UFO CRASH 

 ROSWELL UFO '47 CRASH:  
 http://www.ufocasebook.com/rameymemo.html 

 The ROSWELL FILES:   
 http://www.roswellfiles.com/ 

 The ROSWELL UFO MUSEUM:   
 http://www.roswellufomuseum.com/ 

The ROSWELL INVESTIGATOR, CAREY & SCHMITT's:     
 http://www.roswellinvestigator.com/ 
 ------------------------------------------  

Release 23


Release 23: The 'Gate 3' Incident (updated)


A Special Report by Victor Martinez


MODERATOR's NOTE:


 UFO Thread List:


 This e-mail was originally streamed on Tuesday, June 4, 2007 @ 9:26 p.m.


What I've done is to reproduce the ORIGINAL stream, include the subsequent amendments and then add the following NEW subsections at the 
 END of the original posting:


VISITOR HOUSING ADDENDUM:


DETAILED BACKGROUND INFORMATION WHICH LED TO THE "GATE 3" SHOOTING!


 BOMBSHELL REVELATION! LEARN THE "SECRET" WHICH LINKS ALL 5 ALIEN SPECIES TOGETHER and THE NEVER-BEFORE-PUBLISHED OFFICIAL IDENTITY OF THE WOUNDED ALIEN!


 GATE 3 SHOOTING SHOCKER: THE GORY, BLOODY and ABSOLUTELY HORRIFIC DETAILS OF THE INFAMOUS "GATE 3 INCIDENT" REVEALED HERE FOR THE FIRST TIME!


° CATALOGUED ALIEN SPECIES and THEIR CELESTIAL ORIGINS


° ASTRONOMICAL DATA ON THE HOMEWORLDS OF THE ALIEN CIVILIZATIONS


° SHOCKER: CITING CLASSIFIED DOCUMENTS 20+ YEARS OLD, ANONYMOUS


DISCLOSES 2 ALIEN SPECIES ORIGINATING FROM A PARTICULAR CONSTELLATION AND NOW A BRAND NEW BOOK and MAGAZINE ARTICLE CONFIRM ALIEN LIFE EXISTS WITHIN THAT CONSTELLATION: THE CYGNUS ARM ... A MUST-READ!


° THE STRUCTURE OF THE MILKY WAY GALAXY: A BRIEF DESCRIPTION OF OUR SPIRAL GALAXY -- TYPE SABbc -- CENTERED IN SAGITTARIUS


° LIGHT-YEARS AS A UNIT OF MEASUREMENT ... WHAT EXACTLY IS IT?


° SUGGESTED REFERENCE SOURCES


For those of you who read the original e-mail of 6-4-07, SCROLL DOWN to:


"VISITOR HOUSING" and read from that point on for all of the brand NEW MATERIAL. This now constitutes the THIRD version -- and hopefully FINAL!


-- of this subject as we prepare to move on to other disclosure topics.


"The Gate 3 Incident" is a subject that originally came up in December 2005 when I was in regular communication with ANONYMOUS of the "Project SERPO" disclosures.


Because someone let the "genie out of the bottle" (Paul McGovern?), I have now been given permission to release the following still CLASSIFIED information. The following is the true story of the "Gate 3 Incident" as told by ANONYMOUS and his DIA colleagues.


As always, my own comments/remarks are offset by the use of [ ] brackets.


------------------------------------------


E-mail message

From: ANONYMOUS


Date: Thurs, Dec. 15, 2005, 8:39 p.m. (PST+3)


To: Victor**@*****.net (Victor Martinez)

 


Subject: THE ESCAPED ALIEN and THE GATE 3 INCIDENT


VICTOR: Thank you for your recent inquiry; who told you about this event? It's still highly classified, and unless you receive instructions otherwise from me or any member of our group [DIA-6], this is to remain /between you and me only.


This is the true story of the Gate 3 Incident.


DATE: This incident occurred in April 1983.


BACKGROUND: Gate 3 was a designation for an entrance into the Groom Lake Complex. This gate connected the Groom Lake complex with Area 51. The gates surrounding the Groom Lake complex was [were] the responsibility of a private security company [Wackenhut Corp]. There was a mixture of private security and military security for the complex.


EVENT: The incident occurred when a "Visitor," [Extraterrestrial Entity/ETE] being housed at Area 51, S-2 facility escaped. A massive search was started by military and private security forces. The Visitor was on foot and left the underground S-2 facility through an open vault door.

 


NARRATIVE: Part of the search team was the Director of Security for the


Groom Lake complex and an agent from the Air Force Office of Special


Investigation [AFOSI], who was the counterintelligence officer for the


complex. Both were traveling in a jeep from the back gate of Groom Lake


to the gate leading into Area 51, called Gate 3.

 


As the jeep approached Gate 3, the OSI agent noticed the guard was missing from the required location outside the gate house. As the jeep stopped, the OSI Agent got out of the jeep to investigate.


CRITICAL MASS: The OSI agent walked up to the gate to check on the guard. As the OSI agent got closer to the front door of the gate, the OSI agent noticed the interior of the gate was blood splattered. The OSI agent noticed only small pieces of human body parts were left of a human being.


The OSI agent returned to the jeep and contacted the Central Security Control (main/primary security office for the complex) and reported the findings. The Director of Security contacted his office by way of a radio phone, mounted inside the jeep. The OSI agent, armed with only an automatic pistol, walked around the area searching for a perpetrator.

 


FLASHPOINT: The OSI agent located the "Visitor," lying down near an underground water culvert. The OSI agent challenged the Visitor, ordering the Visitor to give up. The Visitor walked away, followed by the OSI agent. At some point, the OSI agent fired his weapon at the Visitor, as a warning. The Visitor, turned and pointed something at the OSI agent.


The OSI agent fired directly at the Visitor, hitting the Visitor directly in the chest with two (2) rounds from the 45 caliber automatic pistol. The Visitor fell to the ground. It took about 18 minutes for additional security forces to arrive. The Visitor was placed inside a containment chamber and transported back to the S-2 facility. The Visitor recovered from the wounds.


FOLLOW-UP: The incident was investigated by the FBI and Air Force Office of Special Investigation [AFOSI].

 


THE INCIDENT REMAINS CLASSIFIED.

 


IDENTITY OF THE ALIEN: The name of the creature involved in "The Gate 3 Incident" was an Archquloid. 


A-R-C-H-Q-U-L-O-I-D


The alien is described as one of the "Big Nosed Grays." It was a 5' 6" tall, gray or tan being with large, black, slanted eyes and a mushroom-like head, with four (4) long fingers. They have yellow eyes with vertical pupils and very large, beaked noses. They are genetically engineered by the Ebens [cloned?] and were given to the U.S. Government for observation/examination/study by the Ebens.


VISITOR HOUSING: This particular Visitor lived in "The Bubble" officially known as "The Clean Sphere" located between Levels 2 and 3 of the 8-level S-2 facility at Area 51. If memory serves me right, there were 12-15 compartments within "The Clean Sphere" or "Bubble" which was located at the south end of the S-2 facility.


Both the Archquloid and J-ROD lived in two (2) of the 12-15 compartments marked "Visitor Containment." Victor, it's important to note here that J-ROD and the Archquloid creature were NOT one and the same and that the claims made by some that they were are just plain WRONG. The Archquloid escaped, NOT J-ROD.


What we speculate is that because the Archquloid had to live its primary existence in "The Clean Sphere" and could only spend a minimal amount of time in our atmosphere, that an OVER-exposure to our atmosphere somehow affected its sanity and intellect. Furthermore, it caused the creature to become delusional, disoriented and lose its mental faculties for sound reasoning, analysis and judgment.


In street parlance, it "lost its mind" or was of unsound mind which accounts for his escape from the high-security "Clean Sphere" facility and the resulting homicide of the security guard.


------------------------------------------


E-mail message


From: ANONYMOUS


Date: Sat, Jun 9, 2007, 10:46 pm (PDT+3)


To: Victor**@*****.net


Subject: The Gate 3 Incident


VICTOR:  I cannot handle your almost daily, incessant and constant barrage of questions regarding The Gate 3 Incident and the astronomical data you keep asking me for regarding our Visitors. At the present time, I am going over reams and reams of documents some of which will be released to you for public distribution through your large list and the Serpo Web site over the summer and into the fall.


Because so many of your questions require some research on my part, and it's distracting me from this other important work, I have directed two (2) of our members [DIA-6] to communicate with you directly; we all speak with one voice. 


Whether you wish to combine and represent their responses as one (1) individual or break it up matters little to me; you have the full confidence of me and my group as to how you wish to proceed.


------------------------------------------


VISITOR HOUSING ADDENDUM:


DETAILED BACKGROUND INFORMATION WHICH LED TO THE "GATE 3" SHOOTING!


From: A MEMBER OF THE DIA-6


VICTOR: Here is the detailed background information on "The Gate 3 Incident" which led up to the unfortunate series of events in April 1983. This is all explained in a 300-page report issued on "The Gate 3 Incident" which combines the investigative efforts of both the FBI and the AFOSI.


The Ebens showed us creatures they created. Yes, they can clone almost any living tissue into a creature via a method called "rapid-cycle cloning." JROD was a creature created by the Ebens. He was intelligent, contained a brilliant mind and was able to adapt quickly to our environment. 


The second creature -- the Archquloid -- was primitive. The second creature was a form of a slave. It could be controlled, given orders and was safe, or at least we thought it was safe. The second creature was controlled by a "BRAIN CHIP," and was functionally controlled by a little black box. 


The Ebens provided this creature to us for medical experiments. JROD became frustrated with our efforts to control this creature. The Archquloid creature was able to fully communicate telepathically with JROD. At some point, the creature expressed a desire to be free. JROD released the creature and thus we had "The Gate 3 Incident." 


After the incident, JROD was placed in a secure confinement [containment] facility.  The Archquloid creature -- which survived the shooting and once medically healed -- was placed inside a more secure facility and restrained by a system provided to us by the Ebens. 


The creature died about one (1) year later from a mixture of the trauma associated with the shooting incident and his brain activity, which simply failed. 


After this incident, JROD was never fully trusted again. He was under strict control at all times. His mannerisms changed. His mood changed because of the increased detention. JROD, although gentle, was upset over these new measures.


------------------------------------------


BOMBSHELL REVELATION! LEARN THE "SECRET" WHICH LINKS ALL 5 ALIEN SPECIES TOGETHER and THE NEVER-BEFORE-PUBLISHED OFFICIAL IDENTITY OF THE WOUNDED ALIEN!


From: A MEMBER OF THE DIA-6


VICTOR: You sure ask a lot of questions of our group.


There are two (2) common links between each alien group and the Ebens.


The first link is that the Ebens discovered each group, civilized them and then CLONED their species with others. It is an extremely complicated subject, and is something I don't care to go into at this time with you. While we don't know all of the specifics, basically the Ebens used the DNA of each alien group to CREATE OTHER SPECIES OF ALIENS.


The second common link is the DNA.  Each alien group has the SAME EXACT DNA. How that is possible, we don't know. Level 2 at the S-2 facility is where JROD and the other alien [Archquloid] lived. They have special containment facilities to house each alien. 


Victor, one thing that has never been disclosed is the name given to the second alien, the one shot [the Archquloid]. The USG named that alien: CBE-1 or CLONED BIOLOGICAL ENTITY-1.


THIS HAS NEVER BEEN OFFICIALLY DISCLOSED TO THE PUBLIC; you have a "first" here.


The word "Archquloid" was coined by A51 [Area 51] scientists to classify each different alien race. We knew of five (5), all given to us by the Ebens. We developed other names for each race especially for the "Archquloid" who was the creature shot in the Gate 3 Incident. 


The Ebens cloned other races of aliens. As one of my other colleagues recently wrote and told you, it is really an incredibly complex story. But the Archquloid was a CLONED BIOLOGICAL ENTITY [CBE-1], created by the Ebens. It would take hundreds of hours and thousands of pages of written clarifications to explain it all neither of which I am prepared to do.  


The QUADLOIDS were also genetically created by the Ebens. The Quadloids were cloned from two (2) other species.  So, as you can see, it really gets very complicated hence my reluctance to delve into it too deeply.


Regarding your question as to the number of "S-level" facilities at Area 51: I can only tell you that there are nine (9) such levels within the S-2 facility at Area 51. As to what is done on each level and at each facility, I don't want to disclose that highly classified information as it could very well compromise the security of the base; our group was unanimous on this issue.


In only the most general of terms, there are nine (9) levels at the S-2 complex. They are:


Level 1: Administration
 Level 2: Containment for Visitors
 Level 3: Open storage and work sites for Visitor Crafts
 Level 4: HAZMAT Containment Rooms
 Level 5: Propulsion System Testing and Experimental Station-APS
 Level 6: Secondary Containment for Visitor Crafts
 Level 7: Vaults- Storage sites for Visitor's gifts [referenced in SERPO
 Level 8: Storage site for Visitor's High Energy Devices
 Level 9: Not used, at least through 1995  


 POSTING #19]


Please note that sometimes S-2 is referred to as an 8-level facility as the floor that houses our Visitors is often times not counted as a floor; I have listed them for you exactly as they appear in the base security manual.


We're all very well aware that you've developed other high-level governmental contacts, so if one of your other sources tells you more details, I would ask you to think twice before publishing it for the reasons I just gave. A detailed description of each "S" facility might also bring you some very costly legal problems.


I can't answer your astronomy questions; another member of our group has extensive astronomical data on many alien species; I'll have him get in touch with you.


------------------------------------------


GATE 3 SHOOTING SHOCKER: THE GORY, BLOODY and ABSOLUTELY HORRIFIC


DETAILS OF THE INFAMOUS "GATE 3 INCIDENT" REVEALED HERE FOR THE FIRST TIME!

 


From: A MEMBER OF THE DIA-6


As for "The Gate 3 Incident," everyone has their own opinions. With respect to the OSI agents directly involved in "The Gate 3 Incident" shooting, I don't want to put anyone in a dangerous, sticky situation. Some of this information is still extremely classified. 


To this day, many involved in the shooting still have great differences of opinion as to what should have been done especially with a containment team enroute and only minutes away. I don't want to be accused of being a Monday morning quarterback. The agents on scene did what they thought was right and while they were generally praised, others differ on that point.


[MATERIAL PURPOSELY DELETED BY MODERATOR: 3 PARAGRAPHS.]


No one has mentioned the poor guard.  The examination of the scene revealed the guard was imploded. The Archquloid had a hidden weapon in [on?] his body. The weapon, which was recovered and locked up, contained a form of an energy-directed beam. The beam struck the guard's body and imploded it. 


The largest piece of a body part left was about the size of a quarter. ONE EYEBALL WAS FOUND INTACT. The Archquloid lived for about one (1) year after it was shot, but it was in constant pain since our doctors couldn't adequately and effectively treat all of his problems. 


According to the information we developed from the Archquloid, which appears in the 300-page report, the guard threatened him and he killed the guard in self-defense. The investigation revealed the guard's handgun (Colt .45 automatic) was NEVER fired. 


The gun was not destroyed, which brings up another interesting point. If the guard was threatening the Archquloid with a gun, WHY DIDN'T the Archquloid destroy the weapon? As you can see, there are many Unanswered questions. In closing, the OSI Special Agent fired six (6) shots, striking the Archquloid four (4) times. The Agent fired from a distance of 165 feet, which is really outstanding shooting. 


------------------------------------------


MODERATOR's NOTE: The following section was written by a confidential source within the Defense Intelligence Agency and is a current sitting member of "The DIA-6." He appears to have a different take on the cause of the Visitor's aberrant, dysfunctional, frenzied and near hysterical behavior. ANONYMOUS resumes his information under CATALOGUED ALIEN SPECIES.


"VISITOR" SUPPLEMENTARY BACKGROUND INFORMATION:


VICTOR: This particular "VisItor" was suffering from a medical [mental/emotional] condition. Consider the following: 


- this creature came to this planet from another solar system;
– traveled about 38 light years [38.42];
 - was locked up in a special containment housing complex;
– was shocked by our civilization and our culture;
– was not allowed to leave;
– was under strict compliance controls (metal straps that shocked the creature when it tried to leave or did not comply with our instructions), and;
– was unable to communicate in our language. 


It was probably suffering from PTSS [Post Traumatic Stress Syndrome]. What a shock! This is the same type of shock felt by our 12 Team Members enroute to Planet SERPO in 1965. The creature recovered from its gunshot wounds inflicted by the OSI agent. But it later died, about one year later.


By the way, Bob Lazar DID work at Area 51. He is also aware of this incident.


------------------------------------------


MODERATOR's NOTE:


Ever since the SECOND, more detailed stream I sent on "The Gate 3 Incident," I've received nearly 90 inquiries as to the ORIGIN of the alien species listed in that second posting; ANONYMOUS responded late Tuesday evening, 6-12-07.


CATALOGUED ALIEN SPECIES and THEIR CELESTIAL ORIGINS:


VICTOR: Regarding your question as to where some of the aliens come from, here is the complete list of the alien species the U.S. Government knows of and has catalogued:


1) Ebens = Planet SERPO in Zeta Reticuli


2) Archquloids = Planet PONTEL near the Cygnus Arm


3) Quadloids = Planet OTTO in Zeta Reticuli (genetically engineered "praying mantis" and lizard-like creatures created by the Ebens)


4) Heplaloids = Planet DAMCO near the Cygnus Arm


5) Trantaloids = Planet SILUS in Zeta Reticuli


[NOTE: SOME of the above appeared in "Project SERPO" POSTING #19]


NOTES: Both planets DAMCO and PONTEL are in the Milky Way near the Cygnus Arm.


° DAMCO is from a solar system which contains 11 planets and it is the fourth (4th) planet out; it's size is a little bigger than that of Earth.


° PONTEL comes from another solar system entirely with a sun just about the size of ours. PONTEL is the fifth (5th) planet out and just a little smaller than ours.


More to come....


– ANONYMOUS


------------------------------------------


ASTRONOMICAL DATA ON THE HOMEWORLDS OF THE ALIEN CIVILIZATIONS: 

 





Click to enlarge 

1) CYGNUS ARM within the Milky Way Galaxy. These CYGNUS NEBULOSITIES -- which contain Planets DAMCO and PONTEL -- are all located ~2,000 light-years away. Looking toward the constellation CYGNUS, is a stunning and complex region of nebulae strewn along the plane of our Milky Way Galaxy. The bright, hot, supergiant star DENEB and popular celestial sights such as the North America and PELICAN emission regions, the IC 1318 "BUTTERFLY," and the CRESCENT and VEIL NEBULAE can also be identified.


Silhouetted by the glowing interstellar clouds and crowded star fields, the dark NORTHERN COAL SACK is also visible, part of a series of obscuring dust clouds forming the GREAT RIFT in the Milky Way. Along with the Sun, they lie within the ORION SPIRAL ARM of our galaxy.


2) Constellation: CANCER, Star M44: "A BEEHIVE" OF STARS! The BEEHIVE CLUSTER lies ~580 light-years away, and contains over 350 stars in a cluster spread out over only 10 light-years. M44 is a prominent open cluster of stars. Nicknamed "PRAESEPE" and "The BEEHIVE," it is one of the few open clusters visible to the unaided eye.


M44 was thought to be a nebula until Galileo used an early telescope to resolve the cluster's bright blue stars. These stars in M44, which is thought to have formed about 400-730 million years ago, is larger and older than most other open clusters.  When viewed with a powerful telescope, hundreds of stars become visible.


3) Constellation: TAURUS, M45: THE PLEIADES STAR CLUSTER is ~380-400 light-years from Earth and contains 3,000+ stars. The nine (9) brightest stars are: Atlas, Pleione, Alcyone, Maia, Asterope, Taygeta, Calaeno, Merope and Electra. Perhaps the most famous star cluster on the sky, the PLEIADES can be seen without binoculars from even the depths of a light-polluted city.


Also known as the "SEVEN SISTERS" and M45, the PLEIADES is one of the brightest and closest open clusters. The PLEIADES contains over 3,000 stars and is only 10-13 light years across. As viewed through a good telescope, there are blue reflection nebulae that surround the brighter cluster stars. Low mass, faint, brown dwarfs have also been found in the PLEIADES.


4) Constellation: RETICULUM, Zeta Reticuli I and II, are 5th magnitude yellow double star system, Planets SERPO, OTTO and SILUS are 38.42 light-years away. Planet SERPO's binary suns, Zeta Reticuli I & II; SERPO is Reticulum IV.


PLANET SERPO OF THE ZETA RETICULI I & II BINARY STAR SYSTEM IS IN THE CONSTELLATION OF RETICULUM AND HOME OF THE EBEN CIVILIZATION!


 http://www.solstation.com/stars2/zeta-ret.htm


– Zeta Reticuli I & II are two (2) 5th magnitude yellow-orange main sequence dwarf stars of 5.2 and 5.5 magnitude; they are not blue. Zeta Reticuli lies 38.42 light years or 225,968,400,000,000 miles away. 


– Secondly, Zeta Reticuli 1 is approx. 91% of the diameter of our sun, and Zeta Reticuli 2 is approx. 99% of the diameter of our sun.


– Thirdly, the distance BETWEEN the stars is 367 BILLION miles for Zeta Reticuli I and II, or approx 100 times the Sun-Pluto distance, as they orbit a common center.


THE ZETA RETICULI I & II STAR SYSTEM


 http://www.ufoconspiracy.com/reports/zetareticuli_star_sys.htm

 


THE ZETA RETICULI INCIDENT


 http://www.gravitywarpdrive.com/Zeta_Reticuli_Incident.htm


THE 400 BILLION STARS OF THE MILKY WAY ... OUR GALACTIC NEIGHBORHOOD IS JUST TEEMING WITH SENTIENT LIFE REGARDLESS OF WHAT THE CONTROL-FREAKS OF THE USG STATE PUBLICLY ... ABSOLUTELY AMAZING!


 http://members.nova.org/~sol/chview/chv5.htm


------------------------------------------


SHOCKER: CITING CLASSIFIED DOCUMENTS 20+ YEARS OLD, ANONYMOUS DISCLOSES 2 ALIEN SPECIES ORIGINATING FROM A PARTICULAR CONSTELLATION AND NOW A BRAND NEW BOOK and MAGAZINE ARTICLE CONFIRM ALIEN LIFE EXISTS WITHIN THAT CONSTELLATION: THE CYGNUS ARM ... A MUST-READ! 





Click to enlarge 

THE CYGNUS MYSTERY: UNLOCKING THE ANCIENT SECRET of LIFE's ORIGINS IN THE COSMOS – By Andrew Collins, ISBN# 1842932020, $24.95, 368 pp.

INFORMATION ABOUT CYGNUS ON THIS SITE:
 http://www.google.com/search?hl=en&source=hp&ie=ISO-8859-1&q=site%3Agreatdreams.com++Cygnus


FLASHPOINT: From the distant past and a far-off star comes a revelation to change all we know about who we are, where we come from, and where we go from here.


The CYGNUS ARM CONSTELLATION is the key to Unlocking humanity's ancient and universal belief that life originated in the heavens -- and will ultimately return there. Best-selling author Andrew Collins has found that this long-held conviction emerges from an astronomy that is about 17,000 years old, with standing stones, temples, and monuments across the globe oriented towards Cygnus' stars.


All around the world, ancient peoples fixed the location of heaven -- the source of cosmic life and death -- in the same segment of sky, the constellation of CYGNUS the SWAN, but why?


From the oldest temple in the world to the cutting edge of astrophysics, Andrew Collins sets out to find answers on an extraordinary historical quest to unravel the earliest beliefs of our most distant ancestors.


The CYGNUS MYSTERY ...


† reveals that our ancestors KNEW what science is now telling us -- that life DID originate among the stars;


† shows that Cygnus is at the root of ALL the world's religions;


† traces the very DNA of life from Shamanic art in Paleolithic caves to the foundations of the Great Pyramid, from psychedelic journeys in the Peruvian Amazon to Francis Crick's discovery of the double helix;


† points to the origins of astronomy, literature, ancient cosmologies, even transoceanic sea voyages -- all at a time of sudden change for humanity, some 17,000 years ago;


† provides compelling evidence that high-energy subatomic particles in the walls of ancient caves came from a BINARY STAR known as CYGNUS X-3


-- a source of powerful cosmic rays likely to have reached Earth and accelerated human evolution during the last Ice Age.


BONUS! The July/August 2007 #64 issue of ATLANTIS RISING Magazine -- on newsstands NOW! -- carries a 5-page article entitled, "Has a Popular Science Writer Found the Connection Between Human Evolution & The Cygnus Constellation?" by Dr Greg Little, pp. 32-33, 63-65. 

CHOICE EXCERPT:


The reason Cygnus was so important to the ancients is most easily answered by a previously mentioned fact. The brightest star of the Cygnus constellation is DENEB, which was the pole star 17,000 years ago. But there is an even more intriguing aspect to this. Cygnus lies at a critical juncture in the Milky Way known as "The Great Rift." It is at this spot that the Milky Way splits into two long sides with a dark, murky area dividing it.


This precise location of the Milky Way has served as a key component in many ancient religious systems. The most mysterious and important religious beliefs held by ancient people concerned the origin and destiny of souls. The Milky Way and The Great Rift are the specific geographic locations central to ancient beliefs about the soul. – p. 32, column #3, paragraphs #2 and #3.


------------------------------------------


THE STRUCTURE OF THE MILKY WAY GALAXY: A BRIEF DESCRIPTION OF OUR SPIRAL GALAXY -- TYPE SABbc -- CENTERED IN SAGITTARIUS:


The Milky Way is the galaxy which is the home of our Solar System together with at least 200 billion other stars (more recent estimates have given numbers around 400 BILLION) and their planets, and thousands of clusters and nebulae, including at least almost all objects of Messier's catalog which are not galaxies on their own.


All the objects in the Milky Way Galaxy orbit their common center of mass, called "The Galactic Center." As a galaxy, the MILKY WAY is actually a giant, as its mass is probably between 750 billion and ONE TRILLION solar masses, and its diameter is about 100,000 light years. Radio astronomical investigations of the distribution of hydrogen clouds have revealed that the Milky Way is a spiral galaxy of Hubble type Sb or Sc.


Therefore, our galaxy has both a pronounced disk component exhibiting a spiral structure, and a prominent nuclear region which is part of a notable bulge/halo component. Decade-long observations have brought up more and more evidence that the Milky Way may also have a bar structure (so that it would be type SB), so that it may look like M61 or M83, and is perhaps best classified as SABbc.


Recent investigations have brought up support for the assumption that the Milky Way may even have a pronounced central bar like barred spiral galaxies M58, M91, M95, or M109, and thus be of Hubble type SBb or SBc.


MORE ON THE STRUCTURE OF THE MILKY WAY


The MILKY WAY GALAXY belongs to the "Local Group," a smaller group of three (3) large and over 30 small galaxies, and is the second largest after the giant ANDROMEDA GALAXY M31,


 http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap061126.html


but perhaps the most massive member of this group. M31, at about 2.9 million light years, is the nearest large galaxy, but a number of faint galaxies are much closer: Many of the dwarf Local Group members are satellites or companions of the Milky Way.


The two closest neighbors, both already mentioned, have only recently been discovered: The nearest of all, discovered in 2003, is an already almost disrupted dwarf galaxy, the CANIS MAJOR DWARF, the nucleus of which is about 25,000 light-years away from us and about 45,000 light-years from the Galactic Center.


Second comes SagDEG at about 88,000 light years from us and some 50,000 light years from the Galactic Center. These two dwarfs are currently in close encounters with our Galaxy and in sections of their orbits situated well within the volume occupied by our Milky Way. They are followed in distance by the more conspicuous LARGE and  SMALL MAGELLANIC CLOUD, at 179,000 and 210,000 light years, respectively.


The spiral arms of our Milky Way contain interstellar matter, diffuse nebulae, and young stars and open star clusters emerging from this matter. On the other hand, the bulge component consists of old stars and contains the globular star clusters; our galaxy has probably about 200 globulars, of which we know about 150.


These globular clusters are strongly concentrated toward the Galactic Center: From their apparent distribution in the sky, Harlow Shapley has concluded that this center of the Milky Way lies at a considerable distance (which he overestimated by factors) in the direction of Sagittarius and not rather close to us, as had been thought previously.


Our solar system is thus situated within the outer regions of this galaxy, well within the disk and only about 20 light years "above" the equatorial symmetry plane (to the direction of the Galactic North Pole), but about 28,000 light years from The Galactic Center. Therefore, the Milky Way shows up as luminous band spanning all around the sky along this symmetry plane, which is also called the "Galactic Equator."


Its center lies in the direction of the constellation Sagittarius, but very close to the border of both neighbor constellations Scorpius and Ophiuchus. The distance of 28,000 light years has recently (1997) been confirmed by the data of ESA's astrometric satellite Hipparcos.


Other investigations published consequently have disputed this value and propose a smaller value of some 25,000 light years, based on stellar dynamics; a recent investigation yields roughly 26,000 light years. This data, if of significance, wouldn't immediately affect values for distances of particular objects in the Milky Way or beyond. 


The solar system is situated within a smaller spiral arm, called the Local or ORION ARM, which is merely a connection between the inner and outer next more massive arms, the Sagittarius Arm and the Perseus Arm.


Our Sun, together with the whole Solar System, is orbiting the Galactic Center on a nearly circular orbit. We are moving at about 250 km/sec, and need about 220 MILLION YEARS to complete one orbit (so the Solar System has orbited the Galactic Center ~20 to 21 times since its formation about 4.6 billion years ago).


In addition to the overall Galactic Rotation, the solar system is moving between the neighboring stars (peculiar motion) at a velocity of about 20 km/s, to a direction called "Solar Apex," at the approximate position RA=18:01, Dec=+26 (2000.0); this motion was been discovered by William Herschel in 1783.


BEAUTIFUL: THE MILKY WAY GALAXY AS VIEWED FROM CAPITOL REEF NATIONAL PARK NEAR MOAB, UTAH!


 http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap060801.html


------------------------------------------


LIGHT-YEARS AS A UNIT OF MEASUREMENT ... WHAT EXACTLY IS IT?


WHAT IS THE SPEED OF LIGHT? / WHAT IS A 'LIGHT-YEAR?'


Light travels at 186,170 miles/second.


So in one (1) year, light travels 5,871,057,120,000 miles.


That's 5 trillion, 871 billion, 057 million, 120 thousand miles.


This is arrived at by:


186,170 miles/second x 60 seconds/minute = 11,170,200 miles/minute x 60 minutes/hour = 670,212,000 miles/hour x 24 hours/day = 16,085,088,000 miles/day x 365 days/year = 5,871,057,120,000 miles/year = THE DISTANCE LIGHT CAN TRAVEL IN ONE (1) YEAR = a light year unit of measurement.


Distance to our nearest star, Alpha Centauri: 4.3 LY (light-years)


Milky Way Galaxy = 90,000 LY wide / 3,000 LY thick


No. of stars in our Milky Way: ~400 billion


No. of galaxies in our universe: ~50 billion


No. of stars in our universe: ~5 billion trillion


A light nanosecond: The distance light can travel in a billionth of a second = ~1 ft or 12" [30 cm].


AT THE CENTER OF THE MILKY WAY GALAXY LIES A "BLACK HOLE" WHICH IS LIGHT-HOURS WIDE! Click below to view:


 http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap021018.html


------------------------------------------


SUGGESTED REFERENCE SOURCES to have on hand for future "Project SERPO" releases.


While there are MANY fine astronomy books, the best two (2) for stunning celestial images printed on 40 lb., enamel-coated paper and brilliant color plates are:


UNIVERSE: THE DEFINITIVE VISUAL GUIDE – General Editor Sir Martin Rees, ISBN# 0756613647, $50.00, 512 pp.


THE ILLUSTRATED ATLAS OF THE UNIVERSE – By Mark A Garlick, ISBN#1740893778, $19.98, 304 pp.


and for mainly text in an encyclopedia-like style with few color plates:


THE UNIVERSAL BOOK OF ASTRONOMY: FROM THE ANDROMEDA GALAXY TO THE ZONE OF AVOIDANCE – By Dr David Darling, ISBN#0471265691, $40.00, 570 pp.


 http://www.daviddarling.info/


I have all three (3) and can vouch for them all.


------------------------------------------


MODERATOR's NOTES:


LIFE IMITATING ART? Anyone who knows this classified Gate 3 incident is true certainly had a paradigm shift of awareness concerning the ET presence on Earth, vs. the years of government cover-ups and denials.


The sad part is that the ET "Visitor" was in the position of an escapee -- regardless of its reasons -- instead of an Ambassador from another planet and was summarily remanded to custody of the USG c/o AFOSI agents.


As a brief aside, the incident of shooting an ET with a gun was briefly described near the end of the "X-Files" TV episode, "E.B.E.," Season 1, Episode 16, Air Date: 2/18/94.


It was "Deep Throat" who told Agent Mulder with great sadness that he, Deep Throat, once shot and killed an ET on purpose. That is why he helped Mulder so much, to atone for this action.

To discuss this release on the Open Minds Forum, please Click HERE. 

 
 

RELEASE 24 - 20 June 2007: Area 51 Scientist tell-ALL of ALIENcraft!

Attention: SCIENTISTS, PHYSICISTS and OTHER ASSORTED 'BACKYARD'  SCIENTIFIC TYPES: LEARN FROM AN ACTUAL INSIDER THE SECRETS OF THE ALIEN PROPULSION SYSTEM AND WHY WE CAN'T 'CRACK' AND DUPLICATE IT! / LEARN WHAT MAKES THE ET CRAFT GO FROM POINT "A" to "B" WITH LITTLE FUEL ON HAND, BUT "WHICH CREATES ENORMOUS AMOUNTS OF ENERGY!" / UNDERSTAND WHY "2 + 2 = 5" IN THE REST OF THE COSMOS EXCEPT HERE ON PRIMITIVE PLANET  EARTH! / LEARN THE PROPER PLACE FOR OUR QUANTUM PHYSICS and MECHANICS ... IN THE LATRINE! / THIS IS A "KEEPER!" 

 MODERATOR's NOTES and EXPLANATION: What follows is an exclusive interview between an Area 51 scientist and Linda Moulton-Howe conducted in April of 1995.  

 To the best of ANONYMOUS and the DIA-6's knowledge, THE CONTENTS OF THIS EXPLOSIVE INTERVIEW HAVE NEVER BEEN MADE PUBLIC perhaps due to the agreement Moulton-Howe entered into with the USG at the time of the interview. 

 In a telephone call I placed to the residence of Moulton-Howe on Sunday  morning, 6-17-07, I have confirmed with her that the following interview never appeared on her Web site:  

 http://www.earthfiles.com/ 

 Regardless, ANONYMOUS has now directed me to release an abstract of the 5-page interview which is reproduced below.  

 As always, my OWN comments/notes are offset by the use of [ ] brackets.  

 - BEGIN - 
 ------------------------------------------ 
 This is raw intelligence material and dissemination to unauthorized personnel is prohibited.  

 This attachment was not given a security classification.  

 Interview with Dr Craig McPherson, scientist and former employee of Area 51. 

 Dr McPherson worked at Area 51 from May 1956 until September 1988. This interview was made by Linda Howe during a meeting at the Las Vegas Hilton on April 8, 1995. Under a written agreement between Linda Howe  and Dr McPherson, the contents of the interview could NOT be made public. A U.S. government source recorded the interview. What follows is a summary of the information given by Dr McPherson.   

 NOTE: A background check of Dr Craig H McPherson was conducted. Dr  McPherson obtained a security clearance based on an "Expanded Background Investigation" in August of 1956. The clearance was upgraded at various  intervals until his retirement. Dr McPherson was a Federal Civil Service employee from May 23, 1956 until October 1, 1988.   

 Dr McPherson retired at the Federal Civil Service grade of GS-16. Dr McPherson was born on April 8, 1920 in Scranton, PA. Dr McPherson served  in the U.S. Army Infantry in Europe from June 1944 until October 1946. 
 Dr McPherson obtained the military rank of Sergeant at the time of his discharge. Dr McPherson attended Penn State University, the University of Pennsylvania and MIT.  

 Interview of Dr Craig McPherson by Linda Howe on April 8, 1995. 
 Location: Las Vegas, NV. Time frame: 1224 hrs - 1713 hrs. 

 [Dr Craig McPherson begins speaking.]  

 I served in the U.S. Army from 1944 to 1946. After discharge, I attended college and eventually obtained a PhD in physics. I worked for private industry from 1955 to 1956. In May 1956, I was hired by the U.S. Air Force as an Applied Physics Specialist.  

 My first assignment was at the Nellis AFB, NV, test facility. I worked at Indian Springs AFB, NV, for the first seven months. My work pertained to the examination of Foreign Technology. The foreign technology consisted of Soviet and Chinese equipment. Most of the equipment was obtained from a friendly government. The equipment consisted of tanks, 
 electronics equipment, weapon systems and other related items. 

 During this time frame, the Air Force built an underground facility at Groom Lake. The construction started in 1955 and ended sometime during the summer of 1959. I worked in the Foreign Technology Applications Studies Division (FTASD). We had three (3) different facilities, two of them at Groom Lake and one at Indian Springs. We later obtained a facility at Tonopah. 

 Once the underground facility was ready, we moved in. This was sometime in early 1960. The facility was one of the biggest underground facilities ever built. We must have had over a billion square feet of  space. In later years, the underground facility, code named "Deep Space," was expanded to include three (3) different levels.  

 I was involved in the research and development of the SR-71. We had several different aircraft on the drawing board. The FTASD had more than 65 scientists, technicians and military personnel assigned. Most of our work was very unique. We would obtain some information from the Foreign Technology Acquisition Group (FTAG). 

 This group obtained information from foreign governments or from intelligence agencies. Along with the studies of the foreign equipment that we had available at the facility, we could apply advanced scientific principles to further our own technology. We made terrific advancements during this time frame.   

 During this time period, I NEVER saw a UFO or anything resembling a UFO at the Groom Lake Test Facility. I did NOT see any ETs nor did I ever hear anyone mention that our government was reverse engineering an ET device.  

 In the summer of 1969, I was transferred from the FTASD to the Advance Studies Group (ASG). The ASG was a very secret group located in the second level of Area 51, Complex III. When I first entered the facility, I had to obtain an additional security clearance. During my in-briefing of the ASG, I was informed that our group was working on advanced 
 research principles involving NONconventional flying devices. I saw my first nonconventional device within a few days of being assigned to the ASG. The flying device was code named "Atlas-Tank" (AT). It was A FLYING SAUCER. I worked on specific physics problems associated with this unique design. We had manufactured the AT over a period of 
 eight (8) years.  

 I was brought into the program during the latter part of the ground testing. We solved most of the unique problems, but we still could not get the AT to fly. Several different propulsion systems were used, but none of them worked. Sometime in 1973, I was given another security clearance. I was moved to another facility within Complex III. This was a new facility. I was assigned to the ASG-Alpha. 

 Once in the facility, I was given access to another "flying saucer." This appeared to be the same shape as the AT. However, it was code named "Blue Chariot." Although I did not have access to the interior of the BC, I did observe the outer area of the flying craft. At no time was I told that either of these flying machines were ET related. I worked in 
 the Alpha branch for several months before moving back to ASG. 

 In 1973, a terrible accident occurred at the Complex III facility. The propulsion system on the BC was activated and an explosion occurred killing six (6) technicians. Actually, it was NOT an explosion. A bolt or plasma ball came out of the propulsion system and struck the technicians, VAPORIZING THEM. The BC was then taken to another facility, 
 which was located in a very remote area of Area 51. This area was adjacent to the old above ground nuclear testing land. 

 Scientists learned how the propulsion system worked. They could activate the system, which would generate an enormous amount of energy. The energy could be formed into "balls of plasma" or a steady stream of energy. The system could generate energy equivalent to a nuclear explosion from a range of 0.1 kT up to 350 kT. 

 The strange thing about this energy system was the lack of radiation. The system could generate this enormous amount of power, but it would NOT leave any residual radiation. This puzzled scientists. When I retired in 1988, NO ONE could understand the system. They could activate it, but could NOT understand how it worked.   

 At no time was I ever told that the new propulsion system was given to us by ETs. Nor was I ever told that ETs provided us with any technology. We assumed the new propulsion system was developed by the Soviets. Although no one told us that the new propulsion system and the BC were ET related, we figured they that were.   

 We had our own private discussions about the technology. I could give you the technical details of the propulsion system, but that is still HIGHLY CLASSIFIED. I can say the system operates on some unknown principles. We tried, quite unsuccessfully, to apply our knowledge of physics, quantum theory and other principles to this new system. 

 In OUR science, there are two (2) basic types of bonds by which atoms form molecules - ionic and covalent bonds. An atom is normally electrically neutral. It has the same number of positively charged protons in its nucleus as it has negatively charged electrons in captive orbits. 

 In THIS system things are different. There is an UNKNOWN METHOD by which the atoms are changed. Instead of ionic or covalent bonds, this new system creates a THIRD TYPE of bonding principle. This new type of bonding causes atoms to take on a different form. Atoms go from a normal state -- and when I say "normal," I mean normal in OUR science -- to a "multiplexed" form. In other words, the atoms are doubled or "piggy-backed" onto each other.   

 The atoms are somewhat mutated, but maintain their original shape. I KNOW THIS IS VERY DIFFICULT TO UNDERSTAND. That is why we still DON'T understand it. I'll give you a simple example.  

 If you can recall basic chemistry, you will remember that a hydrogen atom consists of a single proton -- the nucleus -- with one electron in a captive state. When two hydrogen atoms approach each other, their combined energy becomes lower if they SHARE their electrons. Well, in this new system, a hydrogen atom, subjected to this new system (inside 
 this propulsion system) changes to a NEW principle.  

 First, when two hydrogen atoms approach each other, their combined energy level becomes MULTIPLIED through this strange bonding principle. So, instead of having a lower energy level, the energy is MULTIPLIED by the number of atoms of hydrogen that is bonded. If we used the QUANTUM IDEA to understand this, we would conclude that quantum principles do NOT work in this new system.   

 Normally, in our system, positively-charged ions attract and bond to negatively-charged ions to form molecules. This is NOT the case in this new system. It makes NO difference whether the ions are positive or negative as they bond together regardless of valence. We do know that inside this propulsion system, something causes these strange unnatural phenomena to occur.   

 Two plates of metal sit inside a chamber. This chamber is a vacuum. The chamber is a PERFECT VACUUM, that is, there is no outside air or other gases inside this chamber. A tube running from one chamber into another, pushes a gas inside. A third chamber forces still another gas to enter the first chamber. We know that the gases push against these two plates of metal and cause an ENORMOUS AMOUNT OF ENERGY TO BE CREATED.  

 Lastly, just before the gases are "mixed," there is a form of light that is focused against the outgoing energy. This light is of a lower frequency. Normally, in our quantum theory, a small frequency means a lower energy. However, is this system, the lower frequency of light was measured to contain an enormous amount of energy exerted upon this outgoing energy. When I left in 1988, we could NOT understand how the gases were mixed nor could we determine HOW the light was generated.  

 You ask about the metals inside this vacuum container. Quite intriguing. First, the metal strips are located inside Container #1. They are setting perpendicular to each other at exactly 6.54 cm apart. Each metal strip measures 18.45 cm x 9.43 cm. Each metal strip is 3.46 cm wide. The sides of the strips facing each other contain a shiny metal coating. The 
 opposite sides contain a dull coating. 

 Looking at the metal strips from above, one will notice that another substance is sandwiched between the outer two substances. The materials in each of the metal strips have never been identified. We do know the density of the metal strips and the hardness as measured by the Mohs scale. 

 The density of the metal strips are 94.5 [9.45?] on the shiny side and 34.2 [3.42?] on the opposite side. I believe the density or specific gravity was measured by the conventional method, in that the value is grams per centimeter cubed. NOT being a metallurgist, I cannot make comments on these values. But what IS interesting is that these two strips of metals are located inside a somewhat round vacuum container. The outer coating of this container is also shiny. 

 You mention the gases. I am not a chemist. I knew very little about the gases contained in Containers #2 and #3. These gases are two distinct types. One is a gas-liquid type and the other is a solid gas. Don't ask me to explain these two; I don't believe that our chemical engineers could do that. I just know that once the device is activated, the two gases mix and create energy by some method. 

 I DON'T want my name connected to a story about ETs. 

 - END - 

 More to come.... 

 - ANONYMOUS   
 ------------------------------------------ 
 MODERATOR's FOOTNOTES:  

 COVALENT BOND: A chemical bond formed when electrons are shared between two atoms. Usually, each atom contributes one electron to form a pair of electrons that are shared by both atoms.  

 IONIC BOND: A chemical bond formed between two ions with opposite charges. Ionic bonds form when one atom gives up one or more electrons to another atom. These bonds can form between a pair of atoms or between molecules and are the type of bond found in salts. 

 IONIC PROPULSION: Propulsion by the reactive thrust of a high-speed beam of similarly charged ions ejected by an ion engine.   

 KILOTON: The explosive force of 1,000 tons of TNT; a unit for measuring the power of thermonuclear weapons.  

 MOHS SCALE: Hardness is one of the chief ways used to recognize a mineral. It is a scale used to measure the relative hardness of a mineral by its resistance to scratching. In 1822, Friedrich Mohs [German-Austrian: 1773-1839] created a hardness scale based on assigning numbers to common minerals. The concept is that a harder mineral (one with a higher number) can scratch a softer one. 

 Other materials may be correlated to this scale. For example, steel used in a pocketknife is about 5.5 and glass is about 6, so glass can scratch steel, but a common pocketknife will NOT scratch glass.   

 From softest to hardest, the 10 minerals of the Mohs scale are: 

 talc = measuring 1 on the hardness scale   
 gypsum = 2     
 calcite = 3   
 fluorite = 4  
 apatite = 5  
 orthoclase feldspar = 6  
 quartz = 7  
 topaz =  8   
 corundum = 9 (including ruby and sapphire) 
 diamond = 10 / A mineral form of carbon that is extremely hard and transparent. It usually occurs as crystals shaped as octahedrons. Diamonds come from unusual structures similar to volcanoes called pipes; the diamonds are embedded in a mineral called kimberlite. Diamonds form at great depths under high pressure and temperature, then are carried to 
 the surface in a kimberlite pipe. Because diamonds are hard and resist wear, they also survive passage from original locations into gravel deposits in rivers and on beaches.     

 Reference:   

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mohs_hardness_scale 

 METALS/MINERALS ADDENDUM:   

 The Mohs scale is a RELATIVE hardness scale (minerals relative to each other.) 
 There are several more hardness scales. One scale is known as the ABSOLUTE HARDNESS scale: 

 Talc = 1 
 Gypsum = 2 
 Calcite = 9   
 Fluorite = 21 
 Apatite = 48  
 Orthoclase = 72  
 Quartz = 100 
 Topaz = 200   
 Corundum = 400  
 Diamond = 1500   

 For example, this scale indicates that corundum is twice as hard as topaz, and diamond is almost four times as hard as corundum.   

 Reference: 

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Corundum 

 It is unclear whether Dr Craig McPherson was giving hardness numbers on the Absolute scale, such as 94.5, while previously referring to the Mohs scale. Metals (such as a typical knife blade) can be above 50 on the Absolute hardness scale, and hardened steel can be 100 or more.   
 ------------------------------------------ 
 Sources: THE AMERICAN HERITAGE SCIENCE DICTIONARY, ISBN# 0618455043, $19.95, 695 pp.  

 DISCOVER THE SCIENCE ALMANAC: THE DEFINITIVE SCIENCE RESOURCE, ISBN# 0786887591, $13.99, 790 pp.  
 ------------------------------------------ 
 LATE-BREAKING RELATED DEVELOPMENT TO "Project SERPO" POSTING #24: ENORMOUS NEW HANGAR UNDER CONSTRUCTION AT AREA 51 ... IS ET MOVING IN PERMANENTLY COME NOVEMBER 2009?!    

 FLASH NOTICE: Here is an item of interest for the public, since our hard-earned tax dollars are involved, and hopefully, at work at the base for our "Visitor" friends! The estimated size is 200 ft x 500 ft and 100 feet tall. 

 http://www.dreamlandresort.com/forum/messages/22327.html 

 http://www.dreamlandresort.com/area51/new_structure_2006.html 

 http://www.dreamlandresort.com/area51/new_structure_2006.html 

 http://www.dreamlandresort.com/ 

 After the Air Force took over in the late 1980s, the name Area 51 was officially changed to: AIR FORCE FLIGHT TEST CENTER, DETACHMENT 3 or AFFTC DET 3. This is still the official designation of the Groom Lake base. 

© 2007 Dreamland Resort.com / PHOTO: June 10, 2007 from Tikaboo Peak. 

  
 

RELEASE 25 - 20 June 2007: Examination of the Eben Transport Craft!

Attention: SCIENTISTS and PHYSICISTS: THIS IS THE "Project SERPO" POSTING YOU'VE ALL BEEN BREATHLESSLY WAITING FOR! / A BOMBSHELL WORLDWIDE EXCLUSIVE: A HIGHLY DETAILED DESCRIPTION and SCIENTIFIC EXPLANATION OF THE INTERIOR OF THE EBEN ALIEN CRAFT FROM THE ROSWELL CRASH OF JULY 1947! / COMPILED AND WRITTEN BY THE "WHIZ KIDS" OF THE ALPHA TEAM AT THE LOS ALAMOS NATIONAL LABORATORY, THIS WILL GIVE YOU THE SCIENTIFIC NOMENCLATURE YOU'VE ALL BEEN WAITING A LIFETIME FOR! / DO ALL OF YOU HAVE YOUR "EYES ONLY" MAJIC CLEARANCE?! / IF NOT, HIT THAT "DELETE" KEY BEFORE PROCEEDING! 

 - BEGIN -  
 ------------------------------------------  
 EXAMINATION OF THE EBEN TRANSPORT CRAFT  

 ALPHA TEAM RESEARCH:  

 1) While electric charges cannot be conducted from the charge-accumulating fluid (Sims-Kyle) directly through the Toroid walls 
 and edges, there will be a capacitive effect which will accumulate charges of an opposite polarity, on the outside surfaces which will correspond to the inner ones in intensity and location.  

 This "diffuse layer," as it's called by the LANL Bravo Team, of electric charges, occurs most effectively when the liquid (e-plasma), is moving, and the faster the e-plasma moves, the more pronounced will be the separation effect of its electric ions from the ions in the differently moving diffused layer outside.  

 2) In this respect, the charges that accumulate outside in the space around the lower inner edge of the Toroid in its diffuse layer that encircles the base disc assembly (Tarabin) would be negative.  And the charges accumulating around the outside of the whole of the outer circumference of the Toroid would be positive. The result being much the same as dipolar electrodes -- building up between them electrostatic field lines and a potential magnetic field around those lines.  

 3) Inside the craft, over the top horizontal place of the Toroid, which also forms the lower face of the radial planar guide (Merdan), the induced electrical charges react with the Toroid's magnetic field so as to form a horizontally rotating field of polarized (positive) ions.   

 This revolving positive field reacts with the normal air outside of the craft to initiate an inflowing of polarized and neutrally-charged air which, as soon as it passes through the craft's circumferential duct and over the Toroid's electrically-charged outer edge, becomes positively ionized from the effect of sharp-edge ionization.   

 When the inflowing air passes through the duct, its specially designed curved surface acts as a constrictor to speed up the air flow thereby creating a low-pressure area inside the duct. A computer-like system controls air flow pressure and the diffusing of the Toroid's actuator trim system.    

 4) The increase in the circumferential duct's peripheral potential correspondingly increases the oppositely-charged potential of the fluid on the outside of the Toroid.   

 5) When the magnetic fields begin to resonate, the flux lines will create electrical eddy currents over the under-face of the floor 
 surface, so that a skin of charged particles will circulate around the surface. The base can be capacitively coupled to the upper outside dome-shell of the craft, so as to enable the metallic dome to acquire an outside positive charge. The dome itself can be made to store tremendous amounts of electrical energy, over its whole surface area, just like a standard capacitor.   

 6) The central rotating assembly is made up of four (4) bi-polar sphere-sets held equally spaced on a metallic plate. The plate is formed in such a way as to fit inside the perimeter of the inner edge of the Toroid, so as to be able to rotate freely with the sphere-set, but to also form an electrostatic coupling with the charges on the lower edge of the Toroid. This base plate also has a small diameter emission hole at its center. Pico-initiated jets push the air flow through this hole.  

 7) The base plates, as well as holding the four (4) bi-poles, also have to impede and constrict the lower magnetic field of the Toroid, so as to direct the flux lines (Reno-Saber) through, or mainly through, its central hole. This then would not be made of the same construction as the Toroid Shell and would be made of a non-magnetic metal (similar to the magnesium/bismuth/zinc-like material found in Roswell (Number 1) on the lower plates. The base plate material is similar to the Roswell Number 1 material, but differs in composition since it contains an aluminum-like substance as the bonding agent.   

 The base plate must contain some bismuth-like material since bismuth does have a sort of quality needed as it does exhibit what is called "leg current" when pulsed currents are applied to it at a very low frequency (2 MHz - 8 MHz), and in a strong magnetic field indicating that it has capacitance. Bismuth also has a high atomic mass and, of course, a Hall-affects [effects?] resistance or diamagnetism. 

 [NOTE: See "MODERATOR's NOTES" at end.]  

 Either way, non-magnetic material, while not able to prevent all magnetic flux lines from penetrating through it, will convert some of the flux to a rotating electric field (eddy currents) over its surfaces, which will be supplemental to the actions of other charged particles spinning around the large, lower spheres by other interactions, and these rotations will coalesce into a flux-constricting force. The base plate metal could also be laminated on its outside with some sort of insulating material that has not yet been found. 

 8) During recent tests, it was determined that Eben 1 sent out an electronic signature of super-high radio frequency electromagnetic pulses. The pulses are in the three (3) GHz region of the electromagnetic spectrum at a wavelength of one (1) centimeter. Because the waves are so short, and their frequency is so high, the normal sort of capacitance-inductance oscillator with its conductor/antenna emission systems can't cope, and so a different sort of electronics technology is needed to radiate these waves out of the craft into the air or space around it.   

 There are various methods of doing this with short "millimeter" waves, one of which is called the transmission line, yet another is with parabolic antennas, and still another is the waveguide. Of these three (3), the best-suited systems for propagated electric field propulsion is the waveguide, which basically is a rectangular metal tube whereby at one end, the microwave power is pumped in and, at the other end, the delivery of these power waves occurs with almost undiminished intensity.   

 The science of waveguides is quite fascinating and is nothing like cable or conductor-type electronics; the size and the very shape of a waveguide computes in an entirely different fashion toward the end result. Microwaves though, have a very useful range of frequencies; at one particular frequency (3 GHz for atmospheric air), they can create the spin-resonance in the electrons of atoms of the gases in the surrounding air. 

 Electron spin resonance -- ESR -- raises the normal mode "lower" energy state, the visual effect of which is an emission of light photons of various colors (the subject of which is already covered in LANL-Z Alpha Report).   

 - END -  

 More to come.... 

 - ANONYMOUS    
 ------------------------------------------ 
 MODERATOR's NOTES:  

 Name: Bismuth
 Symbol: Bi  
 Atomic No.: 83  
 Atomic Weight: 208.98038  
 Density: 9.79 (g/cc or g/L)  
 Specific Gravity: 9.747  
 Valence: 3, 5  
 Melting Point: 271.40° Celsius / 520° Fahrenheit    
 Boiling Point: 1,564° Celsius / 2,847° Fahrenheit     

 BISMUTH:  A hard, brittle, metallic chemical element discovered in 1753 and derives its name from the German "weisse masse," or "white mass." It is grayish-white with a tinge of red, or pinkish-white that is used chiefly in making alloys of a low melting point and in medicine, as well as for fire-safety devices. It is a crystalline metallic element that occurs in nature as a free metal and in various ores. 

 Bismuth is the most strongly diamagnetic element and has the highest atomic number of all the stable elements. It is the element most repelled by a magnetic field, and its electrical resistance increases the most in a magnetic field. Like water, it expands upon 
 solidification.  

 FACTOID: It is the "bis" in Pepto BISmol.  
 ------------------------------------------ 
 SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION FOR THE ROSWELL, NM, 1947 UFO CRASH 


 ROSWELL UFO '47 CRASH:  

 http://www.ufocasebook.com/rameymemo.html 

 The ROSWELL FILES:   

 http://www.roswellfiles.com/ 

 The ROSWELL UFO MUSEUM:   

 http://www.roswellufomuseum.com/ 

The ROSWELL INVESTIGATOR, CAREY & SCHMITT's:     

 http://www.roswellinvestigator.com/ 
 ------------------------------------------ 
 Sources: THE AMERICAN HERITAGE SCIENCE DICTIONARY, ISBN# 0618455043, $19.95, 695 pp.  

 DISCOVER THE SCIENCE ALMANAC: THE DEFINITIVE SCIENCE RESOURCE, ISBN# 0786887591, $13.99, 790 pp. 

 
 

RELEASE 26 -  A VIOLENT '85 Contact With ETs in Russia!
  
VICTOR:

 

In order to make this report more readable for your huge lists, here is the intelligence lexicon that will make the following, still highly classified, CIA report more understandable.

 

GLOSSARY of TERMS:

 

CAC: Controlled Agency Contact
 CIA: Central Intelligence Agency

CO: CIA Case Officer

CRAFT: alien spacecraft

FAC: Foreign Agency Contact

HQ: Headquarters

KGB: Komitet Gosudarstvennoy Bezopasnosti (Committee for State Security)

NOC: Non-Official Cover (NO diplomatic immunity extended)

NSA: National Security Agency

OCCUPANTS: alien beings

PG: Polygraph

RA-049: Moscow CIA Station

CAC-049-0031: Reporting station for Controlled Agency Contact [49] followed by his number [31]

SC: Station Chief

SEVEN PRINCE: Codeword for intelligence collection within a foreign country

SEVEN PRINCE COBRA: Codeword for foreign intelligence collection within the old Soviet Union

 

My group and I have given you a very wide latitude in appending any additional information you feel that is relevant as you did with "Project SERPO" postings 23, 24 and 25; we were all very pleased. Please use your continued sound judgment and provide any additional supplementary material at the end that you feel would benefit and enrich this target audience.

 

Many of your sharp readers will note that there some glaring discrepancies in this report and will be surprised at its brevity and

often times broken syntax. It is IMPORTANT for everyone to READ MY NOTES CONCERNING THIS REPORT which I'll ask you to place immediately after the "Report of Contact."

 

More to come....

 

– ANONYMOUS

------------------------------------------

MODERATOR's NOTES:

 

As is my custom, I have corrected the original report for missing articles, punctuation (either missing or UNnecessary), faulty

parallelism/shifts in verb tense and hyphens inserted into compound modifiers, e.g., tight-fitting outfit, pear-shaped head, etc.

 

The sole intent is to make this stunning report more readable and flow better ... that's it.

 

However, the ORIGINAL 2-page CIA report has been included as an INLINE IMAGE and will appear on the SERPO.org Web site as thumbnails that one can click on for a larger image as was done in POSTING #23 at:

 

 http://serpo.org/release23.asp

 

For those who have followed the most recent "Project SERPO" postings, the following UFO-ET incident in the former Soviet Union will remind one of the infamous "Gate 3 Incident."

 

In this manner, researchers can examine and scrutinize the document itself to see if they believe it to be an authentic representation of the genuine artifact.

------------------------------------------

– BEGIN "Project SERPO" POSTING #26 –

 

CODEWORD: SEVEN PRINCE

 

SUMMARY OF INTELLIGENCE ACTIVITIES / REPORT OF CONTACT

 

STATION: RA-49

 

SOURCE: CAC-049-0031

 

DATE: 12 JAN 85

 

SUMMARY OF INFORMATION:

 

CAC reported a confrontation with an alleged space alien by Soviet military personnel at Ceremchovo. CAC was taken to the site after a "UFO" landed northwest of Ceremchova ICBM site 62 (Saskylach-Kovo).Soviet military personnel confronted the craft and its occupants. A confrontation developed and Soviet military personnel shot one of the occupants.

 

After the shooting incident, several other occupants of the craft retrieved the injured occupant and returned to their craft. A beam of light exited the craft and struck a Soviet military M40 jeep, COMPLETELY VAPORIZING THE VEHICLE. No Soviet military personnel were in the jeep during the attack.

 

Soviet military personnel fired several rounds of 12.7mm at the craft. One of the rounds struck the undercarriage of the craft. The craft glowed a bluish-green color. The craft's occupants, numbering four,exited the craft and were taken into custody by Soviet military personnel. The occupants were transported to the Saskylach-Kovo Military Barracks and detained.

 

CAC was given access to the occupants. CAC advised the occupants were dressed in a gray-colored, tight-fitting suit. All occupants appeared to look the same. They were described as:

 

height: 1 meter tall, weight: 25kg, no hair, four fingers and no thumbs, narrow feet with no big toe. The eyes were oversized compared to the size of their head. The head was pear-shaped. No ears were observed. The mouth consisted of just a small slit. A small nose was observed, but no nostrils were observed.

 

The occupants were interrogated, but would or could not understand Russian. Several other languages were attempted including English, French, German and Spanish. The craft's occupants would not respond. 24 hours after the occupants were detained inside a Soviet jail, THEY DISAPPEARED. The craft, which was secured by Soviet military personnel, [also] DISAPPEARED.

 

REPORT OF CONTACT – DETAILS:

 

On 22 Jan 85, CAC made contact through agent-communication-device-AN23, signaling the CO that a contact was requested. On 23 Jan 85, the SC approved a plan to conduct a closed interview of CAC at site 4-SO-P-6. The CO, with the assistance of CO2, CO3, CO4, CO5 and NOCS-223 and NOCS-101, made contact with CAC. The counter-surveillance report is attached.

 

Contact was made at site 6. A polygraph (SC requested a routine PG) was administered. NO deception was noted. The entire interview was recorded both on audio and video by CO3. The language used during the interview was in Russian. CAC advised of the following:

 

On 12 Jan 85, while working normal duties at Regional II, Soviet Control Center Command, CAC was informed of an incident at the Ceremchovo ICBM facility involving a UFO. Specific information was requested by Command Central. CAC read the initial cable from the on-scene Soviet commander.

 

The initial cable reported that a UFO had landed northwest of missile site K3. Soviet military personnel responded to the scene. A dark-colored UFO was found on the ground east of the missile command facility. One missile technician was standing near the east boundary, looking at the UFO. As Soviet military personnel came within close proximity of the UFO, two (2) occupants of the craft exited through a door. The occupants approached the east perimeter fence of K3.

 

Soviet military personnel challenged the occupants to stop. Three (3) of the four (4) occupants stopped.  The fourth occupant continued to advance towards the fence. One Soviet Military Security official fired several rounds from an AK-47a rifle, hitting the occupant. The occupant fell to the ground.

 

The three (3) other occupants advanced towards the injured occupant and retrieved the body. The four (4) returned to the craft. Approximately 2 minutes later, an opening appeared on the side of the craft. A BLUISH-GREEN BEAM OF LIGHT came out of the craft and struck an unoccupied jeep, COMPLETELY VAPORIZING IT. As the author of the report being read by CAC stated, the JEEP JUST DISAPPEARED.

 

An armored vehicle moved up towards the craft and fired a volley of 12.7mm rounds at the craft. The craft was struck near the undercarriage.
  

The four (4) occupants, minus the injured occupant, exited the craft and walked towards the Soviet military personnel. As one of the on-scene commanders stated, the four (4) occupants did NOT appear to be afraid. They approached the armored vehicle and sat on the ground. Soviet commanders on scene assumed the occupants were surrendering.

 

Several attempts were made to communicate with these occupants using the Russian language. The occupants did not seem to understand the speaker. The occupants were carried to a jeep and transported to the Saskylach-Kovo Military Barracks, Building Number 45. (Note: CAC-049-63 had reported Building Number 45 was KGB headquarters for Region II, command center. This information was verified by NSA source Echo-3.)

 

The occupants were placed inside detention cells, one (1) occupant per cell. CAC arrived at Saskylach-Kovo  Military Barracks, Building Number 45 on 13 Jan 85. CAC was allowed to enter each cell and attempt to communicate with the occupants. CAC used English, French and German languages. The occupants would appear to listen while CAC was speaking, but would not answer. The occupants appeared to be very passive.

 

Two (2) other KGB officials, one speaking Spanish and the other speaking English, attempted to communicate, but to no avail. The Soviet Military Command Center commander advised that Moscow was requesting the occupants be flown to Military Barracks 10 (intelligence historical records indicate Barracks 10 was located in Obninsk, south of Moscow).

 

On 14 Jan 85, at approximately 0630 hours, the CELLS where the OCCUPANTS were located were EMPTY. NO signs of a forcible exit was observed. The CRAFT, which was being guarded by the elite Soviet Border Patrol Branch G, ALSO DISAPPEARED. CAC reported Soviet KGB officials took over 100 PHOTOGRAPHS and one (1) video recording of the occupants. CAC provided 25 copies of the photographs to this [CIA] CO.

 

ANALYSIS – SOURCE: CAC is well known to HQ. He has reported RELIABLE information for the past 22 years. CAC is the best deep access agent available to our operating location. The information provided by CAC is somewhat UNBELIEVABLE based on the SUBJECT MATTER.

 

However, this CO feels the information warrants further study. CO feels additional assets should be directed towards the target area to confirm CAC's information. Examination of the photographs revealed the occupants DID NOT APPEAR TO BE HUMANS. We will allow HQ analysts to make a more accurate interpretation of these photographs.

 

PLAN OF OPERATION:

 

After conferring with the SC, the CO will plan a course of action to determine the reliability of CAC and the credibility of the information provided by CAC. Sierra report will accompany this report.

 

[BLACKED OUT information.]

 

049-004

 

– END "Project SERPO POSTING #26 –

-----------------------------------------

ANONYMOUS' SUPPLEMENTARY NOTES:

 

VICTOR:

 

You may present these background notes I have provided you in whatever order and presentation you wish. [I'm going to use what is known in expository writing as "transitional writing/style" with block paragraphing.]

 

1) The initial "Report of Contact" is made from the field station chief directly to CIA headquarters in Langley, VA.

 

2) What I've provided you is only a "Report of Contact" which we refer to as "raw intelligence" or you would term a "rough draft" as an English teacher. This "Report of Contact" is the first thing "out of the gate" and basically serves more as a summary of events which is compiled while people's memories are still fresh; this is why it's so short.

 

3) The actual, FINAL report is called a SIERRA REPORT and is an extremely detailed presentation of ALL the intel collection activity on a particular event with all COs [CIA Case Officers] as well as NOCs submitting their own reports. Additionally, the Sierra Report will contain any known/taken PHOTOGRAPHS, RECORDINGS (and an abstract of what's on the recordings and a brief summary of what the photos purportedly show), POLYGRAPH [lie detector] test results and, of course, all of the individual field reports.

 

All of this is then given to one or two CIA analysts who then -- much like you would either as an editor or a teacher -- assemble all of this data and place it in the proper format and style for acceptable presentation. After this, the CIA SC signs off on the Sierra Report. This information is then routed via diplomatic pouch to CIA management at Langley and then distributed to the "need-to-know" management personnel and routed appropriately from there.

 

In the case of this Soviet ETE-human contact incident, if I recall, the Sierra Report was somewhere in the 66-70 page range for this event alone.

 

4) When our CAC first made us aware of this incident -- even before the "Report of Contact" was finalized -- the SC sent a teletype from the Moscow station to CIA HQ.

 

TELETYPE messages are broken down into four (4) categories:

 

a) FLASH Message: urgent, T/S [top secret] codeword given/required;

 

b) IMMEDIATE Message: classified at least at the "secret" level; must be sent out within 24 hours;

 

c) PRIORITY Message: "confidential" or "secret" message; this is a backup and/or provides additional information to an "immediate" message;

 

d) ROUTINE Message: normal traffic; cannot contain any intelligence info; must be NON-classified material; often times it is publicly accessible information such as newspaper stories, magazine articles and other published media reports.

 

Of particular note, it is the NOCs [non-official cover personnel] who are the James Bond, cloak-and-dagger types whom you see portrayed in the movies, TV and popular literature, NOT our CIA's COs [case officers].

 

This information should provide your large readership the proper context and framework this 2-page report was presented in.

 

More to come....

 

– ANONYMOUS

-----------------------------------------  
doc 1

Click image to enlarge.

doc 2  

Click image to enlarge.

 -------------------------------------------------------------

MODERATOR's END NOTES:

 

1) The use of an energy-directed beam in vaporizing the Soviet jeep vehicle is very reminiscent of the security guard being similarly vaporized by the CBE-1 [Cloned Biological Entity-1 aka an "Archquloid"] as told in the "Gate 3 Incident" now memorialized in "Project SERPO" POSTING #23 at:

 

 http://serpo.org/release23.asp

 

NOTE: I am withholding information on the CBE-1's use of the energy-directed beam device for a future SERPO posting pending some specific information.

 

2) Like you, I also noted the two (2) major discrepancies in the stunning report you have just read. However, I feel that this was

sufficiently addressed in ANONYMOUS' SUPPLEMENTARY NOTES. Based on what he's stated, the initial raw report was most certainly "polished" later on for grammar, style, usage and agreement/consistency of all reported and known facts as laid out in the "Report of Contact."

 

3) In the REPORT OF CONTACT, it's noted that two (2), not three (3) occupants exited the craft and then says three of the four stopped. At what point did the third and fourth alien occupants exit their alien craft? As I said, this WAS the initial, RAW REPORT ("rough draft") and reporting gaps like this were most certainly covered, addressed and answered when the final SIERRA REPORT was issued.

 

4) I am ONLY the messenger for this report ... it's up to the UFO community, professional investigators, authors, and even "armchair" UFO researchers to determine the validity of this truly amazing -- IF TRUE -- ET-human encounter in the old Soviet Union over 22 years ago....

------------------------------------------

SUPPLEMENTARY BACKGROUND INFORMATION ON THE TWO KEY INTELLIGENCE AGENCIES INVOLVED IN THE 1985 SOVIET UFO INCIDENT

 

– THE CENTRAL INTELLIGENCE AGENCY –

 

The CENTRAL INTELLIGENCE AGENCY was established by President Truman to coordinate U.S. intelligence and became a a global agency for collecting and evaluating intelligence and for extending U.S. influence through covert action.

 

The CIA was conceived of by Major General William "Wild Bill" Donovan, director of the Office of Strategic Services [OSS = "Oh, So Social!"]. Jokesters said that because a great number of OSS operatives came from aristocratic backgrounds and Ivy League universities who had been recruited by Arnold Wolfers, master of Pierson College.

 

In 1944, Donovan suggested to President Roosevelt that after WWII, the United States should create a peacetime, worldwide intelligence service. On Thursday, September 18, 1947, the Central Intelligence Agency was born.

 

A 1949 amendment to the 1947 act permitted the CIA to keep its official titles and salaries secret, hide its budget, and award contracts to private firms without bids. The agency was also allowed to award permanent residency to aliens and their families. This usually meant giving sanctuary to defectors and foreign agents.

 

The CIA set up an Office of Special Operations (OSO) to handle covert action. In June 1948, another NSC (National Security Council) directive authorized "preventive direct action, including sabotage, anti-sabotage, demolition and evacuation measures, subversion against hostile states, including assistance to underground resistance groups...."

 

During the UFO-Soviet Union incident, the Director of the CIA was William J Casey, appointed by President Ronald Reagan, and served as the DCI from January 28, 1981 - January 29, 1987. Serving as the DDCI was John N McMahon, also appointed by Reagan, and he served from June 10, 1982 - March 29, 1986.

 

FOOTNOTE: Current Secretary of Defense Robert M Gates, temporarily served as acting director during Casey's illness from Dec 18, 1986 - May 26, 1987.

 

INTELLIGENCE GROUPS TO KNOW

 

SPECIAL GROUP: The Special Group was a senior interdepartmental organization tasked with overseeing the CIA's high-risk COVERT operations during the 1950s and early 1960s. Also known as the 5412 Group, the Special Group traced its lineage to the early Operations Coordinating Board (OCB). The OCB was later renamed the 5412 Group, or simply the Special Group.

 

During the administration of President John Kennedy, the Special Group was known as the 303 Committee -- after a room in the executive office complex in Washington, D.C. The group was later known respectively as the 40 Committee and then the Operations Advisory Group. Members of the Special Group included representatives from the U.S. Dept of State, the U.S. Dept of Defense, the Joint Chiefs of Staff (JCS), the Oval Office and the CIA.

 

OPERATIONS ADVISORY GROUP: During the administration of Richard Nixon, the 303 Committee became known as the 40 Committee. After the Church Committee hearings of 1975, and the subsequent establishment of the Intelligence Oversight Board (IOB), the 40 Committee was renamed the Operations Advisory Group.

 

OPERATIONS COORDINATING BOARD: The Operations Coordinating Board or OCB was the first in a series of senior interdepartmental organizations tasked with overseeing the CIA's high-risk covert operations. On September 3, 1953, President Dwight Eisenhower issued Executive Order (EO) 10483, which created the OCB (EO 10483 also eliminated the Psychological Strategy Board). On February 19, 1961, President John Kennedy issued a directive abolishing the OCB. All OCB functions were

rolled into the SPECIAL GROUP.

 

The CIA's headquarters: Is it in Langley or McLean, VA? Technically, CIA headquarters is in both. "Langley" is the name of the McLean neighborhood in which CIA headquarters, also known as the George Bush Center for Intelligence, is located. The town of McLean was founded in 1910. Before that time, the area where CIA headquarters is located was known as Langley.

 

In 1906, a railroad began operating, and the population of Langley and nearby Lewinsville quickly grew. In 1910, the post offices of these towns closed, and a new post office, McLean, was opened. In 1959, the U.S. government broke ground for the CIA headquarters building. Construction was completed in 1961, adding another chapter to McLean's long history. Despite the name change in 1910, the name "Langley" is still used to describe the area.

 

– – The KGB OF THE SOVIET UNION – –

 

KGB – KOMITET GOSUDARSTVENNOY BEZOPASNOSTI [Committee for State Security]: It was the Soviet agency responsible for state security from March 1954 until Oct 1991 -- the eve of the demise of the Soviet Union in December 1991.

 

Subsequently, the principal foreign intelligence functions of the KGB were assigned to the newly established Central Intelligence Service. In addition, from 1960 to 1966, the KGB was also responsible for the internal security of the Soviet Union.

 

The KGB's functions included counterespionage, foreign intelligence collection and analysis, counterintelligence for the armed forces, protection of LAND and maritime BORDERS and certain SPECIAL SECURITY FUNCTIONS, among them the CONTROL OF NUCLEAR WEAPONS, communications for national leadership, and provision of the Kremlin guards.

 

The KGB was the world's largest intelligence and police agency, probably larger than all Western intelligence agencies combined. For most of its existence, it was responsible for the functions that in the United States are carried out by the CIA, NSA, FBI, DIA, Marine Corps embassy guards, military counterintelligence agencies, the U.S Border Patrol, Coast Guard and the U.S. Secret Service.

 

During the time of the alien craft landing in January 1985, V M Chebrikov was the chairman of the KGB from Dec 1982 - Aug 1988. 
  

KGB ORGANIZATION: The basic organization of the KGB in its later years provided for nine (9) chief directorates:

 

FIRST Chief Directorate: Foreign intelligence, active measures, counterintelligence, analysis.

 

SECOND Chief Directorate: Domestic counterintelligence, countersubversion, industrial security.

 

THIRD Chief Directorate: Counterintelligence and countersubversion within the Soviet armed forces, including the Special Departments (Osobye Otdely or OO).

 

FOURTH Chief Directorate: Embassy security and internal security.

 

FIFTH Chief Directorate: Dissidents.

 

SIXTH Chief Directorate: Economic, secret, political and transport.

 

SEVENTH Chief Directorate: Surveillance equipment.

 

EIGHTH Chief Directorate: Signals Intelligence, communications security.

 

NINTH Chief Directorate: Protection of national leadership and sensitive installations, including the Kremlin guards. During the 1980s, the KGB was estimated to number more than 400,000 personnel, including 230,000 to 250,000 border troops and approximately 50,000 signal and security troops supporting the national and Communist Party leadership. There were also several hundred thousand KGB informers within Soviet society, including the government and armed forces.

 

It has been estimated that between 40% to 60% of Soviet Embassy officials in Washington, D.C., were attached to the KGB. Officers of the KGB also served in combat areas, supporting Soviet military and state interests. From 1954 to 1989, a total of 572 KGB personnel were killed "rendering military-technical assistance to other countries" -- including Arab countries, North Vietnam and Afghanistan -- and in border conflicts.

 

The KGB and its predecessors operated a large education and training network, with several spy schools to train Soviet and Eastern European intelligence and security personnel. The training facility at Pushkina, near Moscow, was used extensively to train Arab terrorists.

------------------------------------------

Sources:

 

ENCYCLOPEDIA OF THE CENTRAL INTELLIGENCE AGENCY – By W Thomas Smith, Jr, ISBN# 0816046670, $19.95, 282 pp., pp. 180, 213, 258, 260-62.

 

SPY BOOK: THE ENCYCLOPEDIA OF ESPIONAGE, 2nd ed, – By Polmar and Allen, ISBN# 0375720251, $21.95, 719 pp., pp. 126-134, 355-358.

------------------------------------------

SUGGESTED/RECOMMENDED READING:

 

 http://www.amazon.com/Soviet-Ufo-Files-Paranormal-Encounters/dp/1858338581

 

 http://www.amazon.com/Soviet-Ufo-Files-Paranormal-Encounters/dp/0756775116

 

SOVIET UFO FILES: PARANORMAL ENCOUNTERS BEHIND THE IRON CURTAIN –

By Paul Stonehill (Author), Philip Mantle (Foreword)

 

PRODUCT DETAILS:

 

List Price: $25.00

Hardcover: 123 pages

Publisher: Diane Pub Co (February 1998)

Language: English

ISBN-10: 0756775116

ISBN-13: 978-0756775117

Product Dimensions:  10.5 x 8.5 x 0.7 inches

 

Shipping Weight: 1.6 pounds (View shipping rates and policies) Average Customer Review: based on 3 reviews

Amazon.com Sales Rank: #1,737,882 in Books

 

AUTHOR's COMMENTS:    

 

I feel I need to add a few words about the book. The publishers gave me only 124 pages to write about Soviet and Russian UFO phenomenon. I was able to include as much fascinating information as possible; to give more details and discuss cases and patterns, I would need hundreds of pages.

 

But this is a great book, and a good introduction to the subject for those who know little about the secrets of Soviet paranormal phenomena. There are addresses of Russian and Ukrainian researchers, should you wish to contact them.

 

Western readers will learn of such amazing stories as the Ishimba 1953 incident over the taiga; strange account of the Phobos II demise; will see excerpts from the KGB files; and follow reports of Soviet military observers who had to report STRANGE OBJECTS IN THE SKY OVER THEIR NUCLEAR MISSILE SILOS, submarines, secret cosmodromes ... Chernobyl,

Monchegorsk, Dalnegorsk, Tunguska, the World War II sightings, ancient Russian UFO sightings ... the book covers a lot.

 

Again, I am proud of my efforts, and am eternally grateful to my contacts in the former Soviet Union, modern Russia, my country of birth Ukraine, Uzbekistan, and all others. Whether you buy the book or not is up to you....

 

– PAUL STONEHILL

 

 rurcla@hotmail.com

 

© 1996 - 2007, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates


    
 

RELEASE 26a - Russian Version of Violent ET Encounter from KGB!

ANONYMOUS COMMENTS:

 

VICTOR:

 

The Russian version differs in many aspects from our American CIA version,  but I am not surprised. In all of my years in intelligence, the raw intelligence reports are vastly different than the later detailed, final Sierra reports. My guess is that the CIA case officers wrote out the report in a very rough draft and then sent it on to HQ which is the version we gave you. 

 

I'm sure the more detailed report, which I would love to see, has all of the particulars contained in the attached translation. Or, maybe the CIA case officers who initially reported the first event did not have any further intel data from their CAC of the incident beyond the reported activity at the missile site. This Russian version of the same encounter greatly expands on the series of events that took place AFTER the Visitors were remanded into KGB custody.

 

TRANSLATION of E-mail received on August 25, 2007 from KGB officer and Major IVAN.

------------------------------------------

– BEGIN: RETIRED KGB MAJOR IVAN WRITES:

 

I do recall the incident posted on the American e-mail system by this Victor. But the details are all wrong. 

 

The incident happened on 11 Jan 1985. On the early morning hours of 11 Jan, radar stations in northern Siberia registered two (2) unknown flying objects coming into the Soviet Union. The two radar objects flew at great speeds, and registered at 2,000 kilometers per hour. 

 

Soviet Air Defense Systems launched four (4) interceptor airplanes to identify the radar objects. Strategic Forces Chief of Staff (GURVO) was notified. It was  difficult to track these radar objects. They were flying so fast (or "at great speeds") the interceptors could not catch (or track) the objects. A Soviet General, who was in charge of air defenses for the northern sector (Siberia) claimed the objects were missiles because of the great speeds they were traveling at in our country. 

 

The General alerted all interior defense sectors (the Soviet Union had a perimeter of air defense, from the exterior frontier to the

interior). The Interior radar sites could not track the two objects because they were traveling too fast. Border Guards and the Chief Directorate sent controlled messages updating GURVO. They would be on the radar screens for just a few seconds, compared to a regular flying aircraft that would appear for minutes. 

 

The General also said the two objects were flying erratically. The objects were flying from a high altitude to a lower altitude within just a few seconds. No normal airplane could fly like that. This worried many Soviet Command Staff personnel. Soviet radar lost track of the two objects in the central part of the country. A brief radar contact was observed north of Bratsk.

 

Sometime around noon on 11 Jan, Soviet Internal Police reported residents of Zhmurova reported a strange object in a collective (farm) field. Police arrived in Zhmurova from Cheremkhova and Kyuta. Two police officers drove to the object. They observed a second object flying directly above the ground object. The police officers tried to radio their command center in Cheremkhova, but their radio did not work.

 

The police officers did not see any occupants from the object. The police officers drove away and their radio was functional. About 15 minutes later, the object flew away from Zhmurova. The police officers notified the Soviet Military Base in Cheremkhova and warned them of the two objects flying east. A military helicopter flew from Cheremkhova west towards Zhmurova. 

 

The two pilots later reported seeing the two flying unknown (unidentified) objects east at a higher altitude and at a great speed. The objects flew directly towards a missile site. Soviet Military Command Central notified the missile base and warned them of the intruding flying objects. GUCOS (ICBM Chief Directorate Chief) was sent an urgent controlled message.

 

The missile base went on high alert ("priority alert" in Russian). Military guards watched the two objects approach the missile

base. One of the objects flew very low over the base.

 

Military guards fired antiaircraft guns at the approaching object. The bullets (SHELLS) struck the enemy object, but was ABSORBED or PASSED DIRECTLY through the object. The craft glowed a BLUISH-GREEN COLOR and then landed. Military guards surrounded the object. Personnel from the SECOND Chief Directorate in conjunction with  GRU-MRVD, responded. The object opened a door and a bright light appeared in the doorway. Five (5) occupants walked out of this light and onto the ground.

 

Military guards ordered the occupants to lie down. The order was given in Russian. The five (5) occupants did nothing and stood

together. One of the military commanders gave instructions in English, but the occupants still did nothing. One of the occupants walked towards the military guards. One military guard fired a rifle and hit the occupant in the chest. The occupant fell to the ground. The other our (4) occupants walked to the fallen occupant and just sat on the ground. 

 

Military guards surrounded the five (5)  occupants and pushed them, with their rifles in a gesture towards a military vehicle. The four occupants carried their fallen comrade to the military vehicle. The occupants were driven to a detainment facility (confinement facility) in Cheremkhova briefly. They were transferred to a bigger vehicle and taken to a military compound in Irkutsk. The Military Intelligence/Interrogation building within the Irkutsk Military Command Central was used. 

 

Military officials attempted to interrogate the four (4) occupants. Many different languages were used: English, Spanish,

German, but the occupants never acknowledged any language. The injured occupant received first aid by a Soviet Military Doctor. The doctor told the commander in charge that THE INJURED OCCUPANT WAS NOT HUMAN.

 

The injured occupant's blood was thick white fluid. The internal organs of the occupant was different than humans.  The occupants were radiographed (X-rayed). The occupants were described as being approximately 1.2 meters in height and weighed

approximately 100 kilograms. The occupants had no ears, no thumbs, small horizontal openings for mouths and no hair. The occupants were wearing identical one-piece flying suits, gray in color. 

 

Suddenly (eventually), the injured occupant stood up and walked to the other occupants. The injured occupant seemed HEALED. The occupants had no weapons or other equipment on their persons (bodies). GRU officials arrived and took over the interrogation. 

 

One KGB official was on scene with the GRU. Commander, GRU-CMRD received a controlled urgent message updating the status of the occupants and craft. Military officials examined the occupants' craft. It appeared the craft was not made from any

technology known to the military officials examining the craft. The interior of the craft was very small. Only small Soviet military

officials could enter. NO instrument panels or navigation controls were observed. There was one (1) DISPLAY PANEL which appeared to be similar to a TELEVISION SCREEN.

 

SMALL HAND INDENTATIONS WERE LOCATED ON THE DISPLAY PANELS. The occupants were transferred from Irkutsk by a Soviet military plane to Moscow. The occupants' craft was loaded onto a large truck and driven to Irkutsk. The occupants arrived in a location south of Moscow and detained inside a confinement center. They were given water and

food (Russian black bread and soup). The occupants did not eat or drink. 

 

Several interrogation sessions occurred with the occupants by KGB and Soviet Military Linguists from the SECOND Chief Directorate, and the KGB language school were present, but the occupants never spoke nor communicated. 

 

On 14 Jan 85, in the early morning hours, the five (5) occupants escaped from their confinement rooms (cells). A large search was initiated, but the five occupants were not found. The captured craft was stored in a hanger at a military base. On 14 Jan 85, the craft flew out of the hanger, destroying the hanger door with a BLUISH BEAM OF LIGHT. This was the ending [end] of the incident.

 

This incident became very secretive within the KGB/GRU. Many senior officials within the Kremlin were worried. But it seemed that the Kremlin knew something about these crafts. Senior officials were not surprised, but only concerned about the (successful) penetration into the country. GUCOS and GURVO updated reporting procedures and debriefed personnel.

 

I have not thought of this incident in many, many years. I wish I could go to the Kremlin today and look up the documents. But I am retired, and I cannot have access. Please make your American friends know the TRUTH. The CIA was wrong ... THEIR SPIES LIED. But what worries me is that the CIA had spies within our Soviet military that we NEVER caught.

 

– END: KGB MAJOR IVAN's REPORT

 

MODERATOR's CLOSING NOTE: Our CIA would have NO reason to "lie" about the number of alien craft nor the number of alien beings during this incident. Due to the number of translation problems we encountered, "lie" in this case may be more like a "discrepancy."

------------------------------------------

MODERATOR's END NOTES:

 

Here are some highly relevant passages from four (4) classic UFO books that EVERYone should be familiar with.

 

For those FEW of you (I hope!) who have NOT read Phil Corso's landmark 1997 book, THE DAY AFTER ROSWELL, I strongly recommend that you do so at your earliest convenience as it'll provide a wealth of background information and what in education is called "prior knowledge" as a concept.

 

Here are some choice, relevant excerpts from Corso's book:

 

THE USE OF A HEADBAND IN THE ALIEN NAVIGATION SYSTEM:

 

Then there was the strangest device of all, a headband, almost with electrical-signal pickup devices on either side. These eyewitness reports suggested to me that the sensors stimulated different parts of the brain while at the same time exchanged information with the brain.

 

Again, using the analogy of an EEG, these devices were a very sophisticated mechanism for translating the electrical impulses inside the creatures' brains into specific commands. Perhaps these headband devices comprised the pilot interface of the ship's navigational and propulsion system.

 

At first, I didn't know, but it was only when we began development of the long brain-wave research project toward the end of my tenure at the Pentagon that I realized just what we had and how it might be developed. It took a long time to harvest this technology, but 50 years after Roswell, versions of these devices eventually became a component of the navigational control system for some of the army's most sophisticated helicopters and will soon be on the American consumer electronics market

as user-input devices for personal computer games [they are today 60 years later].

 

The first Army Air Force analysts and engineers both at the 509th and at Wright Field were also bedeviled by the lack of any traditional controls and propulsion system in the crashed vehicle. Looking at their reports and the artifacts from the perspective of 1961, however, I imagined that the keys to understanding what made the craft go and directed its flight lay not only with the craft itself, but in the RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN THE PILOTS AND THE CRAFT.

 

If we hypothesized a brain-wave guidance system that was as specific to the pilots' electronic signature as it was to the spacecraft's, then we were looking at an entirely revolutionary concept of guided flight in which THE PILOT WAS THE SYSTEM. Imagine transportation devices in which the key to the ignition is a digitized code derived from your

electroencephalographic signature and is read automatically upon your donning some sort of sensorized headband.

 

The engineers who first discovered this were amazed at the pure conductivity of these skins, functionally like the skin of the craft

itself, and their obvious ability to protect the wearer while at the same time vectoring some kind of electronic field. Where was the physical junction of the circuit between the pilot and the ship? Was it turned on and off somehow by the pilot himself through a switch we didn't know about?

 

Alongside the riddle of the apparent absence of navigational controls, I listed the sensorized headband that so intrigued the officers at Roswell's Walker Field and fascinated me as well. If, as we all suspected, this device picked up the electronic signatures from the creatures' oversized brains, what did it do with them?

 

I believed that these headbands translated the brain's electronic signals into system commands that controlled speed, direction and elevation. Maybe the headbands had to be calibrated or tuned to each individual pilot, or maybe the pilots had to be calibrated to the headband. Either way, the headbands were the interface between the pilot and the ship. But that still didn't resolve the question of the lack of cables, gears or wires.

 

Maybe the answer lay NOT in the lack of structural controls, but in the way the suit, the headband, the creatures' brains and the entire craft worked together. In other words, when I looked at the possible function of the entire system, the synchronicity between the brain interface in the headband, the pure conductivity of the spacecraft, and the elongated structure of the space skins, which also acted like a circuit, I could see how directional instructions could have been translated by the headbands into some form of current flowing through the skins and into the series of RAISED DECK PANELS where there were INDENTATIONS FOR THE CREATURES' HANDS.

 

The INDENTATIONS on these PANELS, as the Roswell field reports described them, LOOKED LIKE THE HANDPRINTS  pressed into the concrete at the old Grauman's Chinese Theater in Hollywood.

 

NOTE: KGB major wrote: "Small hand INDENTATIONS were located on the display PANELS."

 

Were the directional commands a series of electronic instructions transmitted directly from the creatures' brains along their bodies and through the panels into the ship itself as if the ship were only an extension of the creature's body? For that to have been the case, something was still missing. The engine.

 

What if the craft itself were the engine, imparted with a steady current from another source that it stored as if it were a giant capacitor? I suspected the Roswell craft was simply a capacitor that stored current that was controlled or vectored by the pilot and was able to be recharged in some way or could recharge itself with some form of built-in generator.

 

That's the way I believed the spacecraft was navigated, by DIRECT INTERACTION BETWEEN THE ELECTRONIC WAVES GENERATED WITHIN THE MINDS OF THE PILOTS AND THE CRAFT's DIRECTIONAL CONTROLS. The electronic brain signals were interpreted and transmitted by the headband devices, which served as interfaces [and perhaps used the "SMALL HAND INDENTATIONS" described by the the KGB major on the ship's PANEL to interface with the ship].

 

If the Soviets had gotten their hands on some of the apparatus from any one of the alien spacecraft that had gone down since 1947 -- and I didn't know how many there were -- they'd have figured out by now that the aliens had used some form of brain-wave control for navigation. How they directed their thoughts or translated them into an electronic circuit, we didn't know.

 

But we knew that there were no steering wheels or conventional methods of control on the spacecraft, and the headbands we found with the electronic sensors on them were designed to pick up some form of signal from the brain. The analysts at Wright Field believed that the sensors on the headbands corresponded with points on the multilobed alien brain that generated low-frequency waves, so the headbands formed an integral part of the circuit.

 

THE ALIEN PROPULSION SYSTEM

 

There were no conventional technological explanations for the way the Roswell craft's propulsion system operated. There were no atomic engines, no rockets, no jets, nor any propeller-driven form of thrust. The craft was able to displace gravity through the propagation of magnetic wave, controlled by shifting the magnetic poles around the craft so as to control, or vector, not a propulsion system, but the REPULSION FORCE of like charges.

 

Once they realized this, engineers at our country's primary defense contractors raced among themselves to figure out how the craft could retain its electric capacity and how the pilots who navigated it could live within the energy field of a wave.

 

The initial revelations into the nature of the spacecraft and its pilot interface came very quickly during the first few years of testing at Norton AFB. The air force discovered that the entire vehicle functioned just like a giant capacitor. In other words, the craft itself stored the energy necessary to propagate the magnetic wave that elevated it, allowed it to achieve escape velocity from the earth's gravity, and enabled it to achieve speeds of over 7,000 mph.

 

The pilots weren't affected by the tremendous g-forces that build up in the acceleration of conventional aircraft because to aliens inside, it was as if gravity was being folded around the outside of the wave that enveloped the craft. Maybe it was like traveling inside the eye of a hurricane. But how did the pilots interface with the wave form they were generating?

 

The secret to this system could be found in the single-piece skin-tight coveralls spun around the creatures. The lengthwise atomic alignment of the strange fabric was a clue that somehow the pilots became part of the electrical storage and generation of the craft itself.

 

They didn't just pilot or navigate the vehicle ... they became part of the electrical circuitry of the vehicle, vectoring it in a way similar to the way you order a voluntary muscle to move. The vehicle was simply an extension of their own bodies because it was tied into their neurological systems in ways that even today we are just beginning to utilize.

 

So the creatures were able to survive extended periods living inside a high-energy wave by becoming the primary circuit in the control of the wave. They were protected by their suits, which enclosed them head to feet, but THEIR SUITS ENABLED THEM TO BECOME ONE WITH THE VEHICLE, literally part of the wave.

 

In 1947, this was a technology so new to us that it was as frightening as it was frustrating. If we could only develop the power source necessary to generate a consistently well-defined magnetic wave around a vehicle, we could harness a technology by which we would have surpassed all forms of rocket and jet propulsion. It's a process we're still trying to master today, 50 years [60 years now] after the craft fell into our possession.

 

And from Timothy Good's book, ALIEN LIAISON:

 

In response to a question on UFOs from a group of workers in the Urals in early 1990, President Mikhail Gorbachev stated that "the phenomenon of UFOs DOES exist, and it must be treated SERIOUSLY."

 

Times have certainly changed, but the Committee for State Security (KGB) still maintains firm control over the dissemination of information on the subject, principally through its THIRD Chief Directorate, which deals with military counterintelligence [See "Project SERPO" POSTING #26 section, "The KGB of The Soviet Union."]

 

During a screening of the film "E.T." at the White House in the summer of 1982, President Reagan is reported to have whispered to producer Steven Spielberg: "There are probably only six (6) people in this room who know how TRUE this is."

 

In addition, Reagan has publicly stated on at least three (3) occasions that a threat from outer space would have a unifying effect on the world's nations, and he has raised the matter with both President Gorbachev and Edvard Shevardnadze, the former

Soviet Foreign Minister.

 

Some years ago, Bill Moore [UFO researcher/author] learned of the existence of a SPECIAL INTEREST GROUP within the DIA [Defense Intelligence Agency] which comprised two (2) distinct branches feeding data to "Project AQUARIUS" which was supervised by the DIA's Directorate for Management and Operations.

 

One was lodged at the DIA's imagery division (DC5C) and operated from the Melpar Building in Falls Church, VA, with an additional presence at the Digital Imagery Processing Service (DIPS) in the Naval Intelligence Support Center (NISC), Suitland, MD.

 

"The group oversaw a small 'black' budget appropriation and need-to-know access was maintained by probably NOT MORE THAN A DOZEN INDIVIDUALS at any given time," Bill reports.

 

"Over a space of several years, I only ever heard three (3) names of people reportedly associated with it. I have been led to understand since then that the group, now referred to as a 'working committee' underwent something of a reorganization in the latter part of 1986, and as far as I know, it continues to function. One of the results of that reorganization was the establishment of a computerized database and communications net known, curiously enough, as 'MJ-SETI.' "

 

MODERATOR's NOTE: This group from the Defense Intelligence Agency continues its work today under ANONYMOUS and the "DIA-6" comprised of former and current, active members of the DIA with full access to the "Briefing Control Access Roster." I have been asked NOT disclose its official name as it is actually known in government circles.

 

Another visit was to a bunker-like building north of Houston, where Bob Oechsler learned how to operate a peculiar PANEL that he believes must have come from an alien craft.

 

"It had a series of vertical cylinders made of MULTICOLORED LIGHTS that terminated in a hood about 4 feet above the panel. When one inserts a HAND to break the beam, and then raises or lowers a hand, a comparable action takes place with what appears to be some kind of clear-looking cylinder that resides in the base of the CONSOLE corresponding to each beam. It was some kind of CONTROL PANEL -- that was all I learned. I think it was being considered for use in the UFO exhibit area of Cosmic Journey."

 

NOTE: "The small hand indentations ... on the display panels" in the KGB major's report.

 

And now from another Timothy Good book, ALIEN BASE:

 

INSIDE THE SPACECRAFT

 

The following evening, [Howard] Menger was taken on board one of the spacecraft for the first time; a short hop from one of the landing sites to another. Just before entering the craft, one of the spacemen pointed an instrument at Menger and a BLUISH BEAM OF LIGHT struck his head, producing a rather pleasant tingling sensation.

 

"We projected the beam on you to condition and process your body quickly so you could enter the craft," Menger was told. "What actually happened was that the beam changed your body frequency to equal that of the craft. Thus you felt entirely comfortable inside the craft and suffered no ill effects."

 

HOWARD MENGER WRITES:

 

We stepped into a large circular room. In the center of it was an ample-sized round table made of translucent material. Under the

table-top, pulsating lights of many colors moved. The dowel-shaped stem supporting the table was set in what appeared to be a huge magnifying glass, itself set into the floor. Approximately one third of the circular room was devoted to INSTRUMENT PANELS containing many colored lights blinking on and off. In front of the control board was a frame containing what I guessed was some kind of VIEWING SCREEN.

 

THE VOICE

 

"The HULL has a field about it which REPELS all other matter [shells/bullets fired at it]. Your physicists would describe the force involved as the "anti" particle of the binding energy of the atom. When certain elements such as platinum are properly prepared and treated with a saturation exposure to a beam of very high-energy photons, the anti-binding energy particle will be generated outside of the nucleus.

 

Since these particles tend to REPEL each other, as well as all other matter, they like the electron tend to migrate to the surface of the metal where they manifest as a REPELLENT FORCE. Perhaps you noticed that the HULL seemed unusually smooth and slippery. That is because your flesh did NOT ACTUALLY COME INTO CONTACT WITH THE METAL, but was held a

short distance from it by the REPULSION of the field.

 

We use the FIELD TO PROTECT THE HULL from being scratched or damaged [or attacked] during landings. It also lowers air friction greatly when it becomes necessary to travel at high speed through any atmosphere. The field produces an almost perfect laminar flow of air or any gas about the craft, and little heat is generated or transmitted to the hull."

 

And lastly, from yet another of Timothy Good's fine books, BEYOND TOP SECRET:

 

INSIDE THE CRAFT

 

Each of the rooms that was occupied had INSTRUMENT PANELS on the walls, with the [alien] crew members concentrating on the instruments. Some rooms had four or five instruments, others had 15 or 20, but they were of a similar type in each room. They were NOTHING LIKE OURS. There were no screens, such as our oscilloscopes. They had meters, but I could not see dials on them. He said they lit up only when in use.

 

Sid Padrick was shown an oblong lens, which he took to be part of a VIEWING SYSTEM, with a magnified three-dimensional effect. He [the alien] told me that the power source [of the craft he was in] was transferred to them from the other craft, and that it did all of the navigation and manipulation through space. He told me they don't measure time and distance as we know it, but rather in terms of light. When I asked him how fast they travelled through space, he answered that their speed was limited only by the speed at which they could transfer their energy source.

 

THE AZTEC CASE

 

According to Otto Krause, there were no survivors from the craft which crashed near Aztec. "All the bodies inside were dead," Alfred told me. "The one at Aztec is the one they gained the technology from...."

 

Further information on what seems almost certainly to have been the Aztec crash has been provided by a former military officer to the reliable researcher, Chuck Oldham. While stationed at a certain base, the officer's special security clearance enabled him to gain ACCESS TO A RESTRICTED LIBRARY, where he studied a file describing the retrieval of an alien craft and its dead occupants.

 

The aliens found inside were described as beings like us, but smaller. Two of the bodies were badly charred, though the clothing -- 1-piece flight suits woven with a type of fabric with a tensile strength of 800 lb/in² -- was unaffected.

 

No reference to the craft's propulsion system was made in the report other than that technology utilizing MAGNETIC or GRAVITATIONAL FIELDS was involved.

 

"They use the natural magnetic lines of a planet and a gravity field to move their ships from one place to another," the officer explained to Chuck Oldham. "That's how they are able to MAKE NEAR RIGHT-ANGLE TURNS."

 

It was speculated that the aliens were able to cross greater distances of space within a much shorter time than we thought possible. The report further speculated that this craft (and others) had come to grief due to "magnetic faults" located in the areas where the crashes had occurred.

 

WHERE DO THEY COME FROM and WHY ARE THEY HERE?

 

I believe that Man's progress on planet Earth has been monitored by beings whose technological and mental resources make ours look primitive and theirs "supernatural" by comparison. The fact that some of the visitors are similar to us physiologically suggests that we share a genetic link. Could it be that some of them have had a hand in our evolution?

 

Now that our technology has reached the stage where we are endangering the planet and expanding our exploration of space, [UFO] surveillance has intensified.

 

Is it mere coincidence that the modern wave of sightings began during the  Second World War as we began developing nuclear weapons and rockets? Is it also coincidental that UFOs have exhibited so much interest in our NUCLEAR MISSILE SITES and have demonstrated their ability to paralyze launching systems?

 

Until we wake up to the fact that information of quite unprecedented and profound significance is being withheld from us, we shall continue to remain in ignorance....

------------------------------------------

Sources:

 

THE DAY AFTER ROSWELL: A FORMER PENTAGON OFFICIAL REVEALS THE U.S. GOVERNMENT's SHOCKING UFO COVER-UP – By Col Philip J Corso, ISBN# 0671004611, 341 pp., pp. 47, 89-90, 95, 97, 98-99, 100-102, 108-110,

195-96

 

ALIEN LIAISON: THE ULTIMATE SECRET – By Timothy Good, ISBN# 0712621946, 242 pp., pp. 10, 65, 115-16, 204

 

ALIEN BASE: EARTH's ENCOUNTERS WITH EXTRATERRESTRIALS – By Timothy Good, ISBN# 0712678123, 419 pp., pp. 59, 183

 

BEYOND TOP SECRET: THE WORLDWIDE UFO SECURITY THREAT – By Timothy Good, ISBN# 0283062452, 606 pp., pp. 367-68, 494-95, 536

   
 
Release #27  President Reagon's Involvement with Aliens and UFOs
In a December 4, 1985 speech at Fallston High School, MD, President REAGAN spoke about his 5-hour private discussions with General Secretary GORBACHEV the previous month in November, 1985. He relayed to the class: "How much easier his task and mine might be in these meetings that we held if suddenly there was a threat to this world from another species from another planet outside in the universe. We'd forget all the little local differences that we have between our countries, and would find out once and for all that we really are all human beings here on this Earth together." 

 Source: BEYOND TOP SECRET: THE WORLDWIDE UFO SECURITY THREAT - By Timothy Good, ISBN# 0283062452, 606 pp., p. 259 

 http://www.ufoevidence.org/documents/doc1523.htm
  
 Official 1985 portrait of Ronald Wilson Reagan, 40th President of the United States of America. Photo courtesy of the Ronald Reagan Library. For more photos of Ronald Reagan, visit 

 http://www.reagan.utexas.edu/archives/photographs/photo.html
 and
 http://history1900s.about.com/library/photos/blyindexreagan.htm  
    
 http://www.serpo.org/release27.asp

 

 http://www.ufoevidence.org/documents/doc1523.htm

 

"Government is NOT the solution to our problem, government IS the

problem." – Ronald Reagan

 

"My life really began when I married my husband." – Nancy Reagan

 

"What I'd really like to do is go down in history as the president who

made Americans believe in themselves again." – Ronald Reagan

THIS RELEASE HAS BEEN APPROVED BY and AT THE HIGHEST LEVELS OF THE U.S. GOVERNMENT as part of a continuing public acclimation program.  

WHAT: Transcripts of highly classified audio cassette recordings made of 40th U.S. president RONALD REAGAN's briefings with his top level and key advisers on the EXTRATERRESTRIAL subject matter. There are six (6) briefings in the first set; "Project SERPO" POSTING #27a is only the first one (1) of the six (6) transcribed sets.  

The REAGAN ET TRANSCRIPTS are located in POSTING #27a, "3 of 7" and "4 of 7." This does NOT include the "BONUS! SERPO POSTING #27" stream.  

WHEN: President REAGAN was briefed on many aspects of the EXTRATERRESTRIAL subject matter from March 6-8, 1981 and then again on October 9-12 of the same year.  

WHERE: President REAGAN was briefed on both occasions at the presidential retreat at Camp David, MD.  

HOW: At President REAGAN's request, these briefings were both tape recorded AND transcribed via the coordination and administration by a "Top Secret Codeword-cleared" CIA administrative assistant named XXXXX XXXXX. The recordings comprise many meetings/briefings in a combination of 60 min and 90 min cassettes for a total of 54 tapes.  

Of the 54 tapes, 40 have been completed by DOD-DIA personnel; you are reading the transcripts of one of six (1 of 6) briefings President REAGAN made between Friday-Sunday, March 6-8, 1981.  

DOD/DIA personnel were able to gain access to and possession and ownership of these tapes because SOME of the recordings deal with an ALIEN THREAT from a specific HAV [Hostile Alien Race] and therefore fall under the purview, control and jurisdictional authority of the Dept of Defense.  

WHY: The reasons to disclose this information now is two-fold:  

1) As in the case of the "Project SERPO" disclosures, the 25-year time limit on classified USG projects had expired and could -- after much legal vetting and wrangling between DOD lawyers and those USG employees who WANT it released -- be CONSIDERED for public release and into the public domain.  

The "Project SERPO" final report was issued in 1980 + 25 years = 2005 ... Wednesday, Nov 2, 2005 was the first "Project SERPO" release.  

The RONALD REAGAN Presidential ET Briefings: 1981 + 25 years = 2006 ... legal issues to be worked out and resolved brings us to late 2007.  

2) MANY other countries are disclosing their encounters with extraterrestrials -- especially Canada, the UK (MoD files) and Latin America -- so some amount of pressure has been placed and brought to bear on the normally tight-lipped USG "black world" to be more open about what they/we have in our "TS/Codeword" files.  

SUGGESTION: I'm acutely aware that MANY of you will gloss over POSTING #27 which is a lengthy biographical piece I personally researched, compiled and wrote on Ronald Reagan woven together from 10 (ten) different sources in my immense personal library (see bottom of POSTING #27 for bibliography) and which took me 
 80 hours to edit into the final product you'll read.  

I know that you'll all want to "get to the good stuff" first, BUT I would implore you to GO BACK and read the Reagan linear narrative I edited as it provides some GREAT insight into the man, will lead one to believe that given his engaging, natural wit and charm that he used to joke with a great deal of the time that in fact he WOULD HAVE said -- and joked -- the way he did during the highly classified briefings he received on the EXTRATERRESTRIAL SUBJECT MATTER in 1981.  

You'll also learn about some little, virtually UNknown facts surrounding the attempted 1981 assassination on his life -- as well as others -- under the section heading, "CONSPIRACY THEORY 2 of 2: POTSHOTS FROM THE BUSHY KNOLL?!"  

MODERATOR's IMPORTANT CLOSING NOTE: From the very first SERPO posting, I've been given a very wide, great and sole discretionary latitude in HOW I release the material to the public in terms of presentation, formatting, style and CONTENT.  

For THIS release, I was surprisingly provided the names of ALL eight (8) individuals who participated in the classified briefing plus even the name of the CIA briefing transcriber. Five (5) of the presidential briefing participants are still alive -- plus the CIA transcriber -- so I made the "executive"/editorial decision to MASK THOSE NAMES from public view and replace them with "ADVISER #1" - "ADVISER #4."  

For the fifth individual, he is referred to only as "The CARETAKER." The CIA transcriber is referred to as just that. GREAT pains, lengths and efforts were undertaken by me to delete their names when they were mentioned by other speakers. If I glossed over and missed one, then so be it though I hope not.  

Including President REAGAN, only three (3) individuals are named as they have all passed on to the afterlife.  

ISSUE: Though I was NOT asked to do this, in my mind, an obvious problem would definitely arise: These still-living advisers would be hounded, pestered and questioned mercilessly and without end by both real UFO investigators and "armchair" researchers thereby bringing continued DISCLOSURE of these audio recordings to a complete HALT.  

The pressure for me to CEASE and DESIST, as well as the special unit within the DOD/DIA who made this information available would be enormous. I am ONLY interested in getting I-N-F-O-R-M-A-T-I-O-N out to the UFO community and public at large, NOT in "outing" the individuals who participated in these PRIVATE briefings ... at least NOT while five of the eight (5 of 8) participants are still very much alive. If I receive directions to proceed otherwise, I certainly will, but until that time, it's MY CALL.  

As ANONYMOUS remarked to me: "Victor, the really 'good stuff' is yet to come after the first release!"  

Speaking for myself only, I too WANT to see that "really good stuff" and I'll do NOTHING to jeopardize at all.  

This will be my FINAL word on THIS matter and I'll entertain NO suggestions, advice or ideas at all about it ... I'll NOT dignify ANY inquiries regarding this particular issue with even so much as a simple reply. I MEAN WHAT I SAY.  

In addition to the many LEGAL issues which surrounded, hobbled and held up this release for months on end, two (2) military historians reviewed and signed off on this material as well as an astronomer from Cornell Univ.  

It is my high HONOR, distinct PRIVILEGE and great PLEASURE to send this 8-part stream to (in order):  

a) UFO Thread List, M-Z (hundreds);  

b) UFO Thread List, A-L (hundreds);  

c) 24 senior USG officials + 1 MI5 member (active), MI6 (retired), Soviet KGB (retired);  

d) small list of personal friends, former students of mine, ex-girlfriends and cyberstalking victims (
 12);  

e) Bush Admin White House (2)  

f) U.S. Secret Service Presidential Protective Service Detail (1);  

g) CORNELL UNIV, Space Sciences Division, Astronomy Dept, NASA's Mars Rover Project, USG "black world" contract astronomer (1);  

h) retired employee of the NSA who greatly assisted me in not only the proofreading and photo configuration and selection, but advised me and provided valuable input and insight on key aspects of this VERY SPECIAL release.  

i) ANONYMOUS/DIA-6 (6) who will forward all eight (8) parts to key members of the USG intel commuinity, both here and abroad.  

I hope you are all ENRICHED and EDUCATED beyond belief and your wildest dreams by what you are about to read!  

FEEDBACK? E-mail me at my regular e-mail address, NOT this one .... I will NOT respond to ANY e-mails sent here and plan on closing DOWN this address soon. It was solely opened for this particular stream ... no more Wizard ... he's departed for Planet SERPO....  

***

"Government is NOT the solution to our problem, government IS the problem." - Ronald Reagan  

 "My life really began when I married my husband." - Nancy Reagan 

 "What I'd really like to do is go down in history as the president who made Americans believe in themselves again." - Ronald Reagan 

 RONALD WILSON REAGAN: 40th PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES   

 Full name: Ronald Wilson Reagan 
 Born: Monday, February 6, 1911 in Tampico, IL  
 Died: Saturday, June 5, 2004, Los Angeles, CA  
 Burial site: Reagan Presidential Library Grounds, Simi Valley, CA 
 Parents: John Edward and Nelle Wilson Reagan  

 Spouses: Jane Wyman (1-5-1917 - 9-10-2007; born in St Joseph, MO, died in Rancho Mirage, CA; married: 1940, divorced: 1948); 
 Anne Frances Robbins [Nancy Davis-Reagan: July 6, 1921 - ; married: 1952] born in New York City to theatrical actress Edith Luckett and New Jersey auto dealer Kenneth Robbins and then her mother married neurosurgeon Loyal Davis. 

 Children: Maureen Elizabeth (1941-2001); Christina (1947-1947); Michael Edward (adopted; 1945-); Patricia Ann (1952-); Ronald Prescott (1958-) 

 Religion: Disciples of Christ  
 Education: Eureka College (B.A., 1932)  
 Occupations: Rancher; U.S. Army captain; radio sports commentator; actor 
 Government positions: California governor Political party: Republican 

 Dates as president: Tuesday, January 20, 1981 - Sunday, January 20, 1985 (first term); 
 Sunday, January 20, 1985 - Friday, January 20, 1989 (second term)   
 Age upon taking office: 69  

 ELECTION RESULTS:  
 1980 - Presidential / Vice-Presidential Candidates: 
 Ronald Reagan / George H W Bush (Republican) 
 Popular Votes: 43,904,153  
 Electoral Votes: 483  
 Jimmy Carter / Walter Mondale (Democratic) 
 Popular Votes: 35,483,883  
 Electoral Votes: 49 
 John Anderson / VP nominee was not chosen (National Unity) 
 Popular Votes: 5,720,060 
 Electoral Votes: 0  

 1980 ELECTION NOTES: Incumbent president Carter shook off a challenge by Massachusetts senator Edward Kennedy to win the Democratic nomination; 
 Republican Reagan's main competition was from former CIA director and ambassador to China, George Bush (whom Reagan chose as his running mate) and Illinois congressman John Anderson (who ran in the general election as an independent).  

 1984 - Presidential / Vice-Presidential Candidates: 
 Ronald Reagan / George Bush (Republican) 
 Popular Votes: 54,455,075  
 Electoral Votes: 525  
 Walter Mondale / Geraldine Ferraro (Democratic) 
 Popular Votes: 37,577,185  
 Electoral Votes: 13  

 1984 ELECTION NOTES: This election was most notable for former vice president Mondale's selection of New York representative Ferraro as his running mate, the FIRST FEMALE from a major party to run on a national ticket. 

 The REAGAN ADMINISTRATION:   
 Administration Dates: January 20, 1981 - January 20, 1985  
 January 20, 1985 - January 20, 1989  
 Vice President: George Bush (1981-1989)  

 CABINET:  
 Secretary of State: Alexander M Haig, Jr (1981-1982); George P Shultz (1982-1989) 

 Secretary of the Treasury: Donald T Regan (1981-1985); James A Baker III (1985-1988); Nicholas F Brady (1988-1989)  

 Attorney General: William F Smith (1981-1985); Edwin Meese III (1985-1988); Richard L Thornburgh (1988-1989)  

 Secretary of the Interior: James G Watt (1981-1983); William P Clark (1983-1985); Donald P Hodel (1985-1989) 

 Secretary of Agriculture: John R Block (1981-1986); Richard E Lyng (1986-1989)

Secretary of Labor: Raymond J Donovan (1981-1985); Willam E Brock III (1985-1987); Ann Dore McLaughlin (1987-1989)  

 Secretary of Commerce: Malcolm Baldrige (1981-1987); C Willam Verity (1987-1989)   

Secretary of Defense: Caspar W Weinberger (1981-1987); Frank G Carlucci (1987-1989)  

 Secretary of Housing and Urban Development: Samuel R Pierce, Jr (1981-1989)   

Secretary of Transportation: Andrew L Lewis, Jr: (1981-1983); Elizabeth H Dole (1983-1987); James H Burnley IV (1987-1989)  

 Secretary of Energy: James B Edwards (1981-1982); Donald P Hodel (1982-1985); John S Herrington (1985-1989)  

 Secretary of Health and Human Services: Richard S Schweiker (1981-1983); Margaret M Heckler (1983-1985); Otis R Bowen (1985-1989)  

 Secretary of Education: Terrel H Bell (1981-1985); William J Bennett (1985-1988); Lauro F Cavazo (1988-1989) 
  

LIST OF SCIENCE ADVISERS/OMISSION OF VANNEVAR BUSH 

 Wikipedia lists Vannevar Bush (of MJ-12 fame) as a Science Adviser to Franklin D. Roosevelt between 1939-1951. 

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Office_of_Science_and_Technology_Policy#Past_Science_Advisors 

 Also, a Web page at: 

 http://www.majesticdocuments.com/ 

 states that Vannevar Bush was President Truman's highly respected scientific adviser through World War II and the 1940s. See: 

 http://www.majesticdocuments.com/personnel/bush.php 

 BUT, for some reason, the list of Science Advisers at: 

 http://www.ostp.gov/html/_pastadvisors.html  

 starts with Oliver E. Buckley (1951-1952) under the Truman Administration and DOESN'T MENTION Vannevar Bush at all.  Science Advisors to President RONALD REAGAN and to the President of the United States: Office of Science and Technology Policy / Executive Office of the President 

 Source: 

 http://www.ostp.gov/html/_pastadvisors.html  

 REAGAN ADMINISTRATION SCIENCE ADVISERS: 

 Benjamin Huberman (Acting Director, OSTP) Feb. 1981 - Aug. 1981 

 Dr. George A. Keyworth, II (Director, OSTP) Aug. 1981 - Dec. 1985 

 Dr. John P. McTague (Acting Director, OSTP) Jan. 1986 - May 23, 1986 

 Dr. Richard G. Johnson (Acting Director, OSTP) May 24, 1986 - Oct. 1, 1986 

 Dr. William R. Graham, Jr. (Director, OSTP) Oct. 2, 1986 - June 1989 

 Dr. Thomas P. Rona (Acting Director, OSTP) June 1989 - Aug. 1989
  
  

Reagan and Gorbachev

 Click to enlarge
 
 Soviet Union General Secretary MIKHAIL GORBACHEV at a speech on February 16, 1987 in the Grand Kremlin Palace in Moscow: "At our meeting in Geneva, the U.S president said that if the earth faced an invasion by extraterrestrials, the United States and the Soviet Union would join forces to repel such an invasion. I shall not dispute the hypothesis, though I think it's early yet to worry about such an intrusion." 

 Source: BEYOND TOP SECRET: THE WORLDWIDE UFO SECURITY THREAT - By Timothy Good, ISBN# 0283062452, 606 pp., p. 539 

 http://www.ufoevidence.org/documents/doc1523.htm 

 The attached photos are courtesy of the Ronald Reagan Library.  

 

PRESIDENTIAL FACTOIDS: 

 ° Oldest president: Ronald Reagan, who was 77 when he left office 

 ° Only divorced president: Ronald Reagan: divorced from actress Jane Wyman in 1948, married Nancy Davis in 1952  

 ° Only left-handed presidents in order: James Garfield, Herbert Hoover, Harry Truman, Gerald Ford, Ronald Reagan, George H W Bush and Bill Clinton  

 ° Ronald Reagan was a member of Tau K fraternity 

 ° The SHORTEST inaugural speech was given by George Washington at his second inauguration on March 4, 1793 which contained 136 words and lasted only 90 seconds! The LONGEST inaugural speech was given by William Henry Harrison who spoke for nearly two (2) hours on March 4, 
 1781.  

 ° The greatest LANDSLIDE majority ever won in the popular vote was by Richard Nixon in 1972. He defeated George McGovern by a record 17,994,460 votes (47,165,911 to 29,170,33) to win re-election.  

 ° In the nine (9) presidential elections since 1972, these states have a 100% record for voting for the WINNING CANDIDATE: Arkansas, Kentucky, Louisiana, Missouri, Ohio and Tennessee.  

  

HISTORICAL FACTOID QUESTIONS: 

 QUESTION: Who is the ONLY full-term president who did NOT get to nominate a Supreme Court justice? 

 ANSWER: Jimmy Carter never nominated a Supreme Court justice. Three (3) other presidents -- William Henry Harrison, Zachary Taylor and Andrew Johnson -- also never had the opportunity to select a nominee.  

 QUESTION: What is the most COMMON home state for first ladies with nine (9) first ladies having been born there? 

 ANSWER: The State of New York has had more First Ladies born here.  

 QUESTION: Who was the FIRST U.S. president to make audio recordings in the Oval Office? 

 ANSWER: It was FDR, with earliest recording made probably about August 1940. It also was not an "audiotape" [for which the technology didn't exist at that time], as recordings were made on office dictation equipment on sound recording disks. For a secondary source on this go to: 

 http://www.bookcost.com/review/1568362854/  

 For further information and details you should contact an audio archivist at the FDR Presidential Library, go to: 

 http://www.fdrlibrary.marist.edu/staff.html  

 or contact:  Mark.Renovitch@NARA.gov 
 1-845 486-7742 

  

TIMELINE OF EVENTS FOR THE REAGAN ADMINISTRATION:  

 1911: Born in Tampico, Illinois  
 1938: Appears in first motion picture  
 1947-52, 1959: Serves as president of the Screen Actors Guild  
 1954: Becomes television spokesman for the General Electric Company and makes speeches around the country promoting the American way
 1967-1975: Serves as California governor  1976: Falls 80 ballots shy of becoming the Republican nominee for president  
 1981-1989: Serves as 40th U.S. president 
 1981: Wounded in assassination attempt  
 1985: The first of several summits with Soviet leader Mikhail Gorbachev takes place  
 1986: Iran-Contra scandal breaks  
 1994: Announces he has Alzheimer's disease in a hand-written letter addressed to the nation  
 2004: Dies on June 5 in California from pneumonia, related complications from his disease and is buried in Simi Valley, CA

RON & NANCY HORSEBACK RIDING

 Click to enlarge 

 NOT QUITE ALONE - 1982 On every ride, Secret Service agents followed the President and the First Lady, who went by the code names "Rawhide" and "Rainbow."  

 

MAJOR EVENTS THAT OCCURRED DURING REAGAN's TWO (2) PRESIDENTIAL BRIEFINGS ON THE EXTRATERRESTRIAL PRESENCE ON EARTH during March and October, 1981:  

 President Reagan was shot and seriously wounded on Monday, March 30, 1981 in Washington, DC. Also seriously wounded were Secret Service Agent Timothy McCarthy [hit in the stomach], DC police officer Thomas Delahanty (struck in the neck] and Press Sec'y James Brady [shot in the left temple]. John W Hinckley, Jr was arrested, found NOT GUILTY by reason of insanity on May 4, 1982, and committed to St Elizabeth's Psychiatric Hospital in Washington, DC.  

 The U.S. Senate confirmed on Monday,  September 21, 1981, the appointment of Sandra Day O'Connor as the FIRST female U.S. Supreme Court justice. 

 CONSPIRACY THEORY 1 of 2: That President Reagan was shot for his insistence that more information be made available to him on the alien presence than what is normally given each new incoming, sitting president [see end for conspiracy theories].  

  

REVITALIZATION OF CAPITALISM, DEMAND FOR DEMOCRACY: 1980-1989  

 SUMMARY: In the U.S., "The Reagan Years" (1981-88) brought the longest economic boom yet in U.S. history via budget and tax cuts, deregulation,"junk bond" financing, leveraged buyouts and mergers and takeovers. 
 However, there was a stock market crash (Oct. 1987), and federal budget deficits and the trade deficit increased. 

 Foreign policy showed a strong anti-communist stance, via increased defense spending, championing of the MX missile system and the "Star Wars" missile defense program. 

 Four (4) Reagan-Gorbachev summits (1985-88) climaxed in the INF Treaty (1987) as the Cold War began to wind down. The Iran-Contra affair (Oliver North's TV testimony, July 1987) was a major political scandal. 
 Homelessness and drug abuse (especially "crack" cocaine) were growing social problems.  

  

THE RISE OF THE CONSERVATIVE MOVEMENT: THE REAGAN "REVOLUTION"  

 From the time American colonists first began to consider breaking away from England to form their own system of government, lively discussion has almost never stopped over the extent of the powers that government should have. 

 When the ratification of the Constitution was being debated in the late 1780s, some notable patriots argued that the federal government it described would have too much authority over individual states, and"states' rights" versus federal power has been a heated issue ever 
 since.  

 In the 20th century, federal powers expanded in such areas as government regulation of business and banking and in the enactment of social welfare programs. Franklin D Roosevelt's New Deal in the 1930s, Harry S Truman's Fair Deal during the 1940s, and the Great Society of Lyndon B 
 Johnson during the 1960s were all designed to confront social and economic problems at the federal level. 

 In 1980, Ronald Reagan campaigned on the theme "Government is not the solution to our problem, government is the problem." By cutting taxes, ending several social welfare programs, and reducing government regulations on business, he reversed the political trends of the 20th century, and his policies helped revive a sluggish American economy.  

 Reagan's policies and his speech-making skills inspired tremendous enthusiasm from his supporters, and resulted in two landslide election victories. Meanwhile, his opponents called attention to enormous federal budget deficits that grew out of control during his administration. 
 Nevertheless, the nation's oldest president emerged vigorous and still popular after two terms. 

 "I am the same man I was when I came to Washington," he said when he left the White House. "I believe the same things I believed when I came to Washington."  

 When Ronald Reagan was born, his father John took one look at the 10-lb baby boy and called him a "fat little Dutchman" ... the nickname "Dutch" stuck with him for his entire life.  A political liberal in his youth, Ronald Wilson Reagan helped create and spark a conservative coalition in middle age and moved American politics rightward after winning the presidency at age 69. Reagan grew up in a family that was by the standards of the day -- socially as well as politically -- liberal. 

 His Roman Catholic father Jack and his evangelical Protestant mother Nelle condemned racism and young Ron received help from a Jewish mentor. 
 Jack's job with the Works Progress Administration helped the family survive the Depression of the 1930s, but Jack's alcoholism left a mark on his son's personality. Outwardly amiable and optimistic, Reagan typically concealed his feelings, avoided confrontations, and cultivated many acquaintances, but few close friends. 

 After graduating from Eureka College in 1932, Reagan became a radio sportscaster in the Middle West and then began a film acting career in Hollywood. Generally avoiding the movie colony's often wild social life, he nevertheless became active in the Screen Actors Guild (SAG) and a master of Hollywood politics. In 1940, he helped to arrange production of his most famous film, "Knute Rockne: All American," in which he starred as Notre Dame football legend George "The Gipper" Gipp.  

That same year he married actress Jane Wyman. Involved in national politics as well, he voted for Franklin Delano Roosevelt four (4) times and bled for liberal causes so easily, he would later joke that he was a "hemophiliac." Barred from WWII combat by weak vision, he acted in films and plays produced by the U.S. Army. A series of crises in the late 1940s permanently altered Reagan's life. He almost died of pneumonia, his marriage collapsed, and his movie career stalled.  

The Reagans first met in 1949 when Nancy discovered that her name was on mailing lists of left-wing organizations. When she complained, she was referred to Reagan who, as president of the Screen Actor's Guild, was able to straighten it out. Apparently, she had been confused with a different Nancy Davis, and he invited her to dinner so that he could explain.  

Their romance developed gradually. Reagan was still upset over his recent divorce from Jane Wyman, but he found Nancy a comforting shoulder to lean on. He was extremely talkative and she was a good listener. They became engaged in February 1952 and were married on March 4, 1952 with actor William Holden serving as best man. Later that year their first child, Patricia Ann "Patti" was born. A son, Ronald Prescott, was born in 1958. Reagan had also had three (3) children during his first marriage (one was adopted and one died in infancy).  

Nancy and Ronald's film careers were both winding down during the 1950s. The Reagans bought a ranch, "El Rancho del Cielo," and began moving among a wealthy circle of friends in Southern California. They appeared together in a movie called "Hellcats of the Navy" in 1957. It was Nancy's LAST film work while her husband had all but abandoned movies for television. 
  

REAGAN FILMOGRAPHY: 

 http://www.imdb.com/name/nm0001654/ 

 Reagan's LAST film, "The Killers," was released in 1964, the same year he made a televised campaign speech for Republican presidential candidate Barry Goldwater. Goldwater lost the election, but Reagan impressed California Republicans enough to become their candidate for governor in 1966. He won the election.  

In the election of 1980, former California Governor Ronald Reagan defeated Jimmy Carter, a victory that signaled the emergence of a strong conservative political movement that would exert great influence in the coming decades. The new conservatism combined antagonism toward government deregulation and taxes, support for an aggressive foreign policy toward the Soviet Union, and promotion of so-called family values based on Christian morality.  

Reagan pursued an economic policy -- "Reaganomics" -- of tax cuts and deregulation. When the disastrous economy of the late 1970s entered a period of record expansion after 1982, Reagan's popularity soared. His tough rhetorical stance against the Soviet Union and massive defense build-up likewise earned him support not only from conservatives, but many disaffected middle-class voters who traditionally had voted Democratic. In 1984, Reagan won re-election in a landslide.  

Though many found Reagan charming, his presidency was controversial. Annual budget deficits reached record levels in the 1980s pushing the national debt to nearly $3 TRILLION by 1988.  

Conservative zeal for prosecuting the Cold War also led to the administration's greatest crisis, the Iran-Contra scandal, an illegal scheme that involved arms sales to Iran to secretly fund anti-communist rebels in Nicaragua. A number of Reagan administration officials were convicted for their role in the scheme, but Reagan avoided prosecution. He also later admitted that his administration had traded arms for hostages with Iran.

RON & NANCY PORTRAIT

 Click to enlarge 
    

FOREIGN AFFAIRS IN THE REAGAN YEARS  

 The USSR and EASTERN EUROPE: A troublesome 1980-85 for the USSR was followed by (five) 5 years of astonishing change: the surrender of the Communist monopoly, the remaking of the Soviet state, and the beginning of the disintegration of the Soviet empire.  

SOVIET EMPIRE BREAKUP: The world community witnessed the extraordinary disintegration of the Soviet Union into 15 independent states. During the Reagan Era, the 1980s had already seen internal reforms and a decline of Communist power both within the Soviet Union and in Eastern Europe. Russia remained the predominant country after the breakup. In the fall of 1989, the failure of Marxist economies in Eastern Europe was the catalyst in a historic step: The Berlin Wall was opened in Nov 1989.  

Remarks on East-West Relations at the Brandenburg Gate in West Berlin  

"There is one sign the Soviets can make that would be unmistakable, that would advance dramatically the cause of freedom and peace. General Secretary Gorbachev, if you seek peace, if you seek prosperity for the Soviet Union and Eastern Europe, if you seek liberalization: Come here to this gate! Mr. Gorbachev, open this gate! Mr. Gorbachev, TEAR DOWN THIS WALL!" - President Ronald Reagan, Friday, June 12, 1987  

The ABOVE excerpt is from: 
 http://www.reagan.utexas.edu/archives/speeches/1987/061287d.htm 

 MIDDLE EAST: The Middle East remained militarily UNstable with sharp divisions along economic, political, racial and religious lines. In Iran, the Islamic revolution of 1979 created a strong anti-U.S. stance (hostage crisis, Nov 1979 - Jan 1981). In Sept 1980, Iraq repudiated its border agreement with Iran and began major hostilities that led to an 8-year war in which millions were killed.  

LIBYA: The U.S. accused Libyan leader Muammar al-Qaddafi of aiding terrorists in Dec 1985 in Rome and in Vienna of airport attacks, and Reagan retaliated by bombing Libya in April 1986.  

ISRAEL affirmed all Jerusalem as its capital in July 1980, destroyed an Iraqi atomic reactor in 1981, and invaded Lebanon in 1981, forcing the PLO to agree to withdraw. A Palestinian uprising, including women and children hurling rocks and bottles at troops began in December 1987 in Israeli-occupied Gaza and spread to the West Bank. Troops responded with force, killing 300 by the end of 1988 with 6,000 more in detention camps.  

LATIN AMERICA / CENTRAL AMERICA: 

 In NICARAGUA, the U.S. CIA admitted in 1984 to having directed the mining of Nicaraguan ports, and the U.S. sent humanitarian (1985) and military aid in 1986. Profits from secret arms sales to Iran were found to have been diverted to the contras in 1987.  

In EL SALVADOR, a military coup in October of 1979 failed to halt extreme right-wing violence and left-wing terrorism. From Jan - June of 1980, some 4,000 civilians were killed in the civil unrest. In 1984, newly elected Pres Jose Napoleon Duarte worked to stem human rights abuses, but violence continued.  

RECAP: After 25 years of Cold War detente in practice if not in name, Reagan resumed vigorous denunciation of the Soviet Union as an evil, totalitarian empire. He also sponsored the largest military buildup in U.S. history. In March 1983, confronted with a strong antinuclear protest movement, he proposed a high-tech missile defense system, known as the Strategic Defense Initiative.  

Elsewhere, Reagan's diplomacy mixed prudence with exaggerated fears of Third World radicalism. He retained diplomatic relations with communist China and, after a disastrous intervention in the Lebanese civil war which cost more than 300 American lives in guerilla bombings, he prudently withdrew.  

On the other hand, he ordered the bombing of Libya and the invasion of Grenada on the dubious grounds that their governments profoundly threatened U.S. interests, and he worked tirelessly to overthrow the Marxist Sandinista regime in Nicaragua.  

The degree to which Reagan's military buildup contributed to the collapse of communism remains conjectural, but Reagan UNquestionably responded flexibly as the Soviet Union moved toward democracy under Mikhail Gorbachev. First lady Nancy Reagan, an influential behind-the-scenes figure in the Reagan White House, encouraged this flexibility.  

PRESIDENTIAL PROCESSION

 Click to enlarge 
  

APPROACHING THE SUNSET YEARS 

 After her husband won the presidential election in 1980, Nancy arranged glittering social occasions where men wore tuxedos and women donned glamorous floor-length gowns. Her expensive tastes in parties, White House dinnerware, designer gowns, jewelry and furnishings met with some criticism by people who pointed out that while President Reagan was trimming the federal budget, White House social spending was growing almost out of control. Nancy Reagan handled the criticism by pointing out that her gowns were only on loan from designers and were donated to museums after she wore them.  

Those initial concerns soon passed, though. Her involvement with the Foster Grandparents Program and her fight against drug abuse revealed a more serious and caring first lady. She became a spokesperson for the "Just Say NO!" campaign that advised young people to resist trying drugs, and she supported private efforts, rather than government programs, to help combat drug abuse.  

Mrs Reagan expanded her drug awareness campaign to an international level by inviting first ladies from around the world to talks on drug abuse, and during the fortieth anniversary of the United Nations in 1985, she was host of a second international drug conference. Nancy Reagan also helped her husband recover from some serious medical problems: He was wounded in an assassination attempt in 1981, he had colon surgery four (4) years later, and prostate surgery in 1987, the same year Nancy herself had surgery to treat breast cancer.  

She became increasingly involved in helping direct her husband's administration during his second term. Particularly after his hospitalization, she preferred a more relaxed schedule for him so that he could concentrate on the most significant issues needing his attention. As the Iran-Contra scandal entangled the Reagan administration, she became angry with staff members she felt hadn't helped prepare him for answering tough questions from the press.  

Nancy Reagan enjoyed being first lady, but she WELCOMED RETIREMENT after the end of her husband's second term in 1989. She almost immediately established the Nancy Reagan Foundation to continue her campaign to educate people about the dangers of substance abuse, and in 1994, the Foundation joined forces with the BEST Foundation for a Drug-Free Tomorrow. Together they developed the Nancy Reagan Afterschool Program to promote drug prevention for young people.  

A devoted couple, the Reagans helped each other through the best and worst of times. Nancy helped arouse her husband's fighting spirit when he was recovering from a gunshot wound in 1981 following a failed assassination attempt, and she was again at his side as he recovered from surgeries in July 1985 and January 1987.  

The Reagans returned to their California ranch where the former president remained active before beginning to deal with the effects of Alzheimer's disease. The couple remained devoted to each other as he began suffering more profound effects of the disease, and they founded the Ronald and Nancy Reagan Research Institute as part of the National Alzheimer's Association to help focus attention on the disease and provide information about it.  

After the Ronald Reagan Presidential Library in Simi Valley, CA, opened in 1991, Nancy served on the board for the Ronald Reagan Presidential Foundation, which promotes his "Four Pillars of Freedom" -- preserving individual liberty, promoting economic opportunity, advancing democracy around the world, and building PRIDE IN AMERICA's NATIONAL HERITAGE.  

At the end of his presidency, the two former actors went home to their California ranch and, after finally riding off together into the sunset, the Reagans enjoyed a peaceful retirement....  

THE REAGAN LEGACY  

 In his speech, Reagan observed that "Progress may be slow -- measured in inches and feet, not miles -- but we will progress." Small progress in overcoming the economic crisis he identified in the address was made during the first two years of his presidency. Beginning in 1983, the American economy improved and expanded consistently over the next six (6) years -- through the end of Reagan's term.  

Tax reduction acts passed in 1981 and 1986 helped relieve the tax burden that Reagan blamed for having stifled growth. Government programs, which Reagan identified as another form of burden, were cut back during his administration with mixed results.  

Businesses were able to act with less restraint, but some took advantage of reduced government supervision. The government deficit that Reagan targeted for reduction in his inaugural address actually grew during his presidency, partly from increased military spending and a trade imbalance where imports far outbalanced exports and partly from resistance by Congress to authorize further cuts in government programs.  

The economy improved, and some government regulations were enacted later to help maintain order and stability in business. One of the results of the Reagan presidency has been the more careful consideration and debate -- as well as resistance -- that greets each potential new regulation.  

To his supporters, that reality is an example of what they call "The Reagan Revolution" -- an administration that turned away from a 50-year trend of large government social programs and brought renewed emphasis to the question of just how powerful Americans want their government to be.

RON & NANCY SAILING AWAY

Click to enlarge  
PERFECT PAIR - 1964: Daughter Patti Davis told The American 
 Experience: Reagan [use italics]: "My parents ... really sort of 
 complete each other. They're kind of two halves of a circle." 
    

THE ALIEN THREAT AS SEEN FROM RONALD REAGAN's EYES! 

Ronald Reagan is the only president, besides Jimmy Carter, to admit publicly that he'd seen a flying saucer. Reagan was also the only president to hypothesize -- albeit metaphorically or hint -- about the possibilities of hostile extraterrestrials posing a threat to Earth.  

In a speech before the United Nations General Assembly on Monday, September 21, 1987, Reagan used an example of an alien attack on humanity as a rationale for governments to put aside their differences and come together for the common good. He did so with the full knowledge that many of the assembled press would take his remarks derisively.  

Nevertheless, Reagan also knew that most, if not all, of the assembled diplomats represented governments that had their own issues in dealing with the UFO "threat." Reagan had used the same analogy before during a speech at his summit meeting with Soviet president Mikhail Gorbachev in 1985.  

Unlike his predecessors, some of whom might have been more inclined to disclose the existence of UFOs to the American people, Ronald Reagan proposed the development of a planetary defense system called the Strategic Defense Initiative (SDI), or as it was dubbed by the media, "Star Wars."  

Though the program was touted as a "shield" against incoming Soviet ballistic missiles, many UFO researchers thought that it was public cover FOR ITS REAL MISSION: A DEFENSE SHIELD AGAINST HOSTILE UFOs. In fact, the Soviets were actually inclined to support the project, despite their public protestations, once Reagan offered to make it available to them.  

RONALD REAGAN, AN ALIEN INVASION and "THE NEW WORLD ORDER!" 

The proponents of the "New World Order" cosmic conspiracy believe that when President Ronald Reagan gave his famous "alien invasion" speech to the entire United Nations General Assembly in September of 1987, he had already secretly advised representatives of the 176 member nations that the leaders of their respective governments must meet the demands of the technologically superior extraterrestrials or be destroyed. In his speech to the General Assembly, Reagan said that an alien threat was already among us.  

A number of conspiracy theorists stated that Reagan's speech hinted at a plan agreed to by world leaders that extraterrestrial invaders around the year 2000 would carry out a carefully staged "alien invasion" that would convince the masses of the world that a real-life alien attack from outer space was about to begin. People of all nations would believe their leaders, who would tell them that the aliens were a benevolent species and that unconditional surrender to them would be for everyone's own good.  

Immediately following the surrender to the aliens, the united leaders will form a One World Government -- a New World Order -- thus fulfilling biblical prophecies about a return to the days of Babylon. The aliens will revel themselves as demonic entities that delight in doing Satan's work.  

Under the One World Government, the following laws and rules will apply:  

- There will be NO private or church schools; 

 - Christianity will NOT be permitted in ANY form; 

 - There will be only a one-unit monetary system;  

 - Population will be limited by restrictions on the number of children per family; 

 - There will NO middle class, only rulers and servants; 

 - NONE of the former national boundaries of countries shall exist; 

 - Privately owned firearms or weapons of any kind will be prohibited; 

 - A legal system of world courts will oversee a single unified code of laws, enforced by a One World Government police force and a One World unified military;  

 - Only ONE RELIGION will be allowed and that will be in the form of a One World Government Church, which will adhere to Satanism or Luciferianism; 

 - Permanent, NONelected hereditary oligarchists will select serfs from the population and form a feudal system, similar to the one that existed in the Middle Ages;  

 - Diseases, wars and famines will be engineered until there are only one (1) billion people -- those who are deemed useful to the ruling classes -- living on the planet;  

 - The social system will be on the basis of a welfare state -- those who are obedient and subservient to the One World Government will be rewarded with the means to live. Those who are rebellious will be starved to death or declared outlaws, thereby becoming targets for anyone who wishes to kill them.  

CONSPIRACY THEORY 2 of 2: POTSHOTS FROM THE "BUSHY KNOLL?!"    

Talk about a small world! A little before 2:30 p.m. on the afternoon of Monday, March 30, 1981, John Hinckley, Jr -- with a .22 caliber bullet -- almost facilitated VP George Bush's ascendancy to the White House thereby sloughing off his second-banana status eight (8) years ahead of schedule! Vice President George Bush briefly flirted with a fast promotion.  

Crouching on the sidewalk in front of the Washington Hilton, John Hinckley, Jr began firing six (6) explosive "devastator" bullets from his Rohm R6-14 revolver at Ronald Reagan. He survived after surgery at George Washington University Hospital where he told his wife Nancy: "Honey, I forgot to duck!"  

Small world, indeed. For that very same day, John Hinckley's older brother Scott, had a dinner date with an old friend of the family: NEIL BUSH, son of the vice president! Scott Hinckley was vice president of his father's Denver-based firm, Vanderbilt Energy Corp.

What some saw as merely an odd "coincidence" prompted more conspiratorially attuned eyebrows to arch like divining rods. After all, what are the ODDS of the president's constitutional successor and the president's would-be assassin knowing each other?! Probably ZERO!  

But the Bushes and Hinckleys went way back, to Texas of the 1960s, where both George Bush and John Hinckley, Sr had amassed personal fortunes in the booming oil industry. Both were blue bloods who circulated in the same privileged circles, which the transplanted aristocrats liked to call their "Texas Raj."  

* In the NBC special reports aired immediately after the shooting, correspondent Judy Woodruff said that at least one (1) shot was fired from the hotel ABOVE Reagan's limousine. She later elaborated saying a Secret Service agent had fired that shot from the hotel overhang. Could Reagan's wound have been inflicted by friendly fire? Did we glimpse a bona fide "second gunman" a la JFK in Dealey Plaza?  

Either way, Woodruff's account might explain HOW a slug managed to strike Reagan when his limo's bulletproof door stood BETWEEN him and Hinckley. Sizing up the Bush-Hinckley nexus, conspiracy sentry John Judge has theoretically dubbed this "the shot from the Bushy knoll."  

* In October 1980, Hinckley, Jr flew to Nashville to stalk Jimmy Carter, but was arrested at the airport when authorities discovered three (3) handguns in his suitcase. Oddly, after ONLY FIVE (5) HOURS IN CUSTODY, this unstable and antisocial pariah -- who had attempted to transport weapons across state lines and into a city soon to be visited by the president of the United States -- was fined and RELEASED without further ado! Even more oddly, authorities apparently didn't bother to examine his journal, which in "Dear Diary" fashion, detailed Hinckley's plans to kill Carter! Was this a case of bumbling negligence or something more ominous?  

* Finally, a pall of suspicion quite naturally fell over VP George "Poppy" Bush the preppy achiever and future president whose spooky pedigree was longer than a Texas stretch limo. Like his father before him, Bush, Sr was a member of Yale's elite "Skull and Bones Society," which had weaned more than a few powerhouse pols, Wall Street lions, CIA "black world" superstars and a 1980s group of disgruntled intel operatives known loosely as "Agents for Bush" who had been fired by CIA Director Admiral Stansfield Turner under the Carter administration.  

* There are also a couple of parallels between Hinckley, Sirhan Sirhan [assassinated Robert Kennedy on 6-5-1968], Mark David Chapman [John Lennon's assassin on 12-8-1980], Arthur Herman Bremer [Alabama Gov. George Wallace's would-be assassin on 5-15-72] and Patrick Purdy, the commando-geared gunman who slaughtered five (5) Vietnamese children, and wounded another 30, in a Stockton, CA, school yard on Tuesday, January 17, 1989. ALL were heavily dosed with psychiatric drugs -- mind-control drugs by definition.  

Purdy strode coolly onto that playground, pumping away with his Chinese-style, semi-automatic AK-47 assault rifle firing 104 full-metal-jacketed MILITARY-TYPE bullets loaded in 7.62 X 39mm cartridges with the same GLAZED-EYED ROBOTIC DEMEANOR CHARACTERISTIC of one-day spree killers. Many of those killers are dosed with mood-altering drugs, a fact little publicized when such tragedies occur.  

Before drawing his gun to shoot at Reagan, Hinckley has said that he had hoped someone would STOP him. As he drew his gun, he felt, "Now, I have NO choice." He said he felt "relieved" once the shooting was over. Like Chapman and Sirhan before him, he squeezed out bullet after bullet, then became preternaturally calm, as if his PREDETERMINED MISSION/FUNCTION function was now complete.  

Perhaps, Hinckley, Purdy, et al., were the victims of psychiatry gone berserk, monsters manufactured by accident. OR perhaps they were DELIBERATELY PROGRAMMED MIND CONTROLLED ASSASSINS [CIA's MK-ULTRA] courtesy of a little known, hole-in-the-wall USG "black world" agency that "takes care of things" outside of normal channels.  

------------------------------------------  

RONALD REAGAN LIBRARY and MUSEUM 40 Presidential Dr Simi Valley, CA 93065-0600 1-800 410-8354 E-mail: reagan.library@nara.gov/ Web site: http://www.reagan.utexas.edu/  

The NATIONAL ARCHIVES FOIA WEB PAGE ON UFOs, "Project BLUE BOOK," MJ-12 and ROSWELL!  

 http://www.archives.gov/foia/ufos.html

The NATIONAL ARCHIVES RECORDS ADMINISTRATION INFORMATIONAL REQUESTS:  

 http://www.archives.gov/contact/inquire-form.html

Or, you can contact NARA by these other methods: 

 Call NARA toll free at:   

 1-866-272-6272 or 1-86-NARA-NARA or 
 1-301 837-0527 or 0510 or 2903   

 The NATIONAL ARCHIVES and RECORDS ADMINISTRATION  

 8601 Adelphi Road   
 College Park, MD 20740-6001-01 
 ------------------------------------------ 
 Written, researched and compiled by Victor Martinez  

 Sources:  

 THE PRESIDENTS FACT BOOK - By Roger Matuz, Edited by Bill Harris, 
 ISBN# 9781579123895, 773 pp., pp. 672-91 

 THE OXFORD GUIDE: UNITED STATES HISTORY - Edited by Paul S Boyer, 
 ISBN# 9780195340914, $9.99, 940 pp., pp. 652-53 

 THE NEW YORK TIMES GUIDE TO ESSENTIAL KNOWLEDGE - The New York Times 
 Staff, ISBN# 0312313675, $35.00, 1,096 pp., pp. 291-92 

 IN THE CROSSHAIRS: FAMOUS ASSASSINATIONS and ATTEMPTS - FROM JULIUS 
 CAESAR TO JOHN LENNON - By Stephen J Spignesi, ISBN# 0760762139, 
 $6.98, 287 pp., pp. 128-31, 138-41, 201-04, 247-49,  

 CONSPIRACIES and SECRET SOCIETIES: THE COMPLETE DOSSIER - By Brad and 
 Sherry Steiger, ISBN# 158591740, $24.95, 544 pp., pp. 326-27  

 THE 80 GREATEST CONSPIRACIES OF ALL TIME: HISTORY's BIGGEST MYSTERIES, 
 COVERUPs & CABALS - Vankin & Whalen, ISBN# 0806525312, 718 pp., pp. 
 504-07  

 CONSPIRACIES, COVER-UPS and CRIMES: FROM JFK TO THE CIA TERRORIST 
 CONNECTION - By Jonathan Vankin, ISBN# 0440213851, $4.99, 384 pp., pp. 
 171-73, 230  

 CONSPIRACY ENCYCLOPEDIA: The ENCYCLOPEDIA OF CONSPIRACY THEORIES - 
 Edited by Thom Burnett, ISBN# 1596091568, $10.95, 320 pp., pp. 32, 64-65      

 THE UFO MAGAZINE UFO ENCYCLOPEDIA: THE MOST COMPREHENSIVE SINGLE-VOLUME 
 UFO REFERENCE IN PRINT - William J Birnes, ISBN# 0743466748, $14.00, 
 p. 364, pp. 263-64 

 THE 2007 WORLD ALMANAC and BOOK OF FACTS - Editorial Director Zoe 
 Kashner, ISBN# 0886879957, $12.99, 1,008 pp., pp. 348-49, 490, 527, 
 529-30, 683 

***

Release 27a

RELEASE 27a - Reagan Briefing

Transcript of classified tape recording made at Camp David, Maryland during a presidential briefing regarding the subject of UNIDENTIFIED FLYING OBJECTS and EXTRATERRESTRIAL VISITATION of EARTH. President RONALD REAGAN was present. The recording was made between March 6 and 8, 1981.

WILLIAM CASEY: Mr President, good morning. As we discussed in February, this briefing contains some very sensational and some very, very classified information. I am not sure, oh, well, I'm not going to make a decision on who you want in the room. That will be your decision, Mr President. This will be a real tough one to follow since the briefing starts back, historically speaking, that is, and runs up to recent times. I believe we have prepared a good chronological order of events. I'm sure you, Mr President, will have many questions.

The list of questions presented to me by ADVISER #2 should all be answered during this briefing. I hope they are, more than anyone, especially you, Mr President, leave this briefing with questions still unanswered. I have asked The Caretaker to conduct this briefing. He is a contract employee of the CIA and is the present custodian of the information. Are we to assume that everyone is present?

PRESIDENT: Well, it will be entirely up to you, Bill. I guess everyone must be cleared for this briefing of information, is that not correct?

WM CASEY: Well, it appears everyone is, but as you will see Mr President, this stuff is pretty high up on the food chain. We call it ATS or "Above Top Secret." This stuff has its own classification and markings. We have a special container, special printers and copiers for this stuff. Every word of this material is printed on special paper then placed inside special covers. The caretakers have taken special efforts to protect all of this stuff from being released inadvertently or copied by some unauthorized person.

But all of this material is protected by a special group of people. The Caretaker is in charge of protecting this information and all of the other stuff associated with this information. I would prefer that you, Mr President, decide on who you want in this room. Remember, this material is a closely guarded secret. Although the gist of the story has been out there for many years, very little of the ACTUAL TRUTH has ever been released to the public. Oh, yes, well, by some of the renegades maybe, but many of them have been discredited.

PRESIDENT: OK, Bill, I guess we need ADVISER #1, you, ADVISER #3 and Caspar here. I think ADVISER #2 and Michael can leave.

ADVISER #2: Mr President, excuse me, but I would prefer to leave. I don't wish to know this information. You know, plausible denial or something like that.

MICHAEL DEAVER: Mr President, whatever you wish, I'll do. It would be an interesting subject, but do I really have a need to know? No, I don't think so.

PRESIDENT: OK, I guess that is it.

WM CASEY: Thank you, Mr President. I will now turn the briefing over to The Caretaker.

ADVISER #3: Mr President, and Mr Director, I already had this briefing. I can stay or leave. Secretary Weinberger and myself received this a few weeks ago.

SECRETARY WEINBERGER: Mr President, as you know, we have some pending business regarding that Soviet problem in Berlin. I think we might just handle that. ADVISER #3 and I will let you close this meeting to just a few.

PRESIDENT: OK, Casp, I guess you and ADVISER #3 can leave. Thanks for coming.

WM CASEY: OK, Mr President, that certainly narrows the audience. I think this is just right.

PRESIDENT: OK, well, I can't wait to hear this. Let's proceed.

The CARETAKER: Good morning, Mr President. First of all, I would like to give you a bit of information on my background. But before that, please, Mr President, if you have questions during this briefing, just interrupt me, sir. I have been employed by the CIA for the past 31 years. I started the caretaking status of this project in 1960. We have a special group of people whom we call "Group 6," that cares for all this information.

PRESIDENT: Good morning, I hope, well, I believe I will ask questions. Bill briefed me back in January, but I'm not sure ... huh ... well, was it detailed, no, I don't think so ... huh ... OK, well I'm sure Bill didn't tell me all 'cause we only had about one hour.

WM CASEY: Mr President, I only gave you a quick briefing for the NSDD (National Security Decision Directives) that we want to incorporate into the overall action directives about this subject. ADVISER #3, Caspar and I have details far beyond what I knew before January. The last administration wasn't too keen on making all of this stuff accessible to us during the briefings in November and December.

PRESIDENT: Well, I knew a little about this subject before. Back in 1970. Nixon had all of the good stuff and wanted to share it with some of his friends. Nixon showed me some papers. Not sure about who authored them, but they ... huh ... well something about New Mexico and other places. Nixon was pretty ... huh ... well, you know, fascinated with it. He showed me something, some kind of object or device that came from one of their craft. Something that was taken from the New Mexico crash site. I don't know if, well ... huh ... do we know what it was? I don't think we knew or maybe now, after 11 years, we might know.

The CARETAKER: Mr President, I can answer some of those questions. Do you wish for me to begin?

PRESIDENT: Oh, well, what level is this? I mean, what was it called? I don't remember what they called this.

WM CASEY: Mr President, codeword. It's called Top Secret Codeword. This information is beyond Top Secret as I said before. It has its own classification. It is very compartmentalized.

PRESIDENT: Well, I guess just the minimum. Are we recording this?

The CARETAKER: Mr President, no, unless you wish.

WM CASEY: Yes, it is [CIA FEMALE TRANSCRIBER] who is doing that. I think we should. I don't want to make any mistakes later about this. ADVISER #4 should also stay, since he is one of the caretakers of the information.

PRESIDENT: Well, I don't want anyone leaking this stuff. Not knowing what we are about to discuss ... huh ... oh, well, Bill I guess it is your call. ADVISER #4 should stay. I guess he should ... huh ... oh, OK, well, you make the call, Bill.

WM CASEY: OK, I guess ADVISER #4 will stay. But I think [CIA FEMALE TRANSCRIBER] must stay. I'll make that call.

PRESIDENT: OK, I guess we can do our business first, give me a few minutes. Let's get some food first, or snacks. How long will ... huh .... oh, about one hour?

The CARETAKER: Mr President, I estimate this will last about one hour, at least the first part of it. This is a very complicated subject to brief. I can do it, but maybe the questions will extend [beyond the first] the time period.

PRESIDENT: OK, I see. Let's take a break and then reconvene.

(Break)

The CARETAKER: OK, Mr President, are we ready?

PRESIDENT: Yes, we are, let's go.

The CARETAKER: Mr President, as was mentioned earlier, I must say, that this briefing has the highest classification within the U.S. government. I will start with a slide presentation. I have most of this briefing on the slides, but I also have an outline that I have passed out to each [person] in attendance.

PRESIDENT: Oh, OK, so are we ... can we follow it with the [outline] paper?

The CARETAKER: Yes, Mr President, you can follow the briefing with the outline in front of you.

PRESIDENT: Thank you.

The CARETAKER: The United States of America has been visited by Extraterrestrial Visitors since 1947. We have proof of that. However, we also have some proof that Earth has been visited for many THOUSANDS OF YEARS by various races of Extraterrestrial Visitors. Mr President, I'll just refer to those visits as ETs. In July, 1947, a remarkable event occurred in New Mexico. During a storm, two ET spacecraft crashed. One crashed southwest of Corona, New Mexico and one crashed near Datil, New Mexico. The U.S. Army eventually found both sites and recovered all of the debris and one live Alien. I'll refer to this live Alien as "EBE 1." PRESIDENT: What does that mean? Do we have codes or a special terminology for this?

The CARETAKER: Mr President, EBE means "Extraterrestrial Biological Entity." It was a code designated to this creature by the U.S. Army back in those days. This creature was not human and we had to decide on a term for it. So, scientists designated the creature as EBE 1. We also referred to it as "Noah." There was different terminology used by various aspects of the U.S. military and intelligence community back then.

PRESIDENT: Do we or did we have others? The number "1" would seem to indicate we had others.

The CARETAKER: Yes, we had others. Back then, the term was EBE and no number designation. We'll explain how the others came into our knowledge.

PRESIDENT: OK, sorry, I was just wondering and I guess, well, I'm sure the briefing will cover this. Please continue.

The CARETAKER: All the debris and EBEs recovered from the first crash site were taken to Roswell Army Air Field, Roswell, New Mexico. EBE was treated for some minor injuries and then taken to Los Alamos National Laboratories, which was the safest and most secure location in the world. Special accommodations were made for EBE. The debris was eventually transferred to Dayton, Ohio, home of the Air Force Foreign Technology Division. The second crash site wasn't discovered until 1949 by some ranchers. There were no live Aliens at this site. All this debris went to Sandia Army Base in Albuquerque, New Mexico.

PRESIDENT: OK, a question, regarding the first site, how many aliens were in the spaceship?

The CARETAKER: Five (5) dead aliens and one (1) alive. The bodies of the dead aliens were transported to Wright Field in Ohio and kept in a form of deep freeze. They were later transported to Los Alamos where special containers were made to keep the bodies from decaying. There were four (4) dead aliens in the second crash site. Those bodies were in an advanced state of decaying. They had been in the desert for the past two (2) years. Animals and time got to those bodies. The remains were transported to Sandia Base and eventually onto Los Alamos. We determined both crashed spaceships were of similar design and the bodies of the aliens were all identical. They looked exactly the same. They had the same height, weight and physical features. Here are the photographs of the aliens.

(Pause)

PRESIDENT: Can we classify them? I mean can we ... well, connect them with anything Earthly?

The CARETAKER: No, Mr President. They don't have any similar characteristics of a human, with exception of there eyes, ears and a mouth. Their internal body organs are different. Their skin is different, their eyes, ears and even breathing is different. Their blood wasn't red and their brain was entirely different from human. We could not classify any part of the Aliens with humans. They had blood and skin, although considerably different than human skin. Their eyes had two different eyelids. Probably because their home planet was very bright.

PRESIDENT: Maybe I'm getting ahead, but do we know where they came from? Mars, our system or where?

The CARETAKER: Yes, Mr President, we do know where they come from. I can go into this now, or I can wait until it comes up in the briefing.

PRESIDENT: No, no, please, continue. I can wait.

The CARETAKER: Thank you, Mr President. EBE stayed alive until 1952 when it died. We learned a great deal from EBE. Although EBE did not have voice organs like humans, it was able to communicate with an operation performed by military doctors. EBE was extremely intelligent. It learned English quickly, mainly by listening to the military personnel who were responsible for EBE's safety and care.

EBE was housed in a special area at Los Alamos and Sandia Base. Although many different military doctors, scientists and a select number of civilians studied EBE, it never became upset or angry. EBE helped us learn from all the items found in the two crash sites. EBE showed us how some of the items worked, such as a communications device. It also showed us how various other devices worked.

PRESIDENT: Excuse me, but you are referring to this creature as an IT. Did it have a gender?

The CARETAKER: I'm sorry Mr President, but yes, it was male. Within EBE's race they had males and females.

PRESIDENT: OK, thank you. Please continue.

The CARETAKER: Thank you, Mr President. EBE died of what military doctors considered natural causes. I don't think we could really state exactly why EBE died. Although we had five (5) years to study EBE, we didn't have any standards to compare EBE's body with standard medical observations. It was difficult to lose EBE, since it was the most interesting thing we as humans could receive and study. A visitor from another planet ... ANOTHER WORLD. EBE did explain where he lives in the universe. We call this star system Zeta Reticuli, which is about 40 light-years [38.42] from Earth. EBE's planet was within this star system.

PRESIDENT: OK, where is this in comparison to something we all know?

The CARETAKER: Well, Mr President, our closet star is four light-years away. I can show you the constellation it is in.

[Alpha Centauri, a yellow star, is the brightest star in the constellation Centaurus, 4.3 light-years away]

PRESIDENT: No, I wouldn't know much about astronomy. I just thought I could understand the distance. How long did it take this spaceship to get here?

The CARETAKER: Well, Mr President, I can tell you now or we can discuss that in another briefing. As Mr Casey said, this is a complicated subject because there are many levels of compartmentalization. This briefing is just the basic information about a visit to our planet by one particular alien race.

PRESIDENT: Well ... huh ... what, am I to understand ... this isn't a full briefing?

WM CASEY: Mr President, we have different levels of stuff. If we mix it up, I don't think it will make sense, nor will we have time this morning. I understand you have a busy schedule today.

PRESIDENT: As the President of the United States, I should know EVERYTHING, right, or shouldn't I? If I am to assume this was a briefing of substance, then I should hear ALL of it. I think this is more important than some other things on my daily calendar. But maybe I'm jumping the gun. If there are some things I shouldn't know, please tell me.

WM CASEY: No, no, Mr President, I didn't mean you shouldn't know this stuff. I simply meant we should proceed in an orderly fashion as to the briefing. But it is up to you. We will not hold anything back.

PRESIDENT: ADVISER #1, what do you think? Do you know about all this?

ADVISER #1: Mr President, yes, I was briefed many times on this subject matter. As Director Casey stated, this is a very, very complicated subject. I think it took me about one year to be fully briefed into all aspects of this matter. There are different areas. The initial crash, an investigative period, some attempt at contact, A DISINFORMATION OPERATION to protect this matter and several other levels.

PRESIDENT: Oh, wow, I didn't realize how complicated this was. I'm new at [all of] this. I have a great responsibility to the citizens of this nation to make decisions based on accurate information presented by my advisers ... YOU, ALL of you. I won't interfere in your presentation of this information. So, I guess, we'll proceed in the order you have chosen. I'm sorry for interrupting in this presentation, but as a person who is interested beyond belief in this, I'll just shut up and wait to ask questions.

WM CASEY: Mr President. No, no, please ask any questions you wish. You are the President. We are not here to argue with you over the order of this briefing. But some things are SO HIGHLY CLASSIFIED that THIS BRIEFING IS THE LOWEST LEVEL. If you ask a question that is in a different level, then we will have to re-evaluate the audience.

ADVISER #1: Mr President. Everything we know about Alien visitation to Earth is contained in 16 (sixteen) volumes of binders. These binders contain thousands of pages. We can give you anything you wish but, as Director Casey said, we must evaluate the clearances of each person listening to our responses.

PRESIDENT: OK, I now understand. Give me whatever you want and I'll continue to ask questions. But if you need me to wait on an answer, just tell me.

WM CASEY: OK, Mr President we will do that. I still don't know the entire story. I have read one tenth of one binder and have hundreds of questions.

PRESIDENT: OK, let's continue.

The CARETAKER: Mr President, thank you for those responses. I will answer any question, if I can. But if the question is above this level, then Director Casey will have to make that decision for me.

PRESIDENT: I fully understand, please continue.

The CARETAKER: It took the EBE spaceship nine (9) of our months to travel the 40 [38.42] light-years. Now, as you can see, that would mean the EBE spaceship traveled faster than the speed of light. But, this is where it gets really technical. Their spaceships can travel through a form of "space tunnels" that gets them from point "A" to point "B" faster without having to travel at the speed of light. I cannot fully understand how they travel, but we have many top scientists who can understand their concept.

PRESIDENT: Well, I certainly couldn't understand the science in that. Is it a black hole?

The CARETAKER: Mr President, something like that, but much more complicated.

PRESIDENT: Do they get here ... no never mind, please continue. [unintelligible]

WM CASEY: Mr President, I can assure we know how they do it, but we can't do it.

PRESIDENT: OK. (several speaking at once)

The CARETAKER: As to some history. The original project, started back in 1947, was called "Project GLEEM." This project contained volumes of documented information collected from the beginning of our investigation of UFOs and Identified Alien Craft, or "IAC." The project was originally established in the early '50s by, first President Truman and then by order of President Eisenhower, under control of the National Security Council. President Truman established a group of people to handle this project. The group was called Majority 12 or "MJ-12."

In 1966, the project's name was changed to "Aquarius." The project was funded by confidential ["black world"] funds appropriated within the intelligence community's budget. The recovery of these alien spacecraft led the United States on an extensive investigative program to determine whether these aliens posed a direct threat to our National Security. As you might remember, Mr President, our country openly investigated UFO sightings under projects Grudge, Sign and finally Blue Book.

The original mission of the Air Force program was to collect and analyze all reported sightings and incidents involving UFOs and then determine whether the information could be interpreted as having any bearing on the national security of the United States. Some information was evaluated with the idea of using the gained data to advance our own space technology and future space programs.

About 90% of the estimated 12,000 reports analyzed by the Air Force under Blue Book were considered hoaxes, explained aerial phenomena or astronomical objects. The other 10% were considered legitimate alien sightings and/or incidents. However, not all UFO sightings or incidents were reported under the Air Force programs of Grudge, Sign and Blue Book.

In 1953, Project Gleem initiated its own investigative detail and certain sightings were reported directly under Gleem rather than one of the other projects. Project Gleem, which became "Project AQUARIUS" in 1966, was a parallel reporting system for UFO sightings and incidents.

Reports collected under Project Aquarius were considered actual sightings of alien spacecraft or actual contacts with alien life forms. We recovered two alien spacecraft from New Mexico. Both were heavily damaged, but we were able to examine them. The two craft were considered technological marvels by our scientists. However, the operating instrumentation was so advanced that our scientists could not decipher it. The two craft were stored in a special security location in the West. We gained a large volume of technological data from these craft.

Several independent scientific investigations, at the request of the Air Force and CIA were initiated during the era of "Project Blue Book." MJ-12 decided that officially the Air Force should end their investigation of UFO sightings. This decision was arrived at during the NPNN meeting in 1966. The reason was two fold. First, the United States had established communications with the aliens.

PRESIDENT: Hold on, OK ... well, Bill, no ... never mind, please continue.

WM CASEY: Mr President, the communications project is of a higher level. I recommend we continue on this course and then switch to the next, if we have time.

PRESIDENT: OK, you're steering the boat, Bill.

The CARETAKER: The United States felt relatively sure the aliens' exploration of Earth was non-aggressive and non-hostile. It was also established that the aliens' presence did not directly threaten the security of the United States. Secondly, the public was beginning to believe that UFOs were real. The NSC felt this public feeling could lead to a nationwide panic if we disclosed everything we knew about UFOs and alien visitation. We were involved in one major operation during this time frame that involved our alien visitors. That operation is of a higher level and it will be up to Director Casey to proceed now or wait until later.

WM CASEY: We'll wait on that part of it. I haven't been fully briefed and I would like to be able to know everything about that program before trying to brief the President.

ADVISER #1: I agree with Director Casey. That part of the program is really complicated and will require a full day to brief.

PRESIDENT: OK, as I said before, Bill's the captain of this ship.

The CARETAKER: It was felt that public awareness of these projects would have jeopardized the future space program of the United States. Releasing our secrets about UFOs and alien visitation would also cause a PANIC AMONG RELIGIOUS LEADERS around the world. Therefore, MJ-12 decided that an independent scientific study of the UFO phenomena would be needed to satisfy the public curiosity.

The final official study of the UFO phenomena was accomplished by the University of Colorado under an air force contract. The study concluded that sufficient data did not exist that would indicate that UFOs threatened the security of the United States. The final conclusion satisfied the Government and allowed the Air Force to officially step out of the UFO investigating business.

When the Air Force officially closed "Blue Book" in December 1969, Project Aquarius continued operation under control of NSC/MJ-12. The NSC felt investigation of UFO sightings and incidents had to continue in secrecy without any public knowledge. The reasoning behind the decision was this: If the Air Force continued its investigation of UFOs, eventually some non-cleared and non-briefed Air Force or DOD civilian officials would obtain the facts behind Project Aquarius.

Obviously, for operational security reasons, this could not be allowed. In order to continue the investigation of UFO sightings and incidents in secrecy, investigators from CIA/DCE and MJ-12 were assigned to military investigative units with orders to investigate all legitimate UFO/IAC sightings and incidents. These agents are presently operating at various locations throughout the U.S. and Canada. All reports are filtered either directly or indirectly to MJ-12. These agents are collecting reports of UFO/IAC sightings and incidents occurring on or near sensitive governmental installations.

Many reported sightings and incidents have occurred over nuclear weapons bases. The aliens' interest in our nuclear weapons can only be attributed to the future threat of a nuclear war on Earth that could affect space. The Air Force has initiated measures to assure the security of the nuclear weapons from alien theft or destruction. MJ-12 feels confident that the aliens are on an exploration of our solar system for peaceful purposes. However, we do have information and that is at another level, that more than one alien species are visiting Earth.

PRESIDENT: Well, that is a lot to digest. I have written down many questions. But let's take a break and come back to this.

(Break)

PRESIDENT: I think we can continue now.

The CARETAKER: Thank you, Mr President. I will continue. In the 1976 MJ-12 report, it was estimated that the aliens' technology was many thousands of years ahead of ours. Our scientists speculated that until our technology develops to a level equal to the aliens, we cannot understand the large volume of scientific information we have gained from the aliens' craft. This advancement of our technology may take many hundreds of years.

During our initial program to study the alien's spaceship, we started many different projects. The first project, originally established in 1949, was to collect and evaluate medical information from the surviving alien creature -- EBE 1 and the recovered alien bodies. This project medically examined EBE 1 and provided our medical researchers with many answers to the evolution theories.

The next project originally established as part of Project Gleem in 1954 became a separate project in 1966. Its mission was to establish communication with aliens. This project met with positive success and will be discussed later under a different level. Two other projects involved the test flying of an alien ship and the cross technology between our space program and the information we obtained from EBE 1.

WM CASEY: Now, Mr President, we can move on to questions or a different level. Which do you prefer?

PRESIDENT: Well, I have a lot of questions, so let me ask a few and then we can move on. I guess the first question I have is their life span. How old is EBE 1?

The CARETAKER: Mr President, the alien civilization that EBE came from [is what] we call the Eben Society. It wasn't a name they gave us; it was a name we chose. Their life span is between 350-400 years, but that is Earth years.

PRESIDENT: Is time the same on their planet as on ours?

The CARETAKER: No, Mr President, time is very different on the Eben Planet, which, by the way, we call SERPO. Their day is approximately 40 hours. That is measured by the movement of their two (2) suns. The solar system containing SERPO is a binary star system, or two suns, rather than one, like our solar system.

PRESIDENT: Oh, well, your answer creates more questions. OK, as I understand it, their planet has two suns. Wouldn't that mean the planet was hot? I guess that explains their eyes, having two eyelids.

The CARETAKER: Yes, Mr President. Their suns do not set, like ours. There is daylight during their entire day, with the exception of a short time period where both suns hit the horizon.

PRESIDENT: What is life like on Serpico?

The CARETAKER: Mr President, it is called SERPO, spelled S-E-R-P-O. I think that will have to be given in a different level of briefings. Mr Director....

WM CASEY: Yes, Mr President, I think we are getting way ahead of ourselves. We have all that information about the visitor's planet, but we would have to present that information in a different briefing.

PRESIDENT: OK, all these levels. Something, I guess, I'll have to ... well, I'll have to get used to it. Does all classified information have these different levels?

WM CASEY: It is similar to the SIOP briefing you were given in January. We have different levels of clearances and....

PRESIDENT: No, I understand all that, Bill. I fully understand the different levels of clearances. I mean, what about the Soviets? What about the spy operations we have in Russia, comparing the two, this alien information to that, are they on the same level?

WM CASEY: No, Mr President. This information would be considered at the very top, whereas our spying operation inside Russia would be considered at a parallel level, but not the same.

PRESIDENT: Like apples and oranges, OK, I see. I guess this is more that can be explained in one sitting. What about the travel from SERPO to Earth?

The CARETAKER: Well, Mr President, the distance from Earth to SERPO is about 40 light-years. They can travel that in about nine (9) of our months. I am no scientist, but as I mentioned earlier, they can travel that great distance by means of space tunnels. They seem to be able to bend the distance from one point in space to another. Just how they do this, must be explained scientifically.

PRESIDENT: OK, well, very interesting. Are the laws of physics on their planet the same as our planet?

The CARETAKER: Not exactly. There seem to be a little different laws, especially when it comes to the movement of their planet in relationship to their two suns. Our scientists don't understand it because it defies some of our laws of physics.

PRESIDENT: Do they use nuclear power, or what type of power do they have in those ships?

The CARETAKER: Mr President, we understand very little about their propulsion system. There seem to be two different propulsion systems. One they use within our atmosphere and one they use once they exit our atmosphere. They do not have nuclear power. Their propulsion system does have some type of low level radiation emissions, but nothing that would endanger us. It isn't like our radiation, but we call it radiation because we have nothing else to compare it with.

PRESIDENT: Have these aliens visited other places on earth?

The CARETAKER: Again, Mr President, that would be in a different level of discussion.

PRESIDENT: I'm getting tired of hearing that answer, but I understand.

WM CASEY: Mr President, the Soviet Union has had their contacts with these aliens. We have a great deal of intelligence that would indicate the Soviets had their "Roswell," so to speak. What they know is about the same as we know. They had some bodies back in the late '50s, but our intelligence would indicate the species of aliens were different.

[SEE:  http://www.serpo.org/release26a.php]

PRESIDENT: OK, well, then Bill, that presents a very disturbing feeling for me. Are you telling me there are different races or species, as you said, visiting Earth at the same time?

WM CASEY: CARETAKER, take that question.

The CARETAKER: Yes, Mr President, but I hesitate to state the reason. We should have that discussion in a different meeting.

PRESIDENT: Just answer the simple question of how many different species, don't go into details, since I'm sure it is at "a different level," as I've been hearing ALL morning!

The CARETAKER: I am sorry Mr President if I upset you....

PRESIDENT: No, no, Caretaker, don't feel that way. I am not upset. No, you are all of my advisers. As President, I must listen to YOU and take YOUR advice. I am NOT upset. I'm sorry for giving you that impression. Can you tell me how many different species have visited us?

The CARETAKER: Mr Director?

WM CASEY: Go ahead, Caretaker, answer the President's question.

The CARETAKER: At least five (5).

PRESIDENT: Are they all friendly?

The CARETAKER: Mr Director?

WM CASEY: Adviser #1, would you like to step in here?

ADVISER #1: Mr President, that is a very difficult question to answer. There are many parameters that we follow to evaluate the threat. However, we have little intelligence on four (4) of the five (5). We have plenty of intel on the Ebens ... gee ... they've given us everything we asked for! They have also helped us to understand the other four (4) species. I'm afraid to say, Mr President and please don't misunderstand my words, but we think ONE OF THE SPECIES IS VERY HOSTILE. WM CASEY: Mr President, do you wish for us to continue on this track or would you like something more private, as to the discussion of this topic?

PRESIDENT: For Christ sakes, I'm the President of the United States. I should know if we are endangered by some THREAT FROM OUTER SPACE. If you have something to say about a threat posed by this one species of aliens, then I WANT TO HEAR IT.

WM CASEY: Mr President, we have intelligence that would indicate this one (1) species of aliens have ABDUCTED PEOPLE FROM EARTH. They have performed scientific and medical tests on these humans. To the best of our knowledge, NO humans have been killed. But, as ADVISER #1 stated, the intelligence is from witnesses and we haven't thoroughly evaluated this intelligence.

We have captured one of these hostile aliens. This gets into some very, very sensitive areas, Mr President. I strongly suggest we end this discussion and move on to any further questions you might have and then get back to this. I don't think we are prepared to provide you with accurate answers to your questions about the potentially hostile aliens at this time.

PRESIDENT: OK, but expect this to be given to me as soon as possible. I want to KNOW EVERYTHING ABOUT THESE HOSTILE CREATURES so I .... or I mean we should start forming policies on how to deal with them. Adviser #1, do we have OPERATIONAL WAR PLANS on this?

ADVISER #1: Yes, Mr President, we have war plans on ALL potential threats to our country.

PRESIDENT: Please, let us not forget the world. If these creatures attack some other country, we would have to help.

ADVISER #1: Mr President, we have absolutely NO evidence that this particular alien race has any plans to attack the United States of America or planet Earth.

PRESIDENT: I guess we really got off the original subject. But I want to know of any threats. DON'T HIDE ANYTHING FROM ME! Is that understood?

WM CASEY: Yes, Sir.

ADVISER #1: Yes, Sir, Mr President. We will NEVER hide any information about a potential threat to our country or the world. You receive daily intel briefings and you will continue to and we can update that briefing with any potential threat from this area.

PRESIDENT: OK, let us continue. How many other presidents received this briefing?

The CARETAKER: Mr President, I have briefed President Nixon, Ford and you. President Carter was never given the entire briefing. I have no answer as to why he wasn't given the briefing.

PRESIDENT: Well, knowing that guy, he probably couldn't understand it being from Georgia! But that is just a dry joke.... (laughter heard in room)

 
The Reagans at Camp David

 Click to enlarge
 
 http://www.reagan.utexas.edu/archives/reference/tripsdavid.html  

 PRESIDENT RONALD REAGAN's TRIPS TO CAMP DAVID 

       1981 
       January 30 - February 1 
       February 6 - 8 
       February 13 - 16 
       MARCH 6 - 8       <== NOTE THESE DATES 
       April 25 - 27 
       May 8 - 10 
       June 5 - 7 
       June 8 - 9 
       June 19 - 21 
       July 10 - 12 
       July 25 - 26 
       July 31 - August 2 
       August 11 - 13 
       September 18 - 20 
       September 25 - 27 
       October 2 - 4 
       OCTOBER 9 - 12       <== NOTE THESE DATES 
       October 30 - November 1 
       December 11 - 13 

 Photo of President Reagan and Nancy Reagan at Camp David, 
 Maryland, 7/2/88. Photo courtesy of the Ronald Reagan Library.
    

ADVISER #1: Mr President, I can give you some details of an incident that occurred inside the Soviet Union in 1970.

WM CASEY: Do we want to go there?

ADVISER #4: May I say something, Mr Director?

WM CASEY: Go ahead, ADVISER #4, step in.

ADVISER #4: I think this particular incident inside the Soviet Union will give the President an example of what the world has and will experience in the future. There is no way we can control visitors from outer space from traveling to Earth and visiting our planet. Some astronomers find it difficult to believe that these aliens can find Earth. We are on the outer reaches of our galaxy. Our sun is one of hundreds of thousands of such stars within our galactic neighborhood. But the Ebens found us, they found Earth. And we are not the only country on Earth that has been visited by the Ebens.

Now, as for the other four (4) species. We know they have visited us in the past and will visit us in the future. We are like a petri dish within the universe. We are a diverse planet. We must be very interesting to other extraterrestrials. I'm SURE other intelligent life forms in the universe must have some sort of communications among the [sentient] life forms. Maybe they broadcasted that Earth has intelligent life. Maybe that is why we are [being] visited.

Getting back to ADVISER #1, regarding the incident inside the Soviet Union, Mr President, there are many such sightings all over the world. We must understand that the visitors can roam our planet at will without us doing much about it. However, I personally believe that we must prepare for the EVENTUAL DAY WHEN SOME HOSTILE LIFE FORM DECIDES TO TAKE OVER OUR PLANET. We must be prepared. I hope you understand why I said what I said, Mr President.

PRESIDENT: Yes, indeed, ADVISER #4, very well said. I agree with you. I guess all of those sightings ... well, some of them are real .... I mean, we are being visited, today, now, in this time period.

WM CASEY: Yes, Mr President, we are.

PRESIDENT: OK, ADVISER #1, please continue, we cut you off.

ADVISER #1: OK, thanks, Mr President. As I was saying, actually a series of incidents occurred over about a week. Our intelligence gathering stations inside and outside of the Soviet Union picked up voice transmissions between Soviet Air Defense pilots and ground controllers regarding a number of UFOs which were being chased by Soviet pilots. The incident started in central Siberia and ended over the Black Sea.

Literally thousands of Soviets observed the UFOs and at least 20 different fighter pilots chased the UFOs. The Soviets attempted on two occasions to shoot down the UFOs, but to no avail. That is probably the best evidence that these things are happening over the Soviet Union. We think these UFOs were the hostile ones. We call them hostile because they tend to land, take humans, conduct experiments on them and then release the humans. Their spacecraft are different in design than the Ebens.

PRESIDENT: Wait one minute, ADVISER #1, you mean to say that we have one of their spaceships? Or are you telling me we have some other evidence of their spaceships?

ADVISER #1: Mr President, we have photographs of their ships. This gets a little complicated because some of our intelligence comes from the Ebens.

PRESIDENT: You mean from the EBE guy?

ADVISER #1: Yes, but from other sources of information connected to the Ebens.

WM CASEY: Mr President, we'll have to go to those dreaded words you don't like ... higher levels if you wish.

PRESIDENT: No, well, no ... oh ... OK ... just give me this briefing first. We can schedule the higher level ones later.

ADVISER #1: Simply speaking, we know the difference between the Eben spacecraft and the hostile aliens' spacecraft.

PRESIDENT: Do you have a ... huh ... name for them, I mean the bad ones?

The CARETAKER: May I interrupt, Mr President?

WM CASEY: Wait, OK, I guess we can proceed.

PRESIDENT: Well, huh. (Too many speaking at once; several conversations not understood.)

? (Not understood) ?

The CARETAKER: OK.... (Several sentences said, but not understood.)

WM CASEY: Yes, go ahead, CARETAKER.

PRESIDENT: No, I didn't mean to interrupt.

The CARETAKER: Thank you, Mr President. We call the hostile aliens simply that, HAV, meaning Hostile Alien Visitors. MJ-12 placed that code on them back in the '50s.

WM CASEY: OK, we opened the box so let's just tell the president what we know about the others.

ADVISER #1: The names? What? (Several sentences not understood.) OK, well, technical? Or what?

WM CASEY: (Not understood), well, (not understood), OK, I guess it means the technical stuff.

PRESIDENT: You mean to say, these H-A-Vs have been visiting us and kidnapping our people since the '50s?

The CARETAKER: Mr President, yes, well, they have been around since then, Director Casey....

WM CASEY: Mr President, we have some indication that they might have been doing this for some time. But we really have to consider all of the evidence, listed in our reports, and compare that to some of the open source information. There are always humans that will exaggerate and just tell lies, compared to the real ones or the ones who were abducted and subjected to experiments. We have to sort through the differences and place some aside and look at the real evidence of abductions. But we can be sure that the Ebens have NEVER done this. They are extremely peaceful and would not harm a living soul, including animals.

ADVISER #1: I suggest we go ahead and give the President the information on them.

ADVISER #4: I agree.

WM CASEY: OK, give the President the names, CARETAKER.

The CARETAKER: Names, the technical names?

WM CASEY: Yes, OK, (not understood) well about the (not understood) I can live with that, but we have to be real sure that this information stays HERE. We cannot allow this to flow (not understood) from (not understood).

The CARETAKER: OK, thank you. Mr President, the five (5) species are called, Ebens, Archquloids, Quadloids, Heplaloids and Trantaloids. These names were given to the alien's species by the intelligence community, specifically MJ-5. The Ebens are friendly; the Trantaloids are the dangerous ones.

[SEE:  http://www.serpo.org/release23.php ]

PRESIDENT: My God, just knowing we have names for these things are amazing. Which one did we capture?

WM CASEY: Mr President, we have a Trantaloid, but it is dead. We captured it in 1961 in Canada and we had it in captivity until 1962, when it died. We'll show you a photograph ... CARETAKER?

The CARETAKER: Director, I don't have one with me. But, I will get one couriered over to us.

WM CASEY: Mr President, we can provide that during our next meeting regarding this subject.

PRESIDENT: OK.

WM CASEY: (not understood) ... the part of the story where (not understood), but we can look back.

PRESIDENT: OK, let's continue.

The CARETAKER: Mr President, getting back to my presentation, all of our collected information is safely contained in a number of locations.

PRESIDENT: Don't tell me where, I don't want to know specific locations. I'll let or leave that up to you and the caretakers of the material. I don't want to be in a position or know this ... maybe I will later.

The CARETAKER: OK, Mr President, I'll keep this in general terms. I just want to assure you that all of the information is safely tucked away at secure locations, including the devices and flying craft that we have.

PRESIDENT: May I assume one of these places is located in California?

The CARETAKER: Some of the items are tested at Livermore and flown around Edwards, but they are kept in Nevada.

PRESIDENT: OK, yes, I think I was briefed on sensitive military installations back in February ... west of Las Vegas, I guess.

The CARETAKER: Yes, Mr President. We call it the Groom Lake Complex.

PRESIDENT: OK, I was told about that. The same place we have Soviet fighter jets?

The CARETAKER: Yes, Mr President, the same place. May I continue?

PRESIDENT: Yes, by all means, do.

The CARETAKER: In order to protect all this information and the fact that the United States Government has evidence of our planet being visited by Extraterrestrials, we developed over the years a very effective program to safeguard the information. We call it "Project DOVE." It is a complex series of [disinformation] operations by our military intelligence agencies to disinform the public. As you know, Mr President, we have some highly classified aircraft.

In order to keep these aircraft secret, we tend to convince, at times, the public and press that maybe UFOs are real in order to make the public THINK what they are seeing are actually UFOs instead of OUR own secret aircraft even though we know maybe some of the sightings are of actual UFOs. As I said before, this is complicated, but it is a form of counterintelligence. We give the public some actual facts and let them run with it.

The rest is taken care of by them. If you consider the FIRST PERSON who helped us with this disinformation program, Mr GEORGE ADAMSKI, back in the early '50s, and up to all of the movie productions of UFO-related movies. This helps the public to keep their minds open, but also allows us to keep our secret aircraft away from the public's knowledge. That includes some of the craft that were lent to us by the Ebens.

PRESIDENT: I always knew there was some form of cooperation between our government and the motion picture industry. I heard rumors over the years ... even during my acting days.

The CARETAKER: Well, Mr President, the first cooperative venture was the movie, "The Day the Earth Stood Still." That was a cooperative venture with the United States Air Force and the movie industry.

PRESIDENT: That movie, "Close Encounters," was that one of them? I guess no "Bonzo" movies were involved. (Loud laughter heard.)

WM CASEY: No (laughing), Mr President, I don't think or should I say, I didn't think Bonzo came from outer space! (more laughter)

[RONALD REAGAN played the character Professor Peter Boyd in the Sept 1951 movie, "Bedtime for Bonzo" where a chimpanzee named Bonzo was his costar.

 http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0043325/ ]

PRESIDENT: No, but some people could imagine it!

The CARETAKER: Yes, Mr President, we provided the basic subject matter for that movie.

PRESIDENT: Was it based on a real incident?

WM CASEY: Mr President....

PRESIDENT: OK, Bill, I know what's coming, just forget my question for now.

WM CASEY: OK, CARETAKER, continue.

The CARETAKER: Thank you, Mr President. In 1949, President Truman created two (2) secret commissions. These commissions were to meet privately without recording any contents. The commissions were code named "Adam" and "Eve." The first commission, Adam, was to study the idea of releasing some information to the public regarding our actual knowledge of UFOs and the two (2) crash incidents.

The findings of the Adam commission consisted of the following statement: "In this matter, public opinion must be recognized as a factor of considerable importance, even if clearly affirmative might have the effect of placing before the American people a moral question of vital historical significance at a time when the full security impact of the question had not become apparent. If this decision is to be made by the American people, it should be made in the circumstances of an actual disclosure of the existence of space beings who had visited Earth. In other words, the American public might hesitate to believe the existence of space beings unless the American Government showed proof."

This was an actual quote from the classified document dated 1 December 1949. The second commission, "Eve," concerned the use of atom bombs to repel a space alien attack. What's interesting in this statement was the decision by President Truman to proceed at a record pace on the production of atomic weapons that could be released in space. The commission predicted it would take the United States 10 years to develop such a delivery system. President Truman wanted it developed in five (5) years.

In fact, in 1959, the first Atlas ICBMs were targeted for deep space. SIOP plans were developed to counter any space-based alien invasion. Mr David Lilienthal, the first atomic energy commission chairman, was in charge of the production of enough atomic weapons to counter any anticipated alien threat. The commission was tasked with developing a delivery system that could send a Mark 3 atomic weapon into space.

In the 1948-1949 time frames, there were fewer than 50 atomic bombs in the arsenal and none of these were assembled. The Mark 3 plutonium bombs, like the one dropped at Nagasaki, Japan, took 39 men more that two days to assemble the bomb. The bombs were so large and heavy each weighed 10,000 pounds, and that a delivery system must be capable of sending this heavy weapon into space. As a result of Eve's commission findings, atomic weapons production was increased at a record pace.

Of course, this build-up coincided with the Soviet Union's build-up. It was easy to convince the American public that our build-up was caused by the Soviet Union's build-up. Mr President, in 1964, we were able to have our very first controlled encounter with the Ebens. Let me first give you the background. EBE was a mechanic, not a scientist. He was still able to teach us some of the Eben language. Their language was very difficult for our linguists to learn because it consisted of tones, not words.

However, we were able to translate some basic words. EBE showed us their communications device. It was a strange looking device that had three (3) parts. Once assembled, the device sent out signals, something like our Morse code system, although there was a problem. During the crash in 1947, one part of this communication system was broken. EBE was unable to repair it until our scientists found some items that could be used in place of the broken parts. Once the communication device was repaired, EBE sent our messages. We had to trust EBE as to the contents of those messages.

You can imagine what some of our military commanders thought of this. EBE could be sending out a distress call that could result in some invasion. But that, of course, never happened. EBE continued to send messages until his death. But once he died, then we were on our own. We were able to crudely operate the device. We sent several messages out over a six (6) month period (1953). But we did not receive any return messages.

PRESIDENT: Excuse me, did EBE receive any return messages?

The CARETAKER: Getting back to the messages, Mr President, EBE sent out six (6) messages. One letting his home planet know that he was alive and his comrades were dead, another explaining the two crashes, the third was a request to be rescued, the fourth was a message suggesting a meeting between his leaders and our leaders. The last message suggested some form of an EXCHANGE program.

 http://www.serpo.org/

WM CASEY: Mr President, we'll go into that later.

PRESIDENT: (not understood) ... what ... the exchange program?

WM CASEY: Yes, Mr President. We can give you another couple of hours on that subject.

PRESIDENT: We had one?

WM CASEY: Can I speak to you privately, please, Mr President?

PRESIDENT: OK, yes ... you mean now? (not understood)

WM CASEY: Well, let us put this one on the back burner and go on with the remainder of this briefing.

PRESIDENT: OK.

The CARETAKER: Mr President, we don't think he did, but we could not be entirely certain. But, our scientists fine-tuned our efforts over the next 18 months and finally sent two (2) messages in 1955 that were received. We received a reply. We were able to translate about 30 percent of the message. We turned to several linguist specialists from several different universities and even several from foreign universities. Finally, we were able to translate most of the messages. We decided to reply in English and see if the Ebens could translate our language easier than we could theirs.

PRESIDENT: What did the messages say? The one we received from the Ebens? So, I guess they didn't get the messages sent by EBE? Or did it take that long to respond? Oh, yes, EBE died before we got those messages, never mind.

The CARETAKER: Mr President, the first message we received acknowledged our message and asked questions about the crew of the two missing craft. It also gave a series of numbers that we think were some type of coordinates.

PRESIDENT: OK, so they wanted to know the coordinates of the crash sites on Earth? I'm sure they wanted to know about their crew. Did we tell them all but one was dead? No, wait; I'm sure when EBE sent his messages that is probably the first thing he sent. Was EBE a military person or what?

The CARETAKER: Mr President, we believe EBE was a member of their air force or maybe something like NASA.

PRESIDENT: OK, please continue.

The CARETAKER: Thank you, Mr President. Finally we were able to translate most of the messages. As I said, we decided to respond in English. Approximately four months later, we received a reply in broken English. Sentences contained nouns and adjectives, but no verbs. It took us several months to translate the message. We then sent Eben our typed English lessons in a series of one sheet formats.

Without going into the technical description of the Eben communications device, it was like a television screen and a key pad, but the pad contained several different Eben characters depending on the number of times you held down one key. We were able to transpose our English-typed words into the second part of the device, which was similar to our facsimile transmission system. It took our scientists some time to perfect this, but it worked. Six months later, we received another English message. This time it was clearer, but not clear enough. Ebens were confusing several different English words and still failed to complete a proper sentence.

PRESIDENT: Gee, I do that all of the time (sounds of laughter). I just cannot imagine how an alien race could view our language. We have thousands of different languages on Earth and they probably have just one on their SERPO planet. That is truly amazing.

The CARETAKER: Yes, Mr President, I cannot imagine living on a planet with just one language. But we were able to provide the basic skill level for them to communicate in English. It took time, but they realized our efforts. In one message, they provided us with a form of the Eben alphabet with the equivalent English letter. Our linguists had a very difficult time figuring this out. The written Eben language was simple characters and symbols, but our linguists had a difficult time comparing the two written languages.

Over the next five (5) years, we were able to perfect our understanding of the Eben language somewhat and the Ebens were able to better understand English. However, we had a major problem. Trying to coordinate a date, time and location for an Eben landing on Earth. Even though we could basically understand some Eben and the Ebens could understand some English, we could not understand their time and date system and they could not understand ours. We sent them our Earth's rotation schedule, revolution, date system, etc.

For some reason the Eben's never understood this. In return, the Ebens sent us their system, which was difficult for our scientists to understand because we had no reference to their planet. The Ebens did not explain any astronomical date of SERPO or their system. We then decided to just send pictures showing Earth, landmarks and a simple numbering system for time periods. We had many problems trying to send pictures using their facsimile system. We couldn't be sure they were receiving what we sent.

We had a lot of trial and errors in doing this. We received back some strange messages from the Ebens, basically big question marks regarding what we sent them as to the pictures. We then decided on narrowing any future landing location for them to the location of their crash in New Mexico. We concluded they must have that location. We are sure EBE sent that to his home planet prior to his death. We did find some star charts ... well ... as we call them, in both crashed spacecraft.

They were difficult to understand because they were on a block that we later figured out went into a certain panel on the crashed craft's instruments. Once the panel was in place, the board showed a star system. In fact, we were able to fit all the found boards into the panel and view many different star systems. We then put to work our astronomers in deciphering the star systems. It didn't take them very long to determine the various star systems. We also found several strange spots on the star charts.

We concluded these spots were where the travel space tunnels that EBE described were located. Our astronomers compared the different star charts and found that they were not consecutive. Meaning that one star chart was from one part of the universe and the next was a chart closer to their home system. Our scientists concluded the spots on the chart were a form of short cuts from one point of space to another. Some of our top astronomers were briefed into the program in order to study the charts. I'm sure they were given only the minimum amount of information they needed, something like a need-to-know program.

["Top astronomers": Dr CARL SAGAN, 11-9-1934 - 12-20-1996 /  http://www.imdb.com/name/nm0755981/ ]

PRESIDENT: OK, that is a lot to absorb. Wow, well, I have many questions, but I guess I'll just wait now. I have something to attend to now. But let us take a short break and come back to this.

WM CASEY: Mr President, how much time do you have left?

PRESIDENT: Well, Bill, let me check. (Long pause). I need to call some people on another matter. Give me about 15 minutes. Is that OK?

WM CASEY: Yes, Mr President, we are here at your disposal.

PRESIDENT: I have listened intently to this briefing. I have many questions, which I realize traverses several different layers of secrecy. I don't want to mix up the different layers. But I can see how government bureaucracy exists. That is one thing I can probably change as President! Bill, let's go to the next layer.

WM CASEY: Mr President, do you want the same people involved?

PRESIDENT: Yes, let's just continue.

WM CASEY: OK, CARETAKER, take over.

The CARETAKER: Thank you. When EBE was alive, he showed us two devices. One was a communication system and one was an energy device. The communication system did not work without the energy device. Eventually, a scientist from Los Alamos figured out the two systems and connected them. After EBE died, we were able to send transmissions, as I said earlier. EBE built up a strong friendship with a U.S. Army Major, who was his guardian.

The two of them decided that one of Eben's first messages (of the five sent) was a request for an exchange program between the Ebens and our military personnel. Remember I mentioned six (6) messages. The sixth consisted of landing coordinates for Earth. That information wasn't clearly documented back then. We are not sure of the exact chain of events between EBE and the Major. As I said earlier, we were able to eventually communicate with the Ebens.

Over a period of a few years, we could send and receive information. We finally received a startling message from the Ebens. They wanted to visit Earth, retrieve their spacemen bodies and meet with Earthlings. They provided a time, date and location. We figure that the Ebens were continually visiting Earth and had probably mapped it. However, the date was about eight (8) years in the future. Our military figured something was wrong and that maybe the Ebens were confusing Earth time with Eben time. After a long series of messages, it was determined the Ebens would land on Earth on Friday, April 24, 1964.

PRESIDENT: Just how did we figure the date?

The CARETAKER: Mr President, these messages occurred over a period of several years. By this time, we both had a working knowledge of the other's seasons, which was based on the Earth's rotation, which also figured into our time periods. We had a working knowledge of their 40-hour days. They were a little smarter than us, being able to comprehend our language and our time periods.

PRESIDENT: OK, that makes sense. But ... (not understood) ... about ... (not understood) ... the aliens?

The CARETAKER: Mr President, we did have a basic understanding of their language. We could understand basic words and symbols. They understood more of our language than we did theirs.

PRESIDENT: OK, then what happened?

The CARETAKER: Well....

WM CASEY: Mr President, this is where things get very interesting.

PRESIDENT: OK, I'm waiting.... (not understood)

The CARETAKER: Our government, specifically, MJ-12 met in secret to plan the event. Decisions were made, then changed many times. We had just about 25 months from the time we finally received their message of the date to prepare for their arrival. Several months into the planning, President Kennedy decided to approve a plan to exchange a special military team. The USAF was tasked as the lead agency.

The USAF officials picked special civilian scientists to assist in the planning and crew selection. The team members' selection process was the hardest to accomplish. Several plans were suggested and then changed. It took months for the planners to decide on the selection criteria for each team member. They decided that each member must be military, single, no children and a career member. They had to be trained in different skills.

 http://www.serpo.org/

WM CASEY: CARETAKER, let's just go into the general stuff here, I don't think the President wants to know every single minute detail.

PRESIDENT: Well, if I had the time, I would. (not understood) .... but, I understand that.

The CARETAKER: Mr President, a team of 12 men were selected. However, during this time period, President Kennedy died. The nation was shocked, as you know....

PRESIDENT: Yes, everyone was shocked. I can understand what must have happened during the project when John died.

The CARETAKER: President Johnson continued the program. When it came time for the meeting, we were ready. The landing occurred in New Mexico. We had everything prepared. We had a hoax landing location just in case it was leaked. The landing occurred and we greeted the Ebens. However, a mix up happened. They were not prepared to accept our exchange personnel. Everything was placed on hold. Finally in 1965, the Ebens landed in Nevada and we exchanged 12 of our men for one of theirs.

["Project SERPO" Final Debriefing Report: #80HQD893-020, Classified TS/Codeword /  http://www.serpo.org/]

PRESIDENT: One? Why just one?

WM CASEY: Mr President, this wasn't clearly documented in the reports that we read.

PRESIDENT: One ... was this their ambassador?

WM CASEY: Well, something like that. We just called it EBE 2. We'll discuss that later.

The CARETAKER: Mr President. Our team of 12 went to the Eben planet for 13 years. The original mission called for a 10-year stay, however, because of the strange time periods on their planet, the team stayed three (3) additional years. Eight [seven] returned in 1978. Two died on the planet and two decided to stay.

[NOTE: Team Member #308 (Team Pilot #2) died of a pulmonary embolism enroute to SERPO on the 9-month journey; 11 arrived safely.

 http://www.serpo.org/release14.php ]

PRESIDENT: OK, this is just AMAZING! I can see, about that movie. The movie was based on a real event. I saw that movie. 12 men left, along with Richard Dreyfuss.

["Close Encounters of The Third Kind," 1977]

WM CASEY: Mr President, yes, the movie was similar to the real event, at least the last part of the movie.

PRESIDENT: OK, a lot to digest. I want to hear about the hostile ones.

ADVISER #1: Mr President, may I step in here?

PRESIDENT: By all means, ADVISER #1, do.

ADVISER #1: Well, Mr President, the hostile alien species is responsible for abducting some humans. We can clearly prove some 80 Americans were abducted from about 1955 until the present, the last known one in July of last year [1980]. We have a special military intelligence unit keeping track of these abductions. We have FBI agents attached, to assist us when needed. We have NSA and in some instances, CIA personnel helping.

Unfortunately, we don't have the technology to know when these hostiles will abduct. We get the information afterwards. We interview the victim and place them under hypnotic trances. Some of the victims remember the entire event without hypnosis, while others need hypnosis to relate what happened. We haven't found one single death directly related to the hostile aliens. We have had deaths that were attributed to the abductions ... suicides. We recorded five (5) of them.

But, Mr President, these are the abductions we know about. We have NO idea how many other abductions are occurring in this country or around the world. These hostile aliens are pretty sneaky. They seem to appear and disappear, which is beyond our technical understanding. They also seem to float or defy gravity. WE HAVE ACTUAL PHOTOGRAPHS OF THEM DOING THIS. We have a classic abduction incident that was recorded by military intelligence personnel. It happened in 1979 near a military base.

PRESIDENT: Where?

ADVISER #1: In New Mexico.

PRESIDENT: What's with New Mexico? The aliens seem to like that state. Do we know why?

The CARETAKER: Excuse me, may I speak?

PRESIDENT: Yes, CARETAKER, step in.

The CARETAKER: New Mexico is similar to the home planet of the Ebens. Since we do not know which planet the Trantaloids come from....

WM CASEY: Wait ... ADVISER #4?

ADVISER #4: I think we do. I think the Ebens gave us that information. We know the star group. It is close to our solar system, well, I mean in astronomical terms. Maybe 20-25 light-years away. They are actually closer to us than the Ebens are.

[VICTOR: The homeworld of the HAV, the TRANTALOIDS, is the THIRD PLANET out from the star Epsilon Eridani in the constellation Eridanus at 10.5 light-years away. Although somewhat cooler and fainter than our sun, it is very similar. Hal's friend, ADVISER #4, was mistaken on the distance; an easy error to make given the voluminous amount of information on this subject matter alone. - ANONYMOUS.

 http://www.stellar-database.com/naming.html /

 http://calgary.rasc.ca/constellation.htm#list ]

Nearby Star EPSILON ERIDANI has anEarth-like Planet! Is this the homeworld of the hostile ET species, the TRANTALOIDS?!
EXPLANATION: EPSILON ERIDANI is located in "The Celestial River" where it "flows" south to Achernar. It is fully visible to almost all of the 
 Southern Hemisphere and half of the Northern. A PLANET has been found orbiting a Sun-like star only 10.5 light-years away with a magnitude of 3.7. No direct picture of the planet was taken -- the planet was discovered by the gravitational wobble it created on its parent star, EPSILON ERIDANI. The discovery marks the closest naked-eye Sun-like star yet found to house an extra-solar PLANET. 

 Pictured below, the star EPSILON ERIDANI, located in the constellation 
 ERIDANUS, is visible near the belt of Orion to the unaided eye when it 
 is highest in the sky ~10 p.m. between November-January. The detected planet is thought to have a mass like Jupiter, but orbit slightly closer in. It is unknown whether other planets exist around 
 EPSILON ERIDANI.   

 http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap000807.html 

© 2000 Credit & Copyright: J. B. Kaler (UIUC)  

Epsilon Eridani

Click to enlarge

 

The December 2007 issue of ASTRONOMY Magazine, pp. 44-47, asks  "Does life exist on this exoplanet?" Located only 10.5 light-years away in the constellation ERIDANUS, the Sun-like star EPSILON ERIDANI anchors a planetary system that may hold the seeds of life. 

 The nearest exoplanet to Earth, EPSILON ERIDANI, illustrated below, is orbiting near the star's HABITABLE ZONE, where conditions are suitable for life to evolve making it worth a closer look for intrigued astronomers. A Titan-like moon orbits within this planetary system and offers astronomers their nearest opportunity to search for extrasolar life. 

 Attached image: composite of ASTRONOMY Magazine cover for December, 2007 and the illustration on page 44.  

Asrtonomy Cover

Click to enlarge
    

PRESIDENT: So that means they can travel like the Ebens travel? I mean using those black holes or whatever you call them?

ADVISER #4: Yes, Mr President, they can travel in the same fashion as the Ebens. However, according to the Ebens, the Trantaloids use a different form of propulsion. Something like matter versus antimatter.

PRESIDENT: And that means?

ADVISER #4: Mr President, basic physics....

WM CASEY: Mr President, do you want to go into the physics of this?

PRESIDENT: Oh, no, no, I don't think I'd understand it.

ADVISER #4: I was just going to say that we know that when matter is placed next to antimatter, there is a great deal of energy released. If one could harness that into a propulsion system, that would be great. But we don't have the capability to do that.

PRESIDENT: Do we have one of their spaceships?

The CARETAKER: Yes, well, partially. A crashed one.

PRESIDENT: OK, can we or do we have the technical knowledge to understand it?

WM CASEY: No, Mr President, we don't.

PRESIDENT: We can make atomic bombs, go to Mars and we can't understand their science?

WM CASEY: Adviser #4?

ADVISER #4: Mr President, their technology is probably 1,000 years more advanced than ours ... maybe even more. They have different materials to work with. Some of their materials are not found on this planet.

PRESIDENT: What do you mean, like iron or elements?

ADVISER #4: Yes, Mr President. We found many metals and other things that are not found on this planet. Maybe they have more than 104 elements or maybe they are different than ours.

PRESIDENT: The hostile ones or the Ebens?

ADVISER #4: Mr President that goes for each species although the Ebens do have similar elements as [those found on] Earth. But the Trantaloids have strange materials ... nothing like [those found on] Earth. These ALIENS CAN IMITATE HUMANS. They CAN LOOK LIKE BLOND HUMANS. However, they are not blond, but UGLY-LOOKING INSECTS.

PRESIDENT: Insects, did you say that?

ADVISER #4: Yes, do you have a photograph?

The CARETAKER: Yes, hold on.

WM CASEY: They are pretty nasty looking.

PRESIDENT: Well, they would stand out.

ADVISER #4: No, Mr President, as I said THEY CAN IMITATE LOOKING LIKE HUMANS.

PRESIDENT: How in the world do they do that? It took a lot of makeup to make me look good in the movies. (loud laughter heard)

ADVISER #4: Well, Mr President, I can assure you they don't use makeup, at least not like we would. They have the ability to change their bodies. As I said before, they are 1,000 years ahead of us in technology and probably every other science.

PRESIDENT: They can be killed?

ADVISER #4: Yes, they are just flesh and blood, like a human body. They can be killed. But their spaceships have a force field around them. They can be shot down, but it takes some doing on our part.

WM CASEY: Mr President, we have to use a small-style nuclear missile to shoot them down, but we haven't actually done that yet. We have experimented in Nevada on the captured craft we have of theirs.

PRESIDENT: My God, I hope we haven't used atomic missiles. What does that mean?! I have to give that order!

ADVISER #1: Excuse me, but Mr President, no, we haven't used any nuclear missiles to shoot down any alien flying craft. I think Adviser #4 and the Director mean that if we had to shoot one down, for instance ... if a group of them attacked us.

PRESIDENT: Is that likely?

ADVISER #1: No, I don't think so.

PRESIDENT: Can we intercept their radio transmissions? Do we know their language?

ADVISER #1: We know or we can recognize their language, which is entirely different than the Ebens. They use a very high-band radio system. But they have different frequencies and it is difficult for NSA to track them.

PRESIDENT: Maybe we should call Captain Kirk?! (loud laughter) Oh, a little humor is good in any situation! (loud laughter)

ADVISER #1: OK, Mr President, I'll call Scotty! (more laughter)

PRESIDENT: Yeah, maybe [Gene] Roddenberry knows.!

ADVISER #1: Our air defenses are as best prepared as we can be against any form of an attack by this group.

PRESIDENT: How do we do that? I mean, our pilots. Do they know?

ADVISER #1: Not exactly. But we have a system to cover any threat.

PRESIDENT: A war plan?

ADVISER #1: Like I said earlier, yes, Mr President, we do have war plans just for this event or possible event.

PRESIDENT: OK. Well, I think that is enough for one day. Bill, set something up for tomorrow to finish this.

WM CASEY: OK, Mr President. I'll get with ADVISER #2 and Michael [Deaver].

PRESIDENT: I want to thank everyone for a very thorough briefing. I was educated beyond belief. I will have a different attitude every time I look up in the sky.

TAPE ENDS. 
    
 

 Release 28 -  The REAL Story Behind The POPE's Visit!     

ANONYMOUS comments on various "HOT TOPIC" UFO SUBJECTS INCLUDING AN UPDATE ON:

 + The FAMOUS "GATE 3 INCIDENT" and WHAT THE FOLLOW-UP FBI-AFOSI INVESTIGATION REVEALED: The 'STAR TREK-LIKE' WEAPON USED BY THE CBE, JROD's CONFESSION TO HIS "DEADLY DEED" and HIS "HOUSE [BASE] ARREST" AT AREA 51! 
  
 + The REAL STORY-BEHIND-THE-STORY OF THE POPE's APRIL 2008 VISIT TO AMERICA ... LEARN WHAT SPARKED THE VATICAN TO MAKE THEIR STUNNING ANNOUNCEMENT A MONTH LATER ON EXTRATERRESTRIAL LIFE FORMS IN OUR UNIVERSE ... A GLOBAL EXCLUSIVE! 
  
 + EARTH-SHATTERING REVELATIONS: SERPO's EBEN RELIGIOUS BELIEF SYSTEMS REVEALED! LEARN OF THE LIKENESS BETWEEN THE EBEN RELIGIOUS RITUALS AND THOSE OF EARTH and WHICH TWO (2) EARTH RELIGIONS HAVE A SIMILARITY IN THE EBEN BELIEF OF LIFE-AFTER-DEATH ... A REAL HEAD-TURNER! 
  
 ------------------------------------------
 ANONYMOUS comments on The ALLEGED "UFO-UN MEETING ON ETs!" 
  
 1) I have NO information about an alleged UFO-UN meeting about extraterrestrials. NONE of my sources know anything about this who are both in and out of the UN, and they ALL possess "need-to-know" security clearances. 
  
 2) I don't know a Clay Pickering nor a Robert Morningstar; never heard of them. What is your question regarding them? [They are the contacts for the alleged UFO-UN meeting.] 
  
 3) I believe 95% of all "crop circles" are made by man.  
  
 4) What "Drones?" The UFO community embarrasses itself with such wild stories and a creative, collective imagination. 
  
– ANONYMOUS 
 ------------------------------------------
 ANONYMOUS comments on "The PHOENIX LIGHTS!" 
  
 The lights seen over Phoenix several years ago were U.S. Air Force National Guard planes from the Maryland National Guard conducting nighttime missions by dropping aerial flares. The most recent sightings are Unexplained. We have no direct knowledge of the origin of the lights. 
  
– ANONYMOUS 
 ------------------------------------------
 ANONYMOUS comments on "MEXICO's ROSWELL!"
  
 VICTOR: 
   
 There is only ONE (1) Roswell and that is the one which occurred in July 1947. The other Roswell you asked about is NOTHING more than wild speculation based on chance, random events. It did NOT happen. 
  
– ANONYMOUS 
  
 REFERENCE: 
  
 MEXICO's ROSWELL – The 1974 CHIHUAHUA UFO CRASH, RUBEN URIARTE & NOE TORRES': 
  
 http://www.mexicosroswell.com/ 
 ------------------------------------------
 UPDATE: ANONYMOUS' expanded comments on "The GATE 3 INCIDENT": A FURTHER EXPLANATION of "Project SERPO" RELEASE #23! 
  
 http://serpo.org/release23.asp
  
 VICTOR: 
  
 There are still classified portions of this incident that have NOT been released.  First of all, the weapon used by the CBE [Cloned Biological Entity] was stolen from a research laboratory room. 
  
 The weapon was an "Energy Directed Device" (EDD), which was given to us by the Ebens. The EDD was in a locked container inside the S2 research room. An extensive investigation disclosed that JROD had obtained the weapon, unlocked the CBE's room and gave the CBE the weapon. 
  
 Why? JROD wanted the CBE to protect himself. The EDD could be set for "stun" (similar to a present day Taser) or the "kill" mode. JROD wanted the CBE to escape and be free. JROD realized he could never be free since he had a duty and obligation to stay. JROD was extremely dedicated, but apparently didn't feel the CBE needed to be contained. 
  
 JROD fully confessed to releasing the CBE. JROD was later confined and a restraining device was placed on his legs. CBE could not fully communicate in English. JROD could translate the words from the CBE to English. 
  
 None of the officials doubted JROD would falsify any word meaning from the CBE to English. 
  
– ANONYMOUS 
 ------------------------------------------
 ANONYMOUS comments on POPE BENEDICT XVI's 6-Day VISIT TO NEW YORK CITY and WASHINGTON D.C.! 
  
 Saved e-mail message 
  
 From: ANONYMOUS
  
 Date: Wed, April 23, 2008, 9:31 a.m. (PDT+3) 
  
 To: VictorGM@webtv.net 
  
 Subject: Our Special Guest = OSG 
  
 VICTOR: 
  
 OUR SPECIAL GUEST just arrived back from a trip to the east, where he had a personal conversation with the pope, Pope Benedict XVI. The pope knows about OSG past missions. The pope was excited to hear details. OSG originally had just 30 minutes to brief the pope, but that time ended up being two (2) hours. 
  
 Pope Benedict XVI considered his meeting with OSG as a very special birthday "present" [DOB: Saturday, April 16, 1927] during his 6-day stay between Tuesday, April 15 when he touched down at Andrews AFB to his departure on Sunday, April 20 from Kennedy International Airport in Queens, NY. 
  
 OSG is alive and well. S/he/it was awed by his/her/its two (2)-hour meeting with the pope. OSG has not spoken with any of the other popes. However, Pope Benedict XVI specifically singled out OSG. The pope knew of his/its interstellar journey and knew about his fellow comrades stories regarding the cosmos. Although OSG and his crew never spoke with a pope, they did have numerous contacts with REPRESENTATIVES of the Vatican. 
  
 Something you should let the people know about on your huge lists: 
  
 When OSG met with the pope, they discussed his trip from SERPO, the 13-year stay of our 11 Team Members, their interaction with the Ebens, the past visitation of the Ebens to planet Earth and the future. The pope knew about the trip and knew about the six (6) most recent past visitations of the Ebens to our Earth. 
  
 They occurred/will occur on the following dates: 
  
º Friday, August 18, 1978; 
  º Thursday, April 28, 1983; 
  º Sunday, April 7, 1991; 
  º Tuesday, October 22, 1996; 
  º Sunday, November 28, 1999; 
  º Wednesday, November 14, 2001; 
  º November 2009 [NO set date as of "Project SERPO" Release #28 for this Unofficial visit]; 
  º The Ebens are due back to Earth for an OFFICIAL visit on Thursday, November 11, 2010. As in the past, this visit will occur at the Nevada Test Site. 
  
 [ POINTING TO THE STARS: Satellite dishes and an extensive communications complex wait to greet the Ebens for their next two (2) November visitations to Earth. Click on the link below for a picture of a  satellite dish, similar to the two seen at the GROOM LAKE / AREA 51 test site facility. -   http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap061129.html ] 
  
 ALL visitations occurred at the sprawling Groom Lake Complex. During each visit, a representative from the Vatican WAS present. The pope was particularly interested in the religious activity of the Ebens. The Ebens worship a God. The pope feels their God is the same as ours. The Ebens worship God differently, but NOT so much. In fact, OSG brought artifacts of the Ebens' God that fits directly into OUR [Christian] God. 
  
 Several Eben paintings, sculptured statutes and carved fetishes were similar to our God. In fact, the story of their God -- appearing
 thousands of years ago on SERPO and setting up religious sects on their planet -- is similar to our story of Jesus. The Ebens chant verses, which, when translated, are similar to OUR prayers. The Eben chants contain 26 verses which they repeat every day at their prayer hour, which is in the afternoon (SERPO day). 
  
 The chants sound like Tibetan chants. On a particular Eben day of their year, the Ebens expand the chants to 38 verses. The extra 12 chants pertain to "angels" -- which we have translated to mean "saints" -- who have helped the Eben society. This information has NEVER been released. 
  
 The basic beliefs/religion of the Ebens are simple. However, their practice is very complex. The Ebens worship one (1) God, which they call an "Entity," and they have religious symbols that reflects other religious entities, which they call "sub-entities." This would be similar to our identification with saints. 
  
 The Ebens belief in life-after-death is similar to the Roman Catholic church and to some Eastern religions doctrines. Once an Eben dies, their soul [bioplasmic body] is taken from the body by these sub-entities (saints) and cleansed of all their sins. The soul is then taken to a midpoint, (Catholics would call it "purgatory") between Heaven and that midpoint. Then once the soul is ready, it is taken to the "Supreme Plateau," (Heaven) where it remains for an eternity. 
  
 Their beliefs become much more complex at this point. Some souls, called "The Arranged" (that is their word), are prepared for entry back into the living society, i.e., this plane of existence. The Ebens believe that if they perform some specific act -- referred to as "karma" on Earth -- during their regular life, they then can come back to the living life in another body. The Ebens believe in reincarnation and the eternity of the soul. The Ebens do NOT believe that animals or their sworn enemies of other space-travelling races have souls. 
  
 This is something that might help hold people over on the "Project SERPO" subject matter until all of our files and materials have been given back to us from the Dept of Defense. 
  
 More to come in Fall 2008.... 
  
– ANONYMOUS
 ------------------------------------------
 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pope_Benedict_XVI 
  
 BIOGRAPHICAL SKETCH of POPE BENEDICT XVI 
  Birth name: JOSEPH ALOIS RATZINGER 
  Papacy began: 19 April 2005 
  Papacy ended: 
  Predecessor: JOHN PAUL II
  Born: Saturday, April 16 1927 (age 81)
 Marktl am Inn, Bavaria, Germany
  
 POPE BENEDICT XVI: 
  † Reference style: His Holiness
  † Spoken style: Your Holiness
  † Religious style: Holy Father
  † Posthumous style: NA
  
 POPE BENEDICT XVI (Latin: Benedictus PP. XVI) is the 265th and reigning pope, by virtue of his office of Bishop of Rome, the spiritual head of the Roman Catholic Church, and as such, Sovereign of the Vatican City State. 
  
 He was elected on Tuesday, April 19, 2005 in a papal conclave, celebrated his Papal Inauguration Mass on Sunday, April 24, 2005, and took possession of his cathedral, the Basilica of St. John Lateran, on May 7, 2005. POPE BENEDICT XVI has both German and Vatican citizenship. 
  
 BENEDICT XVI is a respected Roman Catholic theologian and a prolific bestselling author, a defender of traditional Catholic doctrine and values. Like his predecessor, BENEDICT XVI maintains the traditional Catholic doctrines on artificial birth control, abortion and homosexuality. 
  
 BENEDICT XVI was elected pope at the age of 78. He is the oldest person to have been elected Pope since Pope Clement XII (1730-40). As well as his native German, BENEDICT XVI fluently speaks Italian, French, English, Spanish and Latin, and has a knowledge of Portuguese. He can read Ancient Greek and biblical Hebrew. He has stated that his first foreign language is French. He plays the piano and has a preference for Mozart and Bach. 
  
 RATZINGER chose the pontifical name Benedict, which in Latin means "the blessed," in honor of both Pope Benedict XV and SAINT BENEDICT of Nursia. 
  
 ------------------------------------------
 BIBLIOGRAPHY
  
 WORLD RELIGIONS: The ILLUSTRATED GUIDE – General Editor Michael D Coogan, June © 2003, ISBN# 1844836963, $7.99, 288 pp. / Roman Catholicism: pp. 54-6, 72-3, 83-4 / Buddhism: pp. 162-197 / Hinduism:pp. 125-161 / Jainism: pp. 7, 28, 130, 136, 140, 144. 
  
 DICTIONARY of RELIGIONS – Edited by John R Hinnells, 2nd Edition, Sunday, January 28, 1997 ©, ISBN# 0140512616, $20.00, 760 pp.
  
 THE HANDY RELIGION ANSWER BOOK – Editor John Renard, Monday, January 28, 2002 ©, ISBN# 068104716X, $7.98, 582 pp. /
 Catholicism-Christianity: pp. 125-85 / Buddhism: pp. 305-61 / Hinduism:pp. 249-303 / Jainism: p. 305
  
 The COMPLETE IDIOT's GUIDE to REINCARNATION – By David Hammerman, Ed.D and Lisa Lenard, Friday, February 18, 2000 ©, ISBN# 0028638174, $16.95, 361 pp. 
  
 The COMPLETE IDIOT's GUIDE to EXTRATERRESTRIAL INTELLIGENCE – By Michael Kurland, Tuesday, July 28, 1998 ©, ISBN# 0028623878, $16.95, 325 pp. 
 ------------------------------------------
 http://www.cufon.org/cufon/inmanpr.htm 
  
 FLASHBACK TO JANUARY 1994: "The INTELLIGENCE WIZARD" of the 'BLACK WORLD' retired Admiral BOBBY RAY INMAN SPEAKS CANDIDLY ABOUT UFOs and ALIEN LIFE FORMS TO A UFO AUTHOR! 
  
 BEGIN: 
  
 Today, January 13, 1994, this press release/letter was mailed to several members of the Senate Armed Services Committee (which will hold confirmation hearings for Secretary of Defense designate Admiral BOBBY RAY INMAN, Ret.) and several press organizations. The cc: list at the bottom of the letter shows to whom this was mailed. 
  
 As stated, our purpose was only to bring these statements to the attention of the senators and the press so that they may be addressed; perhaps to get an inch closer to the truth. Of course, the attachments are not reproduced. – Jim Klotz, CUFON SYSOP 
  
 FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE: January 12, 1994 
  
 Has Secretary of Defense designate Admiral BOBBY RAY INMAN, Ret, made statements indicating that the U.S. Government has extraterrestrial craft in its possession? Admiral INMAN has been credited with making such statements which have been construed as meaning that he was aware: 
  
• that "recovered vehicles" (meaning extraterrestrial alien craft) have been in possession of the government for over 10 years; 
  
 * he had "some expertise" in the area of UFO before his retirement; 
  
 * that he has been aware of a program to "indoctrinate the public" in UFO matters; 
  
 * that he "understood who is behind the technology in the crafts" meaning extraterrestrial alien beings; 
  
 * that the matter (of U.S, government recovery and possession of alien UFO craft) was covered by the "national security laws." 
  
 We are writing to bring to your attention controversial claims made about statements made by Admiral INMAN. These claims have been published in the United Kingdom and the United States in the books: (UK) "Alien Liaison," 1991, and (in the U.S.) "Alien Update" 1993, and (reiterated in a slightly different form) (U.S.) "Alien Contact: Top-Secret UFO Files Revealed," 1993 all by Timothy Good. Please see bibliography for further information. 
  
 The subject of "UFOs" is a controversial one, but the subject of U.S. Government possession of recovered alien craft is even more
 controversial. This has, and continues to be denied by every government agency queried. 
  
 We are releasing this statement as a cover document to a letter which, along with its attachments, calls the attention of the Senate Armed Service's Committee to these claims. 
  
 It is NOT our intention to attempt to affect the outcome of the confirmation hearing(s), or to impugn Admiral Inman's fine record or him personally in any way. 
  
 It IS our intention to make this information available so that the confirmation hearings provide an opportunity to address this subject and thereby deal with these controversial issues. We feel that addressing this issue is as important for Admiral INMAN as it is for the country. 
  
– BREAK – 
 
January 12, 1994 
 Washington, D.C. 
  
 In Mr. Good's books, Mr. Oeschler attributes the statements at issue here to Admiral Inman during a July 1989 telephone conversation which was recorded by Oeschler only for "note taking purposes." Portions of the transcript of the recorded conversation are reproduced in Alien Update and portions of the tape have been played on a 1991 episode of the television documentary program "Now It Can Be Told." Mr. Oeschler credits Admiral INMAN with statements indicating:   
º "...that MJ-12 meant something to him." pp. 208 Alien Update; 
  
º that he has been aware of a program to "indoctrinate the public" in UFO matters prior to his retirement. pp. 211 Alien Update; 
  
º that he had "some expertise" in the area of UFO but his information was out of date at the time of the conversation. pp. 211 Alien Update; 
  
º that the "pace at which things move in that field" (UFO-related technological research) was high. pp. 212 Alien Update; 
  
º that he was familiar with use of the term "craft" meaning UFO. pp. 212 Alien Update' 
  
º that he "understood who is behind the technology in the crafts" meaning extraterrestrial alien beings. pp. 212-213 Alien Update; 
  
º that he referred Mr. Oeschler to CIA Deputy Director for Science and Technology Everett Hineman and former Director of Naval Intelligence Sumner Shapiro in response to Mr. Oeschler's request for "guidance" in his effort to "get closer to MJ-12" pp. 213 Alien Update; 
  
º that he acknowledged that "recovered vehicles" (i.e., extraterrestrial craft) have been in possession of the U.S. government
 for over 10 years"; 
  
º that "access to them was them was denied" pp. 214 Alien Update; 
  
º that his "Executive Assistant" acknowledged that the Admiral Inman was aware that the matter under discussion (U.S. government recovery and possession of UFO craft) was covered by the "national security laws." pp. 214 Alien Update; 
  
 The matter of "MJ-12" or "the Majestic Twelve" is raised by Bob Oeschler who reports that it has been suggested that Admiral Inman was an actual member or an "insider" of MJ-12. This is tantamount to accusing Admiral INMAN of being a participating member of a "secret inner government" which has been credited in print with everything from merely keeping secret certain facts to intimidation of witnesses and much more pervasive and sinister manipulation, for this is the reputation of MJ-12. 
  
 MJ-12 is purportedly an organization set up by President Truman in 1947 in response to the purported recovery of a crashed extraterrestrial craft in New Mexico. The "evidence" for the existence of MJ-12 is in the nature of a "Presidential Briefing Paper." Despite extensive study and even more extensive speculation about it's implications, the "MJ-12 Briefing Paper" is by no mean a verified document. 
  
 Recently, after years of "no records" responses to Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) requests regarding the authenticity of the MJ-12 Paper, government agencies have shifted to responses of "BOGUS," and, "Cannot be Authenticated as a Genuine ... Document." Reasons for this apparent change in policy are unknown. A recent FBI FOIA release containing the "MJ-12 briefing paper" is reproduced in attachment No. 4. 
  
 We quote the USA Today article, "Inman gets Defense Duty," by Steve Kamarow as printed in the FRI/SAT/SUN, Dec. 17-19, 1993 issue: 
  
 Sen. John Warner, R-VA, a former Navy secretary, said it's "a superb choice ... He has an absolute credibility with the men and women in uniform." 
  
 Yet, Admiral INMAN is being credited with very controversial statements regarding a subject which has, and continues to receive denials from every government agency queried. Might Adm. INMAN's "absolute credibility" come into question were he to be viewed as holding a view opposite to repeated official pronouncements? ... or of making what are perceived to be very controversial statements in a very controversial subject matter? 
  
 After all, should it be true that recovered extraterrestrial artifacts are in the possession of the U.S. Government would be the biggest story of all time. Let us assure you that we take the matter of having verifiable information available seriously, and reiterate that our
 purpose is only to facilitate addressing these issues. 
  
 /s/ Dale Goudie 
 /s/ James Klotz 
  
 Bibliography: 
  
 1) Alien Liaison, Timothy Good 1991. Published by Century; Random Century Ltd., London. ISBN 0-7126-2194-6 
  
 2) Alien Update, Timothy Good 1993. Published by Arrow Random House, London. ISBN 0-09-925761-0 
  
 3) Alien Contact: Top-Secret UFO Files Revealed, Timothy Good 1993. (Revised edition of Alien Liaison) published by William Morrow and Company, New York. ISBN 0-688-12223-X 
  
 Further reference regarding "MJ-12": 
  
 Final Report on Operation Majestic 12, Stanton T Friedman, April 1990. Published by the Fund for UFO Research, Mt. Rainier, MD. 
  
 C U F O N 
 Computer UFO Network 
 Seattle Washington, USA 
 (1-206) 776-0382 
  
 Please credit CUFON as the source of this material. 
  
– END 
  
 http://www.cufon.org/cufon/inmanpr.htm 
 ------------------------------------------
 FOREIGN TECHNOLOGY DIVISION - WRIGHT-PATTERSON AIR FORCE BASE: EBEN ALIEN SCHEMATIC MOCK-UP! 
  
 http://www.qtm.net/~geibdan/mandible/
 ------------------------------------------ 
 OUT THERE: The JACKIE GLEASON-RICHARD NIXON UFO STORY! 
  
 http://www.presidentialufo.com/jackie_gleason.htm
 ------------------------------------------
 SOURCE: A member of the DIA-6 
  
 INTERNET E-MAIL SNIFFERS CIRCA 1997 ... COMPUTER "SNIFFING" MAY HAVE COME A LONG WAY SINCE THEN! 
  
 VICTOR: PUZZLE PALACE co-author Wayne Madsen, in an article written for the June 1995 issue of Computer Fraud & Security Bulletin (Elsevier Advanced Technology Publications), wrote that "according to well-placed sources within the Federal Government and the Internet service provider industry, the National Security Agency (NSA) is actively sniffing several key Internet router and gateway hosts." 
  
 Madsen says the NSA concentrates its surveillance on destination and origination hosts, as well as "sniffing" for specific key words and phrases. He claims his sources have confirmed that the NSA has contracted with an unnamed private company to develop the software needed to capture Internet data of interest to the agency. 
  
 According to Madsen, the NSA monitors traffic primarily at two Internet routers controlled by the National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA), one in College Park, MD (dubbed "Fix East") and another at NASA Ames Research Center in Sunnyvale, CA ("Fix West"). 
  
 Other NSA Internet sniffers, he said, operate at busy routers knows as Mae East (an East Coast hub), Mae West (a West Coast hub), CIX (reportedly based in San Jose), and SWAB (a northern Virginia router operated by Bell Atlantic.) 
  
 Madsen says the NSA may also be monitoring traffic at network access points, the large Internet gateways operated by regional and
 long-distance service providers. The NAPs allegedly under surveillance are in Pennsauken, NJ (operated by Sprint), Chicago (run by AmeriTech and Bell Communications Research), and San Francisco (Pacific Bell). 
  
 "Madsen claims the NSA has deals with Microsoft, Lotus, and Netscape to prevent anonymous e-mail." 
  
 "One senior Federal Government source has reported that NSA has been particularly successful in convincing key members of the U.S. software industry to cooperate with it in producing software that makes Internet messages easier for NSA to intercept, and if they are encrypted, to decode," Madsen wrote. 
  
 "A knowledgeable government source claims that the NSA has concluded agreements with Microsoft, Lotus and Netscape to permit the introduction of the means to prevent the anonymity of Internet electronic mail, the use of cryptographic key-escrow, as well as software industry acceptance of the NSA-developed Digital Signature Standard (DSS)." 
  
 Is the NSA really snooping on the Net? And if they are, would that violate the agency's charter, which specifically prohibits it from
 spying within the U.S.? 
  
 "Well, Net traffic is routed from God knows where to God knows where around the world," says George Washington University Professor Lance Hoffman, a professor of Communications and Telecommunications Systems Policy at George Washington University. 
  
 "So if the NSA is doing this, they could say they are not violating their charter not to spy in the U.S. That's the thing. Intelligent
 routers send stuff any which way."
 ------------------------------------------
 ALL SUPPORTING DOCUMENTATION: Researched, compiled and provided by Victor Martinez

Release 28 a

Release 28a - POPE: "Vatican says aliens could exist!"
  


MODERATOR's NOTE: When the attached was broadcast worldwide, many were startled and surprised at what the Vatican -- with the full blessing of Pope Benedict XVI -- had to say regarding ALIEN LIFE FORMS. However, when I read articles like the attached -- and there were MANY -- I knew instantly that it was sparked by Pope Benedict XVI's private 2-hour visit with OSR [Our Special Guest]. It doesn't take a rocket scientist to connect the chain of events and dots: The Pope visits America between April 15 - 20 + ANONYMOUS notifies me on Wednesday, 4-23-08 that the Pope met with OSR = The Vatican makes a stunning announcement on or about May 12-13, 2008 regarding ALIEN LIFE in our universe. Many thanx to MARK GRAFFIS for the attached of which he did not know that it was part of a much larger picture and will now be added and memorialized on the "Project SERPO" Web site. 


 Vatican says aliens could exist 

 By David Willey 
 BBC News, Rome 

 The Pope's chief astronomer says that life on Mars cannot be ruled out. 

 Writing in the Vatican newspaper, the astronomer, Father Gabriel Funes, said intelligent beings created by God could exist in outer space. 

 Father Funes, director of the Vatican Observatory near Rome, is a respected scientist who collaborates with universities around the world. 

 The search for forms of extraterrestrial life, he says, does not contradict belief in God. 

 The official Vatican newspaper headlines his article 'Aliens Are My Brother'. 

 'Free from sin' 

 Just as there are multiple forms of life on earth, so there could exist intelligent beings in outer space created by God. And some aliens could even be free from original sin, he speculates. 

 Asked about the Catholic Church's condemnation four centuries ago of the Italian inventor of the telescope, Galileo, Father Funes diplomatically says mistakes were made, but it is time to turn the page and look towards the future. 

 Science and religion need each other, and many astronomers believe in God, he assures readers. 

 To strengthen its scientific credentials, the Vatican is organising a conference next year to mark the 200th anniversary of the birth of the author of the Origin of Species, Charles Darwin. 


 Story from BBC NEWS:
 http://news.bbc.co.uk/go/pr/fr/-/2/hi/europe/7399661.stm  


 Published: 2008/05/13 22:08:27 GMT

© BBC 
 MMVIII

Release 28 b

"Release 28b - POPE BENEDICT's XVI's April 2008 Visit to America Memorialized in "Eine Kleine Nachtmusik" 
 by MANTOVANI and His Orchestra!    
  

 – THE EARLY LIFE of POPE BENEDICT XVI (1927–1951):

JOSEPH ALOIS RATZINGER was born on Saturday, April 16, Holy Saturday, 1927 at Schulstraße 11, at 8:30 in the morning in his parents' home in Marktl am Inn, Bavaria, Germany. He was baptized the same day. He was the third and youngest child of Joseph Ratzinger, Sr., a police officer, and Maria Ratzinger (née Peintner). His mother's family was originally from South Tyrol. Pope BENEDICT's XVI's brother, Georg Ratzinger, a priest and former director of the Regensburger Domspatzen choir, is still alive. His sister, Maria Ratzinger, who never married, managed Cardinal RATZINGER's household until her death in 1991. Their great-uncle was the German politician Georg Ratzinger. The pope's relatives agree that his priestly vocation was apparent from boyhood!

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pope_Benedict_XVI  

– Click HERE for a  MUSIC.WAV file attachment From POPE BENEDICT XVI's German Homeland!


Official Vatican Portrait of Pope Benedict XVI
 Official Vatican Portrait of Pope Benedict XVI

Release 28 c

Release 28c - Pope BENEDICT XVI's Visit to America and His Meeting With OSR in April 2008 Commemorated With "Time to Say Goodbye" in a duet by Andrea Bocelli and Sarah Brightman!      


 EXPLANATION: Many facts about our astronomical universe that are taken for granted today have been known -- or accurately recorded -- only during the last millennium. Asam's painting currently hangs in Weltenburg Abbey in BAVARIA, Germany. Bavaria, GERMANY is the birthplace of POPE BENEDICT XVI on Saturday, April 16, 1927. The person depicted viewing these eclipse phenomena is St. BENEDICT! St BENEDICT of NURSIA was the founder of the Benedictine Order monasteries and was the author of "The Rule of Saint Benedict," which is still the most influential writing regarding the monastic life of Western Christianity. 

 Is this painting the earliest realistic depiction of a total eclipse of the Sun? Some historians believe it IS. The BELOW painting was completed in 1735 by Cosmas Damian Asam, a painter and architect famous in early 18th century GERMANY. Clearly drawn is not only a total solar eclipse, but the solar corona and the diamond ring effect visible when sunlight flows only between mountains on the Moon.  

 http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap080128.html 

– Click  HERE for MUSIC.WAV file attachment: "Time to say good bye"!

Official Vatican Portrait of Pope Benedict XVI
Click to enlarge

Release 28 d

Release 28d - How Some View LIFE After DEATH in the UNIVERSE!     
  

LIFE after DEATH: Artist's Conception of Entry into Bohm's Implicate Order of the Enfolded Universe in The Fine Material World! 

 The Explicate Order + UNfolded universe + coarse material world =Earth's reality ... our universe which is an OBLATE SPHEROID in shape [a symmetrical, oval shape] 

 The Implicate Order + enfolded universe + fine material world = the"afterlife" ... our "real" consciousness in our elliptical-shaped, bioplasmic bodies [soul/spirit] as masses of energy and light

 MODERATOR's NOTE: An "egg-shaped" object generally has only one(1) axis of symmetry, BUT an "oval-shaped" object has two (2) axes of symmetry. There are several kinds of ellipsoids, including oblate and prolate spheroids.


oblate spheroid 
T-FracAnemone
 Click to enlarge   

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ovoid  
 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Oblate_spheroid  

 MICHAEL TALBOT's, "THE HOLOGRAPHIC UNIVERSE":

 http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/tg/detail/-/0060922583?v=glance   http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Michael_Talbot  
 http://www.tobyjohnson.com/michaeltalbot.html  

Release 29

Release 29 - The "Yellow Book" and Universe explained 
 (16 June 2008) 


 http://www.serpo.org/anon_comment.php 

+ UPDATE: ANONYMOUS comments on "The RED and YELLOW BOOKS" and PROVIDES NEVER-BEFORE-PUBLISHED SPECIFIC STEP-BY-STEP INSTRUCTIONS ON HOW TO ACCESS "The YELLOW BOOK!"   

 + WHAT THE EBENS KNOW ABOUT OUR UNIVERSE and THEIR VIEWS ON The BIG BANG and INFLATIONARY THEORIES OF COSMOLOGY!  

 + REVEALED: The NAME OF THE ACTUAL UFO CONTROL-STUDY GROUP WHICH COMPLETELY MANAGES THE UFO SUBJECT MATTER ... AND IT AIN'T "MJ-12!"   

 Date: Thu, Aug 9, 2007, 7:53 a.m. 

 From: ANONYMOUS   

 Subject: "The YELLOW BOOK" and "The RED BOOK"   

 From "Project SERPO" POSTING #19:  

 http://www.serpo.org/release19.php 

 http://serpo.org/release19.asp 

 The "YELLOW BOOK" - The "Yellow Book" or "Bible" is the alien's history of our universe written by the aliens themselves as well as their interactions and involvement with Earth's development/evolution. It was brought to Earth and presented to the U.S. government at the famous Holloman AFB landing in April 1964 by female Ebe #2 which was also translated by her.   
  
 "The RED BOOK" - "The Red Book" is an extremely thick, very detailed account summary written and compiled by the U.S. government on UFO investigations  dating from 1947 to the present day.  This orange-brownish book is updated every five (5) years and also contains some cross-over information from "The Yellow Book."    

 "Project SERPO" - Steven Spielberg's 1977 film, "Close Encounters of the Third Kind" is based on the famous Holloman landing as well as the human-ET exchange depicted at the very end with 10 (ten) men and two (2) women who are shown embarking on the alien spacecraft.  

 "The YELLOW BOOK" was provided by the Ebens. It ISN'T exactly a "book." It is a block of material, approximately 2 1/2 inches thick and transparent in nature and appearance. The reader looks at the transparent surface and suddenly words and pictures appear. It is an endless series of historical stories and photographs of our universe,  the Eben planet and their former homeworld, and other interesting stories about the universe. It also contains a historical narrative  and various accounts about Earth's history and distant past.  

 To this day, I am one of the very few people who has actually SEEN and READ "The YELLOW BOOK." I can assure you that Robert Collins has not ever seen, viewed nor read any part of it. His name does NOT appear on  the "Briefing Control Access Roster."  As has been commented on by others, it would take a lifetime to read it and another lifetime to understand it. 

 1) Reference "The YELLOW BOOK": It is an 8 x 11 inch object and approximately 2 1/2 inches thick that is constructed of a clear, heavy fiberglass-type material. The border of the book is a bright yellow, hence "The YELLOW BOOK." 

 When you place the book close to your eyes, you will begin seeing words and images flashing before you. Depending on the particular language you are thinking, that particular language will appear. So far, the USG has identified 80 different languages. 

 Pictures also appear. "The YELLOW BOOK" tells the story of the Ebens' lives, their exploration of the universe, their planet, their societal life and other aspects, including the Eben's longtime relationship with Earth. It tells of their first visit to Earth about 2,000 years ago. It displays Earth as it was in those days. It also shows an Eben, who took the appearance of an Earth Human [Jesus Christ]. 

 According to "The YELLOW BOOK," this Earth Human established religion on Earth [Christianity] and posted the first ALIEN AMBASSADOR on Earth. 

 "The YELLOW BOOK" goes on and on and on and on.... I've spent 12 hours a day for three (3) consecutive days and still NEVER reached the end. I don't think anyone knows how long it goes on or that there is any way to find the "end" of the book. 

 There is NO known end to "The YELLOW BOOK." I understand the record is about 22 straight hours, which was done by the President's Scientific Adviser under the XXXXX administration. Also, there is NO known way to stop reading in one particular place, put down "The YELLOW BOOK" and then resume at the same place. Once you put down "The YELLOW BOOK" and  pick it up again later, the book starts from the beginning. Although the book can somehow determine the language of the person who is reading, it canNOT determine the uniqueness of that person. 

 In other words, the "problem" with "reading" "The YELLOW BOOK" is that  one must start all over from the very beginning once you put it down. If it took you 12 hours to reach p. 564 [events] and then you put it down,  you would have to start all over at the very first words and images displayed during your first read, and only once you passed the 12-hour mark would NEW information you had not seen in the previous sitting would now appear.  

 As I wrote earlier, "The YELLOW BOOK" goes back to around 2,000 years. However, I have NOT viewed the entire "YELLOW BOOK" and don't think anyone else has either. It may have some views/images/history that go back even farther than 2,000 years B.C.   

 2) Reference our UNIVERSE from "The YELLOW BOOK": As for the universe, according to the Ebens, the universe was created in a split second, similar to our "Big Bang Theory," and expands over a period of billions of years. The Ebens don't refer to "years" as our years. They speak of time, but in terms of an "event clock," so to help us better understand,  the Ebens detail our years as a point of reference. 

 According to the Ebens, our universe EXPANDS for about 25 billion years. It then contracts back to its beginning shape. Once the universe CONTRACTS, it expands again REPEATING THE ENTIRE PROCESS. This is considered and referred to as "The Life Span of the Universe" by the Ebens ["Inflation" Theory].   

 "The RED BOOK" was written by the U.S. Government. It contains volumes of information we have gathered regarding our contacts with Extraterrestrial Life Forms. The first volume begins in 1947. The last volume was started in 2005. The information you published in SERPO Posting #19 regarding these books was factually correct. 

 http://serpo.org/release19.asp 

 In the e-mails you forwarded to me, what Robert Collins claims about "The RED BOOK" being updated continuously or when needed is somewhat true, but needs to be placed in proper context.  

 What actually occurs is that as UFO reports come in deemed credible by the reporting government agency -- be it military or civilian -- they are routed to a special section of our government for a follow-up analysis. After that vetting process is completed, they are then sent to a special group ["XXXXX-6"] which then places it into final review for POSSIBLE inclusion into "The RED BOOK."  

 Victor, I know all of this because you see, I have served as the editor for several editions of "The RED BOOK" and have written and delivered the Executive Summary for several sitting U.S. presidents, so I KNOW of what I speak.    

 And when I say "editor," it is NOT in the sense of the word you are familiar with. I do not correct nor review any of the hundreds -- if not thousands -- of reports which are distilled into the final 5-year report for grammar and punctuation as you've done with the "Project SERPO" material.  

 I only present and include the most important, compelling cases into "The RED BOOK" which includes an analysis by me and others of any trends, types of sightings, human contacts with the ETEs and any national security concerns our government or planet might have. My part is to write the The Executive Summary and present it to the current sitting president of the United States.  

 If there was a national security matter that presented itself, that 5-year published review of "The RED BOOK" would be interrupted, but that has been unnecessary as we have a good relationship with our Visitors. 

 On another point, you asked if the Bush administration claims of stopping post-9/11 terrorist attacks was true. 

 What I can definitively tell you is that since 2001, based on the NSA surveillance program, our government has successfully stopped 16 planned terrorist attacks aimed at the USA. Every single plan was initiated from an overseas location. 

 - ANONYMOUS 
 ------------------------------------------ 
 http://www.banguniverse.com/ 

 THE ENORMOUS TIMELINE OF OUR UNIVERSE  
 1,000,000,000 = 1 billion or 10-9 power = 1 followed by 9 0's [zeroes]   
 AB = Time after the Big Bang  
 MYA = millions of years ago  
 YA = years ago  
 NOTE: The first number is AFTER the BIG BANG occurred; the second number is when EARTH's timeline began.   
 0 - 13.7 billion years ago = BIG BANG  
 10-35 - 10-33 seconds = INFLATIONARY Period  
 10-33 seconds = Birth of QUARKS and ANTIQUARKS as they annihilate each other leaving a slight excess of QUARKS 
 10-5 seconds = QUARKS combine to form PROTONS and NEUTRONS  
 10-3 seconds = Formation of HYDROGEN and HELIUM atoms  
 1-3 minutes = Formation of light elements up to BORON  
 370,000 YA = Emission of CMB [Cosmic Microwave Background]: the universe becomes transparent  
 200 MYA - 13.5 billion of years ago = Birth of first STARS; reionization 
 3 billion years - 10.4 billion years ago? = Formation of mature 
 GALAXIES, QUASARS and the oldest STARS in the MILKY WAY GALAXY  
 9.1 billion years [AB] - 5.6 billion years ago = Our SOLAR SYSTEM including EARTH are formed  
 9.9 billion years [AB] - 3.8 billion years ago = First FOSSILS formed  
 13.4 billion years [AB] - 320 MYA = First REPTILES  
 13.5 billion years - 200 MYA = AFRICA splits from AMERICA; the DINOSAURS disappear  
 13.64 billion years [AB] - 65 MYA = End of the DINOSAURS; small MAMMALS diversify  
 13.695 billion years - 5 MYA = PRIMATES including the first APES evolve  
 13.6998 billion years [AB] - 195,000 YA = HOMO SAPIENS appear  
 13.6999 billion years [AB] - 10,000 YA = End of the last ICE AGE; dawn of the MODERN WORLD  
 13.7 billion years [AB] = The PRESENT DAY, June 2008  
 14.7 billion years - 1 billion years hence = EARTH become UNinhabitable  
 18.7 billion years [AB] - 5 billion years hence = SUN becomes a red giant ... the destruction of EARTH  
 23.7 billion years - 10 billion years hence = SUN becomes a white dwarf  
 10-14 years [10 to the 14th power or 1 followed by 14 0's] - A hundred thousand billion years hence = GALAXY- and STAR-formation cease  
 10-36 years = 50 percent of all PROTONS have decayed  [one undecillion = 10 x 36 power]  
 10-40 years = All PROTONS are gone and "BLACK HOLES" now dominate  
 10-100 years = BLACK HOLES disintegrate (1 googol = 10 x 100 0's power]  
 1-150 years = PHOTON age: The universe reaches extreme low-energy state?  
 Buddhism + Hinduism + Jainism + The Billy Meier Pleiadian Contacts = The universe now goes into an equally lengthy "SLEEP CYCLE" ... does it?.... 
 ------------------------------------------ 
 "The BIG BANG THEORY": HOW IT EVOLVED FROM AN IDEA TO SCIENTIFIC ACCEPTANCE: 

 A) Belgian astronomer, civil engineer and Jesuit priest GEORGES-HENRI LEMAITRE [1894-1966] is known as the "Father of the Big Bang." In the late 1920s, Lemaitre deduced that if the universe were expanding, then by going back in time, one would find that everything started from one point. He suggested that the universe had originated as a great "COSMIC EGG," [oblate spheroid] from a "primordial atom" which exploded and expanded outward.   

 B) However, it was not until 1948 that Russian-born nuclear physicist GEORGE GAMOW [1904-1968] and his colleagues worked out the details of the universe's explosive origin during the 1950s. 

 C) The term "Big Bang" was actually coined by one of the theory's strongest opponents, maverick English astrophysicist and cosmologist FRED HOYLE [1915-2001], who believed that the universe was in a "steady state" of continuous expansion and creation of matter. HOYLE was also a vigorous proponent of PANSPERMIA -- the notion that life came to Earth from outer space. After retirement, he became a leading popularizer of science. 
 ------------------------------------------ 
 http://www.dharmakshetra.com/articles3/Time%20Measurements%20described%20
 in%20the%20Vedas.htm 

 HINDUISM's YUGA GREAT TIME FRAMES:  

 http://www.sanskrit.org/www/Hindu%20Primer/yugatime.html  

 MODERATOR's NOTES, COMMENTS and OBSERVATIONS: 

 By my inserting these great TIMEFRAMES contained within the HINDU faith, this should NOT suggest that I endorse these SPECIFIC beliefs/timeframes. Instead, what I AM suggesting is that many [religious/scientific] belief systems incorporate the idea of an EXPANDING and CONTRACTING UNIVERSE ["Inflation" Theory]. 

 This will also be presented in POSTING 29a, 29a-1 [which shows the scientific community in support of this] and then POSTING #29b which conveys ABSOLUTELY ENORMOUS TIMEFRAMES under the famous Billy Meier-Pleiadian contactee case.  

 Whether it's ... 

­ the hundreds of THOUSANDS of years cited within the Hindu Yugas;  
­ the 25 BILLION years referenced by the EBENS; 
­ the 13-7 - 15 BILLION years our Earth scientists estimate; or 
­ the 311 TRILLION, 40 BILLION years claimed by the Pleiadians ... 
 they ALL have one (1) recurring theme in common: They ALL emphasize and subscribe to the belief of an EXPANDING and CONTRACTING UNIVERSE ["Inflation"] and for some, a UNIVERSE that even "sleeps" before EXPANDING again!     
 ------------------------------------------ 
 http://www.serpo.org/release10.php 

 "QUESTION: What do you make of what Ebe #1 allegedly said about Mankind being genetically altered throughout time and that they established religions and Christ in particular on our planet? [An idea that was popularized in the 1989 bestseller, "The Gods of Eden" by William Bramley, ISBN# 0380718073]   

 ANONYMOUS: If one reads "The YELLOW BOOK" [the true and correct history of Mankind as relayed by the ETEs] and reads between the lines, one would come away with the thought and clear impression that the Ebens had something to do with Jesus Christ or, possibly, Jesus was one of them. Also, if you look at some events that are shown in "The YELLOW BOOK," (remember, there are no dates shown in "The YELLOW BOOK"), you can connect some incidents, such as Fatima, etc., with an Eben landing." 
 ------------------------------------------ 
 [ MODERATOR's NOTE: Did the Ebens plant or "seed" the personage of Jesus Christ as alleged in the famous "Project AQUARIUS" briefing document?! (I possess a copy.) See the ENTIRE briefing document reproduced word-for-word which follows and see if you think "the dots connect!" ]   

 http://www.serpo.org/aquarius.php 

 "Project Aquarius" briefing document 

 "ABOVE TOP SECRET / MAJIC EYES ONLY" 

 (TS/ORCON) - Most governmental documents pertaining to UFO sightings, incidents and governmental policies, including "Project Blue Book," have been released to the public under FOIA or under various other release programs.  

 MJ-12 felt the remaining documents and information (not relating to "Project Aquarius") [but] relating to technological facts regarding alien medical matters, [and] the fact that an alien was captured alive and survived three (3) years under secrecy, cannot be released to the public for fear the information would be obtained by SHIS. There was other information obtained from EBE that was deemed sensitive and NOT releasable to the public.  

 Notably, "Project Aquarius," Volume IX, which pertains to tracing the alien's first visitation of Earth back some 5,000 years. EBE reported that 2,000 years ago, his ancestors PLANTED A HUMAN CREATURE ON EARTH to assist the inhabitants of Earth in developing a civilization.  This information was only vague and the exact identity or background information on this Homo-sapien was not obtained.  

 Undoubtedly, if this information was released to the public, it would CAUSE A WORLDWIDE PANIC.  MJ-3 has developed a plan that will allow release of Project Aquarius, Volumes I - III.  

 The release program calls for a GRADUAL RELEASE OF INFORMATION over a period of time in order to CONDITION THE PUBLIC FOR FUTURE DISCLOSURES. Attachment 5 of this briefing contains certain guidelines for future public releases.  
 ------------------------------------------ 
 "Posting Six by Anonymous (14 November, 2005) 

 "You will be honored one day for providing assistance in our release of information. Many thanks. I do not feel that a dialogue or argument with non-believers would benefit our cause. They have the right to criticize our information, but NONE of them will ever be involved in the final process." 

 November 2005 FLASHBACK TO "Project SERPO" POSTING #5:    

 The group called MJ-12 -- which wasn't really the group that controlled the information -- but for the sake of clarity, we'll just call them "MJ-12." The actual  name of the group who controlled, managed and oversaw the SERPO project was called XXXXX XXXXX.  

 Current DIA officials have very little knowledge of this subject matter. However, we will move ahead with our plans. Our main supporter is XXXXX XXXXX XXXXX, a former director of XXX.  He is in our corner and will support our gradual release [Public Acclimation Program] plan. 

 Saved e-mail message   

 From: ANONYMOUS   

 Date: Sun, May 18, 2008, 11:51 a.m. (PDT+3) 

 To: VictorGM@webtv.net  

 Subject: UFO CONTROL-STUDY GROUP 

 VICTOR:  

 For your years of dedicated service to our cause and mission, I will now give you the name of the actual group that controls the UFO-ET subject matter. Additionally, I will also give you the name of a highly classified operation and ongoing project that the UFO community and general public is completely unaware of. 

 [See "Project SERPO" POSTING #30: 

 http://serpo.org/release30.asp ]    

 Contrary to the public's perception regarding U.S. government secrecy and their supposed INability to keep anything secret, quite the opposite is true. I consulted with one of our DIA-6 group members who was a DOD military historian from the early '50s until his retirement. 

 He astutely pointed out that from August 1942 when the "Manhattan Project" to develop the atomic bomb was started under the control of the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers during the Roosevelt administration, NOT a single leak occurred among the 125,000 people assigned to work on it at the project's four (4) main facilities:
•Hanford, WA;   
•The Clinton Engineer Works at Oak Ridge, TN;
•The basement of the unused football stadium at the University of Chicago;
•And the Los Alamos National Laboratory which was built in 1943 on a secluded mesa and headed by Robert Oppenheimer.

You may release this name to the public, but ONLY with the stipulations and conditions I have cited at the end of this piece and the classified project I will give you details about. And now for the name of the group which actually controls, disseminates, sets policy and makes presidential recommendations on the UFO subject matter.  

 1) The name of the UFO control group is called XXXXX-6 that is an acronym for: XXXXX XXXXX XXXXX XXXXX and XXXXX-6 which is just a misnomer to keep people from asking too many questions when the word is mentioned. 

 2) XXXXX-6 was always present, dating back to about 1966. When too much publicity was directed toward MJ-12, the program was switched back to XXXXX-6; this occurred in about 1988. 

 3) The XXXXX-6 Group has custody of ALL "The YELLOW" and "RED BOOK" items. 

 4) Certain people have access to "The YELLOW/RED BOOKS." All access is controlled by the XXXXX-6 Group. I'm sure the President has access. 

 Because so many in the UFO community claim to be "in the know or loop," release the name of the UFO control group in the fall 2008 when we resume the Reagan presidential UFO briefings. Let me know if any of your readers get it right; I'm VERY curious.  

 I give you my approval to release this information to the public within the stipulations, restrictions and parameters I have provided. Once again, I thank you for your dedicated service to our cause.  

 Be patient as we are tending to some minor [legal] problems on future releases with the DOD. 

 Do you realize that 26 people on your list are current and retired USG senior intelligence personnel?! You also have two (2) recipients from the White House on your list. 

 You are famous!!! 

 In the meantime, I am taking much of the summer off for a well-deserved vacation in the Seychelles which I was given the idea for from one of the hosts on the "TODAY Show."? I will be out of contact until September 2008 as will the other members of our group most of whom will be vacationing in the Caribbean and elsewhere. 

 And for you, try and stay healthy and OUT of hospitals! 

 - ANONYMOUS  

 ? Referring to host Matt Lauer of the "TODAY Show" and his annual "Where in the World is Matt Lauer" segment; original air date was Friday, May 2, 2008 for the 5th and final stop of his 5-day world tour.   

 The REPUBLIC of SEYCHELLES is located approx 1,000 miles east of Kenya and has a population of 81,000 living on 115 islands that comprise 176 sq miles of land. The SEYCHELLES are rich in myth and legend, and in the past was a haven for pirates and traders. It is home to 200,000+ giant land tortoises.  

 FAST FACT: The SEYCHELLES are NOT volcanic in origin. Rather, they are the peaks of a huge underwater continental plateau that separated from India ~65,000,000 years ago [by coincidence, this is when a large asteroid is believed to have struck the earth and caused the extinction of the DINOSAURS at the end of the CRETACEOUS PERIOD]. See "Project SERPO" POSTING #30: 

 http://serpo.org/release30.asp 

 http://www.today.msnbc.msn.com/id/24410048 

 ------------------------------------------ 
 HANDY REFERENCE GUIDE!   

 SCIENTIFIC NOTATIONS on ENORMOUSLY LARGE and INFINITESIMALLY SMALL NUMBERS:  

 One million = 1,000,000  
 One billion = 1,000,000,000  
 One trillion = 1,000,000,000,000  
 One quadrillion = 1,000,000,000,000,000  
 One quintillion = 1,000,000,000,000,000,000  
 One sextillion = 1,000,000,000,000,000,000,000   
 One septillion = 1,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000  
 One octillion = 1,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000  
 One nonillion = 1,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000  
 One decillion = 1,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000  
 One undecillion = 1,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000   
 One duodecillion = 1,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000,000  
 One tredecillion = 10-42 power or 10 x 42 power [42 0's]  
 One quattuordillion = 10-45 power  
 One quindecillion = 10-48 power  
 One sexdecillion = 10-51 power  
 One septendecillion = 10-54 power  
 One octodecillion = 10-57 power  
 One novemdecillion = 10-60 power  
 One vigintillion = 10-63 power   
 One googol = 10-100 power  
 One googolplex = 10-googol ... anything beyond 100 0's  

 DIRECT ONLINE INSTRUCTION:  

 SCIENTIFIC NOTATION is used to express very LARGE or very SMALL numbers.  

EXAMPLE: The mean distance of Pluto from the Sun is ~3,670,000,000 miles. Using scientific notation, the number can be expressed as: 3.67 x 10-9 [10 to the 9th power].  

 In writing scientific notation for LARGE numbers, follow THESE rules:  

 ° The FIRST factor must be greater than or equal to 1 and less than 10;  

 ° The SECOND factor must be a power of 10 expressed in exponential form;  

 To write numbers with EXPONENTS, COUNT the number of PLACES to the right of the FIRST NONzero number in standard form. Use the number of places as the EXPONENT. In the case of 3,670,000,000, the FIRST NONzero number is 3. Since 9 digits are to the right of the 3, 9 is the EXPONENT. Therefore, 3,670,000,000 = 3.67 x 10-9 or 3.67 x 10 to the 9th power.  

 In writing very SMALL numbers, follow THESE rules:  

 - The FIRST factor must be greater than or equal to 1 and less than 10;    

 - The SECOND factor must be a NEGATIVE power of 10 expressed in exponential form;    

 - To write numbers with a NEGATIVE EXPONENT, count the number of places to the RIGHT of the decimal point, up to and INCLUDING the FIRST NONzero number. Use the number of places as the negative exponent.  

 EXAMPLE: 0.00079 = 7.9 x 10-4 [10 x -4 power]  

 decimeter = one-tenth or 10-1 power  
 centimeter = one-hundredth or 10-2 power  
 millimeter = one-thousandth or 10-3 power  
 micrometer = one-millionth or 10-6 power [micron]   
 nanometer = one-billionth or 10-9 power   
 picometer = one-trillionth or 10-12 power   
 femtometer = one-quadrillionth or 10-15 power [fermi]  
 attometer = one-quintillionth or 10-18 power   
 zeptometer = one-sextillionth or 10-21 power    
 yoctometer = one-septillionth or 10-24 power 
 [0.000,000,000,000,000,000,000,001]     

 MEASUREMENT of TIME:  

 SECOND: time measurement defined [1 second, 2 seconds, 3 seconds....] as in the initial developmental stages of our universe (see previous section above entitled, "The Enormous Timeline of Our Universe"):  

 SECOND: It is the duration of 9,192,631,770 periods of radiation corresponding to a specific transition of the cesium-133 atom.  

 nanosecond = 1 billionth of a second  
 microsecond = 1 millionth of a second  
 millisecond = 1 thousandth of a second 
 60 seconds = 1 minute  
 60 minutes = 1 hour  
 24 hours = 1 day  
 7 days = 1 week  
 4 weeks = ~1 month  
 52 weeks = 1 year  
 30 days = 1 calendar month (varies)  
 12 months = 1 year  
 365 days = 1 common year [Technically, a year equals 365 1/4  days; to keep the calendar accurate, an EXTRA DAY is added every 4 years resulting in a leap year.]  
 366 days = 1 leap year  
 10 years = 1 decade  
 100 years = 1 century  
 1,000 years = millennium  

 TIME TERMS  

 ATOMIC TIME: Atomic clocks calculate time with EXTREME ACCURACY based on the natural resonance frequency of the cesium-133 atom.   

 DAYLIGHT SAVING TIME: In the United States, Standard Time plus 1 hour. Daylight Saving Time SEEMS to make the day last longer by an hour.  

 SIDEREAL TIME: Also known as ASTRONOMICAL TIME, this method of measurement uses the movement of the stars to calculate time. An average sidereal day is 23 hours, 56 minutes and 4.09 seconds long.  

 SOLAR TIME: An outmoded measurement of time in which noon occurs when the Sun is at its highest point over a given location. Of course, noon -- and therefore time -- varies from place to place. [NOTE: This is the "outmoded" reference of time the Ebens use on Planet SERPO.]  

 STANDARD TIME: Standard Time (estb.1883) divides the Earth into 24 time zones. Calculated on SOLAR TIME, the base of the system is the ZERO MERIDIAN that passes through the Royal Greenwich Observatory at Greenwich, England. Time is measured east OR west of this Prime Meridian according to the time zones. 

 OTHER RELATED SCIENTIFIC MEASUREMENT TERMS:  

 ASTRONOMICAL UNIT [AU] = 93,000,000 miles which is the average distance of the earth from the sun  

 ATMOSPHERE = unit used to measure at SEA LEVEL; one atmosphere equals 14.6952 lbs/square inch OR 2,116,102 lbs/square foot OR 1.0332 kilograms/square centimeter OR 101,325 newton/square meter  

 DYNE = the force needed to accelerate a 1-gram mass 1 centimeter/second squared  

 HORSEPOWER [hp] = Method #1: the power in the FPS system [foot-pound-second system] needed to lift 550 lbs a distance of 1 foot in 1 second; Method #2: the power needed to lift 33,000 lbs a distance of 1 foot in 1 minute; Method #3: 745.7 watts OR 42.41 British thermal units/minute most often used in scientific usage  

 LIGHT-YEAR [ly] =  5,871,057,120,000 [trillion] miles -- OR 63,240 AU -- which is the distance light travels in a vacuum in one (1) year; Method: take the speed of light ~186,170-186,282 miles/second and then multiply it by: 60 seconds in a minute, then 60 minutes in an hour, then 24 hours in a day and then 365.25 days in a year = 5 trillion, 871 billion, 057 million, 120 thousand miles    

 MACH NUMBER = a ratio of the speed of a body/airplane to the speed of sound in the earth's atmosphere; object/speed of sound; primarily used for airplane speed; about 1,088 ft/second    

 NEWTON = the force need to accelerate a 1-kilogram mass 1 meter/second
 squared  
 PARSEC = a unit of distance used by professional astronomers to measure the vast stellar and galactic distances (rather than light-years) which is equal to the mean Earth-Sun distance = 1 astronomical unit [AU]; 206,265 AU OR 1.92 x 10-13 power miles OR 3.2616 light-years; 1 kiloparsec [kpc] = 1,000 pc; 1 megaparsec [Mpc] = 1,000,000 pc   

 PASCAL = unit used to measure pressure; one (1) pascal = 1 newton/square meter OR 0.020855 lb/square foot  

 Pi = 3.14159265+; the ratio of the circumference of a circle to its diameter; usually rounded to 3.14 

 POUNDAL = the force needed to accelerate a 1-lb mass 1 foot/second squared; 1 poundal = 13,825.5 dynes; 1 poundal = 0.138255 newton  

 SPEED of SOUND = usually placed at 1,088 ft/second  

 SPEED vs VELOCITY vs ACCELERATION vs MOMENTUM = 

 SPEED: the ratio of the distance traveled by an object -- regardless of its direction to the time required to travel that distance; speed is a measure of how QUICKLY something is moving; this is the TIME that it takes to travel from one point to another DIVIDED by the distance traveled; speed is expressed in units such as MILES PER HOUR or METERS PER SECOND 

 VELOCITY: the speed AND direction of motion of a moving body; velocity is a vector quantity as it measures the DIRECTION of movement as well as its SPEED 

 . Relative Velocity: it is the velocity that one (1) object has when viewed from another viewing object   

 . Terminal Velocity: When something is dropped and is pulled by gravity toward the earth, it accelerates as it falls until it reaches a 
 velocity from which it can accelerate NO further; this is called its TERMINAL VELOCITY; terminal velocity occurs when the force of the air resistance against the falling object increases to the point where it equals the force of gravity pulling the object; terminal velocity of an object depends on how MUCH AIR RESISTANCE it experiences; it is NOT affected by its weight, but instead by its surface and the streamlining of its shape  

 ACCELERATION: the RATE of change of the velocity of a moving body/object; acceleration -- like velocity -- is a vector quantity as in "speeding up"; acceleration is measured in meters/second/second OR m/s 2 [meters divided by seconds squared] 

 MOMENTUM: it is calculated by multiplying the mass of an object by its velocity; the greater its mass, the greater its momentum to keep moving in one direction UNLESS a force acts upon it 

 COMPUTER MEMORY:  

 Computer memory is based on BITS and BYTES. One (1) megabyte of memory has the capacity of storing 1 million single letters.  

 8 bits = 1 character = 1 byte  
 1 kilobyte = 1,024 bytes OR 2-10 power  
 1 megabyte = 1,048,576 bytes OR 2-20 power    
 1 gigabyte = 1,073,741,82 bytes OR 2-30 power   
 1 terabyte = 1,099,511,627,776 OR 2-40 power  
 1 petabyte = 1,125,899,906,842,624 bytes OR 2-50 power [1 quadrillion] 

 NOTE: TERABYTE databases are becoming more common, and PETABYTE barriers have been broken with the coming EXABYTE, ZETTABYTE, YOTTABYTE and XERABYTE databases, which have even greater storage capacity, to eventually follow. 
 ------------------------------------------    

 BIBLIOGRAPHY  

 BIG BANG and INFLATION THEORIES:   

 ASTRONOMY - General Editor Ian Ridpath, Monday, April 3, 2006 ©, 
ISBN# 0756617332, $22.50, 300 pp. / Big Bang-Inflation Theory: pp. 48-51  

 UNIVERSE: The DEFINITIVE VISUAL GUIDE - Senior Editor Peter Frances, 
 Friday, October 28, 2005 ©, ISBN# 0756613647, $50.00, 512 pp. / Big Bang-Inflation Theory: pp. 46-55  

 BANG! The COMPLETE HISTORY OF THE UNIVERSE - By May, Lintott and Moore, Thursday, April 10, 2008 ©, ISBN# 0801889851, $29.95, 200 pp. / Universe Timeline: p. 192    

 DISCOVER SCIENCE ALMANAC: The DEFINITIVE SCIENCE RESOURCE - Editors Bryan Bunch and Jenny Tesar, Sunday, September 28, 2003 ©, ISBN#0786887591, $13.99, 790 pp. / Big Bang Theory: pp. 97, 266-67  

 The AMERICAN HERITAGE SCIENCE DICTIONARY - Executive Editor Joseph P 
 Pickett, Tuesday, January 25, 2005 ©, ISBN# 0618455043, $19.95, 695 
 pp. / Big Bang-Inflation Theory: pp. 68, 322 

 The UNIVERSAL BOOK OF ASTRONOMY: FROM THE ANDROMEDA GALAXY to THE ZONE OF AVOIDANCE - By David Darling, Monday, October 27, 2003 ©, ISBN#0471265691, $40.00, 570 pp. / Big Bang-Inflation Theory: pp. 63-4, 249   

 The HANDY SPACE ANSWER BOOK - Editors Phillis Engelbert and Diane L Dupuis, Sunday, September 28, 1997 ©, ISBN# 157859085X, $21.95, 576 pp. / Big Bang Theory: pp. 4, 6 [illus], 7-11, 13-16, 45, 49-50, 53, 59, 83, 116, 294, 298, 448 / Inflation Theory: pp. 10-12   

 The HANDY SCIENCE ANSWER BOOK - By The Science and Technology Dept of the Carnegie Library of Pittsburgh, 2nd Edition, Tuesday, January 28, 1997 ©, ISBN# 157859099X, 580 pp. / Big Bang Theory: pp. 29, 31  

 GENERAL REFERENCE:   

 The OXFORD GUIDE: AMERICAN MILITARY HISTORY - Edited by John Whiteclay Chambers III, June © 1999, ISBN# 0195340921, $9.99, 916 pp. / Manhattan Project: pp. 411-12   

 The MATH TEACHER's BOOK OF LISTS - By Judith and Gary Muschla, 2nd Edition, Friday, March 25, 2005 ©, ISBN# 078797398X, $32.95, 408 pp.  

 The SCIENCE TEACHER's BOOK OF LISTS - By Frances Barhydt, MA and Dr Paul W Morgan, Sunday, August 15, 1993 ©, ISBN# 0137933819, $29.95, 500 pp.   

 The READING TEACHER's BOOK OF LISTS - By Dr Edward Fry and Jacqueline Kress, EdD, Friday, April 14, 2006 ©, ISBN# 0787982571, $29.95, 524 pp.  

 1,000 QUESTIONS and ANSWERS - Nicola Baxter, Friday, August 1, 1997 
©, ISBN# 0760706069, $12.98, 192 pp.  

 PARADISE on EARTH: The REPUBLIC of SEYCHELLES:  

 The ILLUSTRATED WORLD ATLAS - Cartographic Consultants Dr William 
 Cartwright and Professor Michael P Peterson, Saturday, August 25, 2007 
©, ISBN# 0760796831, $19.98, 352 pp. / Republic of Seychelles: p. 38, 
 Grids: A-8 and J-5; Longitude: 55° 15' - 56° 00' [east] Latitude: 
 4° 15' - 4° 45' [south] / Wide Area: Longitude: 50°-60° [east] 
 Latitude: 0°-10° [south] 

 TIMELESS WONDERS: EARTH's MOST SPECTACULAR PLACES - By Robert J Moore, 
 Thursday, November 30, 2006 ©, ISBN# 0760787174, $19.98, 320 pp. / 
 "Incomparable Beauty: The Seychelles Islands," pp. 174-75 
 ------------------------------------------ 
 ALL SUPPORTING DOCUMENTATION: Written, researched and compiled by Victor 
 Martinez  

http://www.serpo.org/   

Release 29 a

Release 29a - The UNIVERSE Resolved: It Will Expand FOREVER!
 (16 June 2008) 


 http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap050925.html 

 http://www.universetoday.com/2008/06/13/thinking-about-time-before-the-big-bang/ 

 EXPLANATION: Analyses of a new high-resolution map of microwave light emitted only 380,000 years after the BIG BANG appear to define our universe more precisely than ever before. The eagerly awaited results announced last year from the orbiting "Wilkinson Microwave Anisotropy Probe" [WMAP] resolve several long-standing disagreements in cosmology. Present analyses of the below WMAP all-sky image indicate that the universe is 13.7 BILLION years old (ACCURATE to 1%), composed of 73% 
 DARK ENERGY, 23% cold DARK MATTER -- and only 4% atoms -- is currently expanding at the rate of 71 km/sec/Mpc (accurate to 5%), underwent episodes of rapid expansion called INFLATION, and will EXPAND FOREVER. 

 2005 © Credit: WMAP Science Team, NASA  

Universe Expansion
 Click image to enlarge  

Release 29 b

Release 29a-1 - Our UNIVERSE is Shown to be ~13.7-15 BILLION YEARS Old 
 in This "Afterglow of Creation!"
 (16 June 2008) 


 http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap980207.html 

 BIG BANG THEORY: The plane of our MILKY WAY GALAXY runs horizontally through the center of this microwave image BELOW. This historic all-sky map is based on the first two (2) years of data from NASA's COsmic Background Explorer (COBE) satellite. These "ripples" in the "afterglow of creation" were mapped for the first time by the COBE satellite in 1992. The COBE images confirm that only a million years after the BIG BANG -- which occurred roughly 13.7-15 BILLION YEARS AGO -- parts of the UNIVERSE were visibly hotter than other parts. The CMBR [Cosmic Microwave Background Radiation] shows that the PINK areas are HOTTER and DENSER while the BLUE areas are COOLER and less DENSE. By studying  the size and distribution of the spots found with COBE and future missions, astronomers hope to determine the composition, density, and future of our 
 UNIVERSE. The CMBR was discovered in 1964 by Americans Arno Penzias and Robert Wilson. 

 1998 © Credit: DMR, COBE, NASA, Two-Year Sky Map  

Big Bang
 Click image to enlarge  

Release 29 b

Release 29b - The Inflation and Contraction of Our UNIVERSE!
 (16 June 2008) 


 http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap060323.html 

 http://www.universetoday.com/2008/06/13/thinking-about-time-before-the-big-bang/ 

 The UNIVERSE INFLATION and CONTRACTION: The UNIVERSE is EXPANDING gradually now. But its initial EXPANSION was almost impossibly rapid as it likely grew from quantum scale fluctuations in a TRILLIONTH of a SECOND. In fact, this cosmological scenario, known as INFLATION, is now reported to be further quantified by an analysis of three (3) years of data 
 from the WMAP spacecraft. The subtle properties are distilled from conditions in the early UNIVERSE and related to its first moments of existence. Schematically, this diagram traces the 13.7-15 BILLION years -- plus a trillionth of a second -- history of the UNIVERSE from the quantum scale to the formation of stars, galaxies, planets, and WMAP. 

 2006 © Credit: WMAP Science Team, NASA  

Inflation
 Click image to enlarge  

Release 29 c

Release 29c - Evidence of The BIG BANG and INFLATION are "Heard" 
 in the Frozen Ice of ANTARCTICA!
 (16 June 2008) 


 http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap010501.html 

 EXPLANATION: On the frozen ice near the bottom of our world, increasingly sophisticated instruments listen for a more precise echo of how our UNIVERSE STARTED. Independent collaborations behind three (3) such instruments announced evidence that overtones heard are consistent with our universe having only about 5% normal matter and 95% DARK MATTER or DARK ENERGY. This amount of normal matter was expected were our universe to have undergone a particularly EXPLOSIVE early phase of the BIG BANG known as INFLATION. Fluctuations of microwave light are thought to be caused by sound waves moving through the EARLY UNIVERSE. Pictured BELOW is the remote receiver for the Degree Angular Scale Interferometer (DASI) that recorded one of the data sets. 

 2001 © Credit & Copyright: DASI, CARA, NSF  

Antarctica
 Click image to enlarge  

Release 29 d

Release 29d - Will The UNIVERSE End in a Big RIP, Big CRUNCH or Big FREEZE?!
 (16 June 2008) 


 http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap071021.html 

 EXPLANATION: How will our UNVERSE END? Although the universe started with a BIG BANG, analysis of cosmological measurements allows a possibility that it will end with a BIG RIP. As soon as few billion years from now, the controversial scenario holds, DARK ENERGY will grow to such a magnitude that our own Milky Way Galaxy will no longer be able to hold itself together. After that, stars, planets, and then even atoms might not be able to withstand the expansive internal force. Previously, 
 speculation on the ultimate fate of the universe centered on either a re-collapsing BIG CRUNCH or a BIG FREEZE. Although the universe's fate is still a puzzle, piecing it together will likely follow from an increased understanding of the nature of dark matter and dark energy. 

 2007 © Illustration Credit & Copyright: Lynette Cook  

Universe Puzzle
 Click image to enlarge  

Release 29 e

Release 29e - The Timeframe of INFLATION and CONTRACTION
 (16 June 2008) 

- PLEASE VIEW THE DIAGRAM BELOW! - 

http://www.theyfly.com/  

http://www.figu.org/ 

 OUR UNIVERSE: CREATION - AN EXTRATERRESTRIAL PERSPECTIVE AND A SCHEMATIC DIAGRAM OF OUR EGG-SHAPED UNIVERSE / SPECIAL NOTE: THE MATERIAL UNIVERSE - WHERE WE LIVE AND ALL GALAXIES ARE LOCATED - IS IN BELT #4 COLORED IN BLUE OF THE 7 BELTS WHICH COMPRISE EACH AND EVERY UNIVERSE THAT ARE CONTAINED WITHIN THE 'ABSOLUTE ABSOLUTUM' 
 NOTE: See references to THE ENORMOUS TIME FRAMES OF CREATION AND OUR UNIVERSE at the very end of this posting!   


 Our current scientific viewpoint defines the Universe as all matter and energy, including Earth, the galaxies and all therein, and 
 the contents of intergalactic space, regarded as a whole. Fundamentally, it is viewed as an immense collection of stellar material originating from a primeval "explosion," appropriately termed the "Big Bang," from which all time, space, life and Being originated. 

 However, the extent of our knowledge of the Universe is quite elementary and is severely limited by the power of our telescopes and other such research devices. According to the Plejaran extraterrestrials, we have not even begun to peer into the unfathomably vast expanses of our Universe, let alone understand what it actually is and how it truly began. 

 The Plejarans - a civilization over 8,000 years ahead of us in technical knowledge and one which receives wisdom and knowledge from beings much more highly evolved and knowledgeable than they - are themselves at a loss to fully understand the Universe and the mysterious meaning of its existence. 


 CREATION - AN EXTRATERRESTRIAL PERSPECTIVE 

 To begin to explain the concepts of the Universe, it would be helpful to note that the Plejarans generally use the term "Universe" synonymously with the term "Creation." The most fundamental energy which comprises the Universe, respectively Creation, is the finest of energies appropriately labeled as "fine matter" by the Plejarans, or spiritual matter. 

 This level of matter has yet to be discovered by terrestrial scientists and remains still hidden during mankind's quest to understand the true origin and nature of our physical reality and its manifold secrets. 

 To further expand on the definition of Creation, an excerpt from FIGU's periodical, Stimme der Wassermannzeit (Voice of the Aquarian Age), No. 89, December 1993 states the following: 

 "Creation is the immeasurable mystery suspended in immeasurable expanse. Creation is identical to 'Universal Consciousness,' which guides and prevails in the BEING of consciousness; it is a DOUBLE-HELIX, EGG-SHAPED CONFIGURATION that simultaneously constitutes the Universe in its growing expansion. Its pulsating double-helix arms live as spiritual energy, while rotating against each other." 

 The Universe is Creation's internal and external body. 

- Creation - through its entirety pulsate the Universal 'Gemüt' (a non-translatable German term for the spiritual counterpart to the 
 psyche) and the Universal Consciousness, the power of life and existence in general. 

 - Creation pervades everything and everything pervades Creation, therefore forming oneness within itself. Within this oneness occur all life and all of the evolution allotted to it. 

 - Creation has the identical developmental and evolutionary process as every life form - however, its values of time are anchored in very high values indeed. 

 - Creation itself exists in a conscious creative state for seven Great-Times. Subsequently it lays dormant for an equal number of 
 Great-Times, but this time they last seven times as long. Following this period, Creation is awake to create once again for a period 
 seven times as longer once again than the previous one. 

 Our universe EXPANDS for = 155,520,000,000,000 terrestrial years;  

 Our universe CONTRACTS for = 155,520,000,000,000 terrestrial years;   

 and then it "sleeps" and cogitates its previous existence in its "awake" cycle for an EQUAL number of years;  

 155,520,000,000,000 + 155,520,000,000,000 = ... 
 1 Greattime = 311,040,000,000,000 terrestrial years;  
 7 Greattimes = 2,177,280,000,000,000 terrestrial years and is called an "ETERNITY";  
 7 Eternities = 1 Cosmic Greattime or All Greattime = 15,240,960,000,000,000 terrestrial years. 
 [15 quadrillion, 240 trillion, 960 billion Earth-terrestrial years.]   

 CURRENT EVOLUTIONARY STATE OF OUR UNIVERSE:    

 We are nearly 46,000,000,000,000 [trillion] Earth years into the SECOND EXPANSION CYCLE [second Greattime] since the "Big Bang" event took place. 

 - Creation is The Creation and there exists no Creation other than it within its own Universe. 

 - Creation is the Creation of all creations such as the Universe, the galaxies, stars, earths (earth is equivalent to 'planets' in this 
 context), skies, light and darkness, time, space and all multitudes of life forms in existence, each according to its own species. 

 - Creation is justice, love, strength, wisdom, knowledge, compassion, freedom, mercy, laws, directive, alliance, fulfillment, evolution, life, support, joy, beauty, peace, infallibility, equilibrium, spirit, forever, logic, growth, perfection, contentment, inexhaustibility, 
 omnipotence, sweetness, infinity, solidarity, perception, harkening, elevation, the Sohar, gentleness, lucidity, purity, transformation, 
 origin, future, power, reverence, allness and BEING. 

 - Creation is the BEING and non-BEING of life. It is the most immense mass of spiritual energy in the Universe. 

 - Creation is spirit in its purest form and immeasurable in its wisdom, knowledge, love and harmony in truth. 

 - Creation is a spiritually dynamic, pure-spirit energy that prevails over everything. Incomprehensible for human beings, it is an active, creative wisdom in the midst of its own incessant evolution; it is all-encompassing for all times. 

 - Creation is verity, the all-embracing, solace, comprehensiveness, guidance, equality, accuracy, cognition, empirical knowledge, 
 admonition, discipline, recollection, revelation, praise, perfection, explanation and direction. 

 - Creation is the path of life; it is nature, light, fire and contemplation; Creation is consciousness, and it is omnipresent. Glory 
 be to Creation. 

 HOW OUR UNIVERSE WAS CREATED BY THE ABSOLUTE ABSOLUTUM - WHICH CREATED ALL OF THE OTHER UNIVERSES WHICH RESIDE WITHIN IN IT - AND ITS INITIAL SHAPE AND CONFIGURATION 

 In its initial stage, Creation exists in a slumber or cogitating state. It begins virtually as small as a "flea" and is highly concentrated 
 spiritual energy formed by the ultimately highest form of Creation above it, designated by the Plejarans as the Absolute-Absolutum. A "spiritual" explosion subsequently occurs which instantly fills the entire space the Universe initially occupies. 

 Creation continues to expand for a period of time during which physical matter, i.e., celestial bodies and life forms, are continuously being created within it. Our Universe is nearly 46 trillion years into the second expansion cycle since the Big Bang took place. Creation will experience a total of seven (7) expansion/contraction cycles before moving into the next level of its evolution. 


 A SCHEMATIC OF OUR UNIVERSE 

 In order to grasp a better understanding of Creation, it would be easier to depict it in a diagrammatic form. This, however, proves to be nearly impossible given the incredibly immense proportions of its components, namely its seven (7) belts or levels of energy, however an attempt is made (further below) to display a schematic in order to provide at least a hint of its enormous size. 

 The schematic presented below from: 

 www.billymeier.com/Beamships/Universe.html 
 [link is no longer working] 

 is based on data present at the time just after the "Big Bang." Our Universe has since expanded, reflecting much higher measurement values. 

 Imagine our expanding Universe as a gigantic sphere. Now imagine if you were to slice the Universe in half, thereby exposing the seven (7) individual belts or layers within. Each belt is represented here by a distinct color for illustration purposes only. One thing that should become obvious at this point is that you can only discern four out of the seven "shells" with the colors green, red, yellow and the small, center point being blue. 

 The name and width of these layers, from the outermost to the innermost, are defined below. The widths given are the "thickness" of each shell, not its diameter. (Please bear in mind that this depiction is no where near an actual scale model of the Universe.): 

 7) The Displacement Belt (Green): width = 1.4 x 10/7 light years; 
 6) The Creation Belt (Red): width = 1.4 x 10/64 light years;   
 5) The Transformation Belt (Yellow): width = 1 x 10/55 light years;   
 4) The Solid-State Matter Universe Belt (Blue) (includes all galaxies, planets, stars, gases, etc.): width = 2.5 x 10/15 light years.    

 So then, where are the remaining three layers? The outer layers described above are so incredibly large that the innermost layers would not even show up as a pin point of color, yet they are huge distances, nonetheless. Below is an expanded view of the interior portion of our Universe, starting with the blue "Material Universe" belt described above and the remaining three belts (pink, orange and purple) shown as an exploded pie segment. Note how significantly small our "material" Universe actually is when compared to its entire scope. 

 3) The Ur-Space Belt (Pink): width = 1 x 10/14 light years;  
 2) The Ur-Core Belt (Orange): width = 1 x 10/14 light years;    
 1) The Central Core (Purple): radius = 3.5 light years.    

 The function of the individual belts in our Universe involves a constant transfer of energies; all of this providing the capability for our 
 Universe to manifest a material or physical belt in which stellar material, floral, faunal and human life can develop. To elaborate on 
 these functions, Billy Meier responds to a question about the Material Belt of our Universe: 

 An excerpt from FIGU Bulletin #5 by Billy Meier 

 QUESTION: "What is the Universal Material Belt?" 

 ANSWER: The Universal Material Belt is that part or belt, respectively, of the Universe where matter exists, that is to say, planets, suns, galaxies, meteors, comets, gases, the entire dark matter and other things. All of these things exist only within this material belt, whereas no material whatsoever can be found in the internal and external belts (of which there exist seven in all). In the so-called Transformation Belt those forms develop from which matter develops that later exists in the Material Belt, hence in our visible DERN Universe. 

 This is the only portion of the Universe we human beings are capable of seeing and exploring. We cannot see anything beyond it, for only total emptiness and blackness reign there. Absolutely nothing can be observed or detected - even with the best modern astronomical or other extraordinary tools available to us. The inner and outer belts beyond our visible material Universe are practically endless, and are vast and dark if one excludes the innermost, radiant belt where the Big Bang originated approximately 46 trillion years ago. 

 The after effects of the Big Bang continue to linger within the adjacent belt which, looking at it from Earth, is roughly 1.25 x 10/15 light years away at its closest proximity. Terrestrial scientists are incapable of peering and listening into these depths of space even with the most elaborate super devices. And this indicates precisely the degree of our scientists' narrow-mindedness, when they claim the Universe is barely as old as the distance they can penetrate into the nearly endless space with their observation devices and contraptions. 

 They do not have the remotest clue that the Universe extends far beyond what they envision it to be, and that it has six additional belts in total, which are void of any coarse material or matter. Matter itself is in constant transformation within the Material Belt and it is, therefore, subject to growth and disintegration processes. For this reason, matter can never be or become as old as the complete Universe. 

 At any given time, therefore, only young matter can be found in the Material Universe; matter that can, at best, be a mere 40 or 45 billion years old - in a solid and compact state - while the age of the Complete Universe beyond the Material Belt, respectively our Material Universe, amounts to approximately 46 trillion years. 

 The attempt to schematically depict the Complete Universe, is an impossible feat due to its colossal size. Additionally, its SPIRAL-EGG SHAPE complicates everything even more. Nonetheless, here is an attempt by way of a circular diagram, a model, to illustrate an overview of what our Complete Universe looks like, which bears the name DERN Universe. 

 The sketched proportions do not correspond in distance with one another, of course, since this is only a schematic diagram; for more specific data regarding this material I suggest you read Guido Moosbrugger's lecture, as printed in our FIGU pamphlet "Überdenkenswerte Vorträge" (Lectures to Ponder - available only in German at this point). 

 In [the above] illustration, Belt #4 [blue] depicts our Material Universe, that is to say, the part of the Complete Universe where the 
 galaxies exist with suns, planets, meteors, gas clouds, comets and so forth. The Ur-Space #3 [pink] is the belt from which emanates the so-called background radiation that leads back to the Ur-Core #2 [orange], the actual Ur-Layer, in whose center lies the Central-Core #1 [purple] that constitutes the actual Big Bang location, the Big Bang Center. 

 Beginning in the Ur-Space, matter starts its development and then passes into the Universe Belt, hence, our Material Universe. This matter consists of energy, however, which intermingles with other energy forms that penetrate from the Transformation Belt #5 [yellow] into our Material Universe. The energy matter from Ur-Space is POSITIVE, while the other matter from the Transformation Belt is NEGATIVE. As they join in the Material Universe, they develop into new energy forms from which, ultimately, coarse matter evolves. 

 In the Transformation Belt #5 [yellow] the fine matter energies of the Creation Belt #6 [red] are transformed into energy forms that already extend into the realm of material energy. This makes them absorbable by the Transformation Belt, and they are turned into coarse energy. 

 The Creation Belt #6 [red] absorbs the finest of energies from the space of the Absolute Absolutum, which is located beyond the Displacement Belt, also called Ram Belt #7 [green], whose function it is to nudge away the walls of other universes that float within the space of the Absolute Absolutum as well. The Displacement Belt also performs another function, namely that of absorbing the finest energy matters from the Absolute Absolutum sphere and passing them on into the Creational Belt. 

 This process supplies the Complete Universe with all the indispensable energies it needs to exist. Although it created itself or, rather, was created through the Ur-Idea of the previous Ur-Creation, one can see that the Complete Universe nevertheless requires external energies - in this case from the Absolute Absolutum - upon whose finest energies ultimately 10/49 different forms of Creation depend in infinite number. 

 Regardless of the fact that the Complete Creation, Universal Consciousness, or whatever one wishes to call the Complete Universe, is capable of supporting itself, it nonetheless requires some force, an energy, that enables the Universe to achieve it. This force or energy is provided by the ABSOLUTE ABSOLUTUM. 

 The Absolute Absolutum is the only entity capable of passing on the indispensable and fundamental energies to all existing forms of 
 creations within the entire vastness of all Creational forms, so that they, in turn, have the capability of being able to support themselves. 

 And yet, even the Absolute Absolutum is dependent upon an external life energy, which it does not draw from a higher type of Creation, but directly from what human beings call the ABSOLUTE NOTHING. The Absolute Nothing does, however, contain the fundamental, finest energies from which the Absolute Absolutum SELF-CREATED ITSELF an unfathomably long time ago.   
 ------------------------------------------ 

 THE ENORMOUS TIME FRAMES OF OUR UNIVERSE AND CREATION  

 A good reference to the enormous time frames of our Universe is located at the Web site: 

http://tinyurl.com/5462cr 

 A similar listing of cosmic numbers is at: 

 http://www.experiencefestival.com/kalpa 

 http://www.sanskritmantra.com/brahma.htm 

 and see the LAST section at the BOTTOM of the page at: 

http://tinyurl.com/43rg24 

 In some Hindu Astronomical books, there is a section recounting this ancient cosmology, probably for historical reference. There might be such a section in the INDIAN ASTRONOMICAL EPHEMERIS:    

http://tinyurl.com/47bp8y 

 ----------------------------------------- 

 SCIENTISTS FROM HUMAN GENOME PROJECT EXAMINE JUNK DNA AS POSSIBLY ET IN ORIGIN!   

 In the attached outstanding article, reference is made to serious scientific discussion of so-called human "junk DNA" having perhaps an extraterrestrial origin suggesting past bio-genetic manipulation of Homo sapiens sapiens in eons past by one or more alien races. 

 However, for those "gnostics" on this list, i.e., the elite few who are "in the know," who have followed and studied the voluminous contact notes of the Billy Meier/Pleiadian case for years, this is OLD news. ALL of this information is specified in: 

http://www.theyfly.com/  

 AND YET,... THEY FLY! - By Guido Moosbrugger, Steelmark Publishing, June © 2001, ISBN# 0971152306, $26.95, p. 349, Chapter 15, "Prophecies & Predictions": 

 DNA MANIPULATIONS - Scientists will discover the manipulated gene from ancient times in the DNA chain responsible for the rapid aging in human beings. Preparations in this area began already in 1994. However, whether scientists make their discovery public and utilize their findings to their fullest merit is questionable. 

 The way things look now, public disclosures regarding these discoveries will not be made until a much later date, and probably will 
 still remain this way for a very long time before the public will be fully informed about the discovery. 

 Therefore, a long period will pass before the GENETIC MANIPULATIONS ARE REVERSED by retro-manipulation of the pertinent gene. 

 For the time being, scientists will be unaware that the gene they have stumbled upon is the key factor, and that it is THIS PARTICULAR GENE which was previously manipulated once before, many MILLIONS OF YEARS 
 ago. 

 p. 353: THE DNA FIGHT AGAINST AGING - However, barely three (3) decades prior to this event, a third DNA information code will be discovered in the human body, and the first concrete steps will be undertaken to eliminate diseases in the elderly, heart diseases and attrition. After approximately 25 years, these efforts will prove successful. 

 p. 356: IMMORTALITY INCREASED - Problems will also occur within human populations because their relative immortality, that is, the increase in human longevity, will amount to life spans of from 350 - 450 years. This increase in longevity will also precipitate increasingly greater problems of overpopulation and all other subsequent obstacles, which will include migrations that will result in new types of interbred peoples. 

 Among them will be a group who call themselves Eurasians. They will demand the Eurasian region for their homeland at a time when the "semi-humans," those with human-animal, genetically-manipulated creatures and the robot-humans will be creating incredible problems. These difficulties will lead to the deplorable decline of every space travel program and nearly bring space travel to a complete standstill. 

 The problem will come about because of the robot-humans' and semi-humans' refusal to continue working for normal human beings, and because of their unwillingness to continue a life of subservience and exploitation as living maneuvering devices for spaceships, vehicles, equipment, war machines and such other gadgetry. These events will transpire at a time when a climatic reversal begins on Earth because of the Sun's noticeably weakening activity triggered by reduced nuclear fusion within. 

 p. 360: MORE GENETIC MANIPULATIONS - This is also the time when geriatric research, through genetic reverse-manipulation, will release the human population from the premature aging curse; a curse that was brought about long ago in the initial fighting peoples' genes by the gene manipulators, the "creator-overlords." 

 This REVERSE MANIPULATION will afford Man an EVEN LONGER LIFE SPAN than that achieved by terrestrial geneticists through prior procedures, whereby human lives increased to an average life expectancy of 400 years. These new achievements will produce an EXTREMELY LONG HUMAN LIFE EXPECTANCY OF THOUSANDS OF YEARS. 

 In the ensuing few years, the time will come when intelligent ocean dwellers will begin to contact human beings and communicate with them, and a new race of terrestrial inhabitants will thereby be founded. Then the time will come when aggressions with Martian inhabitants [populated by Earth's inhabitants who started colonies] will begin and result in the actual launching of attacks on the colonies. These events will be followed by 15 years of relative calm, finally bringing good fortune to the Earth's inhabitants in their quest to find their actual origins. 

 A terrestrial space expedition will penetrate into the regions of Sirius and discover, or rather locate there, proof of the Ur-Ur-Ur-ancestry of the human beings on Earth, who previously were PROCREATED THROUGH GENETIC MANIPULATIONS IN ANCIENT TIMES BY THE SIRIUS "CREATOR-OVERLORDS." 

 This discovery will reveal that over many millennia, the terrestrials' ancestors fled across long twisting paths, found the Sol system and began settling there. This, humankind on Earth will eventually find its direction back TO ITS ORIGIN - which, of course, will not suddenly resolve mankind's problems by any means. 

 p. 360-361: TERRESTRIAL MANKIND IS RE-ACQUAINTED WITH THEIR CREATOR-OVERLORDS - Of course, linked to this discovery will also be contacts with very distant ancestors of the previous "creator-overlords," as well as other intelligences from Sirius that will, by then, no longer lead to the pursuit and slaughter of the genetically-manipulated descendants, the terrestrials. 

 The contacts will lead to a collaboration instead, resulting in the PREVIOUS GENETIC MANIPULATION's DEFINITIVE REVERSAL. This action, in turn, will result in the birth of new descendants who will be normal and no longer be degenerate. The circle finally closes and Man will become a TRUE HUMAN BEING, in equilibrium with the negative and positive. 

 The reversal of this previous degeneration-gene manipulation, along with the continuing climbing OVERpopulation, precipitated even more so by the extraordinary human longevity, will result in plans for THE ERADICATION OF THOSE HUMANS IN WHOM THE GENETIC REVERSE MANIPULATION HAD NOT YET BEEN PERFORMED, on Earth as well as on all other worlds 
 colonized by terrestrials, and space stations inhabited by them. 

 This eradication will transpire in the same manner previously proclaimed and demanded by responsible individuals a very long time ago: A worldwide HALT in the birthrate over a 7-YEAR cycle. Within this framework, ONLY PARENTS whose degeneration was previously eradicated through genetic reverse-manipulation will BE PERMITTED TO PROCREATE. 

 ONLY those individuals, therefore, will be legally entitled to sire an offspring. Illegal pregnancies will be ASSESSED AS THE MOST ABHORRENT CRIME, punishable by DEATH to the guilty parties. 

 This concept will only come about as an inescapable law five (5) years before the period when complete authority over planet Earth is placed into the hands of the administrative sphere within the Sirius alliance, and enforced therefrom.  

 

Creation 
 Click image to enlarge

 

Release 30

Release 30 
 ANCIENT ASTRONAUTS Crash Land During The DINOSAUR ERA of Earth's Distant Past!
 (1 July 2008)

WORLDWIDE BOMBSHELL EXCLUSIVE ... YOU READ IT HERE FIRST! ANONYMOUS provides details on one of the MOST HIGHLY CLASSIFIED PROJECTS OF ALL TIME: "Operation XXXXX XXXXX": The RECOVERY OF AN ALIEN SPACECRAFT WHICH CRASH LANDED ON EARTH DURING THE DINOSAUR ERA ... SHOCKING ... POSITIVELY AMAZING ... BEYOND ALL DISCLOSURE EXPECTATIONS ... LIKE A FIERY BOLT OF AN INCOMING KILLER ASTEROID FROM OUT-OF-THE-BLUE! ... U-N-B-E-L-I-E-V-A-B-L-E ... BUT 100% TRUE ... A MIND-NUMBING, RIVETING, BREATHTAKING READ! 

 VICTOR: 

 "Operation XXXXX XXXXX": A highly classified, sensitive operation with far-reaching national security implications that took place in 1968. A XXXXX archaeological team uncovered a large metallic object in a remote area of southern XXXXX which is a close NATO ally of ours. The object was believed to be an ALIEN SPACECRAFT that had crashed approximately 200 million years ago [200 MYA] according to the archaeological team. 

 The site subsequently was examined by a USAF Recovery Team, which then put the age of the ALIEN CRAFT at approximately 150 million years ago [150 MYA]. I don't think anyone can give an actual age of the site, but it was somewhere between 150 and 200 MYA, based on the location of where it was found. 

 Our scientists used the ABSOLUTE DATING METHOD employing decaying  radioactive isotopes. Sedimentary rock formations and the fact that the object was EMBEDDED INTO THE ROCK were used to estimate the age of the ALIEN CRAFT. 

 The ALIEN CRAFT itself was 45 feet in diameter. The craft was  transported to the State of XXXXX and then to the giant XXXXX lab complex in XXXXX and opened. The ALIEN CRAFT contained two (2) highly decomposed ALIEN BODIES and DECAYED ANIMALS, which were apparently abducted by these ALIEN BEINGS. The animals were small DINOSAURS on board the ALIEN CRAFT. 

 The craft was stored at XXXXX and years of intense research were conducted. The last time I checked, the research team ruled OUT the craft being of Eben origin. However, no one could tell where it came from. The ALIEN BODIES were far too decomposed to be thoroughly examined. They were about 5 feet tall and had very large, bulbous heads. To the best of my knowledge, "Operation XXXXX XXXXX" is still an ongoing project. I personally worked on the operation in the early '70s. 

 The instruments from the craft were interesting because they were made of small crystal-like devices, wired together with a form of very fine wire. The ALIEN PROPULSION SYSTEM contained a large chamber with what we called "Rocks" (obviously some form of energy) in the chamber. Large vents placed around the chamber vented some sort of power, radiation or some form of tremendous energy generated through the vents and into the propulsion chamber which enabled interstellar space travel. 

 Examination of the rocks found zinc, and several unknown materials and alloys which we still cannot identify to this day. The "rocks" obviously lost all of their energy over the years. They were NOT radioactive nor did they contain any special properties. We could never power up the ALIEN CRAFT in the nearly 40 years we've had possession of it. 

 We could NOT locate the actual power system and therefore could never operate any of the equipment contained within the craft. However, we did find a "Star Chart." The chart was created from outside of the Earth on the ALIEN HOME WORLD. To this day, we have been UNable to read and decipher the ALIEN STAR CHART. The star chart was of a deep area of space, but our scientists haven't been able to find that specific area of space. 

 Your analogy of our work on "Operation XXXXX XXXXX" and that of transporting an SR-71 Blackbird back to the year 1200 AD was a good one: If we returned 300 years later to the year 1500 AD, little, if anything, could have been learned by our ancestors as to how the Blackbird worked. In much the same way, the amazing, almost majic-like ALIEN TECHNOLOGY on this craft has similarly stumped us; while some progress HAS been made on it since 1968, it's been MINIMAL (partially due to the poor, degraded condition of the ALIEN CRAFT). 

 Because this is an ongoing USG project, I ask that you place "X's" over the critical names and locations [sent in a subsequent e-mail] though you have the correct information. As a brief aside, you may share the blacked out information with Dr XXXXX X XXXXX whose work on past classified USG projects bestows a certain professional courtesy upon him in that he deserves to know the particulars. 

 Victor, I agree with you that the existence of ALIEN CIVILIZATIONS who had already achieved space traveling capabilities zipping around the Milky Way Galaxy (and perhaps others) truly BOGGLES THE MIND. As you wrote me, the Ebens were perhaps still in their "galactic diapers" when these ALIEN BEINGS were already visiting other worlds ~150-200 MYA and Homo Sapiens did not even exist! 

 One can only wonder and speculate where a civilization -- that had already achieved interstellar space travel -- would be at TODAY 
 technologically from 150-200 MYA! How many star systems have they visited by now? How many other alien civilizations have they made successful contact and interacted with, and perhaps carry on some sort of trade with? How many solar systems have they visited and mapped out in our Milky Way Galaxy and perhaps those of OTHER galaxies? 

 One also has to consider the POSSIBILITY that rather than this crash having occurred in OUR timeline of 150-200 MYA, these ALIEN BEINGS traveled to Earth from the FUTURE to our distant PAST -- when DINOSAURS ruled -- as part of a research mission ... THAT also BOGGLES the mind! 

 More to come.... 

– ANONYMOUS 
 ------------------------------------------ 
 SUPPLEMENTARY BACKGROUND INFORMATION ON "Operation XXXXX XXXXX": 

 MYA = Millions of Years Ago 

 YA = Years Ago 

 The ENORMOUS GEOLOGIC TIME SCALES: 

 + PRECAMBRIAN TIME = 4,600,000,000 - 542 MYA [Also known as the PRECAMBRIAN EPOCH] 

 ‡ HADEAN EON = 4,600,000,000 - 3,800,000,000 years ago 

 ‡ ARCHEAN EON = 3,800,000,000 - 2,500,000,000 

 ‡ PROTEROZOIC EON = 2,500,000,000 - 542 MYA 

 ‡ PHANEROZOIC EON = 542,000,000 years ago (542 MYA] to the
 present day, 2008 AD 
 † PALEOZOIC ERA = 542 - 251 MYA 

 † MESOZOIC ERA = 251 - 65.5 MYA 

º TRIASSIC PERIOD = 251 - 199 MYA 

º JURASSIC PERIOD = 199 -145 MYA 

º CRETACEOUS PERIOD = 145 - 65.5 MYA 

 And within those PERIODS, geologists have STAGES: 

 * Hettangian stage = 208 MYA - 203.5 MYA 

 * Sinemurian stage = 203.5 MYA - 194.5 MYA 

 * Pliensbachian stage = 194.5 MYA - 187 MYA 

 * Toarcian stage = 187 MYA - 178 MYA 

 * Aalenian stage = 178 MYA - 173.5 MYA 

 * Bajocian stage = 173.5 MYA - 166.1 MYA 

 * Bathonian stage = 166.1 MYA - 161.3 MYA 

 * Callovian stage = 161.3 MYA - 157.1 MYA 

 * Oxfordian stage = 157.1 MYA - 154.7 MYA 

 * Kimmeridgian stage = 154.7 MYA - 152.1 MYA 

 * Tithonian stage = 152.1 MYA - 145.6 MYA 

 * Berriasian stage = 145.6 MYA - 140.7 MYA 

 * Valanginian stage = 140.7 MYA - 135 MYA 

 * Hauterivian stage = 135 MYA - 131.8 MYA 

 * Barremian stage = 131.8 MYA - 124.5 MYA 

 * Aptian stage = 124.5 MYA - 112 MYA 

 * Albian stage = 112 MYA - 97 MYA 

 * Cenomanian stage = 97 MYA - 90.4 MYA 

 * Turonian stage = 90.4 MYA - 88.5 MYA 

 * Coniacian stage = 88.5 MYA - 86.6 MYA 

 * Santonia stage = 86.6 MYA - 83 MYA 

 * Campanian stage = 83 MYA - 74 MYA 

 * Maastrichtian stage = 74 MYA - 65.5 MYA 

 † CENOZOIC ERA = 65.5 MYA - present day, 2008 AD 

 ° TERTIARY PERIOD = 65.5 - 1.8 MYA 

º NEOGENE PERIOD = 23 MYA - to the present day, 2008 AD [some list] 

 ° QUATERNARY PERIOD = 1.8 MYA - present day, 2008 

 * HOLOCENE EPOCH = 11,800 years ago - to the present day, 2008 AD 

 To better understand the IMMENSE BLOCKS OF GEOLOGIC TIME we're discussing here, these measures of time are called: eras, periods, stages, epochs, ages and time. Planet Earth's origin is generally put at 4.6 BILLION YEARS ago which is the age of the oldest meteorites found. To better appreciate the vastness of geologic time, let's think of those 4.6 billion years as represented by A SINGLE YEAR. 

– The oldest fossil records go back only about 40 days out of
 that 365-day year; 
– Humans' presence on the planet is only about two (2) hours; 

– Homo sapiens sapiens (modern humans) presence on the planet is only about five (5) MINUTES! 

 Using the 1-year model, it makes the notion of evolution possible, probable and comprehensible. 

 One of the major divisions in the history of life occurs at the beginning of the CAMBRIAN PERIOD [542 - 488 MYA which falls under the PALEOZOIC ERA] when most of the main groups of animals appeared for the first time in the vast geologic record. The seas experience an explosion of invertebrate animal life, including thousands of species of trilobites; there is NO life on land yet. 

 All of this occurs after massive collisions between Earth's plates create a supercontinent in the southern hemisphere known as 
 GONDWANALAND. In the northern hemisphere was LAURASIA, both of which were west of the TETHYS SEA. Both of these land masses came from a single supercontinent called PANGEA that scientists believe broke apart ~170 MYA to form the current continents that we have today. [ REFERENCE:  http://serpo.org/release30j.php ] 

 IMPORTANT NOTE: More than 88 percent of Earth's history is PRECAMBRIAN! Of the remaining time -- when Earth has been home to animal life as we know it -- the part that includes HUMANS and their ancestors is less than ONE (1) PERCENT! 

 NOTE: There are several VARIANTS of the geological time scale used in different fields such as basic paleontology, mainstream geology, geological surveying and prospecting for fossil fuels. 

 The major divisions of geological time are termed EONS (beginning of time) and then ERAS. In turn, each of these great eras is divided into spans called PERIODS. These are then broken down into STAGES within those eras. 

 For the next-to-the-last -- the PALEOGENE PERIOD -- and the current NEOGENE PERIOD, time spans are subdivided into shorter time spans known as EPOCHS. 

 The ALIEN SPACECRAFT that crashed on Earth was roughly during the JURASSIC PERIOD of 199 - 145 MYA; this is what was present on Earth during that period: 

• North American continent drifts westward opening the Gulf of Mexico; a rift forms between South America and Africa. A warm, moist climate contributes to the flourishing of coral reefs and to temperate and subtropical forests. 

• It marks the appearance of the first angiosperms (flowering plants), pterosaurs (winged reptiles), the earliest known bird (Archaeopteryx), and huge dinosaurs such as the carnivorous Allosaurus and herbivorous Apatosaurus. 

 The PRIMARY LIFE FORMS DURING THE JURASSIC PERIOD: 

 Placodonts, primitive archosaurs, chordates, brachiopods, echinoderms, hemichordates, sponges, jellyfish, corals, flatworms, mollusks, annelids, arthropods, Ichthyosaurs, Rhamphorhynchoids, Stegosaurs, Pleisiosaurs, Pterodactyloids, Ankylosaurs, Ornithopods, horned dinosaurs, Sauropods and Teropods. 

 DINOSAURS: They existed on Earth from 225 - 65 MYA during the three (3) periods of the MESOZOIC ERA: The TRIASSIC, the JURASSIC and the CRETACEOUS PERIODS. Dinosaurs evolved from land-dwelling reptiles called THECODONTS. Scientists have named approximately 700 -1,000 species of dinosaurs. 
 [  http://serpo.org/release30f.php /  http://serpo.org/release30g.php ] 

– SIZE DOES MATTER! – 

LARGEST MEAT-EATING DINOSAUR: Spinosaurus which lived about 145 MYA; 

 SMALLEST DINOSAUR: Compsogathus longipes that was a chicken-sized dinosaur measuring only 3 feet and weighing in at just 8 lbs, liked lizard lunches, and lived about 145 MYA; 

 HEAVIEST DINOSAUR: Brachiosaurus weighed as much as 70 - 90 TONS, was as tall as a 4-story building, and lived about 150 MYA; 

 FASTEST DINOSAUR: Struthiomimus, stood 7 feet tall, was 10-13 feet long and could run at speeds of up to 31 mph; 

 LONGEST DINOSAUR: Seismosaurus, the "earthquake lizard" and largest of the sauropods, was a long-necked plant eater, reached lengths of ~98-130 feet (30-39 meters) and lived about 150 MYA. 

 DINOSAUR WITH THE MOST TEETH: Anatotitan, a duck-billed dinosaur, had about 1,000 tiny, leaf-shaped teeth arranged in rows of 200-250 on each side of its upper and lower jaws, all at the back of its mouth. 

 DINOSAURS ARE CLASSIFIED IN 2 GROUPS: 

– ORNITHISCHIA or bird-hipped dinosaurs, had pelvic bones arranged like those of a bird hip, within the pubic bone that was bent backward. They were plant eaters with hoof-like claws. 

– SAURISCHIA or lizard-hipped dinosaurs is the second group. Their pelvic bones were arranged like those of a lizard hip, with the pubic bone pointing forward. There were two (2) main subgroups: 

 ° The THEROPODA were fast, agile hunters; they included Tyrannosaurus rex, Velociraptor, Allosaurus and the ancestors of modern birds. 

 ° The SAUROPODOMORPHA were plant eaters with massive bodies, long tails with front legs smaller than their backlegs. Brachiosaurus was a well-known example. 

 DINOSAURIA: The ruling reptiles are characterized by: 

 * The number of bones in the skull; 

 * A ball-like head of the thigh bone; 

 * Three (3) or more vertebrae fixed to the hip bones; 

 * Three (3) or fewer finger bones in the fourth finger; 

 * A hole rather than a socket in the hip for the leg bone; 

 * A strong joint between the foot bones and the bones of the hind leg; 

 * The presence of a flange on the upper arm bone that held powerful muscles. 

 DINOSAURS became extinct around 65 MYA during a mass extinction known as the CRETACEOUS-TERTIARY Mass Extinction Event or K/T BOUNDARY EVENT. It is widely believed that the event resulted from the collision of an asteroid with Earth, at a point on the northwest coastline of the Yucatan Peninsula in Mexico called the Chicxulub crater (named for a 
 local village). [  http://serpo.org/release30b.php ] 

 This crater -- measuring 106-112 miles (170 kilometers) across -- formed and shot billions of tons of matter into the atmosphere which blotted out the Sun and caused global temperatures to plummet thereby effectively ending the lengthy reign of the dinosaurs. 
 [  http://serpo.org/release30c.php /  http://serpo.org/release30h.php ] 

 The evidence is based mainly on the fact that rocks laid down during this period over a large area contain more than the expected amount of IRIDIUM -- an element comparatively rare on Earth, but characteristic of METEORITES and ASTEROIDS. 

 VICTIMS and SURVIVORS OF THE K/T BOUNDARY EVENT: 

 VICTIMS:  [ REFERENCE:  http://serpo.org/release30i.php ] 

 ^ Dinosaurs 
 ^ Pterosaurs 
 ^ Plesiosaurs 

 SURVIVORS of the K/T BOUNDARY: 

 - Fish 
 - Birds 
 - Insects 
 - Mammals 
 - Crocodiles 
 - Ammonites 
 - Amphibians 
 - Lizards and snakes 
 - Turtles and tortoises 

 STRANGE BUT TRUE: 

 People have produced some weird, fantastic and wonderful theories to explain WHY the dinosaurs disappeared. Some suggest they died from too many erupting volcanoes poisoning the atmosphere, died of boredom, "drowned" in their own droppings, committed suicide, or were even hunted by SPACE ALIENS! [  http://serpo.org/release30d.php ] 

 PALEONTOLOGY 

 PALEONTOLOGY is the science of prehistoric life, generally defined as organisms that lived more than 10,000 years ago, prior to the end of the most recent ice age. The science is based on the nature and distribution of fossils, the remains or traces of organisms. In addition to satisfying our curiosity about organisms that lived long ago, paleontology provides evidence to support the concepts of evolution and continental drift. It also helps to support the theory that impacts of asteroids and comets have been instrumental in wiping out significant portions of Earth's life at intervals in our planet's history -- the so-called mass extinctions. 

 PALEOLITHIC PERIOD: The cultural period of the Stone Age that began about 2.5 - 2 MYA is marked by the earliest use of tools made of chipped stone. The PALEOLITHIC PERIOD ended ~10,000 YA; it is also called "The OLD STONE AGE." 

 The LOWER PALEOLITHIC DIVISION is by far the longest division of this period, lasting until ~200,000 YA and is characterized by hammerstones and simple core tools such as hand axes and cleavers. 

 The MIDDLE PALEOLITHIC DIVISION is generally dated to ~40,000 YA and is associated with archaic HOME SAPIENS, primarily the Neanderthals and their Mousterian tool culture. 

 The UPPER PALEOLITHIC DIVISION dates to ~10,000 YA in Europe and the Middle East and is associated with HOMO SAPIENS. Various distinctive local tool cultures flourished during this relatively brief period, producing a great variety of skillfully flaked tools as well as tools made of bone, antler wood and other material. 

 PALEOCLIMATOLOGY is the scientific study of climate conditions, along with their causes and effects, in the geologic past. These conditions are reconstructed on the basis of evidence found in the geologic record, especially in the form of glacial deposits, FOSSILS, SEDIMENTS, and rock and ice cores. Because much of the geologic record studied in paleoclimatology predates HUMANS, this research is very valuable for weighing the relative influence of human and natural causes on GLOBAL 
 CLIMATE CHANGE. 

 PALEOECOLOGY is the branch of ECOLOGY that deals with the interaction between organisms and their environment. 

 PALEOMAGNETISM is the fixed orientation of a rock's magnetic minerals as originally aligned at the time of the rock's formation. 

 FOSSILS: The remains or imprint of an organism from a previous geologic time. More than 1 million species of FOSSIL organisms have been identified. These range from microscopic bacteria to giant dinosaurs and tree ferns. Evidence of truly ancient fossils -- much of it controversial -- suggests that Earth may have had simple bacteria-like life as long as 3.5 billion years ago. 

 FOSSIL TYPES: THE 4 BASIC TYPES 

 BODY FOSSILS are either actual remains of organisms or remains in which original chemicals have been replaced by other chemicals, typically silicon dioxide and other minerals from water seeping through the buried remains. 

 INDEX FOSSILS are the fossil remains of an organism that lived in a particular geologic age and is used to identify or date the rock or ROCK LAYER in which it is found. 

 MICROFOSSIL is a microscopic fossil as that of a pollen grain or unicellular organism. MICROPALEONTOLOGY is the branch of paleontology that deals with MICROFOSSILS. 

 TRACE FOSSILS are marks made by the activities of ancient organisms, such as footprints, burrows, leaf imprints, chemical traces and tooth marks on bones. They reveal much about anatomy as well as the habits and habitats of their creators. 

 DATING FOSSILS EMPLOYS 2 METHODS 

 RELATIVE DATING METHOD: Relative dating methods compare the ages of various fossils, indicating their relative ages, but NOT their actual ages. For example, STRATIGRAPHY is based on the fact that in an undisturbed sequence of rock layers, fossils in lower layers are older than those in upper layers. 

 ABSOLUTE DATING METHOD: Absolute dating methods provide SPECIFIC AGES for fossils. These methods are based on the fact that radioactive isotopes decay at a specific rate, called a half-life. Another technique, electron spin resonance dating, uses the changes that background radiation indirectly makes, at a predictable rate, in the magnetic field of crystalline minerals. It is used to date calcium carbonate in shells, teeth and coral. 

 THE TIMELINE OF ANCIENT MAN 

 HOMO HABILIS appeared 2.3 - 2.5 MYA in the Olduvai Gorge, East Africa. The earliest HOMO SAPIENS appeared POSSIBLY 260,000 years ago in Africa and then definitely 160,000 - 150,000 years ago. HOMO SAPIENS co-exist with HOMO ERECTUS in Asia and NEANDERTHALS in Europe and the Middle East. 

 HOMO HABILIS provided evidence of the deliberate USE OF FIRE 1.8 MYA - 500,000 YA. 

 HOMO NEANDERTHALENSIS [Neanderthal Man] appeared 350,000 - 250,000 YA, and emerged in ice-age Europe and western Asia for the next 220,000 years before dying off 24,000 YA. 

 HOMO SAPIENS population spread is halted possibly due to the catastrophic eruption of Toba, Sumatra ~71,000 years ago; global 
 temperatures are lowered for a millennium. The immense volcanic eruption left a 1,000 sq mile Toba caldera behind. A giant depression formed after the collapse of the volcano's cone. Today, it holds a large body of water with an island in the caldera which is a resurgent dome where magma is active in a chamber directly below the surface. 
 [  http://serpo.org/release30k.php ] 

 "NUCLEAR ADAM" was the most recent known common ancestor of today's man having come into existence sometime between 90,000 - 60,000 years ago. 

 PANGEA: A large supercontinent that extended from pole to pole on ONE SIDE of the earth during the late PALEOZOIC and early MESOZOIC ERAS; it eventually split forming LAURASIA and GONDWANALAND. 
 [ REFERENCE:  http://serpo.org/release30j.php ] 

 SEDIMENTARY ROCK: Rock formed by the buildup of material at the bottoms of bodies of water. 

 METAMORPHIC: The name given to SEDIMENTARY ROCKS or minerals that have recrystallized under the influence of tremendous heat and great pressure since their original deposition. 
 ------------------------------------------ 
 http://science.nationalgeographic.com/science/prehistoric-world/prehistoric-time-line.html?nav=A-Z 

 See a PREHISTORIC TIME LINE [above]: 

 MASS EXTINCTIONS IN EARTH's DISTANT PAST ARE DUE TO SEA LEVEL CHANGES, STUDY SAYS, BUT WHAT CAUSED THOSE CHANGES IN SEA LEVEL? / SOME SCIENTISTS CLAIM THAT THE 6th MASS EXTINCTION LEVEL EVENT IS ALREADY UNDERWAY DUE TO GLOBAL WARMING! – 
By John Roach, National Geographic News, Tuesday, June 17, 2008 

 http://news.nationalgeographic.com/news/2008/06/080617-sea-change-extinctions.html 

 The rise and fall of the seas may have a more lethal toll on Earth's life than ASTEROIDS and supervolcanoes, according to a new study. Over the past 540 million years, every increase in the rate of extinctions -- including the five so-called mass extinctions -- has been linked to environmental changes wrought by changing sea levels, the study says. 

 The research may be especially relevant today, as what some scientists are calling THE SIXTH MASS EXTINCTION MAY ALREADY BE UNDERWAY, perhaps due to global warming. Since the beginning of life on Earth 3.5 billion years ago, 
 scientists estimate there have been as many as 23 MAJOR EXTINCTION EVENTS. During the past 540 million years, there have been 5 MAJOR MASS EXTINCTIONS, primarily of marine plants and animals. Each time, between 75 and 95 percent of ALL SPECIES VANISHED. 

 The idea that sea level changes are associated with these mass-extinction events has been around for almost 60 years, Peters noted, but until now scientists have been unable to quantify the environmental consequences of SEA LEVEL CHANGE. The seas rise and fall as the climate shifts and as the Earth's tectonic plates move. 

 As a result, the marine animals in them sometimes disappear when their shallow-water environments vanish or are dramatically altered. He found that all five mass extinction events, and many of the smaller events in the fossil record, are associated with changes in sea level and sedimentation. 

 SHRINKING HABITAT 

 Wolfgang Kiessling, a paleontologist at Humboldt University in Berlin, Germany, is an expert on mass-extinction events. While he doubts that changing sea levels alone drive mass die-offs, he said the study is important because it shows that habitat size is relevant to species diversity. 

 "The bigger habitat you have, the more species you can sustain -- and when habitat shrinks, you get increased risk of extinction," said Kiessling, who was not involved in the study. However, he added, changes in sea level alone are insufficient to explain the magnitude of mass-extinction events such as the one 65 million years ago, which wiped out the DINOSAURS. "There's got to be more," he said, "something like supervolcanoes [and/or] ASTEROID IMPACTS." 
 ------------------------------------------ 
 http://science.nationalgeographic.com/science/prehistoric-world/mass-extinction.html 

 WHAT CAUSES LARGE-SCALE ANIMAL DIE-OFFS? / ABOUT 90% OF ALL LIFE FORMS THAT HAVE EVER LIVED ON EARTH ARE NOW EXTINCT! / THE SPECIFIC CAUSES FOR SUCH EXTINCTION LEVEL EVENTS ARE MYSTERIES, BUT LARGE IMPACTING ASTEROIDS ARE PRIME SUSPECTS! – 
National Geographic, Friday, June 20, 2008 

 More than 90 percent of all organisms that have ever lived on Earth are extinct. As new species evolve to fit ever changing ecological niches, older species fade away. But the rate of extinction is far from constant. At least a handful of times in the last 500 million years, 50 to more than 90 percent of all species on Earth have disappeared in a geological blink of the eye. 

 DINOSAURS appeared after one of the biggest mass extinction events on Earth, the Permian-Triassic extinction about 250 million years ago. The most studied mass extinction, between the Cretaceous and Paleogene periods about 65.5 million years ago, killed off the DINOSAURS and made room for mammals to rapidly diversify and evolve. 

 The CAUSES of these mass extinction events are UNSOLVED MYSTERIES, though volcanic eruptions and the impacts of LARGE ASTEROIDS or comets are PRIME SUSPECTS in many of the cases. Both would eject tons of debris into the atmosphere, darkening the skies for at least months on end. Starved of sunlight, plants and plant-eating creatures would quickly die. Space rocks and volcanoes could also unleash toxic and heat-trapping gases that -- once the dust settled -- enable runaway global warming. 

 An EXTRATERRESTRIAL IMPACT is most closely linked to the CRETACEOUS EXTINCTION EVENT. A huge crater off Mexico's Yucatán Peninsula is dated to about 65.5 million years ago, coinciding with the extinction. Global warming fueled by volcanic eruptions at the Deccan Flats in India may also have aggravated the event. Whatever the cause, DINOSAURS, as well as about half of all species on the planet, went extinct. 

 Massive floods of lava erupting from the central Atlantic magmatic province about 200 million years ago may explain the Triassic-Jurassic extinction. About 20 percent of all marine families went extinct, as well as most mammal-like creatures, many large amphibians, and all non-dinosaur archosaurs. 

 LARGEST EVER DIE-OFF 

 The Permian-Triassic extinction event about 250 million years ago was the deadliest:  More than 90 percent of all species perished. Many scientists believe an ASTEROID or COMET triggered the massive die-off, but, again,  NO crater has been found. Another strong contender is flood volcanism from the Siberian Traps, a large igneous province in Russia. Impact-triggered volcanism is yet another possibility. 

 Starting about 360 million years ago, a drawn-out event eliminated about 70 percent of all marine species from Earth over a span of perhaps 20 million years. Pulses, each lasting 100,000 to 300,000 years, are noted within the larger date Devonian extinction. Insects, plants, and the first proto-amphibians were on land by then, though the extinctions dealt landlubbers a severe setback. 

 The Ordovician-Silurian extinction, about 440 million years ago, involved massive glaciations that locked up much of the world's water as ice and caused sea levels to drop precipitously. The event took its hardest toll on marine organisms such as shelled brachiopods, eel-like conodonts, and the trilobites. 

 IS IT HAPPENING NOW? 

 Today, many scientists think the evidence indicates A SIXTH MASS EXTINCTION IS UNDERWAY. The blame for this one, perhaps the fastest in Earth's history, falls firmly on the shoulders of humans. By the year 2100, human activities such as pollution, land clearing, and OVERfishing may have driven more than half of the world's MARINE and LAND SPECIES TO EXTINCTION. 
 ------------------------------------------ 
 http://www.guardian.co.uk/environment/2007/oct/24/climatechange.scienceofclimatechange 

 GLOBAL WARMING COULD WIPE OUT HALF OF ALL SPECIES WHERE THEY MEET A FATE SIMILAR TO THAT OF THE DINOSAURS ... EXTINCTION! / "ICEHOUSE" CONDITIONS PROMOTE BIODIVERSITY WITH ALL LIFE FORMS WHILE "GREENHOUSE" CONDITIONS GIVE RISE TO INCREASED EXTINCTION RATES! – 
By Alok Jha, The Guardian, Wednesday, October 24, 2007 

 Rising global temperatures caused by climate change could trigger a huge extinction of plants and animals, according to a study. Though humans would probably survive such an event, half of the world's species could be wiped out. 

 Scientists at the University of York and the University of Leeds examined the relationship between climate and biodiversity over the past 520m years -- almost the entire fossil record -- and uncovered an association between the two for the first time. When the Earth's temperatures are in a "greenhouse" climate phase, they found that extinctions rates were relatively high. Conversely, during cooler "icehouse" conditions, biodiversity increased. 

 Peter Mayhew, a population ecologist at the University of York and one of the authors of the research paper, said: "Our results provide the first clear evidence that global climate may explain substantial variation in the fossil record in a simple and consistent manner. If our results hold for current warming -- the magnitude of which is comparable with the long-term fluctuations in Earth climate -- they suggest that EXTINCTIONS WILL INCREASE." 

 According to the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change, global temperatures could increase by as much as 6C° by the end of the century. Dr Mayhew found that of the five mass extinction events in the Earth's history, four were linked to greenhouse climates where the Earth was covered in heat-trapping carbon dioxide or methane gases. 

 This includes the EXTINCTION extinction of the DINOSAURS 65 MYA years ago, thought to have been caused by the impact of a large asteroid on the Yucatan peninsula and beneath the Gulf of Mexico. The largest ever extinction occurred 251 MYA years ago, when 95% of animal and plant species were killed off. The most likely cause was floods of lava erupting from the central Atlantic region -- an event that triggered the opening of the Atlantic ocean. 

 Dr Mayhew said extinction through global warming was expected to occur through mismatches between the climates to which organisms are adapted, and the future distributions of those climates. 
 ------------------------------------------ 
 MANKIND's SECRETS KEPT IN LUNAR ARK IN CASE EARTH IS DEVASTATED BY AN ERRANT ASTEROID, COMET or GLOBAL THERMONUCLEAR WAR! – By Maurice Chittenden, The Sunday Times, Sunday, March 9, 2008 

 http://www.timesonline.co.uk/tol/news/uk/science/article3511818.ece 

 If civilisation is wiped out on Earth, salvation may come from space. Plans are being drawn up for a "Doomsday Ark" on the moon containing the essentials of life and civilisation, to be activated in the event of earth being devastated by a giant ASTEROID or nuclear war. Construction of a lunar information bank, discussed at a conference in Strasbourg last month, would provide survivors on Earth with a remote-access toolkit to rebuild the human race. 

 A basic version of the ark would contain hard discs holding information such as DNA sequences and instructions for metal smelting or planting crops. It would be buried in a vault just under the lunar surface and transmitters would send the data to heavily protected receivers on earth. If no receivers survived, the ark would continue transmitting the information until new ones could be built. The vault could later be extended to include natural material including microbes, animal embryos and plant seeds and even cultural relics such as surplus items from museum stores. 

 As a first step to discovering whether living organisms could survive, European Space Agency scientists are hoping to experiment with growing tulips on the moon within the next decade. According to Bernard Foing, chief scientist at the agency's research department, the first flowers -- tulips or arabidopsis, a plant widely used in research -- could be grown in 2012 or 2015. Tulips are ideal because they can be frozen, transported long distances and grown with little nourishment. Combined with algae, an enclosed artificial atmosphere and chemically enhanced lunar soil, they could form the basis of an ecosystem. 

 The first experiments would be carried out in transparent biospheres containing a mix of gases to mimic the earth's atmosphere. Carbon dioxide given off by the decomposing plants would be mopped up by the algae, which would generate oxygen through photosynthesis. The databank would initially be run by robots and linked to earth by radio transmissions. Scientists hope to put a manned station on the moon before the end of the century. 

 The databank would need to be buried under rock to protect it from the extreme temperatures, radiation and vacuum on the moon. It would be run partly on solar power. The scientists envisage placing the first experimental databank on the moon no later than 2020 and it could have a lifespan of 30 years. The full archive would be launched by 2035. The information would be held in Arabic, Chinese, English, French, Russian and Spanish and would be linked by transmitter to 4,000 "Earth repositories" that would provide shelter, food, a water supply for survivors. 
 ------------------------------------------ 
 http://www.breitbart.com/article.php?id=D908GE800&show_article=1%20 

 REFERENCE:  http://serpo.org/release30k.php 

 BOMBSHELL STUDY: HUMAN BEINGS ALMOST BECAME EXTINCT 71,000 YEARS AGO! / NEW STUDY SAYS NEAR EXTINCTION THREATENED ALL HUMANITY FROM THE TOBA VOLCANO ERUPTION and THE ENSUING RAPID, DRAMATIC and CLIMATE CHANGES! 
– 
By Randolph E Schmidap, Science Writer, Breitbart.com, Thursday, April 24, 06:15 PM US/Eastern 

 WASHINGTON (AP) – Human beings may have had a brush with extinction 71,000 years ago, an extensive genetic study suggests. The human population at that time was reduced to small isolated groups in Africa, apparently because of drought, according to an analysis released Thursday. About 3,000 generations ago -- a mere blink in the evolutionary timescale -- the human population of Earth dwindled to the point where EVERYONE on the planet could have fitted inside a small football stadium. 

 Mounting DNA evidence indicates that the human population was reduced to perhaps fewer than 10,000 or perhaps 2,000. One study even suggests that the number of women dropped to just 500 individuals! For centuries, each new generation of Homo sapiens sapiens could easily have been the LAST. 

 The Genographic Project study and report was published in the American Journal of Human Genetics. Previous studies using mitochondrial DNA — which is passed down through mothers — have traced modern humans to a single "mitochondrial Eve," who lived in Africa about 200,000 years ago. The migrations of humans out of Africa to populate the rest of the world appear to have begun about 60,000 years ago, but little has been known about humans between Eve and that dispersal. 

 The new study looks at the mitochondrial DNA of the Khoi and San people in South Africa which appear to have diverged from other people between 90,000 and 150,000 years ago. Humans separated into small populations prior to the Stone Age, when they came back together and began to increase in numbers and spread to other areas. 

 Spencer Wells, National Geographic Society explorer in residence, said in a statement: "Tiny bands of early humans, forced apart by harsh environmental conditions, coming back from the brink to reunite and populate the world. Truly an EPIC DRAMA, written in our DNA." 

 WEATHERING THE STORM 

 Homo sapiens survive because there were three (3) tropical areas of high rainfall in the world, where the land was able to support larger numbers of people. ALL were in Africa, where there  archaeological evidence for human expansion after the climate crisis. 

 Paleontologist Meave Leakey, a Genographic adviser, commented: "Who would have thought that as recently as 71,000 years ago, extremes of climate had reduced our population to such small numbers that we were on THE VERY EDGE OF EXTINCTION." Today, we OWE our very existence to those few populations that -- through luck or ingenuity -- managed to survive the GEOLOGICAL DISASTER that killed the rest of our species. 

 GLOBAL CATASTROPHE 

 In fact, the reason for the collapse of our species was right under our feet. Deposits of ash and debris have provided evidence for one of the most SEVERE NATURAL DISASTERS in the history of life on Earth. It has been dated by paleoclimatologists and geoscientists to EXACTLY 71,000 years ago. 

 The CAUSE of this disaster was the ERUPTION of the TOBA VOLCANO on the Indonesian island of Sumatra. The largest volcanic explosion of the previous 2 million years, and one of the biggest of the past 450 million years, its effects were felt right across the earth. The crater it left behind measured 60 miles across. 

 The GENOGRAPHIC PROJECT: 

 http://www.nationalgeographic.com/genographic 
 ------------------------------------------ 
 EARTH 2100: IS THIS CENTURY OUR LAST ONE? / SCIENTISTS FROM AROUND THE GLOBE JOIN ABC NEWS IN A FORUM ON SURVIVING THE 21st CENTURY! – 
By Sarah Namias, ABC News, Thursday, June 12, 2008 

 Are we living in the LAST century of our civilization? Is it possible that all of our technology, knowledge and wealth cannot save us from ourselves? Could our society actually be heading towards collapse? According to many of the world's top scientists, the answer is YES, unless we take action NOW. This September, in "EARTH 2100," a dramatic ABC News 2-hour broadcast 

http://earth2100.tv/ 

 the greatest minds across the globe will join together in a countdown to the year 2100 to tell us what we must do to survive the next century and what may happen IF we don't. 

 CLIMATE CHANGE RESOURCE PAGE: 

 http://www.nhne.org/tabid/490/Default.aspx 

 EXTINCTION LEVEL EVENTS: 

 http://www.nhne.org/news/NewsArticlesArchive/tabid/400/articleType/
 CategoryView/categoryId/92/Crisis-Extinctions.aspx 
 ------------------------------------------ 
 BIBLIOGRAPHY: 

 SMITHSONIAN EARTH – Editor-in-Chief James F Luhr, Thursday, September 2, 2004 ©, ISBN# 078949643, $50.00, 520 pp. 

 HISTORY: FROM THE DAWN OF CIVILIZATION TO THE PRESENT DAY - The DEFINITIVE VISUAL GUIDE – Editorial Consultant Adam Hart-Davis, Monday, October 15, 2007 ©, $50.00, 612 pp. 

 SMITHSONIAN HUMAN: The DEFINITIVE VISUAL GUIDE – Editorial Consultants Robert Winston and Dr Don E Wilson, Wednesday, January 28, 2004 ©, ISBN# 0756605202, $50.00, 512 pp. 

 The Times COMPLETE HISTORY OF THE WORLD: The ULTIMATE WORK OF HISTORICAL REFERENCE – Editor Richard Overy, 7th Edition, Thursday, September 20, 2007 ©, ISBN# 1435101596, $19.98, 416 pp. 

 ATLAS OF WORLD HISTORY – Project Director Peter Furtado, Saturday, September 1, 2001 ©, ISBN# 0760727104, $24.98, 6.28 [extensions] 

 The TRUTH ABOUT HISTORY – Project Editor Liz Hitchcock, Saturday,January 6, 2007 ©, ISBN# 076078874X, $12.98, 320 pp. / "Endangered Species": pp. 163-65 

 The AMERICAN HERITAGE SCIENCE DICTIONARY – Executive Editor Joseph P Pickett, Tuesday, January 25, 2005 ©, ISBN# 0618455043, $19.95, 695 pp. 

 The COMPLETE BOOK OF DINOSAURS – By Dougal Dixon, June © 2006, ISBN# 0681375787, $5.99, 256 pp. 

 The COMPLETE GUIDE TO FOSSILS and FOSSIL-COLLECTING – By Steve Parker, June © 2007, ISBN# 0681375760, $5.99, 256 pp 

 DINOSAURS – Consulting Editor Dr Angela Milner, Friday, August 1, 2003 ©, ISBN# 0760746346, $6.95, 64 pp. 

 DINOSAUR ENCYCLOPEDIA: PREHISTORIC LIFE AS YOU HAVE NEVER SEEN IT BEFORE – By Igloo Books, June © 2006, ISBN# 1845614096, $5.99, 128 pp. 

 DINOSAURS THROUGH TIME – By Rupert Matthews, November © 2007, ISBN#8860980429, $5.99, 120 pp. / Troodon-Dinosaurid: p. 117 

 MY FIRST ENCYCLOPEDIA OF DINOSAURS: HUNDREDS OF FACTS, MORE THAN 250 ILLUSTRATIONS! – Consultant Editor Denise Ryan, June © 2008, ISBN# 1740896641, $4.99, 48 pp. 

 STAR TREK VOYAGER COMPANION – By Paul Ruditis, Thursday, May 1, 2003 ©, ISBN# 0743417518, $27.95, 482 pp. / "Distant Origin": pp. 176-80 

 The NEW YORK TIMES GUIDE TO ESSENTIAL KNOWLEDGE: A DESK REFERENCE FOR THE CURIOUS MIND – General Editor John W Wright, Completely Revised and Expanded 2nd Edition, October © 2007, ISBN# 0312376596, $35.00, 
 1,320 pp. 

 The 2008 WORLD ALMANAC and BOOK OF FACTS – Editorial Director C Alan Joyce, November © 2007, ISBN# 1600570720, $12.99, 1,008 pp. 
 ------------------------------------------ 
 ALL SUPPORTING DOCUMENTATION: Written, researched and compiled by Victor Martinez  

Release 30 a

Release 30a
 What The Universe Looked like DURING and BEFORE The Age of The DINOSAURS! 
 (1 July 2008) 


 http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/calendar/allyears.html   



Barred Spiral Galaxt NGC 1300
 1 of 4: The BARRED SPIRAL GALAXY NGC 1300 spans over 150,000 light-years  across the galaxy center. The picturesque galaxy lies about 75 MILLION light-years distant, so that light that we NOW see left DURING the age of the DINOSAURS. /  http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap001004.html  
Click to enlarge  


  

Spiral Galaxt M100
 2 of 4: The SPIRAL GALAXY M100 is a large spiral galaxy similar to our own MILKY WAY, containing over 100 billion stars. It is over 150 MILLION light-years away, so the light we see left when DINOSAURS roamed the Earth. /  http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap950626.html 
Click to enlarge  

 

Galactic Ring NGC 6782
 3 of 4: The GALACTIC RING of NGC 6782 blossoms into a spectacular and complex structure highlighted by a circumnuclear ring. Light we see TODAY from NGC 6782 left about 180 MILLION years ago, while DINOSAURS roamed the Earth. The galaxy spans about 80,000 light-years across. / 
 http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap011121.html 
Click to enlarge  

 

Elliptical Galaxy NGC 1132
 4 of 4: ELLIPTICAL GALAXY NGC 1132 appears as a large, isolated galaxy toward the Constellation of the River (Eridanus). 
 NGC 1132 is over 300 MILLION light-years away, so the light we see from it today left BEFORE DINOSAURS roamed the Earth. / 
 http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap080213.html 
Click to enlarge 
  

Release 30 b

Release 30b 
 DINOSAURS Wiped Out ~65 Million Years Ago During The K-T Event ... 
 Could it Happen AGAIN?!
 (1 July 2008) 

 http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap000226.html 

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Image:Yucatan_chix_crater.jpg  

 EXPLANATION: What killed the DINOSAURS? Their sudden disappearance 65 million years ago, along with about 70 percent of all species then living on Earth, is known as the K-T BOUNDARY EVENT (Cretaceous-Tertiary Mass Extinction event). Geologists and paleontologists often entertain the idea that a large asteroid or comet impacting the Earth was the culprit. In such a cosmic catastrophe, the impact would generate firestorms, tidal waves, earthquakes, and hurricane winds. Debris thrown into the 
 atmosphere would have a serious global environmental consequences, creating extended periods of darkness, low temperatures, and acid rains -- resulting in a planet-wide extinction event. In 1990, dramatic support for this theory came from cosmochemist Alan Hildebrand's revelation of a 65-million-year-old, 6-12 miles wide, 112-mile-wide ring structure still detectable under layers of sediment in the Yucatan Peninsula region of Mexico. The outlines of the structure, called the CHICXULUB Crater (named for a local village), are visible in the BELOW three (3) representation(s) of gravity and magnetic field data from the region. 

 2000 © Credit: Courtesy V.L. Sharpton, LPI  

Chicxulub Crater Fossil 

Click to enlarge
  

  Release 30 c

Release 30c 
 ASTEROID = The Global Extinction of the DINOSAURS ~65 MYA 
 Played to "FIRE in The SKY" by the Nitty Gritty Dirt Band!
 (1 July 2008) 


 http://www.universetoday.com/2008/05/19/no-doomsday-in-2012/ 

 http://gallery.in-tch.com/~earthhistory/cretaceous%20page%206.html 

 CRETACEOUS ASTEROID EXTINCTION SUMMARY: This color sketch represents a Late CRETACEOUS PERIOD asteroid -- perhaps as much as 6 MILES wide -- beginning to heat up as it first enters Earth's atmosphere at an altitude of some 300,000 to 
 400,000 feet.  Approaching the southern Caribbean from the southeast at a shallow, 30 degree angle to Earth's surface, the asteroid is only a few seconds from direct impact in this illustration.

 

Dinosaur Asteroid 1
 ILLUSTRATION #1: K/T BOUNDARY Extinction-Level Event KILLER ASTEROID as it first 
 enters Earth's atmosphere! 
Click to enlarge  

 

Dinosaur Asteroid 2
 ILLUSTRATION #2: "Hey, that's NO burning bush!" / Illustration Courtesy of © 
DOUGLAS HENDERSON 
Click to enlarge  

 

Dinosaur Asteroid 3
 ILLUSTRATION #3: Direct ASTEROID IMPACT in southern Mexico's Yucatan Peninsula region! This is called the CHICXULUB Crater, which was named for a local village. 
Click to enlarge  

– Click here for the MUSIC.WAV file attachment! –  

Release 30 d

Release 30d 
 The LACERTA FILE: Could a SAURIAN Race Have Evolved From The DINOSAURS?! 
 Played to: "Lost in My World" by the Outsiders!
 (1 July 2008) 

CRITICAL THINKING: The DINOSAURS were around for ~185.5 MILLION years and Mankind has been around for ~200-300,000 years and one can see what we've accomplished as a species in such a relatively SHORT period of time on Earth. Scientists have found that the intelligence of an animal is related to the ratio between the size of its brain and the size of its body. This ratio is called the ENCEPHALIZATION QUOTIENT. Based on THIS figure, the MOST INTELLIGENT dinosaur was the "TROODON", a 10-foot-long hunter from the END of the CRETACEOUS Period. 

 QUESTION: During those ~185.5 MILLION years that DINOSAURS ruled in the MESOZOIC ERA, could a SAURIAN RACE have naturally evolved into a SENTIENT BEING (like Homo sapiens sapiens) and then emigrated from Earth when they detected an INcoming ASTEROID? Could the frequent reports of REPTILIAN ALIENS be our ANCESTORS coming back to "THEIR" homeworld as a matter of monitoring us or just plain curiosity?! 

 THIS perspective was actually presented on the "STAR TREK VOYAGER" TV series in season #3, episode #165 entitled "Distant Origins!" 

 SHOW SYNOPSIS: The SAURIANS [Genus Hadrosaur] vanished when a mass extinction occurred at the END of the CRETACEOUS PERIOD. Some of the SAURIANS escaped Earth on "city-ships" when a land mass they lived on was destroyed by the K/T BOUNDARY EVENT ~65.5 MYA. HADROSAURS (duckbilled dinosaurs) were the most common and varied plant-eating 
 ornithopods, and the GREATEST SUCCESS STORY in the history of the DINOSAURS. 

 HOWEVER, many scientists believe that IF the dinosaurs had NOT become extinct, the "TROODON" dinosaur MIGHT have evolved to become as intelligent as MODERN HUMANS. They have named this "imaginary" creature a "DINOSAURID." 

 http://www.sabon.org/reptiloid/index3.html 

 

Dinosaur 14
 IMAGE: Could DINOSAURS Have Evolved into a SAURIAN Race of REPTILIAN HUMANS?! 
Click to enlarge  

– Click here for the MUSIC.WAV file attachment! –  

Release 30 e

Release 30e 
 Were Baby DINOSAURS Abducted by an ALIEN Race? 
 Played to "Lost in a Lost World" by The Moody Blues! 
 (1 July 2008) 

FEEDING TIME! A mother OVIRAPTOR has freshly killed prey for her hungry babies. Rather than naturally SMALL DINOSAURS, could it have been BABY DINOSAURS found onboard the ALIEN spacecraft?  

Dinosaur 15
Click to enlarge  

– Click here for the MUSIC.WAV file attachment! –  


 

Release 30 f

Release 30f 
 Could THESE be The Small DINOSAURS Abducted Onboard The ALIEN Craft?!
 (1 July 2008) 


Dinosaur 9
 IMAGE #1: LUNCHTIME! 4 small DINOSAURS ... were 2 out of this small group found onboard the ALIEN craft?! Some DINOSAURS were as small as chickens! 
Click to enlarge  

 

Dinosaur 4
 IMAGE #2: Identification Parade of DINOSAURS from the late TRIASSIC Period through the late CRETACEOUS Period! 
Click to enlarge  

 

Dinosaur 5
 IMAGE #3: Parade of DINOSAURS From ALL Periods! Were some of these found onboard the ALIEN craft as babies?! 
Click to enlarge  

 

Dinosaur 2
 IMAGE #4: JURASSIC Period SAUROPODS on a leisurely Sunday family outing at the lake! 
Click to enlarge 

  

Release 30 g

Release 30g 
 Everyday Life of the CRETACEOUS Period DINOSAURS!
 (1 July 2008) 


Dinosaur 7
 IMAGE #1: BATTLE ROYALE in Mongolia! Late CRETACEOUS Period VELOCIRAPTOR battles a PROTOCERATOPS squashing its DINOSAUR eggs in the process! A curious and inquisitive-looking PRENOCEPHALE looks on at the ferocious, fierce encounter!
Click to enlarge  

 

Dinosaur 6
 IMAGE #2: LOOKING SKYWARD! JURASSIC Period DIPLODOCUS sees an ALIEN CRAFT coming 
 in for a hard landing! "Uh, oh, I sense BIG trouble coming our way!" 
Click to enlarge  

 

Dinosaur 8
 IMAGE #3: CHOW TIME! DINOSAURS head for their lunch hour in the swamp "mess hall!" 
Click to enlarge  

 

Release 30 h

Release 30h 
 What Earth Looked Like With FIRES Raging Everywhere After the K/T BOUNDARY EVENT!
 (1 July 2008) 


 http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap001121.html 

 CRETACEOUS PERIOD-CENOZOIC ERA – Most of the Earth's land has been scorched by fire at some time in the past, and sometimes in the very DISTANT PAST like the K/T BOUNDARY EVENT of ~65 MYA which caused the extinction of the DINOSAURS and ushered in the CENOZOIC ERA. Although causing many a tragedy -- people and dinosaurs alike! -- fire is 
 considered part of a NATURAL ecosystem cycle. Large forest fires on Earth are usually caused by lightning and can be visible from orbit EXCEPT in the case of the K/T BOUNDARY EVENT. Below, this fire swept through MONTANA's Bitterfoot Valley and what the FIRES raging worldwide ~65 MYA may very well have looked like. 

 NOTE: Please see "Project SERPO" RELEASE #30i 

 2000 © Credit: John McColgan (AFS, BLM)  

Dinosaur Asteroid 5
Click to enlarge  

Release 30 j

Release 30i 
 The Fossilized Remains of the DINOSAURS After The 'Big One' HIT!
 (1 July 2008) 

 


 IMAGE #1: Global FIRES rage out of control -- this one in MONTANA -- after the ASTEROID DIRECT HIT in the Yucatan Peninsula on Earth 65.5 MYA! 
Click to enlarge  

 

Dinosaur 11
 IMAGE #2: Skeleton of an APATOSAURUS DINOSAUR 
Click to enlarge  

 

Dinosaur 12
 IMAGE #3: Skeleton of a HYPSILOPHODON DINOSAUR 
Click to enlarge  

 

Dinosaur 13
 IMAGE #4: Skeleton of a CAMARASAURUS DINOSAUR 
Click to enlarge 

  

NOTE: Please see "Project SERPO" RELEASE #30h  

 Release 30 j

Release 30j
 The Supercontinent PANGEA as it WAS and as it Might be AGAIN 250 MY From Now?! 
 (1 July 2008) 

 http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap070922.html 

 EXPLANATION: Is this what will become of the Earth's surface? The surface of the Earth is broken up into several large plates that are slowly shifting. About 250-170 million years ago [MYA], the plates on which the present-day continents rest were positioned quite differently, so that ALL of the landmasses were clustered together in one supercontinent now dubbed PANGEA. About 250 million years from now, the plates are again projected to reposition themselves so that a SINGLE landmass dominates. The below simulation from the PALEAOMAP Project shows this giant landmass: PANGEA ULTIMA. At that time, the Atlantic Ocean will be just a distant memory, and whatever beings inhabit Earth will be able to walk from North America to Africa! 

 2007 © Credit & Copyright: C. R. Scotese (U. Texas at Arlington), PALEOMAP  

Pangea
Click to enlarge  

 

Release 30 k

Release 30k 
 The EVE of DESTRUCTION: TOBA, Sumatra, Indonesia: 
 MANKIND's EXTINCTION Level Event ... ALMOST!
 (1 July 2008) 

 http://volcano.und.edu/vwdocs/volc_images/southeast_asia/indonesia/toba.html 

 EXTINCTION FLASHPOINT: Just as the DINOSAURS met their EXTINCTION LEVEL EVENT ~65.5 MYA, the GREATEST crisis to afflict the human race pushed Homo sapiens to the edge of EXTINCTION 71,000 YA as the TOBA ERUPTION 
 spewed 670 cubic miles of volcanic material into the atmosphere making it the MOST VIOLENT ERUPTION of the last 2 million years. However, as the climate gradually improved, the human population exploded, growing exponentially as it once again spread across the world.

 

Toba Eruption
 IMAGE #1: Landsat image of The TOBA CALDERA. Image courtesy of the 
 Landsat Pathfinder Project. 
Click to enlarge  

 

Toba Eruption
 IMAGE #2: Map of the TOBA CALDERA showing faults and updomed areas. / 
 1986 © M D Knight – MUST CREDIT – 
Click to enlarge  

 

Toba Eruption
 IMAGE #3: SCARS OF THE EARTH: Photograph of The TOBA CRATER Lake which is 18 X 60 miles with an average depth of 1,485 ft. / 1996 © 
Photographers A.M. & K.D.Hollitzer. – MUST CREDIT – 
Click to enlarge  

 

Toba Eruption
 IMAGE #4: Comparison of volumes produced by some of the greatest VOLCANIC ERUPTIONS. NOTE the amount of volcanic material spewed into the atmosphere between TOBA [2,800 cubic km] and that of Mount St Helens of May 1980 that produced 1 cubic km of ash. 
Click to enlarge  

 

Toba Eruption
 IMAGE #5: TOBA is located near the Sumatra Fracture Zone (SFZ). VOLCANISM is the result of the subduction of the Indian Ocean plate under the Eurasian plate. / 1986 © M D Knight – MUST CREDIT – 
Click to enlarge 

 WORLD ORGANIZATION of VOLCANO OBSERVATORIES WEB SITE: 

http://www.wovo.org/ 
  

– Click here for the MUSIC.WAV file attachment! –  

 

Release 31

Release 31
 DIA-6 Member OBITUARY
 (2 July 2008) 
  

Please also see:  http://serpo.org/release31a.php 

 UFO THREAD LIST: I regret to inform all of you that a member of the prestigious and highly regarded DIA-6 -- as viewed within USG intel circles -- left us in his sleep in the early morning hours of Monday, June 30, 2008. What follows is an abstract of this man's remarkable, rich, full, rewarding and very satisfying life. Please join me in sending positive vibes his way as he makes his way around in the afterlife! 

 PERSONAL LIFE – The EARLY YEARS 

• TRUE and LEGAL NAME: MASKED from public view 

• NICKNAME: "The CROW" 

• DOB: Monday, December 10, 1917, PA 

• DOD: Monday, June 30, 2008, SW, USA  Age: 90 

• B.S.: Electrical Engineering, Univ of Pittsburgh 

• M.S.: Electrical Engineering, MIT 

 MILITARY SERVICE-EMPLOYMENT 

 ° U.S. Army Air Corp, 1942; 

 ° Flew 214 combat missions in a B-17 over Germany during WWII; 

 ° Recalled to active duty in 1951, he moved to the USAF as a pilot where he flew 114 combat missions over the Korean conflict in a B-25; 

 ° "The CROW" went to work for the U.S. Army Intelligence Corps in 1952 as a USAF officer until 1961; 

 ° In 1961, he was transferred to the newly-formed DEFENSE INTELLIGENCE AGENCY; 

 ° "The CROW" moved into a civilian status in 1964, but held an Air Force Reserve rank and retired from the U.S. Air Force Reserves in 1968 as a Colonel; he retired from the DIA in 1977 in the GM Senior Executive Level Service employee as a GM-18. 

 RETIREMENT and "The CROW's" GOLDEN YEARS 

– After his retirement, he consulted for E-Systems Corporation and the Los Alamos National Laboratory in the area of "Black Projects." 

– During his government service, he worked on ALL aspects of "Project AQUARIUS," "Project GLEEM," "Project BLUEBOOK" and GALLANT Projects. 

– "The CROW" worked at both the Nevada Test Site/Area 51 and at the Los Alamos National Laboratory where he examined and conducted experiments on "special" aircraft and "foreign" aircraft designs. 

– He was VERY instrumental in analyzing "gifts" given to us by our "visitors" and explaining HOW these "gifts" worked. 

 "GOLDEN YEARS" PERSONAL LIFE 

 † "The CROW" was married to his soulmate, childhood sweetheart and the love of his life, Denise for 51 years who passed away on Thursday, January 17, 1991. 

 † He left behind three (3) sons, one (1) daughter, 15 grandchildren and eight (8) great grandchildren! 

 † "The CROW" will be laid to rest in the Southwest USA in the State of XXXXX. 

 "Do SOMEthing of service with your life for other people. Because then you'll know -- at the END of YOUR days -- that it mattered that YOU were HERE." – The late Bob Curry, father of Ann Curry, co-host of NBC's "The TODAY Show." 

 Given his remarkable life's achievements, one would have to say that "The CROW" certainly lived up to those lofty expectations, challenges and goals.... 
 ------------------------------------------ 
 † "The CROW's" obituary written, researched and presented by "Project SERPO" Moderator Victor Martinez  

Release 31 a

Release 31a
 DIA-6 Member OBITUARY
 (2 July 2008)

 http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap070916.html 

 http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap050803.html 

– Click here for the attached MUSIC.WAV file! – 

"The CROW" left us on Monday, June 30, 2008 for the implicate order of the enfolded universe in the fine material world. In a fitting tribute, here is a song I've selected which describes "The CROW" at heart -- "Forever Young" -- and for what awaits 
 him IF there is a heaven or as the Ebens call it, "The SUPREME PLATEAU" -- and as he FLOATS toward it -- it must look LIKE the breathtaking LAGOON NEBULA M8 where "The CROW" will feel right at home again! -  
Lagoon Nebula Man over Earth 
   

Release 32:   

Release 32: EBENS Land on AKAU Island For 2009 Meeting!

WORLD BOMBSHELL EXCLUSIVE: The EBEN ALIEN CIVILIZATION FROM ZETA RETICULI LANDS on AKAU ISLAND on THE REMOTE U.S. TERRITORY of JOHNSTON aTOLL FOR THEIR NOVEMBER 2009 DIPLOMATIC RENDEZVOUS!  

 http://www.serpo.org/release32a.php  

BONUS! ANONYMOUS "SITS DOWN" FOR A VERY RARE QUESTION and ANSWER SESSION TO ADDRESS SOME OF THE MOST PRESSING QUESTIONS THAT MANY IN THE UFO
 COMMUNITY WANT ANSWERS TO!

FLASHBACK TO "Project SERPO" Release #30:  

 http://www.serpo.org/release30.php  

VICTOR:  

Before I address the ongoing BILLY MEIER issue you've raised many times in recent months [Release #33], I wanted to comment on one of our most recent posts in our "Question and Answer" interview.  

QUESTION: Going back to "Project SERPO" Posting #30 -- "ALIEN CRAFT CRASH LANDS DURING EARTH's DINOSAUR ERA!" -- aside from the star system location that you subsequently provided me AFTER "Project SERPO" Release #30 was published, do you have ANY additional information/updates that you can now share with our large audience?  

ANONYMOUS ANSWERS: "Project SERPO" Posting #30 was very detailed as you presented it, but I have more information to pass on from recent contacts with scientists who are still working on this very special project.  

In fact, we DID find and retrieve "Star Charts" inside the craft ...well over a thousand of them. They were transcribed on thin black  paper" or something similar to paper. It is a form of an "X-ray of the Universe." It has taken many, many years and very close analysis -- using a combination of the Hubble Space Telescope and various ground-based telescopes -- to study these highly complex, off-world maps. They were similar to our "star maps" and it has taken many years of research to pin point the exact location of these alien maps to our own maps

In 1997, we found that one of the alien star charts/maps were of our galaxy, the Milky Way. It showed the outer reaches of our galaxy. We eventually found our Sun and our Solar System in one of these alien charts. It appears the Dinosaur-era alien craft had a large camera -- or at least that is what we called it -- that took photographs which come out similar to an X-Ray. We eventually figured out that the Dinosaur-era "Alien Craft" originated from a Star System approximately 22 light-years from Earth when it visited Earth ~150 MYA. Whether that alien civilization is still in existence, I have no information on.  

Now, this is the ONLY additional and ALL of the information I have on the recovered ALIEN CRAFT from the Dinosaur era which was masterfully presented by you in SERPO RELEASE #30. Our group was very pleased with your highly detailed release and supporting extensions.  

– FOR SUPPORTING INLINE PHOTO ATTACHMENTS for "Project SERPO" Release #32, go to: –  

The POSSIBLE HOME WORLD LOCATIONS OF THE  ALIEN SPECIES WHO CRASH LANDED ON EARTH DURING THE DINOSAUR ERA ~150 MYA! [Release #30]  

 http://www.serpo.org/release32b.php
 ------------------------------------------ 
 FLASHBACK TO "Project SERPO" Release #1, November 2005:  

 http://www.serpo.org/release1.php  

QUESTION: As a result of the U.S. government's official investigation, what was the SPECIFIC CAUSE determined to be of the crash landing of the two (2) Eben craft in July 1947 over The State of New Mexico?  

ANONYMOUS ANSWERS: An electrical storm brought down the two (2) Eben ships in July of 1947.

QUESTION: In the days immediately following the Roswell crash, Roswell folklore tells of a USN JAG coming to the base where the lone surviving Eben was being held in some kind of holding/jail cell and it was only by accident that the JAG employee saw him. Did this actually happen? WHERE and WHEN [date] did the Eben die? Is he buried HERE on EARTH -- and if so WHERE? -- or was he taken back to SERPO for burial?  

Furthermore, a caller to the popular "Coast 2 Coast AM Show" posed the question that he was surprised that the Ebens did not stage some kind of "rescue mission" just as we might have, and authors Carey and Schmitt commented that in the immediate aftermath, residents of Roswell reporting see "strange lights" for a while after the crash.  

WAS a "rescue mission" ever staged by the Ebens, yes or no? OR did they approach our government and simply ask for their fallen (dead) comrades back and allow the lone survivor to remain?  

ANONYMOUS ANSWERS: No, it didn't happen like that. The ONLY surviving Eben was taken to the Roswell base and placed in the custody of the lead intelligence officer. He was then moved to Los Alamos the next day by a military convoy. The Eben was isolated from almost everyone and eventually died at Los Alamos in 1952; President Truman saw him. NO Navy JAG was ever involved. That is another one of those totally wrong, misleading, falsely-planted stories. These people write these books and
 make up stories. Only a few know the ACTUAL TRUTH about the Roswell crash.  

There was NOT a rescue mission ever staged by the Ebens. The only two (2) Eben craft that were near Earth crashed that night in 1947. Ebe #1 did state that they sent a distress signal to their home planet SERPO, but it would take at least nine (9) months for the nearest rescue craft to reach them. Ebe #1 died in 1952; his body, along with his crew mates, were returned to the Ebens in 1964 during the meeting in NM. The Eben craft was stored in Ohio and then moved to the Nevada Test Site [NTS]. I
 believe it is still in NV.  

QUESTION: There have been rumors for years that there have been other Human-ET exchange program(s) besides "Project SERPO." Can you comment on this?  

ANONYMOUS ANSWERS: There were TWO (2) other Human-ET exchange missions, but I was never involved with them and I don't have the details since all such "black" programs are highly compartmented.  

Ask some of the other active and retired USG officials on your huge list ... they might know.  

QUESTION: Is there an ALIEN RACE of beings called the "Orange Group" visiting Earth from the star system of ANTARES?  

ANONYMOUS ANSWERS: I've never heard of the "Orange Group" ... I don't think that is a real alien group. We did have some information on an ALIEN SPECIES traveling to our Solar System from ANTARES, ~550 light-years away. I don't know much more than I remember from reading briefing manuals back in the '80s. I believe we knew about them from Ebe #2.  

 http://www.serpo.org/release32c.php

QUESTION: In a previous "Project SERPO" release  

 http://www.serpo.org/release28.php  

you stated that the EBENS were returning to the NTS [Nevada Test Site] in November 2009 ¹ for a visit to Earth. Did that visit occur and, if it did, what was the outcome?  

ANONYMOUS ANSWERS: Last month, on Thursday, November 12, 2009, a visit WAS made by the EBENS to a remote location on Earth, but it was NOT to the NTS, but instead to the little-known North Pacific Ocean desert island of JOHNSTON ATOLL/ISLAND ². The EBENS paid us a kindly visit for 12 hours between 0600 - 1800 on this U.S. territory [U.S. military
 time, local].  

 http://www.serpo.org/release32a.php  

The meeting specifically occurred on AKAU ISLAND, which is the North Island of the sprawling JOHNSTON ATOLL system. The EBENS landed on a flat portion of the northwest sector of this island. There were 18 (eighteen) officials from around the world who met the EBENS. They included the following [number of] representatives from our planet, Sol III:  

1 = The VATICAN  

2 = The UNITED NATIONS 

 9 = The UNITED STATES of AMERICA  

- Broken down into -  

1 = WHITE HOUSE REPRESENTATIVE From The OBAMA ADMINISTRATION  

2 = U.S. INTELLIGENCE OFFICERS  

1 = LINGUIST 

 5 = U.S. MILITARY REPRESENTATIVES  

- Other Countries / Misc -  

1 = The PEOPLE's REPUBLIC of CHINA 

 1 = The RUSSIAN FEDERATION

4 = INVITED SPECIAL GUESTS  

= 18 TOTAL INVITED GUESTS  

Additionally, a very special set of gifts were exchanged. The EBENS provided us with six (6) gifts that would assist us in future
 technological developments. In return, the Vatican gave the EBENS two (2) 12th Century religious-themed paintings [see "End Notes"].  

Furthermore, a future meeting date was set for November 2012 in addition to a previously scheduled official visit on Thursday, November 11, 2010 at the NTS.  

 http://www.serpo.org/release32a.php  

CRITICAL NOTE: The defense of JOHNSTON ATOLL is managed by the U.S. military; NONE of the islands are open to the public.  

QUESTION: Do we possess tele-transporter or "flash drive" technology that we have appropriated/back-engineered from the Visitors, yes or no?  

ANONYMOUS ANSWERS: With respect to your question regarding "tele-transporter" technology, the Ebens do NOT have this technology. They have mastered space travel and can venture through space defying the time barrier.  

As for our own technology, I very much doubt we have it today. We don't have the Star Trek "Beam-me-up-Scotty" technology.  

QUESTION: In a private communication I had with your legal counsel, I am given to understand that a member of the DIA-6 has a PhD in [theoretical?] physics ... can you ask this individual to expand on HOW SPECIFICALLY the Ebens traverse the vast, great distances of space and overcome the problem of TIME as they seem to freely travel from "Point A to Point B" in our Milky Way Galaxy?  

ANONYMOUS: The Ebens use a "Universal Grid" system in traveling from one point of space to another. Their craft are able to travel NEAR the speed of light. This enables their craft to go into an altered space-time chamber. That allows the point of DEPARTURE and the point of DESTINATION to become closer in real time. It is similar to folding space by making the two (2) points -- departure and destination -- become much closer.  

Remember, the Ebens have been working to perfect this type of space travel -- overcoming the time barrier -- for well over a period of 50,000 [of our] years. By now, they have in fact perfected this mode of space travel.  

Although we have been given the basic BLUEPRINT for their craft, propulsion mechanism and overall operating system, we still don't understand it. They utilize minerals that we simply don't have here on Earth [Element 115 per Bob Lazar?]. One particular mineral, similar to Uranium ³ -- but not as radioactive -- provides the extra power for their propulsion system. They also utilize a form of a SPACE DISPLACEMENT system, which basically causes a VACUUM in front of the propulsion that allows NOTHING to interfere with the created THRUST.  

At the present time, we canNOT understand how they accomplish this. They use a vacuum chamber, which consists of a mini-nuclear reactor that forces some type of matter into space that deletes the molecules and causes that very small portion of space to become a vacuum. They also utilize anti-matter in such a way as to force their propulsion system into "streams" [waves] of energy in front of their craft that enables the craft to move and flow much easier through space withOUT any FRICTION from the ATMOSPHERE.  

That is all from our physicist member.  

FINAL QUESTION: To the best of your insider knowledge, has our 44th President of The United States Barack H Obama received the standard presidential UFO-ET briefing, yes or no?  

ANONYMOUS ANSWERS: I do NOT know whether President Obama has been briefed on the subject matter of ongoing UFO visitation and continuing ET contacts with various visiting [alien] races.  

I personally find it difficult to read stories and lies being spread by the UFO community about our friends [the Ebens]. That is the primary reason we cannot support the UFO community in general nor its many of its contributors.  

We very much enjoy your e-mails. We all read them with vigor and interest. Thank you for your continuing support.  

More to come....  

– ANONYMOUS  

– FOR SUPPORTING INLINE PHOTO ATTACHMENTS for "Project SERPO" Release #32, go to: –  

The ANTARES STAR SYSTEM: HOME WORLD FOR ONE OF THE ALIEN SPECIES PRESENTLY VISITING SOL III, EARTH!  

 http://www.serpo.org/release32c.php

WORLD BOMBSHELL EXCLUSIVE: The EBEN ALIEN CIVILIZATION FROM ZETA RETICULI LANDS on AKAU ISLAND on THE REMOTE U.S. TERRITORY of JOHNSTON ATOLL FOR THEIR NOVEMBER 2009 DIPLOMATIC RENDEZVOUS!  

 http://www.serpo.org/release32a.php
 ------------------------------------------ 
 END NOTES and BIBLIOGRAPHY:

¹ = The EBEN visits from ZETA RETICULI I and II occurred/will occur on the following days and dates:  

° Friday, August 18, 1978;  

° Thursday, April 28, 1983;  

° Sunday, April 7, 1991;  

° Tuesday, October 22, 1996;  

° Sunday, November 28, 1999;  

° Wednesday, November 14, 2001;  

° Thursday, November 12, 2009 at the U.S. unincorporated territory of JOHNSTON ATOLL on AKAU Island;  

° The Ebens are due back to Earth for an OFFICIAL visit on Thursday, November 11, 2010;  

° A November 2012 date was set and confirmed during the EBENs' recent November 12, 2009 visit at JOHNSTON ATOLL on AKAU Island [a 2012 specific date was not provided]. As in the past, this visit will occur at the Nevada Test Site.  

 http://www.serpo.org/release28.php 
 ------------------------------------------
² = JOHNSTON ATOLL is a 50-square-mile atoll and is one of the MOST ISOLATED ATOLLS IN THE WORLD, located in the North Central Pacific Ocean, some 750 miles south west of Honolulu; the nearest lands to JOHNSTON ATOLL are the tiny islets of the French Frigate Shoals, around 800 km to the north east, in the Northwestern Hawaiian Islands. It is about one-third of the way from Hawaii to the Marshall Islands.  

Located at 16° 45' North LATITUDE and 169° 30' West LONGITUDE, there are four (4) islands located on the coral reef platform, two natural islands -- JOHNSTON ISLAND and SAND ISLAND -- which have been greatly expanded by coral dredging, as well as North Island (AKAU) and East Island (HIKINA), both of which are artificial islands formed solely by
 coral dredging.

 http://www.serpo.org/release32a.php  

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Johnston_Atoll

JOHNSTON ISLAND is an unincorporated territory of the United States, administered by the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service of the Department of the Interior as part of the Pacific Remote Islands Marine National Monument managed by the National Wildlife Refuge System. The defense of JOHNSTON ATOLL is managed by the U.S. military; NONE of the islands are open to the public.  

It is a former ATOMIC TEST FACILITY and site for five (5) high-altitude nuclear tests during the 1960s called "STARFISH PRIME" grouped together as "Operation FISHBOWL" under the larger former classified project of "Operation DOMINIC."  

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Starfish_Prime
 ------------------------------------------
³ = URANIUM: Atomic Number: 92 / Symbol: U / Name: Uranium / Atomic Weight: 238.0  

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Uranium

Source: "CHEMISTRY: The PERIODIC TABLE of ELEMENTS," Bar Charts, Inc, 1999 ©, Boca Rotan, FL 
 ------------------------------------------
 The GREAT VATICAN MUSEUMS OF ROME, ITALY:  

 http://www.sacred-destinations.com/italy/rome-vatican-museums

 http://www.christusrex.org/www1/vaticano/0-Musei.html

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Vatican_Museums

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gothic_art

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Panel_painting

VATICAN RELIGIOUS-THEMED PAINTINGS and ART:  

The VATICAN MUSEUMS (Musei Vaticani) contain one of the world's greatest art collections. Housed in the richly decorated galleries and apartments of the VATICAN PALACE, the VATICAN MUSEUMS boast the largest collection of classical sculpture in the world, plus extensive artworks from the Etruscan, Egyptian, Early Christian, Renaissance and modern periods and the magnificent Sistine Chapel. 
 ------------------------------------------
 ANTARES STAR SYSTEM ASTRONOMICAL DATA:  

 http://stars.astro.illinois.edu/sow/antares.html

ANTARES (Alpha Scorpii) – A brilliant jewel set within the Milky Way, ANTARES guides us to one of the great constellations of the sky, the Zodiac's Scorpius (or Scorpio), the celestial scorpion, one of the few constellations that actually looks like what it represents. ANTARES, a class M (M1.5) red supergiant has a color similar to Mars. This magnificent first magnitude (typically 0.96) star, shining opposite Betelgeuse, its counterpart in Orion, is ranked the 15th brightest in the sky.  

Its great distance of 550 light-years (second Hipparcos reduction) reveals that it is truly luminous, to the eye almost 10,000 times
 brighter than the Sun. Because it is cool, only about 3,600 degrees Kelvin at its surface, it radiates a considerable amount of its light in the invisible infrared. When that is taken into account, the star becomes some 60,000 times brighter than the Sun.  

A low temperature coupled with high luminosity tells us that the star must be huge, luminosity and temperature giving a radius of about 3 Astronomical Units. It is so big that astronomers can easily detect and measure the size of its apparent disk, which gives an even bigger radius of 3.4 AU, 65% the size of the orbit of Jupiter.  

If as high as half a magnitude, ANTARES could be as bright as 90,000 Suns, pretty much taking care of the radius discrepancy. Buried within the wind is a fifth magnitude (5.5) hot class B (B2.5) companion star (only 3 seconds of arc away) that hides within ANTARES' bright glare. The two are separated by roughly 550 AU and take perhaps 2,500 years to orbit each other.  

The companion hollows out a small ionized region within the wind, and although blue-white, has the reputation of appearing green as a result of a contrast effect with its brilliant reddish mate. ANTARES, with an uncertain mass of 15 to 18 solar masses, probably does not have much time left to it. It is massive enough someday to develop an iron core and eventually to explode as a brilliant supernova. This event may be a million years off ... an astronomical blink of an eye.

 http://www.serpo.org/release32c.php
 ------------------------------------------
 "ROSWELL INVESTIGATOR," TOM CAREY and DON SCHMITT's:  

 http://www.roswellinvestigator.com/

"WITNESS TO ROSWELL: UNMASKING THE GOVERNMENT's BIGGEST COVERUP" – By
 Thomas J Carey and Donald R Schmitt, Revised and Expanded edition,
 Wednesday, May 20, 2009, ISBN# 13-978-1-60163-066-7, $16.99
 / 
 http://www.amazon.com/Witness-Roswell-Unmasking-Governments-Cover-up/dp/1601630662
 ------------------------------------------
 To join in an active, lively and challenging discussion on the latest
 "Project SERPO" Release #32, go to:  

OPEN MINDS FORUM, BRENDAN BURTON's, THE PROGRESSIVE SCEPTICS &
 PARA-POLITICS:  

 http://www.openminds.co.nr/

 http://www.openmindsforum.com/

 http://lucianarchy.proboards21.com/

 http://lucianarchy.proboards21.com/index.cgi

 http://lucianarchy.proboards21.com/index.cgi?board=projectserpo
 ------------------------------------------
– Written, Researched and Compiled by VICTOR MARTINEZ –
  
 

Release 32a
 The EBEN ALIEN CIVILIZATION From ZETA RETICULI 
 Lands on AKAU ISLAND on The Remote U.S. Territory of JOHNSTON ATOLL 
 For Their November 2009 Diplomatic Rendezvous!

 

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Johnston_Atoll

NOTE: Scroll DOWN to view all 13 (thirteen) IMAGES!

– The 3 Must-See VIDEOS on JOHNSTON ATOLL/ISLAND! –

http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=M4AJMH_Da0o&feature=related

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9x7vrkwMp_Q&feature=related

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xM8VChttrAo

 

IMAGE #1 = Map of JOHNSTON ATOLL/ISLANDS [The EBENS From The
 ZETA RETICULI Double Star System Landed on AKAU Island]

Johnston Atoll

 

IMAGE #2 = Full View of JOHNSTON ATOLL/ISLAND

Johnston Atoll

 

IMAGE #3 = Airstrip at JOHNSTON ATOLL/ISLAND

Johnston Atoll

 

IMAGE #4 = Top Side View of HIKINA ISLAND

Johnston Atoll

 

IMAGE #5 = Top Side View of AKAU ISLAND [The EBENS Traveled 38.42
 Light-Years and Landed on AKAU Island on Wednesday, November 12, 2009]

Johnston Atoll

 

IMAGE #6 = Top Side View of JOHNSTON ATOLL/ISLAND

Johnston Atoll

 

IMAGE #7 = Supply Depot at JOHNSTON ATOLL/ISLAND

Johnston Atoll

 

IMAGE #8 = Top Side View of JOHNSTON ATOLL/ISLAND

Johnston Atoll

 

IMAGE #9 = Top Side View of SAND ISLAND

Johnston Atoll

 

IMAGE #10 = Top Side View of JOHNSTON ATOLL/ISLAND

Johnston Atoll

 

IMAGE #11 = Top Side View of JOHNSTON ATOLL/ISLAND

Johnston Atoll

 

IMAGE #12 = Map of JOHNSTON ATOLL/ISLAND (close-up)

Johnston Atoll

 

IMAGE #13 = Map of JOHNSTON ATOLL/ISLAND (wide view)

Johnston Atoll


 NOTE: The 2009 EBEN Landing at AKAU ISLAND Appears at The Very TOP CENTER of this last image.

   
 

Release 32b
 The Possible HOME WORLD LOCATIONS of The ALIEN SPECIES 
 Who Crash Landed on EARTH During The DINOSAUR ERA ~150 MYA! 

 NOTE: Scroll DOWN to view all nine (9) IMAGES! 

 IMAGE #1 = A MAP of STARS WITHIN 20 LIGHT-YEARS of EARTH: 



 http://www.atlasoftheuniverse.com/12lys.html  

  

IMAGE #2 = A MAP and LIST of STARS WITHIN 50 LIGHT-YEARS of EARTH:  



 http://www.atlasoftheuniverse.com/50lys.html  

  

IMAGE #3 = A MAP of The MILKY WAY Galaxy:  



 http://www.atlasoftheuniverse.com/milkyway.html 

  

IMAGE #4 = Our UNIVERSE WITHIN 50,000 LIGHT-YEARS 
 of The MILKY WAY Galaxy:  



 http://www.atlasoftheuniverse.com/galaxy.html  

  

IMAGE #5 = The CLASSIFICATION of STARS:  



 http://www.atlasoftheuniverse.com/startype.html 

  

IMAGE #6 = POSSIBLE "HABITABLE ZONE" PLANETARY SYSTEM DISCOVERED 
 ONLY 20 LIGHT-YEARS AWAY!  



 http://wattsupwiththat.com/2009/04/21/habitable-zone-planet-discovered-only-20-light-years-away/ 

  

IMAGES #7 #8 and #9 = FOUND 20 LIGHT-YEARS AWAY: The NEW EARTH!  







 http://www.dailymail.co.uk/sciencetech/article-450467/Found-20-light-years-away-New-Earth.html 

  

The BRIGHTEST STARS in The MILKY WAY Galaxy: 

 http://www.atlasoftheuniverse.com/stars.html  

 NOTE: Giant Star ANTARES is #15: Alpha Scorpii: ANTARES 

  

EXTRASOLAR PLANETS LOCATED 20 - 33 LIGHT-YEARS AWAY! 

 http://www.solstation.com/stars/new2obj.htm  

  

A LIST of ALL STAR SYSTEMS WITHIN 20 LIGHT-YEARS of EARTH: 

 http://www.atlasoftheuniverse.com/nearstar.html 

   
 



Release 32c
 The ANTARES STAR SYSTEM: 
 HOME WORLD For One of The ALIEN SPECIES 
 Presently Visiting Sol III, EARTH!

 

The 5 Must-See VIDEOS on ANTARES and STAR SIZE Comparison! 

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2FwCMnyWZDg&feature=related 

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vpUWNYgVEfk&feature=related 

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0d85KmFn-wM&feature=related 

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HEheh1BH34Q&feature=related 

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=I34FNr_peUk&feature=related 

 NOTE: Scroll DOWN to view all 11 (eleven) IMAGES! 

 http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap090708.html  

 IMAGES #1 - #5 = NOTE: The Red Supergiant Star ANTARES is always marked  by a BRIGHT YELLOWISH appearance in the following first five (5) images. 

Antares  

Antares  

Antares

Antares

Antares

IMAGES #6 - #11 = Location and STAR SIZE COMPARISON With Other 
 Well-Known Celestial Bodies Including ANTARES [Image #11]  













 EXPLANATION = IMAGE #1: The DARK RIVER to ANTARES: Connecting the Pipe Nebula  to the colorful region near bright star ANTARES is a dark cloud dubbed the "Dark Ri flowing from the picture's left edge. Murky looking, the Dark River's appearance is caused by dust obscuring background starlight, although the dark nebula contains mostly hydrogen and molecular gas. Surrounded by dust, ANATARES, a red supergiant star, creates an unusual BRIGHT YELLOWISH reflection nebula. Globular star cluster M4 is just seen above and right of ANTARES, though it lies 
 far behind the colorful clouds, at a distance of some 7,000 light-years. The Dark River itself is about 500-550 light-years away. This colorful skyscape is a mosaic of the sky in the Constellation Scorpius. 

 Credit & Copyright: Jason Jennings  

 
  

Release 33
 The DEFENSE INTELLIGENCE AGENCY [DIA] DETERMINES 
 The BILLY MEIER-PLEIADIAN "Contactee" Case to be a COMPLETE FRAUD! 

VICTOR:  

This is the DIA abstract ptovided to me on The BILLY MEIER-PLEIADIAN Case.  

OVERVIEW: U.S. Intelligence conducted a VERY thorough, detailed investigation into Meier's alleged contact with ETs. Our operatives personally interviewed Mr. Meier in 1985, while I was stationed with the DIA in Europe. Meier tried to convince us that he was in constant contact with ETs. However, after a very careful examination of his photographs by DIA imaging specialists, we were convinced HE FAKED EVERY PHOTOGRAPH [that we reviewed and he made available to us].  

FIELD INVESTIGATION: In September 1982, the Defense Intelligence Agency [DIA] officially opened a file on Billy Meier based on a Swiss radio interview Mr. Meier conducted with Robert Zanotti in June 1982. During that radio interview, 
 Mr Meier detailed alleged contacts he had with "Alien Visitors" from the M45 Pleiades Star System at ~380-400 light-years away.  

The DIA file contained all of the information gathered on Mr. Meier. The file was closed in December 1987. After a very careful
 examination of the information gathered by the DIA, it was determined Mr. Meier LIED during several interviews with covert DIA officials and provided HOAXED photographs to them. The photographs were carefully examined by DIA/CIA officials and found to be clever FAKES.  

The DIA also analyzed a recording made by Mr. Meier of an alleged contact with "Pleiadian aliens" on Monday, July 7, 1980. Again, the recordings were found to contain FALSE, Earth-originated sounds. The  DIA interviewed 21 of the 80 so-called "witnesses" to Mr. Meier's contacts. ALL were determined to be LIARS. Three (3) witnesses took polygraph examinations
 administered through Swiss Intelligence [AIS] and all three (3) FAILED it.  

Two (2) witnesses, Jacob Bertschinger and Engelbert Waechter actually retracted their statements after being confronted by Swiss Intelligence.  

SIDE NOTE: Mr. Meier served in the French Foreign Legion and claimed to have lost his left arm during an operation in Turkey in 1964. That claim was later proved to be FALSE.

PERSONAL OBSERVATIONS: As for myself, I personally interviewed Mr. Meier in 19XX. I posed as a reporter for "Der Spiegle." Mr. Meier relayed his historical contact with "aliens" from the Pleiades star cluster starting in the early '40s during his childhood. Mr. Meier stated he recorded the contacts starting in the early '50s and allowed me to listen to several different cassette recordings of contacts in 1975 near Ober-Saedelegg, Switzerland. He wouldn't allow me to take any cassette to copy, but he DID let me record from his recorder.  

He also showed me many photographs of alleged Pleiadian "alien" spacecraft. He allowed me to take photographs of the pictures. He did give me one (1) photograph of the large craft hovering above his auto. Mr. Meier sounded sincere during the interview and even had me convinced that something had happened to him. I later spoke with a Swiss intelligence official, who told me Mr. Meier was "crazy." The Swiss Armed Forces Intelligence Service [AIS] investigated ALL of his claims throughout the years and found them to be all FALSE.  

USG CONCLUSIONS: YES: Other foreign intelligence agencies also conducted their own investigations into the Meier case. Here is some additional information for you: The CIA, DIA, the German BND¹ and even the KGB conducted their own separate investigations into Meier's alleged contact with ETs. The U.S. intelligence investigation commenced around 1976 and was terminated in December 1987.  

FOLLOW-UP: The conclusion of the USG intelligence community was this: The "photographic evidence" were considered to be ALL HOAXES. Mr. Meier actually ADMITTED to DIA investigators that the photographs were BOGUS. As a general closing statement of the Meier case, this is all of the information that U.S. intelligence knows and has compiled on the Meier "contactee" case over time with no further updates now for years.  

Case closed....

– DIA-6

– FOR SUPPORTING INLINE PHOTO ATTACHMENTS for "Project SERPO" Release #33, go to: –  

The DEFENSE INTELLIGENCE AGENCY [DIA] DETERMINES The BILLY MEIER-PLEIADIAN "Contactee" Case to be a COMPLETE FRAUD!  

 http://www.serpo.org/release33a.php
 ------------------------------------------ 
¹ = W GERMAN INTELLIGENCE BND = Bundesnachrichtendienst: Established in 1956, the [Federal Intelligence Service], was W Germany's foreign intelligence service. Unlike the CIA, it was responsible for BOTH foreign and domestic intelligence.  

The BND was the descendant of the Gehlen Organization which was developed and overseen by the CIA beginning in 1949. It was essentially the intelligence network that had been run for Nazi Germany against the Soviet Union by Lt Gen Reinhard Gehlen.  

During the 1950s, the CIA controlled W German intelligence through Gehlen. The present day German BND functions in much the same manner as it did under the W German government. The BND's counterpart organization is the CIA and its counterintelligence arm in W Germany is the BfV [Federal Office for The Protection of The Constitution] first established in 1950 and greatly mirrors the American FBI.  

The suspicions, hemorrhaging and turf wars of W German secrets through the BND and BfV to E Germany finally ended with the reunification of Germany during the dismantling of the infamous Berlin Wall. 
 ------------------------------------------
 BIBLIOGRAPHY and RECOMMENDED READING:  

"AND STILL THEY FLY!" – By Guido Moosbrugger, Completely Revised and
 Updated, 2nd ed, February 2004, ISBN# 0971152314, $26.95, 424 pp. 
 / 
 http://www.amazon.com/Still-They-Fly-Guido-Moosbrugger/dp/0971152314

SPY BOOK: The ENCYCLOPEDIA OF ESPIONAGE – By Norman Polmar and Thomas
 B Allen, 2nd ed, Tuesday, July 13, 2004, ISBN# 0375720251, $21.95, p. 85
 / 
 http://www.amazon.com/Spy-Book-2nd-Norman-Polmar/dp/0375720251

ENCYCLOPEDIA of The CENTRAL INTELLIGENCE AGENCY – By W Thomas Smith,
 Jr, June 2003, ISBN# 0-8160-4667-0, $19.95, p. 38 
 /
 http://www.amazon.com/Encyclopedia-Central-Intelligence-Agency-Thomas/dp/0816046670
 ------------------------------------------
 http://www.serpo.org/release33a.php  

BILLY MEIER / MICHAEL HORN:  

 http://www.billymeier.com/

 http://www.theyfly.com/

 http://www.gaiaguys.net/

 http://www.figu.org/

 http://www.figu.org/us/spiritual_teaching/interview.htm

 http://www.forum.figu.org/

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Billy_Meier

The 7 Must-See VIDEOS on BILLY MEIER and MICHAEL HORN:  

Part #1:  

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=49yfYyH0YNQ&feature=fvw

Part #2:  

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dXUrS4zlgF0&feature=channel

MICHAEL HORN in BILLY MEIER Documentary Presentation:  

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ILT03ycAEQI&feature=related

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=j9VZQup4B-M&feature=related

J RANDOLPH WINTERS on The BILLY MEIER CASE:  

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=jsp6lF4SCKI&feature=related

PLEIADIAN BEAMSHIPS PRESENTATION:  

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2r3YhxADlOw&feature=related

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=29wnpEy2DY4

 BILLY MEIER PHOTO ANALYSIS PAGE

 ------------------------------------------
 To join in an active, lively and challenging discussion on the latest "Project SERPO" Release #33, go to:  

OPEN MINDS FORUM, BRENDAN BURTON's, THE PROGRESSIVE SCEPTICS & PARA-POLITICS:  

 http://www.openminds.co.nr/

 http://www.openmindsforum.com/

 http://lucianarchy.proboards21.com/

 http://lucianarchy.proboards21.com/index.cgi

 http://lucianarchy.proboards21.com/index.cgi?board=projectserpo
 ------------------------------------------
 Written, Researched and Compiled by VICTOR MARTINEZ 
  
  

Release 33a
 The Defense Intelligence Agency [DIA] Determines 
 The BILLY MEIER-PLEIADIAN "Contactee" Case to be COMPLETE FRAUD! 

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Billy_Meier 

 NOTE: Scroll DOWN to view all 13 (thirteen) IMAGES! 

 The 7 Must-See VIDEOS on BILLY MEIER and MICHAEL HORN: 

 Part #1:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=49yfYyH0YNQ&feature=fvw 

 Part #2:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dXUrS4zlgF0&feature=channel 

 MICHAEL HORN in BILLY MEIER Documentary Presentation: 

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ILT03ycAEQI&feature=related 

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=j9VZQup4B-M&feature=related 

 J RANDOLPH WINTERS on The BILLY MEIER CASE: 

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=jsp6lF4SCKI&feature=related 

 PLEIADIAN BEAMSHIPS PRESENTATION: 

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2r3YhxADlOw&feature=related 

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=29wnpEy2DY4  

 BILLY MEIER / MICHAEL HORN: 

 http://www.billymeier.com/ 

 http://www.theyfly.com/ 

 http://www.gaiaguys.net/ 

 http://www.figu.org/ 

 http://www.figu.org/us/spiritual_teaching/interview.htm 

 http://www.forum.figu.org/ 

 BILLY MEIER PHOTO ANALYSIS PAGE 

 

Billy Meier photographs

Billy Meier photographs

Billy Meier photographs

Billy Meier photographs

Billy Meier photographs

Billy Meier photographs

Billy Meier photographs

Billy Meier photographs

Billy Meier photographs

Billy Meier photographs

Billy Meier photographs

Billy Meier photographs

Billy Meier photographs

 Sources: THE AMERICAN HERITAGE SCIENCE DICTIONARY, ISBN# 0618455043, $19.95, 695 pp.  

 DISCOVER THE SCIENCE ALMANAC: THE DEFINITIVE SCIENCE RESOURCE, ISBN# 0786887591, $13.99, 790 pp. >

 ASTRONOMICAL DATA ON THE HOMEWORLDS OF THE ALIEN CIVILIZATIONS: 

1) CYGNUS ARM within the Milky Way Galaxy. These CYGNUS NEBULOSITIES -- which contain Planets DAMCO and PONTEL -- are all located ~2,000 light-years away. Looking toward the constellation CYGNUS, is a stunning and complex region of nebulae strewn along the plane of our Milky Way Galaxy. The bright, hot, supergiant star DENEB and popular celestial sights such as the North America and PELICAN emission regions, the IC 1318 "BUTTERFLY," and the CRESCENT and VEIL NEBULAE can also be identified.

 

Silhouetted by the glowing interstellar clouds and crowded star fields, the dark NORTHERN COAL SACK is also visible, part of a series of obscuring dust clouds forming the GREAT RIFT in the Milky Way. Along with the Sun, they lie within the ORION SPIRAL ARM of our galaxy.  
2) Constellation: CANCER, Star M44: "A BEEHIVE" OF STARS! The BEEHIVE CLUSTER lies ~580 light-years away, and contains over 350 stars in a cluster spread out over only 10 light-years. M44 is a prominent open cluster of stars. Nicknamed "PRAESEPE" and "The BEEHIVE," it is one of the few open clusters visible to the unaided eye.

 

M44 was thought to be a nebula until Galileo used an early telescope to resolve the cluster's bright blue stars. These stars in M44, which is thought to have formed about 400-730 million years ago, is larger and older than most other open clusters.  When viewed with a powerful telescope, hundreds of stars become visible. 
  

3) Constellation: TAURUS, M45: THE PLEIADES STAR CLUSTER is ~380-400 light-years from Earth and contains 3,000+ stars. The nine (9) brightest stars are: Atlas, Pleione, Alcyone, Maia, Asterope, Taygeta, Calaeno, Merope and Electra. Perhaps the most famous star cluster on the sky, the PLEIADES can be seen without binoculars from even the depths of a light-polluted city.

 

Also known as the "SEVEN SISTERS" and M45, the PLEIADES is one of the brightest and closest open clusters. The PLEIADES contains over 3,000 stars and is only 10-13 light years across. As viewed through a good telescope, there are blue reflection nebulae that surround the brighter cluster stars. Low mass, faint, brown dwarfs have also been found in the PLEIADES.

 

4) Constellation: RETICULUM, Zeta Reticuli I and II, are 5th magnitude yellow double star system, Planets SERPO, OTTO and SILUS are 38.42 light-years away. Planet SERPO's binary suns, Zeta Reticuli I & II; SERPO is Reticulum IV.

 

PLANET SERPO OF THE ZETA RETICULI I & II BINARY STAR SYSTEM IS IN THE CONSTELLATION OF RETICULUM AND HOME OF THE EBEN CIVILIZATION!

 

 http://www.solstation.com/stars2/zeta-ret.htm

 

– Zeta Reticuli I & II are two (2) 5th magnitude yellow-orange main sequence dwarf stars of 5.2 and 5.5 magnitude; they are not blue. Zeta Reticuli lies 38.42 light years or 225,968,400,000,000 miles away.

 

– Secondly, Zeta Reticuli 1 is approx. 91% of the diameter of our sun, and Zeta Reticuli 2 is approx. 99% of the diameter of our sun.

 

– Thirdly, the distance BETWEEN the stars is 367 BILLION miles for Zeta Reticuli I and II, or approx 100 times the Sun-Pluto distance, as

they orbit a common center.

 

THE ZETA RETICULI I & II STAR SYSTEM

 http://www.ufoconspiracy.com/reports/zetareticuli_star_sys.htm

 

THE ZETA RETICULI INCIDENT

 

 http://www.gravitywarpdrive.com/Zeta_Reticuli_Incident.htm

 

THE 400 BILLION STARS OF THE MILKY WAY ... OUR GALACTIC NEIGHBORHOOD IS JUST TEEMING WITH SENTIENT LIFE REGARDLESS OF WHAT THE CONTROL-FREAKS OF THE USG STATE PUBLICLY ... ABSOLUTELY AMAZING!

 

 http://members.nova.org/~sol/chview/chv5 .htm

------------------------------------------

SHOCKER: CITING CLASSIFIED DOCUMENTS 20+ YEARS OLD, ANONYMOUS DISCLOSES 2 ALIEN SPECIES ORIGINATING FROM A PARTICULAR CONSTELLATION AND NOW A BRAND NEW BOOK and MAGAZINE ARTICLE CONFIRM ALIEN LIFE EXISTS WITHIN THAT CONSTELLATION: THE CYGNUS ARM ... A MUST-READ!  

 
 

Release 34
ALIEN "Spy" Sent Back to Home World by USG! 

INTERGALACTIC "SPY" SHOCKER: IN A SCENE RIGHT OUT OF THE 1967-'68"INVADERS" SCI-FI TV SERIES, AN EXTRATERRESTRIAL ENTITY CALLED A"SEPTELOID" FROM THE "DELTA PAVONIS" STAR SYSTEM SUCCESSFULLYINFILTRATED THE U.S. GOVERNMENT AS AN EMPLOYEE, WAS "OUTED" BY AN "ALIENABDUCTEE" and THEN SENT PACKING BACK TO HIS ALIEN HOME WORLD BY U.S.INTELLIGENCE ... "ET, GO HOME!" ... HARD TO BELIEVE, BUT ABSOLUTELY 100%TRUE!,

------------------------------------------

GLOBAL SHOCK SURVEY: "THEY" WALK AMONG US: 1 IN 5 BELIEVE IN ALIENS! –By Miral Fahmy, Reuters, Thursday, April 8, 2010, 1:01 p.m., EDT 

SINGAPORE – ALIENS exist and they live in our midst DISGUISED ASHUMANS -- at least that's what 20% of 23,000 adults polled in 22countries in a global survey believe! Read the ENTIRE article here: 
 http://www.reuters.com/article/idUSTRE6374B220100408
------------------------------------------ 
VICTOR:

I apologize for not getting back to you much earlier; pressing personal matters have recently taken much of my time. 

In reference to your repeated requests to present some new information NEVER before disclosed to the public to be provided to one of the moderators [Chris Iversen] who hosts our SERPO.org Web site [Open Minds] for a conference, I went outside of our agency to close intelligence contacts of mine and secured the following: 

ABSTRACT: I just received information on a highly sensitive operation code-named "Operation TANGO-SIERRA" that occurred in early 1980. It involved U.S. intelligence capturing an ALIEN BEING [who was] living among us. 

CODE NAME: "Operation TANGO-SIERRA" 

SET-UP: Here is the story. Personally, I've NEVER heard of this particular operation before in all of my years in intelligence circles and employment. This information extracted about the ALIEN is still highly classified and EXTREMELY difficult to obtain. 

From what I've learned, except for former presidents Carter, Reagan and Bush I, most presidents since then have NOT been briefed on this specific operation. 

 http://www.serpo.org/release27.php

 http://www.serpo.org/release27a.php

– ANONYMOUS 
 ------------------------------------------
– BEGIN ANONYMOUS II and III – 

VICTOR MARTINEZ: 

INTRODUCTION: I am an intelligence colleague of the man whom you have come know as ANONYMOUS who has asked me to brief you on a very special USG operation. 

OPERATION OVERVIEW: I was directly involved with "Operation TANGO-SIERRA." It involved the finding, tracking and eventual capture of an EXTRATERRESTRIAL ENTITY. 

NARRATIVE: The original operation began in early 1980 when an EARTH FEMALE was identified by U.S. intelligence as being a so-called "ALIEN ABDUCTEE." She had been abducted by a MALE NON-HUMAN in 1977 which was her first abduction. 

The MALE NON-HUMAN showed the Earth woman abductee projections of ALIEN LIFE on another planet. The projection was from a small, triangle device. The woman viewed this projection which she described as images displayed in a 3-dimensional "holographic" view. 

The MALE NON-HUMAN never harmed the Earth woman abductee. During the three (3) years of her ongoing abduction, the Earth woman was taken by the MALE NON-HUMAN through a "veil of light" to another place. The Earth woman described this place as being "a light bubble." She would sit inside the bubble and view these holographic projections with the MALE NON-HUMAN. 

On one (1) occasion, the MALE NON-HUMAN introduced the Earth woman to another MALE, whom the Earth woman described in debriefing details as NOT being human, i.e., not being an Earth male abductee. The Earth woman called this other being a "CREATURE." 

This creature performed a medical examination on the Earth woman. The woman did NOT fully consent to the alien's examination as she was temporarily paralyzed. After the examination, the woman was taken back to her residence. This woman was single, 23-years-old and a trusted, well-respected U.S. government employee. 

When the Earth woman brought up her abduction by a MALE ALIEN to the attention of a co-worker, the co-worker contacted an office security official, who then contacted U.S. intelligence officials. U.S.
intelligence spent hours and hours vetting the woman's story, conducting thorough background investigations, performing surveillance, and administering several polygraph examinations. 

The Earth woman's story was eventually deemed to be factually true and correct. U.S. intelligence then mounted a very special, highly classified operation to capture this ALIEN BEING, who lived near
Landover, Maryland. 

FIELD INVESTIGATION: In early 1980, the 7602 Air Intelligence Wing, Section III, began a detailed, intense investigation involving the presence of EXTRATERRESTRIAL CREATURES having infiltrated the highest levels of the United States government. 

This information originated from several abductees, who underwent extensive screening to determine their credibility. One particular FEMALE ABDUCTEE, who lived in the Washington D.C. area, provided a very believable, credible-sounding account that she had been abducted by a HUMAN-LOOKING MAN [Extraterrestrial Entity], who actually resided in the Landover, Maryland area. 

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Landover,_Maryland

With the assistance of the 4th District, the Air Force Office of Special Investigations [AFOSI], a highly classified operation was launched, code named: "Operation TANGO-SIERRA" to find, detain and debrief that "HUMAN" and determine whether or not he was an actual EXTRATERRESTRIAL CREATURE/NON-HUMAN and an imminent or potential threat to our national security. 

[SIDE NOTE: Tango and Sierra are military phonetic words for the letters T and S respectively ... T/S = "Top Secret".] 

The entire operation lasted five (5) months and involved approximately 60 intelligence officers. EVERY intelligence gathering capability was utilized at the time: Ground, aerial surveillance, telephone wiretaps, photographic evidence and other undisclosed clandestine operations were ALL conducted and some simultaneously in concert with one another. 

The NON-HUMAN ENTITY was quickly identified, carefully watched, photographed and eventually CAPTURED near a shopping mall (southeast of Andrews Air Force Base, Maryland) after it walked up an embankment. It was quickly determined that this MALE ALIEN had NO special powers nor abilities. 

The MALE NON-HUMAN voluntarily complied with the U.S. intelligence AFOSI Special Agents and went quietly and without incident. The MALE NON-HUMAN was then remanded to custody and placed in captivity at Ft. Belvoir Army Post, VA. 

 http://www.andrews.af.mil/

 http://www.belvoir.army.mil/

FOLLOW-UP: 

The MALE NON-HUMAN was interrogated by teams of AFOSI Special Agents over several weeks and in total was questioned and intensely interrogated for many months by other agencies. 
It was during this time that the MALE NON-HUMAN disclosed its race, its resident [home] planet and the reason it came to Earth. The MALE ALIEN basically cooperated and provided details of its life on his ALIEN HOME WORLD. 

The NON-HUMAN ENTITY was released on the direct orders of then President Carter in late 1980, and subsequently left Earth and returned to its home planet. 

CRITICAL END NOTES: The MALE NON-HUMAN originated from the star system DELTA PAVONIS, ~20 light-years [19.92 light-years] from Earth where it was the 4th planet from their sun. It is roughly the same size as our Earth. 

We called the captured alien SEPTELOIDS ... S-E-P-T-E-L-O-I-D-S. That was the identifying alien species name given to them by the ASTROBIOLOGISTS on our team. I have NO idea how they picked that name as well as some of the other odd-sounding alien species names ending with the suffix of "loid."

[http://www.blurtit.com/q368446.html

Suffix "oid" = used in various sciences meaning "having the likeness of" so it is "similar" which indicates that the thing is NOT identical to another, but RESEMBLES it, e.g., an anthropoid.]

The travel time to Earth was 18 Earth months using a very complex propulsion system and TIME-SPACE DISPLACEMENT travel mode. Back then in 1980, we could NOT understand the ALIEN PROPULSION SYSTEM and we NEVER saw his spacecraft. 

[ALIEN PROPULSION SYSTEM explained in "Project SERPO" Release #32 
 http://www.serpo.org/release32.php]

When President CARTER let the MALE NON-HUMAN leave, he just vanished. I was never in the intelligence loop as to HOW he left or HOW he departed Earth. These aliens from Delta PAVONIS have been visiting Earth for ~100 Earth years. Apparently, they could assume the HUMAN SHAPE and FORM and easily live among us. 

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Shapeshifting

[SHAPESHIFTING refers to a change in the shape or form of a person or an ALIEN CREATURE. It is also called transformation, transmogrification, homeomorphism or metamorphosis.] 

SERPENT SHAPESHIFTERS: 
 http://www.subversiveelement.com/AliensNordicsSerpentShapeShifter.html

I'm not sure how they learned English so well nor other languages. You've got to remember that this was EXTREME COMPARTMENTALIZATION. I knew just what I was suppose to know [surveillance]. There is MUCH MORE to the ALIEN DEBRIEFING that I do NOT know. From what I've learned over the years, this race of alien beings originally came to Earth as EXPLORERS about a century ago. 

With respect to the MALE NON-HUMAN's employment, he worked as a records keeper for the U.S. Dept of Commerce in Washington D.C. He was able to manufacture his own [fraudulent] identification documents by assuming the name/ID of a deceased Earth human. He was in a career that did NOT
require a high-level security clearance thereby enabling him to escape the much greater scrutiny given to "Secret" clearance level background checks and above.

Although they possessed the human shape, form and basic anatomy, they were NOT human beings like you and me. Their actual, normal, "real" appearance was that of a HIDEOUS-LOOKING CREATURE that would most certainly scare, frighten and terrify a normal Earth human. 

Above all, they did NOT have ANY extra [sensory] powers nor abilities. They had NO WEAPONS and NEVER tried to harm EARTH humans. Their sole intent and stated mission was that they just wanted to study Earth humans and obtain the basic structure of the human body, anatomy and social interplay. I don't know how many others of this specific type of ALIENS were among us as I was not authorized that specific highly classified information. 

However, I am positive that there were more similar-type operations than just this one. "Operation TANGO-SIERRA" was just one (1) operation that lasted ~nine (9) months from start to finish in the D.C area. U.S. intelligence had more such operations around the U.S., with one in the southwest and another in the northwest, but I don't know for sure on the location details.

Regarding your other questions, I can't answer them for you are relying on information from outsiders [UFO community] who do NOT know what the U.S. government intelligence agencies know and specifically what they were doing while handling ALIEN CONTACT. You asked me questions that were obviously posed to you by non-intelligence types. 

As for other VISITING ALIEN RACES, we knew of nine (9) of them. The EBENS were the nicest while the TRANTALOIDS were the ugliest, meanest sons-a-bitches and most dangerous. 

I don't know who Dr Stranges is ... was that the movie guy? 

[See "MODERATOR's NOTES and OBSERVATIONS" at end.]

I only KNOW that the very inner circle of our government KNOWS. That is about all I can tell you. I never spoke with the MALE NON-HUMAN in "Operation TANGO-SIERRA," but I was actively involved in this operation. Most of the older fellows who knew all of this are dead now. Former CIA Director RICHARD M HELMS was our boss for this operation. He died some years ago [1913 - 2002]. 

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Richard_Helms

[Admiral STANSFIELD TURNER was CIA director during "Operation TANGO-SIERRA"] 

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Director_of_Central_Intelligence

AFTERWARD: The CIA/DIA/NSA were all involved as well as one (1) or two (2) FBI Special Agents, but they were NEVER fully briefed. The lead agency was the 7602nd that operated out of Ft Belvoir. Those guys were the BEST of the BEST. I was the lead case officer for the surveillance part of the operation. I was very good at that. I was trained by the best and worked inside the old Soviet Union for many, many years.

I could follow the devil around and he would NEVER know it. Most of the UFO operations -- clandestine, that is -- were performed by the 7602nd. In fact, the CIA came to THEM for their specialized training. The 7602nd Air Intelligence Wing remained secret for many years. Although it was a U.S. Air Force unit, the unit contained ALL branches of the armed forces except the Marines ... we NEVER could train those guys! 

Your ANONYMOUS source is probably someone I know [Yes] since we have a very close-knit intel group who meets about once a month where we discuss items of mutual interest. We all live in the XXXXX and XXXXXX areas. We have many intel contacts in Texas, especially Austin. 

We used to have a much larger group, but over the years, time has taken its share of our beloved, cherished friends....

I hope all of this works out for you. Good luck, Mr Martinez. 

– ANONYMOUS II 

SIDE NOTES: 

I never read that book ... never even heard of it ["EXEMPT FROM DISCLOSURE" – By Ret USAF Capt Robert M Collins]. Is Collins some outsider? 

COMMENTING ON "The YELLOW BOOK": 

"The YELLOW BOOK" is quite an extraordinary piece of ALIEN technology. It was given to us by the EBENS. It tells the entire history of their race, planet and most of the history of the universe as well as our own. As far as I know, no one has ever viewed the "Yellow Book" to its very end. As you stated in one of your releases, it would take an entire lifetime to READ it and yet another to UNDERSTAND it. 

[http://www.serpo.org/release29.php] 

Regarding "Project SERPO": 

I was briefed into this very special project many years ago, but only as a trainer [for the astronauts.] I was not sure of the exact nature of this project until I read all about it on the SERPO.org Web site. Like ALL other operations and special projects, SERPO was highly compartmentalized. I have now read the entire SERPO story, which I never knew was even posted on the Internet until I was placed in contact with you. I learned much from it and it looks like you pretty much have the entire story. 

I congratulate and commend you for getting this very important piece of America's "hidden" history out. I really enjoyed reading this information. I just shared it with many of my old intel friends -- and they knew about it! It's truly an AMAZING story, ALL of which is FACT. I guess there still is a controversy on whether two (2) women went or not. At least one (woman) went for sure. I knew six (6) of them while in training as their instructor. Two (2) were NURSES, one was a LINGUIST and I'm not sure about the others with the passage of time.

REGARDING THE LEGENDARY "MJ-12" UFO CONTROL GROUP: 

There was a "Group-6" that was involved in the Roswell Incident cover-up. "Group-6" controlled the administrative side of all UFO investigations at the time. It was centered in New Mexico. It primarily
involved "The 1121 Special Activities Squadron" of the USAF. It also thoroughly investigated the famous Lonnie Zamora contact incident of Friday, April 24, 1964, in Socorro, NM; I remember it well because I was stationed in NM then. 

SIDE NOTE" "Group-6" is mentioned in "Project SERPO" Release #27a: 

 http://www.serpo.org/release27a.php

 There WAS in fact an MJ-12 group which stood for "Majority Group-12." It was comprised of 12 (twelve) USG officials who controlled, managed and directed EVERY aspect of the UFO phenomenon.
 MOST of the officials were governmental types, BUT some were NOT. That "MJ-12" name was changed some years ago which I understand you know [Yes]. 

REGARDING THE HOSTILE ALIEN SPECIES "The TRANTALOIDS": 

 http://www.serpo.org/release27a.php

[VICTOR: The homeworld of the HAV, the TRANTALOIDS, is the THIRD PLANET out from the star Epsilon Eridani in the constellation Eridanus at 10.5 light-years away. Although somewhat cooler and fainter than our sun, it is very similar. Hal's friend, ADVISER #4, was mistaken on the distance; an easy error to make given the voluminous amount of information on this subject matter alone. – ANONYMOUS.] 

ADVISER #4: Mr President that goes for each species although the Ebens do have similar elements as [those found on] Earth. But the Trantaloids have strange materials ... nothing like [those found on] Earth. These ALIENS CAN IMITATE HUMANS. They CAN LOOK LIKE BLOND HUMANS. However, they are not blond, but UGLY-LOOKING INSECTS. 

PRESIDENT REAGAN: Insects, did you say that? 

ADVISER #4: Yes, do you have a photograph? 

The CARETAKER: Yes, hold on. 

WM CASEY: They are pretty nasty looking.

INSECTOID ALIENS: 

 http://www.subversiveelement.com/AliensInsectoids.html

– END ANONYMOUS II = 88% / ANONYMOUS III = 12% – 
------------------------------------------
VICTOR: I know you and our [Open Minds] forum members will have MANY questions, but since this information originated outside of our agency [Defense Intelligence Agency], this is all I can provide you with at the moment. 

This should be sufficient for our forum moderator [Chris Iversen] to present at "The Great UFO Congress of 2010" on Saturday, April 24, 2010. 

 http://drufo.org/index.htm
 http://www.drufo.org/conference.new.htm


Thank you for your continued interest and support. 

More to come....

– ANONYMOUS 

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

MODERATOR's NOTE: 

You may now proceed to: 

 http://www.serpo.org/release34a.php  

 http://www.serpo.org/release34b.php  

 http://www.serpo.org/release34c.php  

 http://www.serpo.org/release34d.php  

 http://www.serpo.org/release34e.php  

which contain a total of 55 astronomical images, charts and star maps on DELTA PAVONIS, plus "INVADERS" TV STILLS, shapeshifting REPTILIAN ALIENS, and relevant supporting IMAGES which best represent what visiting extraterrestrial craft MIGHT look like. 
 ------------------------------------------
 RELATED WEB SITES and USEFUL LINKS: 

The definitive history of UFOlogy during this time period written by
noted historian Richard M Dolan. 

"UFOs and The NATIONAL SECURITY STATE: The Cover-Up Exposed, 1973-1991,
Vol. 2" – By Richard M Dolan, Copyright © September 2009, ISBN#
 978-0967799513, $26.95 

 http://keyholepublishing.com/  
/
 http://www.amazon.com/Cover-Up-Exposed-1973-1991-National-Security/dp/0967799511   
------------------------------------------
 "The INVADERS" TV SERIES STARRING ROY THINNES WEB SITE LINKS! 

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Invaders  

 http://www.tv.com/the-invaders/show/2350/summary.html  

 http://www.theinvaders.co.uk/contrib/article_01.html  

 http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0061265/  

"The INVADERS," are ALIEN BEINGS from a dying planet in another galaxy. Their destination: the EARTH. Their purpose: to make it "THEIR" world by taking HUMAN FORM. 

The show's hero, architect David Vincent [Roy Thinnes] must convince a disbelieving world that the ALIEN INVASION NIGHTMARE has already begun.  In the final episode, Vincent attempts to warn a U.S. senator that a governmental official is an alien in, "Inquisition." 

– "The INVADERS" VIDEOS! – 

"The INVADERS" Opening Titles and Credits: 

 http://www.youtube.com/watch#!v=uOLGrXOtuwQ&feature=related  

"The INVADERS" Commercial Promos #1 #2 and #3: 

 http://www.youtube.com/watch#!v=zNtsgXRuU5M&feature=related  

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BYpd6MdRwss  

 http://www.youtube.com/watch#!v=Qr-qGkVBUoM&feature=related  

"The INVADERS" DVD Release Promos: 

 http://www.youtube.com/watch#!v=TDj7zYPe8qY&feature=related  

 http://www.youtube.com/watch#!v=e327uf2_Hos&feature=related  

"The INVADERS" Sample Episode: 

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=TIa5ocx1vY4  
------------------------------------------
 "REPTILIAN ALIENS" HISTORICAL CONTEXT: 

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Reptilians  

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_reptilian_humanoids  

There is a widespread belief within UFOlogy that at least one (1) ALIEN SPECIES coming to Earth has a REPTILE-LOOKING appearance. Then, there is a smaller circle who believe that these REPTILIAN ALIENS actually originated here on Earth when a sentient SAURIAN RACE/SPECIES naturally evolved via evolution toward the very end of the late Cretaceous Period of the Mesozoic Era. 

SAURIAN/DINOSAUROID/REPTOID ALIENS: 

 http://www.subversiveelement.com/Aliens_Dinosauroids.html  

This SAURIAN RACE then departed Earth -- perhaps because of the asteroid ELE [Extinction Level Event] which primarily wiped out nearly all of the land-based dinosaurs. This Saurians found a new home world in the cosmos and have now returned to their original "home" -- Sol III -- but now only as "Visitors." These Saurians are also known as "DINOSAUROIDS,"  

"REPTILIANS" and "REPTOIDS." 

"The LACERTA FILE": 

Parts #1 and #2 [edited version]:
 http://www.luisprada.com/Protected/the_lacerta_files.htm   

Part #1 [UNedited version]:
 http://www.subversiveelement.com/AliensReptoidsLacerta1.html   

Part #2 [UNedited version]:
 http://www.subversiveelement.com/AliensReptoidsLacerta2.html   

What UFO researchers want to know is WHAT the ALIEN NON-HUMANS from the DELTA PAVONIS star system really look like BEFORE they shapeshift into and assume an EARTH HUMAN appearance!

In the "STAR TREK: VOYAGER" Sci-Fi TV Series, "Distant Origin" Season #3, Episode #165, states that REPTILIAN ALIENS naturally evolved from Earth's DINOSAURS. 

Here for your thought-provoking viewing pleasure is that classic episode, "Distant Origin" presented in five (5) 10-min segments from
 Wednesday, April 30, 1997: 

VIDEO: 1 of 5:
 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=E1aZTrjMovA&feature=related  

VIDEO: 2 of 5:
 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9Sq6o7K4SSk&feature=related  

VIDEO: 3 of 5:
 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tcdnR1-vVTU&feature=related  

VIDEO: 4 of 5:
 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9snLWssPBX4&feature=related  

VIDEO: 5 of 5: 
 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dGtO9ZH94vY&feature=related
 ------------------------------------------
 MODERATOR's NOTES and OBSERVATIONS: The belief by many in the UFO community that HUMAN-LOOKING ALIENS have embedded themselves within our society is NOT a new one. Here are three (3) books which either touch on or fully address this theme with choice supporting excerpts from the latter two.

"STRANGER AT The PENTAGON" – By Dr Frank E Stranges 
/
 http://www.amazon.com/Stranger-at-Pentagon-Frank-Stranges/dp/0965578607   

BOOK SYNOPSIS: Dr Frank Stranges -- an evangelical minister -- claims he was escorted inside the PENTAGON where he met a HUMAN-LOOKING BEING from another planet. The ALIEN ENTITY had NO finger prints, could read minds and had a space suit that could NOT be cut nor burned. Dr Stranges claims this being -- known as VAL THOR -- had a spiritual message to give to Earth if its inhabitants would only listen. 

"ALIEN LIAISON: The ULTIMATE SECRET" – By Timothy Good, Copyright © January 1, 1991, ISBN# 0712621946 
/
 http://www.amazon.com/Alien-Liaison-Ultimate-Secret-Timothy/dp/0712621946   

p. 61: Apart from a barely noticeable difference in the eyes, the ALIENS WERE VERY SIMILAR TO HUMANS. A great deal of information was given during the course of these meetings, as well as a few demonstrations of technical and mental abilities which transcended those of normal human beings. At no time did they reveal their origin, but they did mention that they had bases on Earth. 

They did reveal, however, that on several occasions -- over a long period of time -- they had been responsible for GENETICALLY UPGRADING
 THE HUMAN SPECIES. It was implied that other, less evolved beings were also visiting our planet. 

pp. 66-7: Deceased U.S. Army brigadier general: Among their own people [extraterrestrials], they use thought only, but ... they have learned to
speak our language [English] so perfectly that if one of them was to step up and speak to you ... you would NOT recognize him from one of
 your own people [Earth humans], and in appearance, probably the greatest difference you would note would be his handsome features and perfect
 proportions physically....

The brigadier general explained that "the boys upstairs" had mastered the languages of those they contacted by means of their close proximity
 to Earth over a period of 2,000 years, but in cases where difficulties arose, they made use of a translating device, which they were helping us
to develop. 

p. 74: On 28 October 1976, Dr Diaz noticed an unusual man waiting in his office. He was short -- about 5' 2" -- with extraordinarily white skin,
 "almost the color of milk." The stranger requested a physical exam ... because, he said, he "traveled a lot" and therefore required regular
 medical examinations. 

The man was normal in every way apart from being hairless, with the exception of his head -- where a small growth of black hair encircled
 the temples -- and the eyes. He noticed that the color of the man's eyes was "almost impossible to describe ... like violet," and that the iris
 was wider than normal. 

Suddenly the man explained that the true purpose of his visit was to impart some important information: 

"I am NOT from this planet [Earth], but don't be nervous. It is necessary that you people [Earth humans] recognize that MANY of us
 [extraterrestrials] are here INTERMINGLED with you [on Earth] and trying to help because you are very close to having tremendous problems on your planet...." 

pp. 76-7: [Author Tim Good speaking]: A colleague of mine learned from a scientist friend in the 1970s that the director of a German/U.S. space
research center (located in W Germany) was of ALLEGEDLY EXTRATERRESTRIAL ORIGIN. This knowledge was restricted to a quorum of scientists at the base, and the information apparently supplied by the director [an extraterrestrial] proved to be invaluable in their research effort. But I have to add that my colleague had the opportunity of meeting the director in London in the 1980s ... and is satisfied as to the director's [off-world] "credentials." 

Even Germany's great space pioneer Dr Hermann Oberth is reported to have endorsed the suggestion of ALIEN LIAISON. "We canNOT take the credit for our record advancement in CERTAIN scientific fields alone; we have been helped," he is quoted as having said. When asked by whom, he simply replied, "The people of OTHER WORLDS." 

"ALIEN BASE: EARTH's ENCOUNTERS WITH EXTRATERRESTRIALS" – By Timothy
Good, Copyright © 1998, ISBN# 0712678123
/
 http://www.amazon.co.uk/Alien-Base-Earths-Encounters-Extraterrestrials/dp/0099255022   

pp. 41-2: Both men were extremely good-looking, with perfect, almost transluscent skin, and appeared to be very youthful and strong, Becoming
 suspicious about their origin, the witness asked where they came from. "We live on a distant planet," they replied, pointing to the sky. 

p. 43: They said they spoke many of our languages, and were continually improving their knowledge of them. But WHY were they coming to Earth?  "As you have noticed, WE LOOK PRETTY MUCH AS YOU DO, so WE MINGLE WITHYOUR PEOPLE, gather information, leave instructions or give help where needed," they told Wartena. They further explained that they were monitoring the "progression or retrogression" of our society. 

p. 153: [George] Adamski was the first to proclaim that SOME PEOPLE FROM OTHER PLANETS WERE ACTUALLY LIVING and WORKING AMONG US -- illegal aliens as it were -- and stated that his contacts often took place in the anonymous surroundings of restaurants and hotel lobbies.  

p. 154: [Author Tim Good speaking]: After he had refolded the paper, I felt the time had come to ask him telepathically if he really was from
another planet, and if so, would he please identify himself by placing his right index finger on the right side of his nose. The response was
immediate and dramatic, for no sooner had I transmitted the thought than he did precisely that!

p. 178: In appearance, the man was rather unusual, said Menger: "He was a fine looking man. Although there was something definitely unusual
about him, he could have passed -- and did -- for an ordinary GI. The singularity of the man probably was not because of the finely chiseled
features and the luminous, almost liquid quality of his eyes, but in the communication I felt. I could sense that the man was kind, wise, [and]
emotionally and spiritually developed beyond anyone I had ever met." 

p. 376: PROJECTED IMAGES OF EARTH's HISTORY 

The entities suddenly rose from their seats, explaining that they wanted to show her how familiar they were with Earth's history. "We are going
to make a projection for you," they announced. Curiously, although a thick fog had developed -- and it was chilly in Sospel at that time of
year -- Mme X did not feel cold. Now joined by three (3) other quasi-humans, holding black spheres in their hands, she and the others
 watched as predominantly sepia-colored images, about three (3) meters high, were projected on to the fog without ANY visible beams of light
 emitting from the spheres. 

The "film" which ran from our prehistory to WWII, traced our wars, sometimes stopping at individual "frames." Mme X told them she was
 uninterested in wars, to which they responded that armed conflicts were all humans knew about, and that they themselves only knew this planet
 [Earth] in that light. 

pp. 77-8: Finally, Fry discussed the confusing variety of alien species with which we are are confronted. 

"Probably most of the confusion in the field has been caused by the need of many people to force all of the UFO phenomenon into one hole. 

"Each individual case is an individual event that should be judged on its own merits. To think that all beings visiting this planet come from
the SAME PLACE -- with the SAME PURPOSE -- and in the SAME TYPE of craft, is like standing on the corner of 42nd Street and Broadway,
 watching all the people go by and assuming they all come from the same place, with the same purpose, and the same habits. 

"We live in a galaxy that teems with life and intelligence in every direction -- once we get our egos under control enough to admit that
 fact. We're just one of a series of evolutionary products -- and by NO means the leading one...."
 ------------------------------------------ 
– Background on The DELTA PAVONIS Star System – 

http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Delta_Pavonis/ 
 http://www.solstation.com/stars/dpavonis.htm   

 http://www.stargazing.net/David/constel/constel/pavo.html  

 http://www.eldacur.com/~brons/NerdCorner/StarGen/DEL-Pav-91303.html  

 http://members.nova.org/~sol/chview/chv5.htm  

MAP/ATLAS OF THE STAR SYSTEMS WITHIN 20 LIGHT-YEARS OF EARTH: 

 http://www.atlasoftheuniverse.com/20lys.html  

LIST OF THE STAR SYSTEMS WITHIN 20 LIGHT-YEARS OF EARTH: 

 http://www.atlasoftheuniverse.com/nearstar.html  
/
 http://www.astro.wisc.edu/~dolan/constellations/constellations/Pavo.html   

The DELTA PAVONIS Star System Fast Facts: 

Yellow-Orange Main Sequence Dwarf Star 
 Distance: 19.92 Light-Years from Earth
Age: 1.399 Billion Years 
Spectral class: G8
 Visual magnitude: 3.55 
Luminosity: 1.231 * Sun
 Mass: 0.98 * Sun
Diameter: 1.188 * Sun 
 Radial velocity: -21.7 km/sec 

DELTA PAVONIS is a YELLOW-ORANGE STAR and is older than our SUN, but is
very similar to it. YELLOW STARS are one of the main targets in the the
search of EARTH-LIKE PLANETS and life. 

NOTEWORTHY: DELTA PAVONIS has been identified by Maggie Turnbull and
Jill Tarter of the SETI Institute as the "Best SETI target" in a survey
 of nearby stars. DELTA PAVONIS is the nearest SUN-LIKE STAR that is not
a member of a binary or multiple star system. 

STARS and PLANETARY SYSTEMS IN SCIENCE FICTION 

HISTORICAL NOTATIONS: The notion that there might be inhabited EXTRASOLAR PLANETS may be traced at least as far back as Giordano Bruno, who, in his De l'infinito universo e mondi ("Concerning the Infinite Universe and Worlds," 1584), declared that "Innumerable suns exist; innumerable EARTHS revolve about these suns ... Living beings inhabit these worlds." 

One of these is Voltaire's Micromégas (1752), which features a traveller from SIRIUS. As science fiction became established in the
early 20th Century, destinations such as the MOON, MARS, VENUS or other bodies within the SOLAR SYSTEM became stereotyped. 

BACKGROUND: Authors began to invoke a variety of mechanisms for SUPERLUMINAL TRAVEL and placed their stories on PLANETS in SYSTEMS around other STARS, a move giving them freedom to construct more EXOTIC FICTIONAL WORLDS and themes. 

Although some of the STARS named in works of science fiction are purely imaginary, many authors and artists have preferred to use the names of REAL STARS which are well known to astronomers, either through being notably bright in the sky as seen from EARTH or being relatively near to EARTH. The SOLAR SYSTEM was already a billion years old before life appeared on Earth. 

"DELTA PAVONIS" in Science Fiction Writing,
 Popular Literature and Broadcasting: 
"DELTA PAVONIS" (1990), a science fiction novel by John Maddox Roberts and Eric Kotani. 
/ 
 http://www.amazon.com/Delta-Pavonis-John-Maddox-Roberts/dp/0671720201   

FLASH NOTE: Astrophysicist Dr Yoji Kondo often writes with the pseudonym "Eric Kotani" under which he has written five (5) science fiction books. His specialized research interests are binary stars, the LOCAL INTERSTELLAR MEDIUM and relativistic physics. Dr Kondo is the author of the widely acclaimed "INTERSTELLAR TRAVEL and MULTI-GENERATIONAL SPACE SHIPS" and is a 5th degree black-belt in judo and 6th degree black-belt in aikido. 
/
 http://www.amazon.com/Interstellar-Travel-Multi-Generational-Space-Ships/dp/1896522998   

 http://www.balticon.org/Balticon32/bio3.html  

"DUNE" (1965), is a novel by Frank Herbert. The planet CALADAN is the third world of the DELTA PAVONIS star system. 

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Caladan  

"DUNE: A Whisper of CALADAN SEAS" is a short story and rehash of the Brian Herbert novel "The ROAD to DUNE." Planet CALADAN is a sea-covered ancestral home world. 
/ 
 http://www.amazon.com/Dune-Novel-Series-Timeline/lm/R2J44GACFT4NE1   

Paul McAuley's "The QUIET WAR" mentions a rocky terrestrial planet called Tierra within the DELTA PAVONIS star system. 
/
 http://www.amazon.com/Quiet-War-Paul-McAuley-GollanczF/dp/0575079339   

"ON MY WAY TO PARADISE" (1989), a novel by Dave Wolverton. The war-ravaged planet BAKER -- a satellite of the DELTA PAVONIS star system -- is the world on which the story reaches its climax in 2300 AD. 

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/On_My_Way_to_Paradise  

"REVELATION SPACE" (2000), novel by Alastair Reynolds. The planet Resurgam and the neutron star Hades are part of the DELTA PAVONIS star system. 
/
 http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0441009425/hobbyspace   

In Frederick Pohl's "The VOICES OF HEAVEN," the protagonist, Barry Di Hoa is frozen and sent aboard a colony ship to the planet PAVA in the DELTA PAVONIS star system. 
/ 
 http://www.amazon.com/Voices-Heaven-Frederik-Pohl/dp/0312856431   

Desmond Ravenstone's "ATRAXA TRILOGY" is based on the second planet orbiting DELTA PAVONIS, called "Terranova" by the Atraxa and "New Earth" by the Kerem. 
/
 http://www.amazon.ca/Land-Pleasure-Book-Atraxa-Trilogy/dp/1411658930/ref=sr_1_3/178-2787375-6683136?ie=UTF8&s= books&qid=1271795907&sr=1-3  

TRANSFORMERS (1983) animated television series, "The Big Broadcast of 2006" episode. DELTA PAVONIS IV is the home of a race of humanoid cats. A malfunctioning hypnotic Quintesson signal drives the cats to attack a neighboring planet of humanoid dogs. 

 http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0809068/  [1986] 

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Transformers_%28TV_series%29  

The novelette "SUNDOWNER SHEILA" by F. Gwynplaine MacIntyre (published in Interzone 202, February 2006) takes place on Terra Nova, a planet orbiting DELTA PAVONIS in synchronous rotation with almost no libration, so that one hemisphere of the planet is in perpetual darkness, and the other hemisphere (known as Nevernight) is in perpetual daylight. "Sundowner Sheila" is narrated by a synthetic human who is assigned to a longitude on Terra Nova where DELTA PAVONIS is permanently at zenith, so that the sun is always directly overhead and the time of day is always noon. 

"The CELESTIAL AVIARY of OUR GALAXY": Deep in the southern sky lies a celestial AVIARY -- five (5) constellations representing exotic or mythical BIRDS flocking around the south celestial pole. Grus the Crane and Phoenix, the great mythical bird that rose from the ashes of its
 predecessor. Three other BIRDS lie closer still to the southern pole: Tucana the Toucan, Apus the Bird of Paradise and PAVO The PEACOCK. All five (5) constellations were created by the German celestialcartographer Johann Bayer in 1603. Only two -- Phoenix and PAVO -- are
mentioned in classical mythology. 
 ------------------------------------------
"The UFO-NEW AGE DIRECTORY OF ALL THINGS ALIEN, SPOOKY and SUPERNATURAL! 

 http://www.VictorTheWizard.info/  

 http://www.VictorTheWizard.info/ufodirectory.txt  
------------------------------------------
 4,000 UFO and PARANORMAL LINKS! 

 http://www.startinglinks.net/cydoniaufo/7.htm  

ALIEN ABDUCTION, EXPERIENCE & RESEARCH, MARILYN J RUBEN's: 

 http://www.abduct.com/  

ALIEN ABDUCTIONS, UFO SIGHTINGS and CROP CIRCLE PHENOMENA: 

 http://www.iwasabducted.com/  

ALIEN EXPERIENCES: CASE STUDIES OF REAL EXPERIENCES WITH ETs, BARBARA LAMB and NADINE LaCHANCE's: 

 http://www.alienexperiences.com/  

ALIEN HUNTER, DERREL SIMS': 

 http://www.alienhunter.org/

The ALIEN JIGSAW: TRUE EXPERIENCES OF ALIEN ABDUCTION, KATHARINA WILSON's: 

 http://www.alienjigsaw.com/  

ALIENS, UFOs, EXTRATERRESTRIAL CONTACT & PSYCHIC PHENOMENA: 

 http://www.geohanover.com/  

AILEEN GAROUTTE's EXPERIENCER BLOG: SUBMIT YOUR OWN 'OFF WORLD' ENCOUNTER or READ ABOUT OTHERs' ENCOUNTERS WITH OUT-OF-THIS-WORLD CREATURES! 

 http://ufoexperiences.blogspot.com

 http://thechurchofufology.blogspot.com/

 http://ufoexperiences.blogspot.com/2006/08/light-waves.html  

AUSTRALIAN CLOSE ENCOUNTER RESEARCH NETWORK: 

 http://www.acern.com.au/

JOURNAL of ABDUCTION-ENCOUNTER RESEARCH [JAR]: 

 http://www.jarmag.com/  

REPTOID RESEARCH CENTER, JOHN RHODES': 

 http://www.reptoids.com/  

The ROSWELL FILES: 

 http://www.roswellfiles.com/  

"ROSWELL INVESTIGATOR," TOM CAREY and DON SCHMITT's: 

 http://www.roswellinvestigator.com/  

ROSWELL PROOF, DAVID RUDIAK's: 

 http://www.roswellproof.com/  

The ROSWELL UFO MUSEUM: 

 http://www.roswellufomuseum.com/

UFO CONSPIRACY, Capt ROBERT M COLLINS', Ret USAF: 

 http://www.ufoconspiracy.com/  

 http://www.ufoconspiracy.com/reports/kennedy-vm.htm  

 http://www.ufoconspiracy.com/reports/kennedy_assassins_.htm  

UFO DIGEST: VIDEO PROOF OF UFOs, ALIEN ABDUCTIONS & THE PARANORMAL, DIRK VANDER PLOEG's: 

 http://www.ufodigest.com/  

UFO EVIDENCE: 

 http://www.ufoevidence.org/  

UFO FOCUS NEW ZEALAND [UFOCUS NZ] SIGHTING INVESTIGATION, RESEARCH, 'CLOSE ENCOUNTER' SUPPORT and RESOURCE NETWORK, SUZY HANSEN's: 

 http://www.ufocusnz.org.nz  

"The UFO HUNTERS" WEB SITES: 

The History Channel: 

 http://www.history.com/minisites/ufohunters/  

The Sci-Fi Channel: 

 http://www.ny-spi.com/  
 ------------------------------------------
OPEN MINDS FORUM, BRENDAN BURTON's, THE PROGRESSIVE SCEPTICS & PARA-POLITICS: 

 http://www.openminds.co.nr/

 http://www.openmindsforum.com/

 http://lucianarchy.proboards.com/

 http://lucianarchy.proboards.com/index.cgi

 http://lucianarchy.proboards.com/index.cgi?board=projectserpo
 ------------------------------------------
– Written, Researched and Compiled by VICTOR MARTINEZ –


 
 

Release 34a
Delta Pavonis 

 http://www.serpo.org/release34.php

 http://www.serpo.org/release34a.php

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Delta_Pavonis

 http://www.solstation.com/stars/dpavonis.htm

 http://www.stargazing.net/David/constel/constel/pavo.html

 http://www.eldacur.com/~brons/NerdCorner/StarGen/DEL-Pav-91303.html

 http://members.nova.org/~sol/chview/chv5.htm

MAP/ATLAS OF THE STAR SYSTEMS WITHIN 20 LIGHT-YEARS OF EARTH:

 http://www.atlasoftheuniverse.com/20lys.html

LIST OF THE STAR SYSTEMS WITHIN 20 LIGHT-YEARS OF EARTH:

 http://www.atlasoftheuniverse.com/nearstar.html

 http://www.astro.wisc.edu/~dolan/constellations/constellations/Pavo.html

NOTE: Scroll DOWN to view all six (6) IMAGES!

 

IMAGE #1 = Close-Up View of the astronomical listing for DELTA PAVONIS, 10th entry down

Delta Pavonis

 

DELTA PAVONIS Star System Fast Facts:

Yellow-Orange Main Sequence Dwarf Star
 Distance: 19.92 Light-Years from Earth
Age: 1.399 Billion Years
Spectral class: G8
 Visual magnitude: 3.55
Luminosity: 1.231 * Sun
 Mass: 0.98 * Sun
Diameter: 1.188 * Sun
 Radial velocity: -21.7 km/sec

 

IMAGE #2 = Master List of The Nearest STAR SYSTEMS to Earth

Delta Pavonis

 

IMAGE #3 = Star System DELTA PAVONIS, 2nd to the LAST listing

Delta Pavonis

 

CELESTIAL NOTE: DELTA PAVONIS is a YELLOW-ORANGE STAR and is older than our SUN, but is very similar to it. YELLOW STARS are one of the main targets in the the search of EARTH-LIKE PLANETS and life.

 

IMAGE #4 = STAR SYSTEMS WITHIN 20 LIGHT-YEARS: There are a total of 83 known star systems within this distance containing 109 stars and 8 brown dwarfs. This is a negative version of this map, which might be easier to print.

Delta Pavonis

 http://www.atlasoftheuniverse.com/w20lys.gif  [negative version]

 http://www.atlasoftheuniverse.com/20lys.html

 

IMAGE #5 = The DELTA PAVONIS Star System in popular science fiction literature:

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Caladan

"DUNE: A Whisper of CALADAN SEAS" is a short story and rehash of the Brian Herbert novel "The ROAD to DUNE." CALADAN, is the third planet of DELTA PAVONIS where the surface of the planet is predominantly covered with water. In the novel, Planet CALADAN is a sea-covered ancestral homeworld. The desert planet ARRAKIS is pictured here BELOW.

Dune

 http://www.amazon.com/Dune-Novel-Series-Timeline/lm/R2J44GACFT4NE1

 

NOTE: In the SUN's immediate neighborhood, there's about one (1) star for every 280 cubic light-years. So there should be about ...

1,875 stars within 50 light-years
15,000 stars within 100 light-years
1,875,000 stars within 500 light-years

 

LOCAL GALACTIC NEIGHBORHOOD: DELTA PAVONIS has been identified by Maggie Turnbull and Jill Tarter of the SETI Institute as the "Best SETI target" in a survey of nearby stars. DELTA PAVONIS is the nearest SUN-LIKE STAR that is NOT a member of a binary or multiple star system.
The distances between stars are ENORMOUS. The distance from the SUN to PROXIMA CENTAURI is 4.22 light-years which is equal to 40,000,000,000,000 kilometres. Our fastest space probes would take 60,000 years to travel this distance.

 

IMAGE #6 = "DELTA PAVONIS" (1990), novel by John Maddox Roberts and Eric Kotani.

Delta Pavonis

 http://www.amazon.com/Delta-Pavonis-John-Maddox-Roberts/dp/0671720201


  
 

Release 34b
"The Invaders" (TV)

 http://www.serpo.org/release34.php

 http://www.serpo.org/release34b.php

NOTE: Scroll DOWN to enjoy all 20 (twenty) IMAGES!

"The INVADERS," are ALIEN BEINGS from a dying planet in another galaxy. Their destination: the EARTH. Their purpose: to make it "THEIR" world by taking HUMAN FORM.

The show's hero, architect David Vincent [Roy Thinnes] must convince a disbelieving world that the ALIEN INVASION NIGHTMARE has already begun. In the final episode, Vincent attempts to warn a U.S. senator that a governmental official is an ALIEN in, "Inquisition."

Space Invaders Space Invaders Space Invaders 

 

IMAGE #4 = Alleged PLEIADIAN alien craft over Switzerland from the BILLY MEIER Collection at:

 http://www.billymeier.com/  /  http://www.theyfly.com/ 

I want to believe 

 

IMAGES #5 and #10 = RE-creation of an ALIEN ABDUCTION

Space Invaders Space Invaders 

 

IMAGE #6 = HUMAN-LOOKING ALIEN leaves spacecraft, the storyline of"The INVADERS"

Space Invaders

 

IMAGE #12 = Some UFOlogists believe that a sentient SAURIAN RACE naturally evolved from the bird-like dinosaur TROODON during the late stage of the CRETACEOUS PERIOD of the MESOZOIC ERA, departed Earth -- perhaps because of the asteroid ELE [Extinction Level Event] -- and they have now
 returned "home" to Sol III [See corresponding IMAGE #42 in "5 of 5"].

Troodon

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Troodon 
 http://www.subversiveelement.com/Aliens_Dinosauroids.html

See "STAR TREK: VOYAGER" Sci-Fi TV Series "Distant Origin" Season #3, Episode #165 which states that REPTILIAN ALIENS naturally evolved from Earth's DINOSAURS.

VIDEO: "Distant Origin" ["1 of 5" segments]
 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=E1aZTrjMovA&feature=related

 

IMAGES #7, #8 ("David Vincent" played by Roy Thinnes), #9, #14, #15, #16 and #20 = Scenes from "The INVADERS"

Space Invaders Space Invaders 
Space Invaders Space Invaders 
Space Invaders Space Invaders 
Space Invaders   

 
 

Release 34c
"The Invaders" (TV)

 http://www.serpo.org/release34.php

 http://www.serpo.org/release34c.php

NOTE: Scroll DOWN to enjoy all 11 (eleven) IMAGES!

- "The INVADERS" VIDEOS! - "The INVADERS" Opening Titles and Credits:
 http://www.youtube.com/watch#!v=uOLGrXOtuwQ&feature=related

 

IMAGES #21, #23, #24, #27 and #32 = Scenes from "The INVADERS"

Space Invaders Space Invaders 
Space Invaders Space Invaders 
Space Invaders   

 

IMAGE #25 = Still Photo from the ABC TV Series "V"

Space Invaders

 

IMAGE #29 = "ABDUCTEE" looking down on EARTH from an ALIEN cruiser craft during a break from physical "examinations" from their ALIEN abductors

Space Invaders

 

IMAGE #31 = Have one or more EXTRATERRESTRIAL RACES visited Earth in in its distant past? The History Channel presents ...

 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=GvU1fuOkOHg 
 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=E3y5h24sWuw&feature=related

 
 



34d
 
 34e
                 
 
 
Release 34d
"The Invaders" (TV)

 http://www.serpo.org/release34.php

 http://www.serpo.org/release34d.php

NOTE: Scroll DOWN to enjoy all nine (9) IMAGES!

"The INVADERS" Commercial Promos #1 #2 and #3:
 http://www.youtube.com/watch#!v=zNtsgXRuU5M&feature=related 
 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BYpd6MdRwss 
 http://www.youtube.com/watch#!v=Qr-qGkVBUoM&feature=related

 

IMAGE #34 = Conspiracy researcher DAVID ICKE believes that many world leaders are actually REPTILIAN ALIENS under their outer skin including Sec'y of State HILLARY CLINTON. His basic premise is that human beings are the result of a breeding program conducted by a RACE of REPTILIANS called ANUNNAKI from the planet DRACO.

Space Invaders

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Reptilians 
 http://www.davidicke.com/ 
 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/David_Icke

DRACO GROUP Constellation:  http://antwrp.gsfc.nasa.gov/apod/ap090701.html 

 

IMAGE #35 = ALIEN ABDUCTION depicted in the movie "The FOURTH KIND"

Space Invaders

 

IMAGES #36, #37 #38, #39, and #40 = Scenes from "The INVADERS"

Space Invaders Space Invaders 
Space Invaders Space Invaders 
Space Invaders   

 

IMAGE #41 = JOLENE BLALOCK from "Star Trek: Enterprise"

Space Invaders



 

Release 34e
"The Invaders" (TV)

 http://www.serpo.org/release34.php

 http://www.serpo.org/release34e.php

NOTE: Scroll DOWN to enjoy all eight (8) IMAGES!

"The INVADERS" DVD Release Promos:
 http://www.youtube.com/watch#!v=TDj7zYPe8qY&feature=related 
 http://www.youtube.com/watch#!v=e327uf2_Hos&feature=related

"The INVADERS" Sample Episode:
 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=TIa5ocx1vY4

 

IMAGE #42 = Some UFOlogists believe that a sentient SAURIAN RACE naturally evolved during the last stage of the CRETACEOUS PERIOD of the MESOZOIC ERA, departed Earth -- perhaps because of the asteroid ELE [Extinction Level Event] --and have now returned "home" to Sol III.
[See related IMAGE #12 in "1 of 5"]

whatever

 http://www.subversiveelement.com/Aliens_Dinosauroids.html

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/File:Dinosauroid.jpg

 http://lg.wikipedia.org/wiki/File:Dinosauroid_Reptoid.gif

See "STAR TREK: VOYAGER" Sci-Fi TV Series "Distant Origin" Season #3, Episode #165 which states that REPTILIAN ALIENS naturally evolved from Earth's DINOSAURS.

VIDEO: "Distant Origin" ["5 of 5" segments] 
 http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dGtO9ZH94vY&feature=related

 

IMAGE #43 = Many conspiracy theorists believe that some EARTH HUMANS have shapeshifted from their original REPTILIAN ALIEN form

whatever

 http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Shapeshifting

 

IMAGES #44, #45 and #46 = Scenes from "The INVADERS"

whatever whatever whatever 

 

IMAGES #47 and #48 = "STRANGER AT The PENTAGON" – By Dr Frank E Stranges

Stranger Stranger 

 

 http://www.amazon.com/Stranger-at-Pentagon-Frank-Stranges/dp/0965578607

BOOK SYNOPSIS: Dr Frank E Stranges -- an evangelical minister -- claims he was escorted inside the PENTAGON where he met a HUMAN-LOOKING BEING from another planet. The ALIEN ENTITY had NO finger prints, could read minds and had a space suit that could NOT be cut nor burned. Dr Stranges claims the being -- known as VAL THOR -- had a spiritual message to give to earth if its inhabitants would only listen.

 

IMAGE #49 = The definitive history of UFOlogy during this time period written by noted historian Richard M Dolan

Dolan

"UFOs and The NATIONAL SECURITY STATE: The Cover-Up Exposed, 1973-1991,
Vol. 2" – By Richard M Dolan, Copyright © September 2009,
 ISBN# 978-0967799513, $26.95

 http://keyholepublishing.com/

 http://www.amazon.com/Cover-Up-Exposed-1973-1991-National-Security/dp/0967799511

Credit: Cover art by Mark Brabant (Illustrator)

 
   
SECRETS OF THE MOJAVE

In reference to Zeta Reticuli, from where many of the Grays are said to ... 1974 article 'THE ZETA RETICULI INCIDENT', describing the Hill abduction, ...
www.greatdreams.com/mojave.htm 

 SIRIUS - THE DOG STAR - THE LOST AND MISSING STAR  
Also known as Zeta Reticuli from the Zeta Reticulan star system (the ... Their facial features are very similar to the Zeta Reticuli greys and are of the ...
www.greatdreams.com/dogstar.htm  
John Lear - UFOs and Aliens  
The home of the aliens were described as being a star in the Constellation of Orion, Barnards star, and Zeta Reticuli 1&2. ...
www.greatdreams.com/John-Lear.htm  
Reptilians - The Connection to Dulce - by Branton  
Barney and his wife Betty were abducted by gray-skinned humanoids "from Zeta Reticuli". HOWEVER, one of the 'beings' on the craft was described by Barney ...
www.greatdreams.com/reptilian-humanoids.htm 

 

 

 Alien Abduction Classifications  
Types - Zeta Reticuli Star System - (maps). Alien Races and Classes. ... www.greatdreams.com/zeta.htm. DREAMS OF ALIENS AND UFOS ... It was in a dream, ...
www.greatdreams.com/ufos/alien-abduction-technology.htm 

UFOS AND ALIENS - THE BIG PICTURE  
... and propaganda program intentionally orchestrated by the Zeta Reticuli Visitor races and their cohorts within the leagues of human illuminati faction. ...
www.greatdreams.com/picture.htm  


The Light and the Shadow  
It came from the Zetas, the Zeta Reticuli who are from the Orion star system, ... What’s happening, right now, is the Zeta factions that these agreements ...
www.greatdreams.com/shadow.htm 


ET EARTH BASE; SECRET SPACE STATION  
The ETs are not breaking the US Government- Zeta treaties, but the Government has broken treaties by mistreating ETs, and trying to fire on UFOs." ...
www.greatdreams.com/etsecret.htm - 15k - Cached - Similar pages 


Extraterrestrial-Aliens.com - The Alien Presence On Earth.  
Later in 1954 the race of aliens, known as Greys, from Zeta Reticuli area in space, who had been orbiting the equator, landed at Holloman Air Force Base. ...
www.greatdreams.com/1953-aliens.htm 

 MAY, 2003, THINGS TO WATCH FOR THIS SUMMER  
... Neuman affirmed that yes, he knew my departed friend Dr. Michael Wolf and Dr. Wolf's frequent Star Visitor companion, "Kolta", a Zeta Reticulan. ...
www.greatdreams.com/may-2003.htm 

 CHRISTIANS AGAINST UFOS AND ALIENS  
Areas identified as Orion, the Pleiades, Zeta Reticuli, etc., which are not really distinct geographical locations, but which make convenient names that ...
www.greatdreams.com/christians-against-aliens.htm 


UFO PROPULSION SYSTEMS  
He said he was told the aliens arrived in the vessel from the fourth planet of the binary stellar system Zeta Reticuli 2. ...
www.greatdreams.com/ufos/propulsion.htm  


UFO CULTS  
She was initially abducted by a negative "intruder"' faction of Zeta Reticuli greys because they were interested in harvesting her special encoded genes and ...
www.greatdreams.com/ufos/ufo-cults.htm 

 PERSONAL AND SPECIAL UFO REPORTS  
Zeta Reticuli Star System, 11. Nature of the Alien, 12. Government and the Grays - Part 1. 13. Government and the Grays - Part 2, 14. ...
www.greatdreams.com/uforprts.htm 


Alien Eyes 

Coming Attractions - The whole Truth  

ET History and Sexuality  

FIGU Bulletin - 1996  

Interplanetary Symbols  

Robert Anton Wilson  

The Lyssa Royal Home Page  

The Physics of Flying Saucers  

The Underground Base at Dulce  

Vault 2078 pictures  

Zeta 2 Reticuli  

Extraterrestrials and our World  

Grey's vs MJ-12 vs Earth  

Stanton Friedman lecture  

Why are they here?  

Aliens, Extraterrestrials and A Way To Perceive Them and Ourselves  

What Does An Alien Look Like? Ground Zero

 The Great Flying Saucer Myth by Kelly L. Segraves
 - A Very Strange Testimony
 





TO:  EXTRATERRESTRIALS AND UFOS  

TO:  ADRIAN OROZCO JIMENEZ GAMEZ 








 



 Autoblog Logo 



    





Research
Shop
News & Reviews
Ownership
Videos
Forum
 


 



+



 Shop 




New Cars 


 
Select a Make(e.g. Mazda) 


 
Select a Model(e.g. Mazda3) 


 Go 



































 / Video
 / See the dangers of texting while driving in video game format
  

Video
 May 12th 2015 at 6:50PM
 4


See the dangers of texting while driving in video game format




  Chris Bruce  

We all know the dangers of texting while driving, but studies indicate that the vast majority of people continue to do it anyway. Now, a video game called SMS Racing gives players a firsthand experience of the perils of messing with their phone while behind the wheel.

 The goal, like most racing games, is to cross the finish line first. During an event, however, texts pop up and players have 10 seconds to answer them. According to Polygon, if you run out of time, you lose a "friend." Mess up on three of them, and it's game over.

 While the message here is serious, SMS Racing keeps the mood light. Icons pop up from other cars when their drivers are texting, which would be a great feature in real life, and the physics model lets the vehicles bounce all over the place. To make this more immersive, the experience is programmed for Samsung's Gear VR goggles, which puts the action right in front of a player's eyes. If you have the necessary equipment, the game can be downloaded for free, here.

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

News Source: Polygon, VR Jam, Turbo Button via YouTube

Motorsports Toys/Games Videos Racing game games samsung samsung gear samsung gear vr sms sms racing texting texting while driving video video game video games virtual reality vr 

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------





















--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Login
 



































































  
  
  
  
  
 





  
  
  
  
  
 






  
  
  
  
  
  
  
 





  
  
  
  
  
  
 









































Post Reply 

 























4 Comments 
Best  



    
Andre Neves



Andre Neves
 22 Hours Ago
 



Wow what a waste of time that video was.  Thanks AB.  *thumbs up*


0       
 
  Report  
  Reply  
 



    
trzjax



trzjax
 22 Hours Ago
 




Thanks Obama... lol



-1       
 
  Report  
  Reply  
 


    
Abe



Abe
 22 Hours Ago
 


@trzjax

OBAMA DOESN'T DRIVE HE HAS HIS PRESIDENTIAL LIMO


0      
 
   Report  
  Reply  
 



    
Nemebean



Nemebean
 4 Hours Ago
 


@trzjax


For the downvoters, "Thanks Obama" was one of the text messages in the video.  I'm guessing that's what trzjax is referring to.  (Either that or it's a somewhat hilarious coincidence).



0      
 
   Report  
  Reply  
 



 



TRENDING 
•2016 Dodge Viper ACR Pricing
•Ford F-150 Recall
•Vehicles That Last 200,000 Miles
•
•
•
  





 






Advertisement 







Follow Us

 
 
 
 
 
 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------





Original Video Series




Translogic 176: Rocket Mobility Tomahawk all-terrain wheelchair



The List: Best of driving schools



The List #0691: Drive a Lamborghini

View more 




Popular News Stories


 

Honda, Nissan, and Toyota expand Takata... 

 

California boy jumps from stolen car and lives



Mother and daughter survive car sliding under truck trailer

 Advertisement   These 10 Vehicles Have Been Deemed the Deadliest on the Road Sponsored 




From Our Partners







  
The 10 Best Engines for 2015 


  
6 Real Cars That Look Like the Batmobile 




  
Chevy Announces The 2016 Chevrolet Camaro Release Date 


  
5 Car Brands to Buy And 5 to Avoid From Consumer Reports 







Research


 

2015 Ford Mustang
 MSRP: $23,800 - $46,170
 

2015 Toyota Highlander
 MSRP: $29,665 - $44,040
 

2015 Honda Accord
 MSRP: $22,105 - $33,630
 

2015 Jeep Cherokee
 MSRP: $23,095 - $30,895
 

2015 Mazda Mazda3
 MSRP: $16,945 - $25,545
View More  






Advertisement 


 


 



Check These Out
 




  


Samsung emerges as Apple's chief auto... 


 


Drivers recognize their bad habits, but... 


  


Dealer repair shops increasingly turning... 


  


Streetpong is the cure for pedestrian... 


  


Aussie retailers pulling updated... 


  


Just when you thought Grand Theft... 
 


Videos
 





 
Xcar goes inside Williams Advanced EngineeringWatch Video
 

 
Victory Motorcycles officially enters TT Zero [w/video]Watch Video
 

 
Hank the Autodog takes a ride in the long-term 2014 Jeep CherokeeWatch Video
 

 
Petrolicious relives history with Stirling Moss and his Mercedes SLRWatch Video
 

 
1944 P-51D Mustang is the perfect project plane for WWII enthusiasts [w/video]Watch Video
 

 
Ronin 47 motorcycles ride by Jay Leno's GarageWatch Video
 

 
Translogic 176: Rocket Mobility Tomahawk all-terrain wheelchairWatch Video
 

 
Watch the USMC's F-35B hover, take off, and landWatch Video
 

 
Magnus Walker shows us how driving in LA is doneWatch Video
 








--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
 







New Vehicles 
Car Finder
Smart Buy Program
Compare Cars


Used Vehicles 
Classifieds
Certified Pre-Owned
Book Values


News & Video 
Auto Shows
Autoblog Green
Autoblog Podcasts
Translogic
Car Club USA
The List


Help 
Tip Us
Feedback
Sitemap
About Us
Archive


Legal 
Terms of Service
Privacy Policy
Trademarks
About Ads


Our Apps 
Autoblog iPhone
Autoblog 360 iPad
Autoblog 360 Android





 
 
 
 
 
 © Copyright 2015 AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved 

share 
facebook  
twitter  
google+  
email 
</B>
[OWNER:ADRIAN.OROZCO.JIMENEZ.ACOSTA.GAMEZ]
[ALLRIGHTZREZERVED]

  
  
  



















































    

  
TO:  ALIEN ABDUCTION AND UFO REPORTS
           Downloadable and printable text files  

TO:  CONSPIRACY AND MIND CONTROL  

TO:  MAIN INDEX  




